Lance_Louis 237676 246
One of the top 10 tight end recruits in the country when he came to San Diego, --NAME-- grew into a late-round pick after one season starting at right tackle for the Aztecs. 
After starting at the end of his sophomore year at tight end, --NAME-- missed the 2006 season with injury, then played as a reserve at guard in 2007. 
His combination of speed and strength impress teams despite his lack of experience on the line. --NAME-- is a bit reminiscent of San Diego Chargers fullback/tight end Brandon Manumaleuna, so some teams may consider using him in a similar role because of his blocking and receiving skills.
2006: Suffered a torn ACL in his left knee during the team's second scrimmage of spring drills in 2006. Underwent surgery and missed the entire season.
Considered one of the top 10 tight end prospects in the country by Rivals.com   All-Southwest region honoree by SuperPrep as one of the top 40 (Number 32) players in talent-rich --NAME--iana   Caught 27 passes for more than 500 yards and seven touchdowns and credited with 63 tackles, including nine sacks on the defensive side   Basketball standout who helped Landry to the state semifinals as a senior.
Excellent athleticism and straight-line speed for the position. Able to lead running backs into the second level and beyond when pulling across the line. Gives great effort blocking downfield, at times going 30-40 yards across the field to knock out defenders. Plays with a mean streak. Will hit two or three targets in space and will finish open-field blocks by putting his defender on the ground. Underrated strength at the point of attack, and is well-built in the upper body. Moves well laterally, extends his arms and has a solid punch to keep defenders at bay in pass protection. Good explosion from his stance, and stays low to move his man in goal-line situations.
Inexperienced as an offensive lineman. Should move inside at the next level as he lacks prototypical height for a tackle. Has gained 35-40 pounds in a little more than a year, and must prove he can maintain 300-plus pounds on his frame. Could gain strength in his lower body if staying on the line. Needs work on his kick-slide and footwork consistency, as he will get beat when relying on his reach and pure athleticism. Overextends occasionally when trying to punch, ending up on the ground too often. Missed all of 2006 with a torn left ACL suffered in spring practice and did not play during the first month of his sophomore season due to injury.
-------------------------
Mike_Teel 237678 178
A durable three-plus-year starter with NFL size and an adequate arm, --NAME-- really started to turn heads during the team's seven-win run at the end of 2008. His connections with fellow 2009 NFL Draft prospects wide receivers Tiquan Underwood and Kenny Britt lit up scoreboards through the final two months of the season. 
--NAME-- improved statistically each season, partially because his receivers began catching the ball consistently. He set career highs as a senior with 3,418 passing yards and 25 touchdowns. 
An NFL team will take a chance on him as a late-round pick or priority free agent because of his strong physical and mental makeup.
2007: Threw for the second-most passing yards (3,147) in a single season in program history despite playing through thumb and hand injuries most of the season.
Two-time First Team All-State selection   two-time All-Parochial and All-Bergen County pick   led Don Bosco to 23-consecutive wins to end his career, including an 11-0 mark in 2003 and back-to-back state championships   team was ranked Number 1 in the state in 2002 and 2003   ranked the nation's 48th-best quarterback by The Insiders.com and the 23rd-best player in New Jersey by Rivals.com   completed 117 of 179 passes (65 percent) for 2,159 yards and 28 touchdowns in 2002   threw for 1,891 yards and 21 touchdowns as a senior in 2003, despite rarely playing in the second half   threw for 202 yards and three touchdowns in 42-0 win over Hackensack, a team which had not allowed a touchdown in its previous four games   was an AP Junior All-American.
Good size for the position, tall enough to survey the field. Quick setup and delivery. Adequate arm strength, throws with some zip on short and intermediate passes over the middle. Gets good air on deep balls, stands tall and delivers. Drops to sidearm when needed, has touch on shorter throws so receivers can run after the catch. Anticipates wells, throws where his receiver will be. Experienced taking snaps from center or via shotgun. Good intangibles, a team leader. Played through a broken right (throwing) hand in 2007.
Lacks the mobility to consistently make plays outside the pocket. Throws too many interceptions because he takes chances and tends to stare down and stick to his primary receiver. Gets the ball in the vicinity of his receiver but is not deadly accurate. Deep throws and fades will float inside instead of reaching the outside shoulder. Puts everything into his deep outs, lowering his release point by dipping his left shoulder. Must learn to deal with pressure in a tighter in a tighter NFL pocket.
-------------------------
Greg_Toler 237680 131
--NAME-- was one of the premier athletes in the Washington D.C. prep ranks, the talented defender never got the opportunity to wear a college uniform, much less earn a high school diploma.
--NAME-- exhausted his first chance at football stardom at Northwestern High School because of poor grades. Once recruiters from Division I schools viewed his high school transcripts, he was not interested. His grades made it a struggle to stay eligible for his senior football season. 
At the end of his senior high school season, --NAME-- was ineligible to attend high school all-star games, missing a chance to earn an athletic scholarship from a major university. 
"I never took my grades seriously like I should have," he said. "My coaches kept telling me that education's first, that you'll never be a student-athlete unless you're a good student." 
After graduation, --NAME-- wound up as a storeroom clerk at JCPenney, stocking shelves and sweeping aisles. He was living at home with his mother and older brother, knew he had the potential to be a college athlete, but that opportunity, he figured, was gone. That was until he met Wilson High School football coach Mark Martin, who recruited --NAME-- for his semipro football team, the D.C. Explosion.
After a few games with the Explosion, --NAME-- was approached by Kevin Grisby, a defensive coordinator at Saint Paul's College, the historically black school tucked into the Blue Ridge Mountains of southern Virginia. Budget cuts killed the college's football program in 1987 but wanted back in, billing itself as the place giving recruits a second chance. It was a school where players with Division I talent could continue to play despite previous off-field problems. 
Grisby immediately found a disciple in --NAME--, whose father had died in the Lorton prison while serving time for drug possession, and he used the one year that St. Paul's competed as a club team to focus on his grades. 
"It started off rough, but we worked his grade-point average up, meeting once a week just to talk about his academics," said Grisby, a former NFL safety with the Philadelphia Eagles.
--NAME-- quickly grabbed a starting position at left cornerback, going on to start his next 40 contests. He set school career records with 14 interceptions, 36 pass breakups and 50 passes defended (average of 0.80 passes defended per game was the top career mark for active Division II players in 2008).
In his first college season, --NAME-- garnered All-CIAA first-team honors, in addition to making the league's All-Rookie squad. In 10 games, he recorded 38 tackles (24 solo) with three stops for loss. He recovered a fumble in the end zone for a touchdown and broke up 13 passes in 2005. His six interceptions tied for 18th in the NCAA Division II ranks, while his total of 19 passes defended placed third nationally.
In 2006, --NAME-- produced 35 tackles (24 solo), picking off one pass while batting down three others during a "sophomore slump." He bounced back with a banner junior campaign, receiving All-CIAA first-team honors. He had an interception with seven pass deflections, averaging 8.2 yards on ten punt returns and 16.8 yards on six kickoff returns. He also ranked eighth on the team with 37 tackles (16 solo), as he did not allow a pass reception in four of 10 games he started.
The left cornerback earned All-CIAA and Little All-American first-team honors in 2008. He placed fourth on the team with a career-high 51 tackles (37 solo), including 4.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He tied for ninth in the nation and second in the league with six interceptions and set the school record with three blocked kicks, returning one blocked punt for a touchdown. He knocked down 13 other tosses, as his total of 19 passes defended tied for the CIAA title while ranking second nationally.
No injuries reported.
Attended Northwestern (Washington, D.C.) High School The two-time All-Metro choice competed as a cornerback, wide receiver and return specialist Ruled academically ineligible for post-season competition after his senior campaign.
He has good change-of-direction agility and the sudden burst needed to close on the play. He will generally stay under control coming out of his pedal and has the natural ability to open his hips in order to generate a quicker second gear. He possesses smooth hips in transition and natural hands to field the ball. While lacking in ideal strength, he shows good athleticism for the cornerback position. Marginal student, but is good picking up schemes and reacting to plays in front of him. Well-liked by staff and teammates. Effective in man coverage and gives total effort on the field. Volunteered to play on all the special team coverage units, in addition to handling return chores. Good toughness in run support (made 23 plays vs. the ground game in 2008) and picks up schemes easily.
--NAME-- was hailed as having blazing speed, but he is quicker than he is fast on film. Questionable zone-anticipation ability (stares into the backfield and fails to handle the switch effectively on combo routes). Not the type to make calls and keep defenders in position, but does not need more than a few reps to retain plays. Compliant in the weight room, but his numbers there indicate that he still has a long way to go before he can compete for a position at the NFL level. When he gets too high in his stance, he will take false steps in transition.
MARCUS TRUFANT, Seattle -- --NAME-- returned to freshman form in 2008 and has very good quickness on the field. He is a work in progress handling zone coverage responsibilities and lacks the strength to attack ballcarriers. His strength issues also come into play when he fails to jam receivers at the line of scrimmage. There is much for him to learn, especially coming from his level of competition. However, cornerback is a position at which you can draft an athlete first and hope to develop his football skills.
-------------------------
Mike_Mitchell 238227 47
The hard-hitting, versatile defender has outstanding quickness and good power, showing that he can come up and make plays inside the box. He began his career as a free safety, shifting to strong safety during the 2006 GMAC Bowl, where he would line up for his final 22 games. Few safeties in the collegiate ranks showed the acceleration and closing speed that --NAME-- possesses.
That speed was put to great use as a Bobcat. He would go on to register 212 tackles (126 solos), with 90 of those hits coming in run support, including 15 that he recorded behind the line of scrimmage. He also proved to be a steady ball hawk, defending 20 passes during his career and generating 140 yards on seven interception returns.
--NAME-- was a well-rounded and respected student at Highlands High School, where he was a member of the Future Business Leaders of America and the Fellowship of Christian Athletes. On the field, he lettered three times, twice earning Kentucky All-Star honors, in addition to being selected All-State honorable mention as a senior. That year, he led the Bluebirds to the state title, recording 87 tackles with three forced fumbles and two fumble recoveries, returning one for a touchdown.
--NAME-- enrolled at Ohio University in 2005, seeing action in nine games at both safety positions as a true freshman. He delivered 21 tackles (16 solos) with a forced fumble and two pass deflections while playing mostly behind Todd Koenig at strong safety.
As a sophomore, he shifted to free safety at midseason, as the coaches wanted to get him and Koenig on the field at the same time. He started the team's final eight games, but shifted to strong safety for the GMAC Bowl. He finished fifth on the team with 55 tackles (27 solos) that included five stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also picked off a pair of passes and deflected two others.
In 2007, --NAME-- took over strong safety duties, starting all 11 games he played in. He missed the Louisiana-Lafayette clash due to a right shoulder contusion and played in the last four contests wearing a cast to protect a broken bone in his right hand. He still managed to rank third on the squad with 74 tackles (47 solos), adding 1.5 sacks while knocking down four passes and intercepting two others.
The injury bug hit again in 2008, as --NAME-- missed most of the Buffalo game and sat out vs. Bowling Green with a knee sprain. He placed fourth on the squad with 62 tackles (36 solos), making 4.5 stops for loss while causing two fumbles. He had five pass deflections and led the team with three interceptions.
2007: Left the Gardner-Webb game (9/01) after the second series and sat out the next game vs. Louisiana-Lafayette (9/08) after he suffered a right shoulder sprain, but an MRI revealed no structural damage Played with his ankle heavily taped vs. Eastern Michigan (10/13) after he sprained it in practice (10/11) Suffered a broken bone in his right hand vs. Bowling Green (10/27) and played in his final three games wearing a soft cast.
2008: Did not play vs. Bowling Green (11/08) after leaving during the first series of the Buffalo clash (10/28) with a knee sprain.
2009: Failed to complete the agility tests during Pro Day (3/12) due to a hamstring pull.
Attended Highlands (Fort Thomas, Ky.) High School, where he lettered three times, twice earning Kentucky All-Star honors, in addition to being selected All-State honorable mention as a senior That year, he led the Bluebirds to the state title, recording 87 tackles with three forced fumbles and two fumble recoveries, returning one for a touchdown Was a member of the Future Business Leaders of America and the Fellowship of Christian Athletes.
Excellent size/speed combination with well-developed upper and lower bodies. Lights up receivers coming over the middle and running backs in the flat. Flies up from the deep backfield on blitzes and levels unsuspecting quarterbacks and ballcarriers coming into the hole. Has the range to cross the field after reading the quarterback's eyes. Good, not great, hands for the interception and has the speed to make yardage on the return. Fairly smooth in his backpedal, can change directions quickly when maintaining his balance.
His interest in making the big hit causes him to miss tackles in the open field. Missile with limited instincts, and could be an injury risk because of the play he ways. Runs around blocks instead of taking them on and shedding using his hands. Usually sees the play in front of him; a read-and-react player who may struggle with misdirection and double moves at the next level. Has the speed to recover against MAC opponents, but may not against NFL receivers. Faced lower level of quarterback play and used his speed to catch up to weak downfield throws.
JOSH BULLOCKS, New Orleans -- --NAME-- might be a better fit at free safety because of his range, natural hands, good ball-hawking ability and ability to keep plays in front of him. He will have a few problems staying with deep receivers, but takes good angles to close, especially when playing inside the box.
-------------------------
Derek_Cox 238354 73
--NAME-- earned a starting job at cornerback early in his freshman year for the Tribe and continued to improve to a second-team All-Colonial Athletic Association pick as a senior. 
--NAME-- really jumped up boards, however, with a great pro day, where he was clocked as fast as 4.39 seconds in the 40-yard dash and posted a 36.5-inch vertical jump and an 11-foot, 8-inch broad jump. He intercepted seven passes and broke up 10 others over the past two seasons, so his athleticism and ball skills give him exactly the type of upside teams look for in a draftable small-school prospect. 
--NAME--'s physical play may project him to safety at the next level and his experience as a punt returner (two scores and a 16.4-yard average in 2008) is another bonus.
No significant injuries reported.
Attended J.H. Rose High School, which also produced N.C. State RB Andre Brown.
Size/speed prospect with long arms and a fair build throughout his body for a cornerback. Good closing speed, and covers a lot of ground once the ball is in the air. Can be physical, attacking receivers and ballcarriers with reckless abandon when he can line them up. A move to free safety is possible because he is willing to play in the box to support the run. Has experience returning punts.
Inconsistent hands for the interception; will drop easy picks but make great plays on others. Gets opportunities for interceptions from poor throws by lower-level quarterbacks, at times catching up after being beat in the second level. Not a smooth gait when running with receivers, returning a punt or after making an interception. Tall and stiff in his backpedal, best in a zone system where he can react to plays in front of him. Needs to work on using his hands in press coverage, although he has the size to handle that type of coverage. Does not change directions as quickly as his shuttle tests predict. Tackling skills are marginal; puts his head down and dives for ankles too often. Gets off blocks from smaller receivers outside but lacks the strength to do so against NFL-caliber players. Has more straight-line speed than elusiveness on returns, so he may be better at bringing back kickoffs than punts.
-------------------------
Slade_Norris 238421 126
--NAME-- (6-2, 232 pounds), a defensive end/outside linebacker prospect, ran a 4.65 in the 40-yard dash at the Oregon State Pro Day. However, he then pulled a hamstring and was done for the day.
He started every game for Oregon State as a senior, and switched to linebacker after starting his career with the Beavers as a safety. He also rushed the passer as a defensive end.
As a senior, he finished with 18.5 tackles for a loss and 10 sacks. He totaled 19 sacks for his career, or fourth most in school history.
In 2007, he moved to defensive end before the season. He totaled nine sacks and 10 tackles for a loss during the season in a successful move.
Injuries forced him to miss most of his freshman season in 2005.
A broken leg limited him to five games in his senior year of high school.
Versatile player who will be a hybrid at the next level.
Will have to put on more weight to play the hybrid role in the NFL, as the ideal weight is in the 250-260 pound range.
-------------------------
Colin_Brown 238429 139
An accomplished center on the basketball court in high school, --NAME-- decided to walk on to the Missouri football team when he didn't receive a lot of interest from college basketball coaches. He developed into an all-conference performer at right tackle by his final two seasons, and has the size teams love at that position. 
Although he's not an elite athlete, --NAME--'s length and relative agility make it tough to beat him on the outside. But Missouri's spread offense makes it difficult to project if he can handle run-blocking duties at the next level.
He was twice an all-state player for the Braymer High School basketball team, and was a McDonald's All-American nominee. On the football field, he was also a first-team All-Conference pick at both defensive tackle and tight end as a senior in 2003. On the hardwood, he averaged 18.5 points, 12 rebounds and five blocks per game while leading his team to a 26-3 record in his final season.
All told, --NAME-- earned 11 letters for Braymer (four in basketball, three in both football and track and one in baseball).
After walking on at Missouri and redshirting his first season, --NAME-- was awarded a football scholarship before the 2005 season. He saw action in two games as the backup center.
After seeing action in 13 games as a reserve left guard and on special teams in 2006, --NAME-- emerged in 2007 spring drills. After backing up left tackle Tyler Luellen, --NAME-- moved to the right side and won the job in the fall. He was entrenched at the spot for the final two years of his Tigers career.
A huge man at 6-feet-7 and 340 pounds, --NAME-- earned Honorable Mention All-Big 12 in 2007 and built on that with another Honorable Mention campaign as a senior after being named to the Lombardi Award Watch List.
2008: Twisted his ankle against Oklahoma State. Slowed by that injury, he eventually left the Texas game with a concussion.
2007: Played through spring drills with a shoulder injury before having it fixed in time for fall practices.
Lettered in four sports at Braymer High School, and was an all-state performer in basketball twice (2003, 2004), as well as being a McDonald's All-American nominee on the hardcourt   First-Team All-State selection on the gridiron as a defensive tackle as a senior in 2003, and also earned First-Team All-Conference honors at both defensive tackle and tight end the same year   Was a star for Braymer in basketball, and averaged 18.5 points, 12 rebounds and 5 blocks per game as a senior in 2004, as he led his team to a 26-3 record and state quarterfinal appearance   Won 11 letters in his high school days, including four in basketball, three each in football and track, and one in baseball.
Tall with a strong frame, with the room to add more bulk and strength. Good initial kick-slide; his lateral movement on zone plays is also better than expected. Has a wide base in pass protection. Will stick onto his man if landing his hands on his jersey. Resets hands inside to maintain anchor if quarterback holds onto the ball. Able to angle a defender out of the inside gap to open huge running and passing lanes. Adjusts inside, getting his hands up quickly to help on end-tackle twists. Despite his height, --NAME-- cuts his man effectively when needed.
Plays too tall at times, and tends to bend at the waist. Does not play as strong as you'd expect for his size, and can get out-leveraged on the line and bull-rushed into the quarterback. Quick defensive ends can beat him easily with an inside spin move or hesitation move to the outside. Needs to prove he can get out of a three-point stance as he wasn't asked to do it often. Plays top-heavy, overextending in space and in pass protection, losing his balance. Adequate moving to the second level, at best.
-------------------------
John_Nalbone 238440 161
--NAME-- had dreams of playing major college football for Rutgers, but wasn't recruited and decided to stay in-state and play for Monmouth at the Football Championship Subdivision level. He has worked diligently since the end of last season to improve his timed speed, but might be used in more of an H-back role in the NFL.
--NAME-- arrived at Monmouth with good credentials after earning All-County honors his final two seasons at Lawrence High School, who he set the school record with 17 career touchdown receptions. And he would only go on to set more records once he arrived at Monmouth.
The Hawks have a history of producing NFL talent, including Dallas Cowboys wide receiver Miles Austin, who entered the league as an undrafted rookie free agent in 2006. The Monmouth coaching staff viewed --NAME-- as the next Hawks receiver with excellent size and hands for his position. 
He progress each season, earning second-team all-conference honors as a freshman and sophomore and first-team all-conference accolades his final two seasons. When all was said and done with his Hawks career, --NAME-- held all of the school's career tight end records with 101 receptions for 1,079 yards and nine touchdowns.
--NAME-- wasn't invited to any of the postseason all-star games or the scouting combine, but did impress an estimated 18-20 NFL scouts on-hand at a March 26 workout at GoodSports USA in Wall Township, N.J., and a workout earlier in the week at Hofstra.
"I think the workouts went really well," said --NAME--. "I would have liked to run a little better at Hofstra but my hard work seems to be paying off. The process has been both stressful and exciting at the same time, after meeting with the teams I'll just have to wait and see."
His workouts earned more attention from NFL teams, with the Eagles, Patriots and Dolphins among those who lined up visits.
No significant injuries reported.
Four-year letterwinner at Lawrence High School in Lawrenceville, N.J.   Earned All-County honors as a junior and senior for the Colonial Valley Conference   Went on to receive All-Area honors as a senior   Set school records for most receptions in a season, and holds the school's all-time record for most career receiving touchdowns at 17 receptions   Named captain senior year   Set the school record for most receiving touchdowns in a game (three).
Good size, strength and effort as a blocker. Highly competitive. Surprising athleticism shown in workouts. Catches the ball cleanly and looks to turn it upfield. Can track the ball over his shoulder. Adequate agility to avoid tacklers in the open field, but good strength to run through them.
Obvious concerns over his level of competition. Needs to improve his strength to hold up as an inline blocker at the NFL level.  Marginal burst out of his breaks to gain separation. Lacks experience in a sophisticated passing offense and will need time to acclimate to a typical route-tree.
-------------------------
Frank_Summers 238445 169
A short, stumpy running back who might translate better to fullback if he'd been willing to block, --NAME-- could struggle to find a role in the NFL. 
Nicknamed "The Tank" due to his build and powerful running style, --NAME-- signed with Cal out of high school, transferred to Laney Community College. He then chose UNLV over Southern California because the Rebels offered him a chance to remain at running back while the Trojans wanted him to move to fullback. Utah and Washington State also recruited him.
An immediate starter for the Rebels as a junior, --NAME-- started all 12 games, rushing for 928 yards and scoring six touchdowns in earning Mountain West Conference honorable mention accolades. His rushing total dropped to 740 yards in 2009, but he improved upon his scoring (eight touchdowns) and showed enough at the Texas vs. Nation game and in subsequent workouts to earn a late-round look. 
"The guys that I've talked to -- the other running back coaches -- have all said he might be one of the more difficult guys to tackle that they've seen on film this year," Steelers running backs coach Kirby Wilson told the Las Vegas Review-Journal following Summer's pro day in early March. "You don't see that (good receiving ability) of a big man much."
LANEY: Attended the junior college in Oakland for the 2005 and '06 seasons and earned All-America honors   A 2006 preseason second-team All-America choice by JC Gridwire. Set school records for carries in a game (48) and season (254) for the Eagles in 20
No significant injuries reported.
A 2003 graduate of Oakland's famed Skyline HS   Rushed for more than 1,000 yards as a senior in 2002 for coach John Beam   The state prep power posted an 11-0 record and was ranked in California's Top 10 that season   Also played linebacker.
Thickly-built back capable of handling the punishment of the NFL. Good vision. Locates the hole quickly and is surprisingly quick to and through the hole. Can drop his shoulder into the defenders and has good leg drive to push for the tough yards. Rarely used as a receiver at UNLV, but displayed soft, natural hands in workouts. Some potential as a fullback. Helped his cause with a strong week of practice at the Texas vs. Nation game.
Lacks the lateral agility or straight-line speed teams prefer at running back. Hasn't shown a willingness to move to fullback in the past. Inconsistent effort as a blocker. Has struggled with his weight in the past. Might struggle with a complicated playbook.
-------------------------
George_Bussey 238447 170
--NAME-- stayed at home and walked on to play for the Cardinals, and contributed in his redshirt freshman season because of injuries along the line. A three-time first- or second-team All-Big East pick in each of the past three seasons, --NAME-- showed good versatility playing left tackle and guard for the Cardinals. 
He is a solid all-around player with the potential to be a solid swing reserve at the next level. However, he's a bit small to play at tackle and is likely to slide inside.
2008: Had a 28-game starting streak snapped when he suffered a sprained left ankle in the second game of the season and sat out against Kansas State.
Starred at Western High School.   Named a Jefferson County All-Star  Benched 315 pounds  Two-year starter on the offensive line.
Good initial quickness off the snap and gets his hands up quickly into his man's numbers. Has very good upper body strength, and does not let go once latched on to his man. Good mobility to the second level and consistently finds a target when pulling. Adjusts to blitzes and stunts quickly. Flexible enough to cut block. Plays with some nastiness, and is willing to put his man on the ground when possible.
Played a lot of tackle in college but is likely to shift inside at the next level due to a lack of height, length and only lateral agility. Can be pushed into the quarterback on occasion when he fails to set his hands and anchor. Hesitates after his kick-slide which allows speed rushers to get the edge. Doesn't own a great punch, and needs to be more violent with his hands.
-------------------------
Spencer_Adkins 238455 176
After a productive high school career, --NAME-- never developed into a standout for the Hurricanes. He wasn't even invited to the scouting combine in February, but impressed scouts from 17 NFL teams who showed up to Miami's pro day just days after the big Indianapolis event.
"I look throughout the league nowadays and there are a lot of dudes who didn't get drafted and are Pro Bowlers. That's the motivation I have," --NAME-- told The Miami Herald after his pro day workout. "There were a couple questions about if I liked the inside or rushing off the edge. I told them, 'It doesn't matter. Whatever you want me to do I'll be able to do.' I think (Friday) opened up a lot of eyes."
It was the sub-4.5 seconds he ran his 40-yard dash in at his pro day that opened those eyes, as that's rare timed speed for an inside linebacker. However, he lacks assignment discipline, didn't produce great numbers for a program with a long linebacker tradition and will have to make his mark early on special teams to stick in the NFL.
2006: Missed the final five games with a leg injury.
As a senior in 2004, made 11 sacks (four in one game) and 19 tackles for a loss As a junior, had 80 tackles and 12 sacks, including a great performance in the state title game Didn't play organized football until high school Emerged as a defensive end as a sophomore and began playing linebacker as a junior Rated as the Number 7 outside linebacker in the nation and Number 87 in the nation regardless of position by Rivals.com. Ranked as the Number 62 overall prospect and the Number 10 linebacker by Scout.com Ranked as the Number 4 prospect in Florida by the Orlando Sentinel, the Number 1 linebacker prospect in the South by the Atlanta Journal-Constitution, the Number 4 overall prospect by the Tampa Tribune and the Number 48 overall prospect by Tom Lemming Member of the PrepStar Top 100 Dream Team and the Florida Times-Union Super 75 Chose Miami over Florida, Florida State and Georgia Coached by Bill Kramer.
Bulked up athlete who certainly looks the part. Short, squatty build well suited to playing in close quarters. Rare speed for the position. Legitimate NFL-caliber athlete. Has seen starting action at all three positions. Good, physical hitter who flashes some explosiveness. Has all of the physical attributes scouts are looking for. Obvious special teams potential.
Classic case of looks like Tarzan, plays like Jane. Struggles locating the ball and too often charges into the line of scrimmage, leaving his teammates in to cover his responsibility. Bit of a 'tweener.  Inconsistent in his disengagement from blockers. Hasn't been productive in this scheme despite his athleticism and the alignment designed to take advantage of his tools.
-------------------------
Zach_Miller 238457 180
--NAME-- was originally recruited to Nebraska as an option quarterback, he transferred to UNO after the Cornhuskers fired coach Frank Solich after the 2004 season and brought in Bill Callahan to run a pro-style offense. At UNO, --NAME-- went on to start for three seasons. 
He rushed for more than 1,000 yards in his first season as the starter in 2006, and threw for more than 1,000 yards in each of the past two seasons. He capped his career by scoring 18 total touchdowns as a senior. By the time his career was over, he had set program records with 50 touchdowns and 306 points.
Scouts asked him to play tight end at the Cactus Bowl all-star game. He really impressed as a receiver in that contest (five catches for 116 yards, one touchdown), then put on a very good show of athleticism at his pro day (4.53 seconds in the 40-yard dash, 37.5-inch vertical, 4.22 short shuttle, 7.06 three cone drill). 
Already a very good athlete, he has potential as a receiving H-back prospect. Gil Brandt, a draft expert who works for the NFL, said --NAME-- reminds him of former Cowboys tight end Jay Novacek.
2009: Unable to lift the 225-pound bench press at his pro day due to a torn tendon in his hand.
A three-sport standout at Bishop Neumann High School in Wahoo, he was Class C-1 all-state honorary captain as a senior and also earned honorable mention all-state honors in basketball Set school records as a senior with 1,200 passing yards and 980 rushing yards under Coach Tim Turman.
Tall with great athleticism. Former quarterback has a good sense of how to run routes despite his inexperience. Runs like a large receiver, looking smooth heading downfield. Looks the ball into his hands, fights for it in traffic. Physical enough to run though arm tackles, push the pile when the extra yard is needed and contribute on special teams. Gives effort as a blocker.
Must add some weight and be coached up on technique to be an effective blocker against NFL defenders. Raw as a receiver, as well, having never lining up there in college. Must learn how to be crisp in his routes, use his body to shield linebackers from the ball and consistently catch throws with NFL velocity away from his body. Played against a lower level of competition.
-------------------------
Robert_Henson 238464 186
Overshadowed by teammates Stephen Hodge and Jason Phillips, --NAME-- has been more than a solid complement inside in the Horned Frogs' defense. He earned first-team All-Mountain West accolades in 2008 (73 tackles, nine for loss, two interceptions) after three consecutive honorable mention selections. 
His athleticism and desire to play football makes him a good inside linebacker and special teams prospect.
No significant injuries reported.
Earned All-East Texas and all-district first team honors as a senior at Longview High School  Was a second team Class 5A all-state selection by The Associated Press and was the District 11-5A Defensive Player of the Year  Logged 129 tackles, including 13 tackles for loss  Recorded two sacks, two interceptions and two blocked kicks as a senior playing for Pat Collins  Selected TCU over Arkansas and Nebraska.
Plays with nastiness and aggression. Reliable open-field tackler and can be a punisher inside the tackles. Closes to the ball quickly, and comes hard downhill when blitzing. Hustles sideline to sideline; seems to always around the ball. Good change of direction ability to cover tight ends and fullbacks in the flat. Adequate hands for the interception. Team leader on and off the field.
A bit undersized and not the superior athlete teams want from a starter. Slips blocks instead of taking them on and shedding. Does not break down in space, and will overrun plays and can be easily avoided by quick ballcarriers. Took advantage of TCU's pressure scheme against lesser competition. Arrested in April 2007 for unlawful carrying of a weapon, but the case was eventually dismissed. Missed 2008 Poinsettia Bowl due to academic issues.
-------------------------
Brice_McCain 238466 188
--NAME-- is an undersized corner who compensates for his small frame will excellent speed and athleticism. That combination also makes him a dangerous kick returner - versatility he'll need to take advantage of in order to make an NFL roster next fall. 
Despite standing just 5-feet-9, --NAME-- was a durable player for the Utes, starting 39 career games. He was a two-time all-MWC pick as a defensive back, and earned conference honors as a kick returner in 2006. His 37 career kick returns rank ninth in school history.
It was his 4.28-second timing on-campus last year that first caught the attention of NFL scouts. And playing opposite fellow NFL draftee Sean Smith, --NAME-- had plenty of NFL eyes watching him play for Utah in 2008. He backed up his 40-time with a 4.33-second timing at his March pro day. That clocking was faster than any of the 36 cornerbacks invited to the scouting combine.
"They must be looking at the stats and not watching film," --NAME-- told The Dallas Morning News about not being invited to the combine. "I had one interception last season and only three in my career. So everybody says, 'He's not a playmaker.' But it they look at the films they'd see I don't get thrown at that much."
No significant injuries reported.
All-state and all-area   all-district as a running back and defensive back   county and Terrell High (Texas) MVP   played cornerback, wide receiver and running back and returned punts and kickoffs   also lettered in basketball and track   ran 100 meters in 10.3 seconds   on 400 meter relay team that placed second in the state (40.6 seconds)   son of Darrell Brockins and Tammie --NAME--   has six siblings and two stepbrothers   brothers Tony and Ricky play college basketball   undergraduate studies major   born Dec. 10, 1986.
Short, but a compact build that appears able to handle the jump in physicality of the NFL. Durable performer who started 39 games over his career. Legitimate NFL athleticism for cover corner. Rare speed and agility. Smooth back pedal. Explosive burst out of his breaks to close. Experienced and productive kick returner.
Lacks the height teams prefer. Excellent straight-line speed and agility not always evident on the football field. Protected by this scheme and a lot of talent around him. Loses out in the physical battle with bigger, stronger receivers. Poor hands for the interception. Has only three interceptions despite 21 career passes broken up. A duck and swipe tackler who doesn't want to get his jersey dirty in run support.
-------------------------
Keith_Null 238471 196
He might play for tiny West Texas A&M, but --NAME-- forced NFL scouts to look up his game film by putting up incredible numbers in 2008 to cap off a record-setting career. He leaves WT holding the program record for most passing yards in a season (4,134 in 2007) and a career (9,769).
He has the requisite size NFL teams look for in a quarterback, but must overcome the obvious concern about the level of competition he faced in Division II. But he's a quick learner and highly efficient - he completed 67.5 percent of his career passes.
He was invited to the Cactus Bowl all-star game in January, where he completed 19 of 27 passes, including a touchdown.
--NAME-- was coached for most of three seasons by former NFL quarterback Ryan Leaf, who was the WT quarterbacks coach in 2008 until leaving the program abruptly in November.
2007: --NAME-- missed a pair of games (vs. Angelo State, vs. Central Oklahoma) due to an undisclosed injury.
Cerebral passer. Reads defenses quickly and rarely throws into coverage. Good understanding of the offense. Can look off the defender and check down to his secondary options. Good setup and delivery. Good accuracy in the short and medium range zones. Can hit the receiver in stride. Ascending talent with the size and experience worthy of developing.
Comes from a spread offense. Has enough athleticism to handle the transition to a regular dropback scheme, but will need time. Questionable arm strength. Struggles to drive the deep out and too often sails deep passes. Was not invited to the upper level all-star games or the Combine and therefore has plenty of questions about his ability to adjust to NFL speed.
-------------------------
J.D._Folsom 238485 214
--NAME-- stayed in Utah when transferring from Snow Junior College to Weber State, where he earned second-team All-Big Sky Conference honors in 2007 before jumping to first-team recognition as a senior after making 73 and 76 tackles, respectively. 
NFL teams may use him at the strong-side linebacker position he played in college, or play him as an in-the-box safety because of his straight-line speed. Either way, --NAME-- brings real intensity into a pro locker room.
In high school, he was a national qualifier in Team Roping on the school rodeo team. He attended Snow before leaving for a two-year LDS mission, returning to Snow in 2006 and then transferring to Weber State at the 2007 semester break.
Played at Snow in the Fall of 2003 for Coach Steve Coburn then left to serve a two-year LDS Church mission to Santa Cruz, Bolivia.   Came back and helped the Badgers to an 11-1 record in 2006. Snow ended the season ranked second in the NJCAA.   First team All-Western State's Football League and Second Team NJCAA All-America team.   Had 69.5 tackles in 2006, 10 tackles for loss and three sacks.   First Team NJCAA Academic All-America team as well.
No significant injuries reported.
Excellent height and upper body strength. Generally holds up against blocks from offensive tackles at the line when playing the nine-technique spot. Smart player, stays at home instead of biting on misdirection. Comes hard on the blitz. Good straight-linbe speed and hustles downfield to get in on tackles even if the ballcarrier is tied up. Willing to blow up smaller receivers in his path. Could be successful as a special teams player.
Not as strong in the lower body, is a bit of a safety/linebacker 'tweener. Stiff in the hips and upper body, struggles to change directions in space. Does not get off blocks or get home on blizes as much as you'd like. Suspended for the first half of the first game of 2008 by the Big Sky Conference after being ejected for kicking a Eastern Washington player in 2007 regular season finale. Will turn 25 in August 2009, served a two-year LDS mission from 2004-2005.
-------------------------
Fui_Vakapuna 238487 215
--NAME-- was recruited by Nebraska, Utah, Oregon, Utah State and Washington, but the Salt Lake native chose to stay home and attend BYU.
After redshirting in 2002, --NAME-- had 30 carries in eight games in 2003 before serving a two-year church mission in Carlsbad, Calif. He returned in 2006, appearing in 12 of 13 games in 2006. He battled through a broken hand in 2007 to carry the ball 73 times and serve as an important blocker.
He wasn't as involved in the running game last season, carrying just 54 times while adding 10 receptions. But he was a valued blocker in front of Harvey Unga.
"I think Harvey should be taking --NAME-- out to dinner, or to lunch once in a while," said quarterback Max Hall. "Because right now --NAME-- is playing very unselfish and doing all of the little things right to make not only the run game, but the pass protections and everything, work. You'll see in some of the games he'll take on his blocker, knock him down and then go to someone else -- and get another block. And then Harvey will run for 15 more yards."
--NAME-- has been limited by a variety of injuries the past few seasons (hand, ankle, hamstring), but will be given a look as a blocking back after performing well in agility and strength drills. He has been compared to former BYU teammate Naufahu Tahi, who is currently with the Minnesota Vikings.
2008: Slowed by a hamstring injury in fall camp.   Missed the season opener due to academic work.
2007: Played in 10 games, but was limited at times by a broken hand.
2006: Bothered by an ankle injury late in the season, but played in 12 of 13 games.
Typical Polynesian build with the bulk to handle NFL punishment. Good vision to locate and get through the hole. Surprising lateral agility to make defenders miss in the open field. Bullish interior runner who can drag tacklers for extra yardage. Good lower, leg drive. Flashes soft hands out of the backfield as a receiver. High effort player.
Lacks the agility and straight-line speed to be a true running back at the next level. Has never been the bell-cow back and will only be successful at the next level as part of a rotation. Inconsistent effort and technique as a blocker. Has struggled with durability throughout his career.  Enters the NFL older than most (24) due to time served on an LDS mission.
-------------------------
E.J._Biggers 238489 217
There's no question --NAME-- is a good athlete. The Miami native was named Dade County Player of the Year in high school, which is awarded to the best player in the talent-rich region.
However, defensive back/quarterback wasn't heavily recruited in-state, and considered Kansas, Iowa, Ohio State and Penn State before final choosing Western Michigan over Kansas.
--NAME-- intercepted seven passes in 46 games for Western Michigan, adding 136 tackles and 19 passes defensed overall.
After finishing his Broncos career, --NAME-- returned to South Florida to train in Davie, Fla. with Western Michigan teammate Louis Delmas.
"Finishing up the season I knew I was going to have to work out and work hard to get ready for these drills," --NAME-- told the Kalamazoo Gazette after his March pro day. "The film shows a lot, but you also want to work out in the eye of the coaches. You want to look good in front of them because a lot of coaches haven't been to games this year and sometimes they probably weren't even paying attention to who you were. You come out here, people know who you are because you are singled out more."
The problem he faces making an NFL roster is excelling at one position. He's very fast and a willing tackler at 6-feet, but lacks the technique right now to hang with NFL receivers. And a switch to safety would be difficult on his lanky build.
--NAME-- will need to make an early impression on special teams until it's determined if he can make it as an NFL corner or safety.
Lanky build with room for additional growth. Good height for the position. Long arms, which he uses well to battle with receivers. Good leaping ability. Reliable open-field tackler who has no problem coming up in run support. Attacks the line of scrimmage. Plays the game with an aggressive mind set. Productive special teams performer who can tackle in space.
A bit of a 'tweener.  Skinny build that may not be ready for the additional physicality of the NFL. Loses a bit in his transition. Long-legged and lacks explosiveness out of his breaks and gives up too much cushion. Lacks the athletic ability to remain with NFL receivers. Could struggle with the adjustment to the safety position due to his lanky build. Was surrounded by a great deal of talent in this defensive backfield.
-------------------------
Brad_Jones 238491 218
--NAME-- produced 242 career tackles - good for 35th in program history. He also had 8.5 sacks in 69 career games to go along with six passes defensed, 10 quarterback hurries and one forced fumble.
A defensive end/linebacker hybrid, --NAME-- flew under the radar until running the 40-yard dash in 4.54 seconds and posting a 33-inch vertical jump at Colorado's pro day in March. Where the Michigan native will fit in the NFL remains to be seen, as his athleticism has always managed to outshine his production.
No significant injuries reported.
As a senior captain and team MVP, he was a first-team all-state selection and all-state Dream Team performer by the Detroit Free Press, when the Lansing State Journal also named him the Defensive Player of the Year. The runner-up for State Player of the Year (Class A), PrepStar selected him to its all-Midwest team as an athlete, while SuperPrep and Prep Football Report put him on their all-Midwest squads. PFR, who called him "an excellent defender with tremendous instincts," also ranked him as the Number 62 player overall in the Midwest (12th LB), as he was a Lindy's preseason Top 100 performer (one of 15 'backers). During his senior and junior years he earned first-team all-conference (Capitol Area Athletic Conference), all-area and all-area Dream Team honors by the Lansing State Journal. The Detroit Free Press made him an all-state special mention honoree his junior year, as he also earned a spot on the all-conference first-team when he was a sophomore. As a senior, he recorded 117 total tackles (79 solo), 18 tackles for loss, 11 sacks, two fumble recoveries (including one for a 70-yard touchdown), five forced fumbles, four interceptions (with one going for a 30-yard touchdown), 15 quarterback hurries and six pass deflections. On offense, where he also started at tight end, he reeled in 27 passes and five touchdowns for 501 yards. As a junior and dual starter once again, he compiled 110 total tackles (62 solo), 11 stuffs for loss, five sacks, four fumble recoveries, two forced fumbles, two interceptions, five quarterback pressures, three pass breakups and one blocked field goal. He also caught 12 balls and one touchdown totaling 280 yards. During his sophomore season, he finished with 99 total stops (42 solo), six tackles for loss, two sacks, one recovered fumble, one interception, three quarterback hurries and one pass deflection, while also netting one reception for 30 yards.
Rangy build with plenty of room for additional growth. Good athletic ability. Productive player who has seen starting action at both linebacker and a glorified defensive end position. Some natural pass rusher traits. Flashes initial burst off the line of scrimmage. Can drop back in coverage and shows some instincts in space. Reads the quarterback's eyes and can close. High effort defender. At his best in pursuit. Effective wrap-up tackler who flashes some explosiveness.
Bit of a 'tweener. Listed as the strong-side linebacker as a senior but played a hybrid defensive end position and lacks the bulk and strength to remain on the line in the NFL. Struggles to disengage from blockers. Eye-popping athleticism shown in workouts doesn't necessarily translate onto the field. Hasn't developed into the player his athleticism makes seem possible. Best fit might be as a 4-3 outside linebacker and special teams ace.
-------------------------
Julian_Edelman 238498 232
The last Golden Flashes quarterback to make a mark in the NFL was the Cleveland Browns' Josh Cribbs. And like Cribbs, it will be --NAME--'s versatility that he'll need to rely on to make the final roster.
--NAME-- broke Cribbs' single-season school record with 3,190 total yards in 2008. He scored a combined 26 touchdown, split equally running and throwing.
But he's expected to be tried primarily at wide receiver and on special teams in the NFL. For the Golden Flashes, --NAME-- also handled part-time punting and punt returning chores, so he's used to moving around.
There is no questioning --NAME--'s athleticism. At his March 12 pro day, he was asked to run again after being clocked in 3.91 seconds in the 20-yard shuttle.
The team that drafted him, the Patriots, is no surprise. New England defensive coordinator Dean Pees was the Golden Flashes' from 1998-03.
Posted record-setting numbers as a freshman quarterback at the College of San Mateo last season Named the Most Valuable Player in All-State Region I by the California Community College Football Coaches Association  passed for 1,312 yards and 14 touchdowns and rushed for a school-record 1,253 yards and 17 scores helped lead the Bulldogs to an 8-3 record and second-place finish in the NorCal Conference as senior at Woodside in 2004, led the Wildcats to a 13-0 record and Central Coast Section championship and was named first-team all-league and all-county totaled 2,237 passing yards and 29 touchdowns in high school career and also rushed for 964 yards and 13 TDs.
2007: Suffered a broken arm against Bowling Green on Oct. 20, missing the final four games of the season.   Before that, had been playing with a partially torn posterior cruciate ligament suffered in the second game at Kentucky.
2006: Sat out the Virginia Tech game with a shoulder injury.
As senior at Woodside in 2004, led the Wildcats to a 13-0 record and Central Coast Section championship and was named first-team all-league and all-county totaled 2,237 passing yards and 29 touchdowns in high school career and also rushed for 964 yards and 13 TDs.
Athletic build with room for an additional 5-10 pounds of additional muscle mass without a significant loss of quickness. Versatile athlete capable of helping in various roles. Good agility to make defenders miss in the open field. Surprising straight-line speed. Good short to medium range accuracy as a passer to consider using on trick plays or as part of a Wildcat formation. Worked out well as a receiver. Caught the ball well and showed enough understanding of route-running to warrant further development. Highly competitive.
Lacks the size and passing accuracy to remain at quarterback in the NFL. Enough overall athleticism to consider as a receiver, but hasn't played the position before. Has struggled with durability throughout his career. Bit of a gimmick prospect, who may lack a true position at the next level.
-------------------------
Jake_O'Connell 238500 237
--NAME-- is a classic practice squad draft choice. He wasn't even an all-MAC pick, but he does possess tantalizing raw tools for a potential tight end or H-back role down the road.
He caught 46 passes in 44 games for the Redhawks, and was barely a blip on the radar of NFL scouts. That changed with an impressive pro day in front of 10 scouts in March, where --NAME-- ran the 40-yard dash in 4.66 and 4.69 seconds and posted a 41-inch vertical jump.
A former high school defensive back and wide receiver in Florida, --NAME-- has a long way to go before making an impact at the next level. But give him a year on the practice squad and see if he can earn a roster spot with his special teams play in 2010.
No significant injuries reported.
Lettered three years at Gulf Coast High School as a wide receiver and free safety   all-county selection at wide receiver in 2002   honorable mention all-region and all-county defensive back as a senior   led Gulf Coast in interceptions for three straight seasons   totaled 83 tackles and two interceptions as a senior   also returned a kickoff and two punts for touchdowns during his senior campaign   served as a team captain during his senior year   coached by Frank Tudryn.
Ascending athlete. High school defensive back who continued to grow, but has maintained his athletic ability. Has the natural burst and straight-line speed to generate separation from NFL defensive backs once he learns how to sink his hips and cut cleaner in his routes. Doesn't shy from contact and will fight for extra yardage. Natural pass catcher. Can snatch the ball out of the air and tuck it quickly. Tracks the ball over his shoulder well. Good special teams player.
Lacks the strength and technique teams are looking for as an inline blocker. Wasn't a focus in the passing game here and remains a work in progress as a route-runner. Relies on his athleticism to generate separation from defenders and won't be able to do so at the NFL level. Still quite raw.
-------------------------
Nick_Schommer 238506 242
--NAME-- is a four-year starter for the Bison who was named third-team AP All-American as a senior. He intercepted 13 passes during his career and broke up 20 others from his free safety spot. 
--NAME-- added 20-25 pounds of muscle during his time in Fargo, but still ran well enough at his pro day to stay on the radar of NFL scouts. He also played baseball at NDSU after being an all-state pick as a high school catcher.
He is just the 25th NDSU player to be selected in the NFL Draft or the CFL draft. He played in 41 games over the past four seasons.
2006: Missed the final two games of the season due to an undisclosed injury.
First-team all-state by the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel and honorable mention all-state by both the Associated Press and the Wisconsin Football Coaches Association   Two-time first team all-conference and All-Northwest Region   Two-time team Most Valuable Player   Played both running back and defensive back for Prescott High School and coach Scott Van Epps   Had 111 carries for 958 yards and 11 touchdowns on offense while recording 124 tackles, two interceptions and three forced fumbles on defense   Also competed in baseball, where he was first team all-state catcher.
Adequate size and speed for the free safety position. Takes good angles to prevent touchdown plays down the sideline. Reliable wrap-up tackler when the play is in front of him, and typically brings down running backs breaking through a hole. Reads quarterbacks' eyes and closes on the ball quickly. Handles his coverage responsibilities well, anticipates clearing of underneath routes and smothers the receiver. Around the ball consistently, and does not give up on plays. Could be a solid performer on special teams because of his tackling ability and toughness.
Not an intimidating hitter or a physically dominating tackler. Lacks the strength to get off blocks from guards near the line or receivers and tight ends downfield. Faster than most FCS players at his position but will not catch up to quicker NFL offensive stars or have the recovery speed to make a play if beaten in coverage. Not asked to blitz very often. Will occasionally take poor angles in coverage and run support, whiffing on the tackle to allow additional yardage. Played against a lower level of competition.
-------------------------
Derek_Kinder 238508 251
--NAME-- entered the 2007 season as a top prospect, but a torn right ACL sidelined him during the first week of preseason camp. As a true junior, --NAME-- earned first-team All-Big East honors by making 57 catches for 847 yards and six touchdowns in 2006. 
His production in 2008 wasn't exemplary (36-422-3), but the Panthers were a run-first team with questionable quarterback play. His size and agility could earn him a roster spot as a rookie if he proves he's all the way back from the knee injury.
When healthy, --NAME-- has the speed to stretch the field, and his basketball background is evident in the way he creates separation from defensive backs.
2007: Suffered a season-ending ACL (right) injury during the first week of training camp and underwent surgery.
Two-time All-New York Class B, three-time All-B North Division and two-time All-Western New York as three-year, two-way starter at Albion High Started at running back his senior season and receiver as a junior and sophomore Defensively was a three-year starter at cornerback Scored 33 touchdowns his senior season and 63 for his career Averaged 8.7 yards per rush as a senior, compiling 1,705 yards on 197 carries Had 17 receptions for 289 yards (17.0 avg.) Eight interceptions and was named the 2003 recipient of the Ron Pitts Award, annually presented to the Buffalo area's top cornerback Led Albion to a three-year mark of 24-4 (.857) Rated the Number 9 prospect in New York by Rivals.com Rated the Number 12 prospect in New York by SuperPrep Played under Coach Dick Diminuco Earned All-Niagara-Orleans League in baseball and basketball 1,000-point scorer in basketball In baseball, was All-Western New York and a gold medalist at the Empire State Games  Scholar-Athlete honoree member of SADD (Students Against Drunk Driving).
Adequate height and good size for the position. Uses his hands and size to create separation from corners. Lines up in the slot and on the outside. Able to track the ball over either shoulder. Adjusts to poorly thrown balls, whether low or high. Relatively quick off the line given his size, and should be able to defeat press coverage at the next level. Finds holes in zone coverage and presents a nice target to the quarterback. Has the vertical to win jump balls in the red zone. A bit more elusive and quick in space than expected.
Lacks elite speed to be a great downfield threat. Not as strong as you'd expect for his size. Not a particularly smooth runner. A bit lazy on routes, and will round off and fail to sell the deep out on occasion. Despite his size, --NAME-- will hear footsteps over the middle. Must improve his consistency blocking downfield.
-------------------------
Freddie_Brown 238517 252
NFL fans might not be familiar with his name, but Alabama fans know all too well who --NAME-- is after he closed his career with 12 catches for 125 yards in the Utes' upset of the Crimson Tide in the Sugar Bowl.
--NAME-- contributed for three years as a reserve in Utah's prolific offense (38 catches, 458 yards from 2005-2007) before becoming the possession receiver safety valve for quarterback Brian Johnson as a senior. --NAME-- led the Utes with 77 catches for 900 yards and seven touchdowns in 2008.
He redshirted in his only season at Citrus College before going to Utah.
While --NAME-- can play multiple receiver positions and is strong after the catch, he lacks great speed and must catch the ball more securely to make an NFL roster.
Redshirted at Citrus College in 2004.
No significant injuries reported.
At Damien High (Calif.), he was first-team all-league in both football and basketball   lettered three times in both sports   45 catches for 685 yards and 5 touchdowns as a senior in 2003   set the school record for longest reception (97 yards)   career numbers were 61 receptions, 895 yards and 6 touchdowns   Damien High won back-to-back league titles (2002-03)   honor roll student all four years.
Tall with a strong upper body build and long arms. Has the size to beat the jam. Uses his frame to shield defenders on slants and crossing routes. Fights for the ball in the air and for extra yardage after initial contact, especially against smaller corners. Equally effective when lining up on the slot or outside. Separates from defenders on jump balls using his height and length. Works to get open if his quarterback scrambles. Able to make a quick move after the catch to free himself from a cornerback.
Very inconsistent hands; will pluck one ball away from his frame and then body-catch or drop the next. Below-average straight-line speed; fails to break away from corners or safeties down the sideline. Loses balance when trying to make a move in the open field. Product of a spread system. Generally a tough receiver, but will hear footsteps over the middle.
-------------------------
Robert_Ayers 71193 18
Regarded as one of the nation's premier defensive players coming out of Marlboro County High School, --NAME-- struggled to earn his place with the Volunteers until his senior season. 
Renewed dedication helped him emerge as one of the few bright spots during a troublesome season for the Vols. He would go on to earn All-Southeastern Conference honors and shared the Andy Spiva Award, given to the team's most improved defensive player.
For all of --NAME--' physical ability, the coaches admit that he just recently emerged following a few inconsistent seasons. 
"When --NAME-- got here, he thought he was God's gift to football," former head coach Phillip Fulmer said. "He wouldn't listen to the upperclassmen -- not in a bad way, but he just didn't take to coaching very well. (As a senior) he's starving for coaching, and he's giving great effort. He's turned into a big-time SEC defensive end." 
--NAME-- wanted to be a linebacker but agreed to slide to defensive tackle, where the Vols had serious depth concerns. It would have been easy for --NAME-- to fight even a situational role in his last chance to show NFL scouts his ability at end. However, he was more concerned with his last chance to win an SEC championship. 
"Obviously, I feel like I'm better off the edge," he said. "But I'll do whatever the coaches ask me to do," --NAME-- stated prior to his banner senior season.
At Marlboro County High School, --NAME-- earned All-State honors as a linebacker and was selected to play in the 2003 Shrine Bowl of the Carolinas. He added All-South honors from Fox Sports Net and was a Top 100 Dream Team choice by Prep Star. Super Prep rated him the third-best linebacker prospect in the nation and the second-best overall prospect in the state of South Carolina. ESPN's Tom Lemming rated him the seventh-best linebacker in the country and he received a four-star ranking from Rivals.com.
The Atlanta Journal-Constitution's Super Southern 100 choice recorded 112 tackles and five interceptions, as he also returned kickoffs as a senior. His best performance was a 28-tackle effort vs. Clover High. He also recorded 94 tackles, including eight sacks, to go with three interceptions as junior. In addition to football he lettered in track, competing in the 100-meter dash and 4x100-meter relay.
--NAME-- redshirted as a 230-pound outside linebacker for Tennessee in 2004. Having bulked up to 250 pounds prior to the 2005 campaign, he shifted to left defensive end. He backed up All-SEC choice Parys Haralson, as he delivered five tackles (three solo) and a six-yard sack in nine games. 
The redshirt sophomore shifted to right end the following season, playing behind Antonio Reynolds, but was hampered early in the 2006 season by a left hand fracture suffered in August camp. He would produce 25 tackles (17 solo) with one sack in 13 games, earning two late-season starting assignments.
In 2007, --NAME-- was a reserve behind Antonio Reynolds. Even though he was used off the bench, he led the team with four sacks and 12 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also collected 34 tackles (25 solo) with two pass breakups and four quarterback pressures.
As a senior, --NAME-- caught fire at midseason to deliver 49 tackles (34 solo) with three sacks, leading the team and league with 15.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also had six pressures and his first career interception.
2000: Did not play as a freshman in high school due to a shoulder injury.
2002/03: Played his last two high school seasons with a torn labrum in his shoulder.
2006: Suffered a left hand fracture in August camp (8/08).
Attended Marlboro County (Clio, S.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Dean Boyd. Earned All-State honors as a linebacker and was selected to play in the 2003 Shrine Bowl of the Carolinas. Added All-South honors from Fox Sports Net and was a Top 100 Dream Team choice by Prep Star. Super Prep rated him the third-best linebacker prospect in the nation and the second-best overall prospect in the state of South Carolina. ESPN's Tom Lemming rated him the seventh-best linebacker in the country and he received a four-star ranking from Rivals.com. The Atlanta Journal-Constitution's Super Southern 100 choice recorded 112 tackles and five interceptions, as he also returned kickoffs as a senior. His best performance was a 28-tackle effort vs. Clover High. Also recorded 94 tackles, including eight sacks, to go with three interceptions as junior. In addition to football he lettered in track, competing in the 100-meter dash and 4x100-meter relay.
Powerfully built athlete. Good lower-body strength to hold up at the point of attack. Flashes the ability to anchor and split double-team blocks on the edge. Good initial hand punch to stun the offensive tackle. Flashes some upfield burst to challenge wide and has good lateral quickness to redirect inside. Good use of hands to slap away the tackle's hands. Varies his speed off the edge and can surprise a lackadaisical blocker with suddenness. Can close with authority, flashing explosiveness. Versatile defender with experience at tackle and end. Developed into a team leader as a senior. Could be an ascending player who is just beginning to scratch the surface of his vast potential.
Lacks an elite first step or the straight-line speed to be true edge rusher. Relies more on varying his speed off the snap and his strength at the point of attack rather than pure athleticism. Moved around a lot in Tennessee's defense and was allowed to exploit mismatches. Likes to tackle high and stronger ballcarriers can escape his grasp. Stepped up his play significantly as a senior and could be a one-year wonder motivated by big NFL paycheck.
MARK ANDERSON, Chicago -- --NAME-- might be the rising star at this position, or 2008 could have just been an aberration. He had three so-so years and even in 2008, it was not until the second half of the season that he started living up to his high school headlines. He might not have the suddenness to play the edge in NFL, but might be a decent fit as an under tackle.
-------------------------
Ramses_Barden 71195 85
The most physically imposing receiver in the 2009 NFL Draft, --NAME-- proved in postseason All-Star games and at the Combine that while he might not have played at the major college level, he is a major talent. His size, strength and long stride have scouts comparing him to former Denver Broncos standout Shannon Sharpe, present Bronco Brandon Marshall and San Diego's Vincent Jackson, all who proved that while they might tower over cornerbacks, they can also play in the short-area passing attack.
--NAME-- broke numerous school and Great West Conference records. He joined David Ball of New Hampshire (58, 2003-06) and Jerry Rice of Mississippi Valley State (50, 1981-84) as the only players in NCAA Division I-AA/Football Championship Subdivision to catch 50 touchdown passes in a career. He had at least one touchdown in 32 games, breaking Rice's old NCAA record of 26 games with a scoring grab. 
--NAME-- put together a string of 20 consecutive games with a touchdown reception, again erasing one of Rice's records (Rice had a string of 17 games from 1983-84). He became just the eighth player in FCS annals to gain over 4,000 yards receiving in a career and his average of 20.4 yards per reception is the best by a receiver at this level since Dedric Ward of Northern Iowa produced a career average of 22.02 yards (1993-96).
At Flintridge Preparatory High School, --NAME-- was a four-sport standout. On the gridiron, the receiver and free safety earned All-Prep League, All-CIF-Southern Section and all-area (Pasadena-Glendale) honors in addition to all-state accolades in the small schools division. He led the Rebels (12-1) to the CIF-Southern Section Division XIII title as a senior, when he caught 41 passes for 915 yards and 14 touchdowns.
--NAME-- also played basketball, volleyball and track. On the hardwood, he averaged 17.2 points and eight rebounds a game. He was named all-league three times and All-CIF twice in basketball and named Cal-Hi Sports small schools Athlete of the Year. An Honor Roll member as a junior and senior, he participated in Peer Counseling, the Minority Student Union as a club director and was an Alliance Camp counselor.
--NAME-- visited Penn and San Diego State before enrolling at Cal Poly. He redshirted in 2004, taking over "X" receiver duties the following season. He earned All-Great West Conference first-team honors, leading the team with 40 receptions for 655 yards (16.4 avg.) and nine touchdowns. He also excelled on special teams, making one solo tackle while using his 6:06 frame to block a pair of field goals.
Professional scouts started to notice what opposing defensive coordinators already knew -- --NAME-- was a man among boys at this level of competition. He received All-America and All-Great West recognition as a sophomore, as he pulled down 42 passes, including 39 for first downs in 2006. That year, he generated 824 yards receiving (19.6 avg.), finding the end zone five times.
As a junior, --NAME-- was a consensus All-America choice. He ranked second in the nation with 1,467 yards receiving, catching 57 passes that included 18 touchdowns. His average of 25.74 yards per catch was the highest mark by an FCS player since Mikhael Ricks of Stephen F. Austin averaged 28.89 yards per reception in 1997. He led the league and placed 11th in the nation in scoring, averaging 9.82 points per game while lining up at the "Z" receiver position.
--NAME-- continued to generate considerable national attention as a senior. He was again named to virtually every All-America team, leading the league and ranking second nationally with an average of 114.27 yards per game receiving. He hauled in 67 passes, averaging 18.8 yards per clip, again coming up with 18 touchdowns, placing eighth in the country with an average of 9.82 points scored per game.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Flintridge Prep (La Canada Flintridge, Cal.), playing football for head coach Marty Konrad On the gridiron, the receiver and free safety earned All-Prep League, All-CIF-Southern Section and all-area (Pasadena-Glendale) honors in addition to all-state accolades in the small schools division Led the Rebels (12-1) to the CIF-Southern Section Division XIII title as a senior, when he caught 41 passes for 915 yards and 14 touchdowns Also played basketball, volleyball and track On the hardwood, he averaged 17.2 points and eight rebounds a game Named all-league three times and All-CIF twice in basketball and named Cal-Hi Sports small schools Athlete of the Year An Honor Roll member as a junior and senior, he participated in Peer Counseling, the Minority Student Union as a club director and was an Alliance Camp counselor.
Dominated FCS competition with his height and strong overall build. His long strides give him deceptive downfield speed. Takes advantage of soft coverage with receiver screens and short patterns, and has better foot quickness than expected for his size. Makes quick moves at the line to get off a jam. Able to snatch the ball with his hands, secure it and quickly turn to get additional yardage. A strong red-zone and jump-ball target due to his height, length and size. Uses his hands well while blocking on the outside, will be an asset in the run game.
Lacks the straight-line speed to get separation from top corners, and must be more consistent using his length to create last-second separation as the ball arrives. Inconsistent hands on jump balls, where he always has the advantage. Played most of his games against a lower level of competition. Does not have the open-field quickness to evade NFL corners on the edge. Tackled easier than you'd expect because of his high pad level. Must use his size better to latch onto smaller corners when run blocking.
-------------------------
Connor_Barwin 71197 46
When someone came up with that phrase, "consummate team player," --NAME-- was the type of athlete they had in mind. He has done everything he could to stay on the field, excelling as a pass rusher, pass catcher and kick blocker for the defense, offense and special team units. --NAME-- has also played for the Bearcats' basketball team at the conclusion of the football season the last two seasons.
On the football season, he has excelled as a wedge buster on the kickoff return unit, as a gunner on the punt coverage squad, as a kick blocker and a terrific hitter who has delivered bone-jarring tackles on opposing returners. In addition, --NAME-- proved to be a clutch receiver at the tight end and H-back positions. 
--NAME-- has amassed 40 first downs among his 53 receptions, converting eight third-down snaps and three more on fourth-down throws. Twenty-six of his receptions gained at least 10 yards, with 13 of those grabs for 20 yards or longer. His clutch receptions produced 20 touchdown drives and three other series that ended with Cincinnati field goals.
At the University of Detroit Jesuit High School, --NAME-- was named the team's Offensive and Defensive Most Valuable Player as a senior. He added All-District, All-League and All-Catholic honors and was rated the state's 17th-best prospect by the Detroit Free Press. He was also selected to play in the East-West All-Star Game.
--NAME-- added a pair of letters in basketball during his prep days. He garnered second-team All-League honors as a junior, leading the squad to the district title. As a senior, he picked up All-Catholic recognition.
--NAME-- was one of two true freshmen to letter at Cincinnati in 2005, wearing jersey No 89 and appearing in all 11 games as a reserve tight end. He caught 8 of 14 passes targeted to him, good for 144 yards (18.0 avg), one touchdown and eight first downs. He also posted two solo tackles and recovered one fumble.
After the 2005 football season, --NAME-- joined the Cincinnati 2005-06 basketball team as a walk-on. He appeared in 18 contests as a reserve, averaging 9.9 minutes per game. He shot 38.9 percent from the field (7 of 18 field goals) and 80 percent from the foul line (4 of 5 free throws). He also pulled down 40 rebounds (2.2 rpg), handed out four assists and blocked three shots.
As a sophomore, the Bearcat Academic Honor Roll selection shared tight end chores with Brent Celek, starting two of the 13 games he appeared in. He ranked sixth on the team, catching 13 of 18 passes targeted to him (opposition deflected three of those attempts) for 148 yards (11.4 avg) and two touchdowns. Nine of his receptions were good for first downs, as he also led the special teams unit with eight solo tackles.
Like he did after his freshman football season, --NAME-- joined the Bearcats' 2006-07 basketball team. He appeared in 23 games as a swingman, hitting 10 of 23 field goals (43.5 percent) and 7 of 13 free throws (53.8 percent) for 27 points (1.2 ppg). He totaled 31 rebounds (1.4 rpg), had nine blocks and doled out five assists.
In 2007, --NAME-- played most of the snaps at tight end, even though he did not start any of the 13 games he appeared in. He finished fourth on the team, catching 31 of 41 passes targeted to him for 399 yards (12.9 avg) and two touchdowns. Twenty-two of his receptions were good for first downs. He also delivered three solo tackles, recovered two fumbles, recovered a blocked field goal and gained 18 yards on a blocked punt return.
Changes came on several fronts for the former tight end in 2008. --NAME-- switched to jersey Number 5 from Number 89, also moving to the other side of the ball as the team's starting right defensive end. The defensive end registered 53 tackles (27 solos) as he led the Big East Conference and ranked seventh in the nation with 12.0 sacks, breaking the NCAA major college single-season record for most sacks by a player in his first season on defense. He paced the team and ranked second in the league with 17.0 stops for losses, led the Bearcats and Big East with 20 quarterback pressures and blocked three kicks while also catching one pass for a 1-yard score.
No major injuries reported.
Attended the University of Detroit (Mich.) Jesuit High School, playing football for head coach Scott Merchant Recipient of the team's Offensive and Defensive Most Valuable Player awards Added All-District, All-League and All-Catholic honors and was rated the state's 17th-best prospect by the Detroit Free Press selected to play in the East-West All-Star Game Also lettered twice in basketball, garnering second-team All-League honors as a junior and All-Catholic recognition in his final year Led the hoops squad to the district title as a junior.
Tall with a well-developed upper body. Physical at the point of attack. Can get under the offensive tackle's pads and push him into the quarterback. Has effective stutter and spin moves. Relentless as a pass rusher, he also hustles down the line and chases ballcarriers downfield. Good backfield awareness to knock down passes and keep contain on reverses, run plays and bootlegs. Uses his hands well to keep blockers away and shed to make tackles. Stands up on some plays -- may fit as a 3-4 rush linebacker. Very coachable because of his intelligence, work ethic and motor. A special teams ace since his freshman year; he blocked three punts in 2008. Played power forward for the Bearcats' basketball team for two seasons as a walk-on.
A bit tight in the hips, is not smooth changing direction or handling coverage in the flat. Is not a quick-twitch athlete. Although he showed some explosiveness and suddenness off the edge, NFL tackles will be more difficult to beat. Inexperienced on defense, played only one season; must continue working on his pass-rushing techniques.
Compares To (Defense): MATT ROTH, Miami -- Like Roth, --NAME-- plays with a nonstop motor. Right now, he makes plays on instincts alone, but you can see with each passing week that he is developing a good feel for the game. Still, with his speed and edge rushing skills, he could be a nice fit in a 3-4 alignment as a strong-side linebacker.
Compares To (Offense): MATT SCHOBEL, Philadelphia -- If --NAME-- is utilized in a short-area passing attack, he has shown the ability to move the chains. His speed is his best asset, but he has shown good lower body strength to break tackles and pick up yardage after the catch.
-------------------------
William_Beatty 71199 60
The Huskies' anchor at the demanding left tackle position for the past two years, --NAME-- started four games at the position during his freshman campaign and took over those duties for the first five games in 2006 before a lower right leg fracture vs. South Florida sidelined him for the rest of the season.
His injury in 2006 underlined his importance to the offense. The Huskies averaged 205.8 yards rushing and 355.8 yards in total offense per game with the sophomore manning the left tackle position that year. With --NAME-- out of action, the team managed to average only 166.57 yards rushing and 301.14 yards in total offense.
At --NAME-- Penn High School, --NAME-- earned first-team All-County gridiron honors on both offense and defense. The team captain competed as a defensive end, defensive tackle, offensive tackle and tight end during his career. He earned seven varsity letters, participating in football, basketball and track. The center on the school's basketball team, he was an Honor Roll student and member of the Future Leaders of America.
--NAME-- enrolled at Connecticut as a 265-pound offensive tackle in 2004, spending that season performing on the scout team. He appeared in eight of the team's 11 games in 2005, starting the Georgia Tech, Pittsburgh, South Florida and Louisville contests at left tackle. He collected 27 knockdown blocks and also recorded a solo tackle, taking down a defensive back after a Connecticut interception vs. Pittsburgh.
In 2006, --NAME-- opened the season with a flourish, registering 38 knockdowns and four touchdown-resulting blocks in the team's first five games. He also made a tackle after an interception in the Indiana game. However, his sophomore campaign came to an end when he suffered a lower right leg bone fracture vs. South Florida, undergoing surgery four days later that forced him to sit out the rest of the schedule.
As a junior, --NAME-- returned to the lineup at left tackle. He struggled vs. the pass rush, along with his fellow line mates, as the Huskies ranked 77th in the nation in quarterback sacks allowed (30, with --NAME-- accounting for 5.5). He produced 10 touchdown-resulting blocks while delivering 85 knockdowns.
--NAME--'s final campaign saw him emerge as one of the elite blockers in the East. The first-team All-Big East Conference choice and recipient of the team's Joseph M. Giannelli Unsung Hero Award, the Huskies left tackle helped the team lead the league and rank 13th in the nation in rushing, averaging 216.38 yards per game, with tailback Donald Brown capturing the major college rushing title. He was credited with 88 knockdowns and 13 touchdown-resulting blocks while allowing just two assisted sacks on 329 pass plays.
2007: Missed the final seven games of the season after suffering a lower right leg bone fracture vs. South Florida (10/07), undergoing surgery on October 10th to repair.
Attended --NAME-- Penn (York, Pa.) High School, earning first-team All-County gridiron honors on both offense and defense The team captain competed as a defensive end, defensive tackle, offensive tackle and tight end during his career Earned a combined seven varsity letters in football, basketball and track The center on the school's basketball team, he was also an Honor Roll student and member of the Future Leaders of America.
Intriguing athleticism. Gets to the second level quickly. Good agility and straight-line speed to pull. Explosive initial pop. Flashes upper-body strength to lift and pancake defenders. Flashes an effective initial punch and has the body control to recoil and ease into his set. Good lateral quickness in pass protection. Good balance. Ascending talent despite starting four years. Characterized by UConn staff as having greatly matured in 2008. Could be just scratching the surface of his potential.
 Doesn't always sustain blocks long enough. Good straight-line speed, but loses his feet in the trash. Potential one-year wonder. Really stepped up his level of play as a senior, sparking some debate whether his level of play will diminish once he cashes his first NFL check. Had no postseason accolades over his first three seasons, but earned first-team All-Big East honors as a senior. Broken leg ended his sophomore season after only seven games.
-------------------------
Travis_Beckum 71201 100
It seems as though --NAME-- has been proving doubters wrong ever since he signed on with the Badgers. When he first arrived on campus, the coaching staff doubted he would be anything more than a warm body sitting on the bench. After all, how many 215-pound defensive ends have ever played in the National Football League? He forced his way on to the field as a special teams kamikaze during his freshman year and was asked to switch to offense the following season.
Playing tight end in the Big Ten Conference at 220 pounds won't have too many opposing defensive coordinators losing sleep. Despite being rated the best prep linebacker in the state of Wisconsin and having no high school experience at the position, he went on to shatter school single-season records for tight ends and capture All-American honors as a sophomore after snatching 61 passes.
--NAME-- was named to the Lombardi Trophy Watch List in 2007. That award is usually reserved for down linemen, showing just how far he had emerged in the eyes of those that follow college football closely. He further established his presence on the football field during his junior year, breaking his own school record while finishing tied for first on the Badgers' annual record chart with 75 catches.
Even though he was the state of Wisconsin's blue chip prospect during his days at Oak Creek High School, --NAME-- always played with a solid blue collar work ethic. He was rated the state's best player and the nation's sixth-best linebacker by Rivals.com and ranked among the prep ranks' top five athletes according to Prep Football Report. He added Super Prep and Parade All-American honors and was named the state's unanimous Player of the Year as a senior. 
--NAME-- ranked seventh on the Detroit Free Press' "Best of the Midwest" list and was selected to play in the 2005 U.S. Army All-American Bowl. The two-time All-State selection recorded 108 tackles, including 38 stops behind the line of scrimmage and 16 sacks as a senior. He also had seven interceptions, eight fumble recoveries and four blocked kicks in 2004.  In addition to earning four letters in football, he earned three more with the Oak Creek basketball team.
As a freshman, --NAME-- was relegated to special teams duties at Wisconsin. He was listed on the depth chart as a rush defensive end and outside linebacker, but managed just two tackles, including one for a loss in 10 contests. In spring drills after the season, he was shifted to the offensive side of the ball. The move was an immediate success.
--NAME-- led UW's receivers in catches and receiving yards throughout 2006 spring camp.  "He has shown the ability since we moved him that he is very athletic and can catch the football," said UW coach Bret Bielema, who moved --NAME-- to tight end after the Capital One Bowl. "I like what he did after the catch, but --NAME-- is just beginning to scratch the surface on how good he can be. He understands where we want him to be in the passing game because he likes the passing game. What we need him to do is be a complete football player."
--NAME-- went on to earn All-American second-team honors as a sophomore. The Mackey Award semifinalist (nation's top tight end) set the school single-season record for tight ends, as he hauled in 61 passes for 903 yards (14.8 avg) and five touchdowns. Both his receptions and receiving yards ranked second among the nation's tight ends. He also gained 19 yards on four carries.
In 2007, --NAME-- shattered his own Badgers tight end record, snaring 75 passes for 982 yards (13.1 avg) and six touchdowns. His average of 5.77 receptions per game ranked second among the nation's tight ends and his receiving yards led the NCAA players at his position. Back on special teams, he also posted four tackles (three solos).
After his junior campaign, --NAME-- seriously considered applying for the 2008 NFL Draft, but decided to return to school. "Playing at Wisconsin in front of the greatest fans in college football is something I want to continue doing for one more year," he said in a statement issued by the school. "I looked into my options and found the best one is right here with this university. I'm enjoying being a Badger and can't wait for our bowl game in Tampa, as well as for next season. I'm glad this decision is behind me and I'm looking forward to another year at Camp Randall."
That decision soon proved to be costly. What was supposed to be a breakout senior season turned into a medical nightmare for --NAME--. He arrived in fall camp and quickly suffered a right hamstring strain. The injury would keep him out of the team's first two games and you could see that he rushed back into action upon his return. He missed three quarters of the Michigan game after he reinjured his hamstring. Against Illinois, he suffered a left fibula fracture, undergoing surgery and was lost for the season, finishing with 23 receptions for 264 yards (11.5 avg).
2007: Limited late in fall camp (8/22) with neck and back spasms.
2008: Missed the team's first two games of the season vs. Akron (8/30) and Marshall (9/06) due to a right hamstring strain that he suffered at the start of fall camp (8/02) Sat out more than three quarters of the Michigan game (9/27) after re-injuring his hamstring Suffered a left fibula fracture vs. Illinois (10/25), undergoing surgery that evening and was forced to sit out the rest of the season.
Attended Oak Creek (Milwaukee, Wisc.) High School Rated the state's best player and the nation's sixth-best linebacker by Rivals.com Ranked among the prep ranks' top five athletes according to Prep Football Report Added Super Prep and Parade All-American honors and was named the state's unanimous Player of the Year as a senior Ranked seventh on the Detroit Free Press' "Best of the Midwest" list and was selected to play in the 2005 U.S. Army All-American Bowl The two-time All-State selection recorded 108 tackles, including 38 stops behind the line of scrimmage and 16 sacks as a senior Also had seven interceptions, eight fumble recoveries and four blocked kicks in 2004 In addition to earning four letters in football, he earned three more with the Oak Creek basketball team.
Rangy athlete with the top-end speed to challenge down the seam. Uses this threat and his long arms to gain separation from defenders. Lines up as an H-back with his hand down, in the slot and outside. Good lateral quickness. Shimmies to sell his route or get off press coverage at the line. Improved recognition of defenses and can recognize the soft spots in the zone. Nice body control as a receiver, flashing the ability to track over his shoulder. Able to make the acrobatic high-point catch. Secures the ball quickly and looks to head upfield. Flashes some wiggle to make defenders miss. Impressive straight-line speed. Provides an initial pop and willingness to sustain as a pass and run blocker.
Underwent shoulder surgery after his junior season, and was still not 100 percent recovered from his leg surgery by Wisconsin's March 4 pro day. 'Tweener who is undersized for the traditional tight end position. Has struggled to gain weight in the past and is a narrow shouldered athlete who lacks the frame to add much bulk. Ultimately gets backed down or ripped off by larger players when blocking on the line due to his less than ideal playing strength. Does not have the straight-line speed and explosive burst out of his breaks to convert to receiver. Lacks the raw power to break tackles. Rounds off routes. Will short-arm passes when hearing footsteps. Body-catches too often.
RANDY McMICHAEL, St. Louis -- --NAME-- is not as bulky as McMichael, but both are superb at securing the ball and heading upfield. The Wisconsin native might be a nice fit for the Packers, who have been lacking a safety valve in their lineup since Keith Jackson's heyday. Size issues will prevent --NAME-- from playing the traditional tight end position and there are serious durability concerns. If he was not so banged up last year, he could have been the king of the mountain at this position heading into the draft.
-------------------------
Rhett_Bomar 71207 151
After a troubling 2006 offseason that saw --NAME-- dismissed from the University of Oklahoma, the quarterback was hoping to play football at Sam Houston State. The NCAA ruled him ineligible, but granted him permission to return to the field in 2007. In just two seasons with the Bearkats, he would go on to become the school's all-time passer, amassing 5,564 yards in 19 games.
--NAME--'s 6,157 yards in total offense and 417 pass completions also established SHSU marks. His 37 touchdown passes are just two shy of the school record of 39 by Dustin Long, and his 49 total touchdowns (including 12 rushing), set another Bearkats career record.
At Grand Prairie High School, --NAME-- lettered three times in football, setting school records for career pass yardage and completions. Playing for his father, Jerry, he earned first-team All-State, All-Area and District MVP honors as a junior, adding All-Area and All-District recognition as a sophomore. A broken hand cut short his senior campaign, as he played in just seven games after participating in 10 contests in each of his first two seasons.
--NAME-- was named an All-American Scholar-Athlete at the U.S. Army High School All-American Game. He was also selected the Outstanding Quarterback at the EA Sports Elite 11 Quarterback Camp. He threw for 6,097 yards and 58 touchdowns, completing 62.1 percent of his pass attempts, as he also rushed for 1,623 yards with 33 scores and averaged 286.0 yards per game in total offense while appearing in 27 contests.
Despite his hand injury, --NAME-- accounted for 27 touchdowns his senior year, as he passed for 1,400 yards and 15 scores while being intercepted six times. He scored 12 touchdowns on the ground and totaled 542 rushing yards on 80 attempts while completing 90 of 147 passes (61.2 percent). The three-time Academic All-District pick racked up 2,860 yards and 25 touchdowns through the air, connecting on 163 of 265 throws with 11 interceptions as a junior. He also rushed for 717 yards on 119 carries and 11 touchdowns that season. 
As a sophomore, --NAME-- threw for 1,837 yards and 18 touchdowns while also gaining 364 yards and 10 scores on the ground. Also an accomplished baseball player, he earned All-Area and All-District recognition as a junior.
--NAME-- enrolled at Oklahoma, where he spent the 2004 season redshirting on the scout team. The following season, --NAME-- was named Freshman All-American third-team by The Sporting News, Academic All-Big 12 Conference first-team and honorable mention All-Big 12, as he started 11 contests for the Sooners. The Holiday Bowl MVP hit on 167 of 308 passes (54.22 percent) for a school freshman single-season record 2,018 yards, 10 touchdowns and 10 interceptions. He also scored four times while generating 184 yards on 89 carries (2.1 avg).
That season would be --NAME--'s last at Oklahoma. In late May, 2006, he pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor charge of being a minor in possession of alcohol. He was sentenced to six months of probation and was required to pay court costs and an administrative fee. That was just the beginning of a troubling offseason.
In August, --NAME-- was dismissed from the Sooners team after an investigation revealed he broke NCAA rules through his employment at a local car dealership (accepted payment for more work than he performed). He enrolled at Sam Houston State in September, 2006, but it was not until early November that the NCAA ruled him ineligible to play for the Bearkats that season. He was given clearance to return to college football in 2007, giving him two years of remaining eligibility.
In his first season at Sam Houston State, --NAME-- ranked eighth in the nation and second in the Southland Conference with an average of 290.56 yards per game in total offense. He started the team's first nine games, missing the end of the season after injuring his left knee before halftime vs. Nicholls State. 
He finished his first season as a Bearkat by throwing for 2,209 yards, 10 touchdowns and six interceptions on 172 of 291 chances (59.11 percent). He gained 2,615 yards in total offense, as he added seven more scores and 406 yards on 87 rushing attempts (4.7 avg).
--NAME-- received All-Southland Conference second-team accolades in 2008. He ranked second in the nation in total offense (354.2 ypg) and fourth in passing yardage (335.5 ypg), as he completed 245 of 436 tosses (56.19 percent) that included 27 touchdowns against 13 interceptions. He also scored five times rushing in the ten games he appeared in.
2003: Missed two games during his high school senior year with a right hand fracture.
2007: Sat out the final two games and missed the second half of the Nicholls State contest (11/03) after he suffered a left knee anterior cruciate ligament tear on a rushing attempt.
2009: Could not participate in the vertical jump at the combine due to a strained right hamstring.
Attended Grand Prairie (Texas) High School, playing for head coach Jerry --NAME--, --NAME--'s father Lettered three times in football, setting school records for career pass yardage and completions Earned first-team All-State, All-Area and District MVP honors as a junior, adding All-Area and All-District recognition as a sophomore A broken hand cut short his senior campaign, as he played in just seven games after participating in ten contests in each of his first two seasons Named an All-American Scholar-Athlete at the U.S. Army High School All-American Game Selected the Outstanding Quarterback at the EA Sports Elite 11 Quarterback Camp Threw for 6,097 yards and 58 touchdowns, completing 62.1 percent of his pass attempts, as he also rushed for 1,623 yards with 33 scores and averaged 286.0 yards per game in total offense while appearing in 27 contests Despite his hand injury, he accounted for 27 touchdowns his senior year, as he passed for 1,400 yards and 15 scores while being intercepted six times Scored 12 touchdowns on the ground and totaled 542 rushing yards on 80 attempts while completing 90 of 147 passes (61.2 percent) The three-time Academic All-District pick racked up 2,860 yards and 25 touchdowns through the air, connecting on 163 of 265 throws with 11 interceptions as a junior Rushed for 717 yards on 119 carries and 11 touchdowns that season As a sophomore, --NAME-- threw for 1,837 yards and 18 touchdowns while also gaining 364 yards and 10 scores on the ground An accomplished baseball player, he earned All-Area and All-District recognition as a junior Graduated fifth in a class of 575 students.
JONATHAN "J.P." LOSMAN, ex-Buffalo -- Yes, they are both blessed with great arm strength and show good mobility running with the ball, but sometimes their confidence can be taken for cockiness and arrogance. --NAME-- showed at the Senior Bowl that he can make all the throws, but he looked like he tried to carry the team on his shoulders too much last year. That, coupled by his tendency to lock on to his primary target too long and a noticeable drop in his production as a runner, makes you wonder if he is just a rifle-armed passer who will be carrying a clipboard for the majority of his career. The jury is out, and he certainly did not take the world by storm during two years playing against inferior competition at Sam Houston State.
-------------------------
Tom_Brandstater 71213 174
Regards as the premier quarterback in the Western Athletic Conference, --NAME-- possesses the range and arm strength that National Football League teams look for in a pro style quarterback. The unquestioned leader of the team put up impressive numbers since taking over the starting position as a sophomore, but has also excelled in the classroom, earning conference academic honors the last three seasons. His intelligence on the field is evident, but academically it is even more impressive, having graduated before his junior campaign and is finishing up work on his Master's degree.
Fresno State has boasted some great college quarterbacks in recent years and --NAME-- has placed his name right next to the likes of Kevin Sweeney, Trent Dilfer, David Carr and Billy Volek in the school record books. He closed out his career ranking fifth in school annals in pass completions (584) and fourth in pass attempts (989), while ranking sixth all-time with 6,857 yards passing and 7,006 yards in total offense. His 47 touchdown passes placed him seventh in Bulldogs annals.
At Turlock High School, --NAME-- was a relatively unknown prep quarterback, as he played in an offense that relied more on the running attack. He threw for more than 1,000 yards as a senior, but made a better impression as a defensive back. He earned first-team All-District defensive honors from the Modesto Bee and guided his team into the Sac-Joaquin Section Championship vs. Stockton Lincoln in his final campaign.
--NAME-- was the top quarterback performer in Fresno State's Summer Football Camp in 2003. He decided to enroll at the university in 2004, spending the season as a redshirt. In 2005, he saw brief action in eight games behind starter Paul Pinegar, completing just 6 of 13 passes for 49 yards, one touchdown and an interception.
The following season, --NAME-- earned the first of three Academic All-Western Athletic Conference honors. He started 10 of 11 games, completing 146 of 268 attempts (54.5 percent) for 1,490 yards, 13 touchdowns and 14 interceptions. He then spent the summer working on his degree and with coach Pat Hill, as the pair worked on improving his throwing mechanics.
--NAME-- arrived back on campus for 2007 fall drills having already earned his degree. It was time for him to also earn some national recognition. He finished 23rd in the NCAA with a 140.49 passing efficiency rating and finished sixth in the WAC with an average of 213.23 yards per game. He amassed 2,654 yards on 211 of 337 passes (62.6 percent), connecting for 15 touchdowns against only five interceptions.
The three-time Academic All-WAC choice topped his previous season's numbers as a senior. He ranked fourth in the league in passing efficiency and total offense, as he hit on 221 of 371 tosses (59.6 percent), generating a career-high 2,664 passing yards to go with 18 touchdowns, as he collected 2,614 yards in total offense.
Injury report not available.
Attended Turlock (Cal.) High School Threw for more than 1,000 yards as a senior, but made a better impression as a defensive back Earned first-team All-District defensive honors from the Modesto Bee and guided his team into the Sac-Joaquin Section Championship vs. Stockton Lincoln in his final campaign.
Very good height and adequate build for the position. Despite his size, his feet are good enough to be effective on the bootleg and moving within the pocket. Good arm strength for short and intermediate routes, and is improving his accuracy on those throws. Has an efficient delivery. Shows some touch on shorter routes, taking a bit off the throw. Operates from under center and the shotgun. Not afraid of contact, and will attempt to block (cut or otherwise) on reverses or even downfield. Good hand work on play fakes. Throws accurately running to his right.
Converted high school safety. Regressed in his decision-making in 2008. Generated a lot of yardage on quick throws from a spread offense look. Does not make a great deep throw, more often than not floating it up for grabs. Struggles to get the ball between linebackers and safeties on deeper routes. Bird-dogs his primary receiver at times, but is improving at looking off coverage and going through progressions. Tries to float passes to open targets instead of just throwing the ball. Not consistent with his spiral, as the ball will come out of his hand a bit wobbly. Will not threaten a defense with the big run, although he does switch the ball to his outside hand to secure it in the open.
MARK BULGER, St. Louis -- While --NAME-- has the pro size, he will need to add more bulk. He has good command in the huddle and has operated in a pro-style defense, but despite what some others feel there seems to be too much inconsistency with him throwing long, especially on the move. He tries to force the ball too much between second-level defenders, and one look at the high amount of passes that have been picked off or deflected shows he still needs a lot of coaching and tutoring. Not to call him a product of the Fresno State system, but how many Bulldogs had success in the NFL?
-------------------------
Kenny_Britt 71217 30
The Big East Conference's elite receiver ended his brilliant three-year career as the league's all-time leading receiver with 3,043 receiving yards in just 34 games. The Associated Press third-team All-American ranked second in the nation with an average of 114.25 receiving yards per game and finished eighth nationally with 87 receptions, an average of 7.25 grabs each contest.
Known for his ability to gain yardage after the catch, --NAME-- closed out his career in explosive fashion, registering his 14th 100-yard receiving game vs. North Carolina State in the PapaJohns.com Bowl. That total tied the Big East Conference record that was first set by Larry Fitzgerald of Pittsburgh (2002-03). That record also included a string of five consecutive 100-yard performances during his junior campaign.
--NAME-- also etched his name in the school record books. His 17 touchdown catches tied the Rutgers all-time record and he also became the all-time leader in receiving yardage (3,043) while ranking third on the school career-record list with 178 receptions, a total that also places him fourth in Big East history.
After his banner 2008 campaign that saw --NAME-- establish Scarlet Knight season records with 87 catches for 1,371 yards, the junior decided to forgo his final season and declared for the 2009 NFL Draft. He is the second player in the Greg Schiano era at Rutgers to leave school early, joining tailback Ray Rice, a second-round draft selection of the Baltimore Ravens in the 2008 NFL Draft. During --NAME--'s three-year career in Piscataway, the Scarlet Knights won 27 games, including three bowl victories.
At Bayonne High School, the local product was rated the 22nd-best receiver in the country and the fifth-best overall talent in the state of New Jersey by Rivals.com. The Prep Star and Super Prep All-American added All-Hudson County first-team honors from the Hudson County Interscholastic Athletic Association, The Star-Ledger and Jersey Journal.
As a senior, --NAME-- was credited with 24 receptions for 462 yards and six touchdowns. That total included seven catches for 136 yards vs. Bridgewater-Raritan and he also eclipsed the 100-yard mark vs. Union Hill with four catches for 112 yards. As a junior, he added 28 catches for 515 yards and six touchdowns. He would conclude his prep career with an appearance in the 2006 New York/New Jersey Governor's Bowl.
--NAME-- enrolled at Rutgers in 2006, where the coaching staff originally planned to redshirt him. However, solid performances in practices forced the team to activate him for nine games, as he started six of the final seven contests. He would go on to make 29 catches for 440 yards (15.2 avg.) and a pair of touchdowns, all coming in those six starting assignments, including an eye-popping total 10 catches vs. West Virginia, a team that boasted one of the top secondaries in the country.
Despite posting the sixth-best receiving yardage total in Big East Conference history (1,232 yards) and ranking second on the team with 62 receptions (19.9 avg.), --NAME-- was only named to the league's All-Big East second team. He also hauled in eight passes for touchdowns, averaging 94.77 aerial yards per game. For that performance, he was named the team's Offensive Most Valuable Player.
--NAME-- finally began to receive national attention in 2008. The third-team All-American and first-team All-Big East pick led the league in receptions (7.25 pg) and receiving yards (114.25 ypg). He set school season records with 87 receptions and 1,371 yards (15.8 avg.), as his yardage total was the second-best season effort in conference annals. He also was used in the backfield, completing his only collegiate pass attempt for 28 yards while adding 75 yards and a score on seven reverses.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Bayonne (N.J.) High School, where he was rated the 22nd-best receiver in the country and the fifth-best overall talent in the state of New Jersey by Rivals.com Prep Star and Super Prep All-American Added All-Hudson County first-team honors from the Hudson County Interscholastic Athletic Association, The Star-Ledger and Jersey Journal As a senior, --NAME-- was credited with 24 receptions for 462 yards and six touchdowns That total included seven catches for 136 yards vs. Bridgewater-Raritan and he also eclipsed the 100-yard mark vs. Union Hill with four catches for 112 yards As a junior, he added 28 catches for 515 yards and six touchdowns Concluded his prep career with an appearance in the 2006 New York/New Jersey Governor's Bowl.
Tall with a long frame. Lines up in the slot and outside. Surprisingly quick feet in and out of cuts. Good route-runner who finds seams against the zone. Reaches top speed quickly. Latches onto cornerbacks in run blocking. Strong runner after the catch, willing to bowl over corners and safeties to gain additional yards. Adjusts to low balls well. Makes most of his plays on crossing routes and is willing to give it up over the middle. Uses his body to shield defenders from the ball. Gives good effort blocking, using his long arms and feet to stay in front of a corner.
Lanky frame lacking strength in the upper body. Has difficulty sustaining blocks downfield against linebackers and safeties. Will need to learn how to use his hands to get off the line. Displayed very inconsistent hands during his career due to poor concentration and hand strength, leading to body-catching too many passes. Should make more plays on jump balls and down the sideline. Does not have the speed to separate after the catch. Not especially quick off the snap, and hasn't faced much press coverage due to his size.
-------------------------
Eben_Britton 71219 39
--NAME-- has played both offensive tackle positions and brings an exciting combination of speed, wingspan, strength and field intelligence. Pro scouts are likening his ability to the Cleveland Browns' Joe Thomas.
--NAME--'s stellar pass-protection skills saw the team's new spread offense begin to jell during the 2007 season. He teamed with tight end Rob Gronkowski to give the Wildcats a devastating blocking tandem. With Willie Tuitama back under center, the Wildcats coaching staff felt that moving their most talented blocker to left tackle was not only a natural, but assured that their quarterback's blind side wasn't a concern.
A highly intelligent athlete, --NAME-- was a Scholar-Athlete Award winner and four-time Honor Roll student at John Burroughs High School. Arizona's Creative Writing major also garnered academic recognition while playing for the Wildcats. He comes from a family blessed with athletes, writers, painters and actors. His mother, Abbie, is a journalist and owner of a personal training business.
At John Burroughs High School, --NAME-- was named Foothill League co-Lineman of the Year in 2004. He added Los Angeles Times All-Region San Fernando Valley honors and received votes in the Long Beach Press-Telegram's Best in the West poll. The Super Prep All-American and Prep Star All-West product received a four-star rating and was listed among the nation's elite offensive tackles by Max Emfinger's recruiting service.
--NAME-- also attained All-State second-team accolades from Cal-Hi Sports during his senior season. He competed in the Cali-Florida All-Star game in Miami, a game that features the nation's top prep stars. He started at left tackle as a senior and on the right side during his first two years on the varsity. He also lettered in basketball and track, setting school records in the shot put and discus during his two seasons with the track squad.
During his freshman season at Arizona, --NAME-- became the first Wildcat and the Pac-10 Conference's first freshman to ever keep his assignment off of the stat sheet in three games, earning Freshman All-American honors in 2006. He made 83 knockdowns with 11 touchdown-resulting blocks, as his blocking consistency grade of 84.5 percent was the second-highest in the conference, topped only by Southern California's center, Ryan Kalil (87.38 percent grade).
In 2007, --NAME-- established himself as one of the nation's premier pass protectors, as more than 70 percent of the team's offense generated came from his blocks. He led the nation's right tackles with an 86.58 percent grade for blocking consistency, earning All-American and All-Pac 10 Conference recognition. His 15 touchdown-resulting blocks tied Virginia Tech's Eugene Monroe for most by an active NCAA Division 1-A player.
--NAME-- earned All-American honorable mention and All-Pac 10 Conference first-team accolades in 2008. He adjusted quickly to his new left tackle position, coming up with a league-high 111 knockdowns while producing 17 touchdown-resulting blocks, also the best total of any offensive lineman in the Pac-10. He graded 85.69 percent for overall blocking consistency, including five games with marks 90 percent or better.
2008: Limited early in August camp with a groin strain (8/09) that forced the coaches to hold him out of several practices Missed the third quarter of the UCLA game (9/20) with leg cramps and dehydration.
Attended John Burroughs (Ridgecrest, Cal.) High School Named Foothill League co-Lineman of the Year in 2004 Added Los Angeles Times All-Region San Fernando Valley honors and received votes in the Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West poll  Super Prep All-American and Prep Star All-West product Received a four-star rating and was listed among the nation's elite offensive tackles by Max Emfinger's recruiting service All-State second-team pick by Cal-Hi Sports during his senior season, serving as squad captain while earning team MVP honors Competed in the Cali-Florida All-Star game in Miami, a contest that features the nation's top prep stars Started at left tackle as a senior and on the right side during his first two years on the varsity Also lettered in basketball and track, setting school records in the shot put and discus during his two seasons with the track squad Scholar-Athlete Award winner and four-time Honor Roll student.
Rare size and wingspan. Good initial hand punch and can physically control his opponent when he locks on. Cognizant pass blocker who recognizes the blitz and adjusts quickly. Flashes a deep kick-step to force pass rushers wide. Adequate lateral agility to mirror the pass rusher to remain at tackle. Forceful run blocker. Despite his height, can play with leverage in the running game and drive defenders off the line. Only marginal agility in the open field, but can eliminate defenders with intimidating pancake blocks. Leader of the line. Started 37 consecutive games.
Protected as a pass blocker by the Arizona spread scheme and athleticism of his quarterback. Lacks the elite foot speed of top left tackles and will struggle in pass protection if he lines up at the OLT position in the NFL. Too often allows pass rushers to get their hands into his chest and can be walked back to the quarterback, despite his strength. Lumbers when blocking on the move and will resort to lunging at the defender in open space.
-------------------------
Andre_Brown 71225 129
After playing in a running back by committee situation his first three years at State, --NAME-- finally was given his opportunity to be the team's full-time starter as a senior. Despite his excellent playing speed, he relished his role as the team's inside runner, dishing out more punishment than he received with his excellent size, bulk and strength.
The tailback started 30 of 44 games he appeared in for the Wolfpack, finishing eighth on the school's career-record list with 2,539 yards. He placed seventh all-time with 523 carries and his 22 rushing touchdowns were good for ninth in State history. 
--NAME-- also proved to be more than just a one-dimensional player. He pulled down 70 receptions as the short-yardage receiver. He also averaged 20.0 yards on 17 kickoff returns, as the tailback would end his career by amassing 3,511 all-purpose yards to go with 24 touchdowns, ranking eighth on the school career-record chart.
--NAME-- was a Parade All-American as a senior at Greenville Rose High School in 2003, when he was also named North Carolina's Associated Press Player of the Year. He scored 47 times during his career and set the state season record with 3,479 yards rushing as a senior, averaging 12.2 yards per attempt to lead the team to the state Class 4A title.
Prior to enrolling at North Carolina State in 2005, --NAME-- spent the 2004 semester at Hargrave Military Academy to improve his grades. He improved his classroom work so much, that he received Academic All-Atlantic Coast Conference honors as a freshman. 
--NAME-- made The Sporting News' Freshman All-ACC squad in 2005, starting the final five games. That season, State's Most Valuable Offensive Back gained 667 yards with six scores on 129 carries (5.2 avg.), as he also averaged 10.9 yards on seven receptions and 21.9 yards on nine kickoff returns.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- became the 21st player in school history to rush for over 1,000 yards in a career. He started seven times in 12 games, producing 658 yards on 124 attempts (5.3 avg.) that included four touchdowns. He also returned seven kickoffs for an 18.7-yard average.
Proving that he was "tough as nails," --NAME-- suffered a foot fracture vs. Florida State and underwent surgery in 2006. The doctors felt that he would be lost for the rest of the season, but he missed only four games before returning to action. He averaged 4.7 yards on 95 rushes that totaled 447 yards with five touchdowns. He also became much more involved in the passing game, latching on to 25 passes for 198 yards (7.8 avg.).
--NAME--'s final campaign almost got off to a rough start as he fractured his left foot again in spring drills and was forced to have a second surgical procedure. He underwent a grueling rehab program and went on to start all 13 games. He finished his final campaign with 175 carries for a career-high 767 yards (4.4 avg.) and seven touchdowns. He also made 29 catches for 309 yards (10.7 avg.) and a pair of scores.
2007: Sat out the East Carolina, Virginia, Miami and North Carolina games after undergoing surgery to repair a fractured bone in his left foot suffered in the Florida State clash.
2008: Again broke the bone in his left foot during spring drills, undergoing a second surgical procedure.
Attended Greenville (N.C.) Rose High School, playing football for head coach Greg Thomas Parade All-American as a senior Named North Carolina's Associated Press Player of the Year Scored 47 times during his career and set the state season record with 3,479 yards rushing as a senior, averaging 12.2 yards per attempt to lead the team to the state Class 4A title.
Tall and thick in upper and lower bodies. Strong straight-ahead runner. Nimble enough to sidestep and find a running lane. Lowers his pads to run over tacklers. Will keep his legs churning in short-yardage situations and carry linebackers and safeties for a few yards. Able to stand up to blitzing linebackers. Productive receiver who is a mismatch against safeties in the open field.
Runs tall. Lacks elite speed, taking a few steps to get going. Inconsistent hands out of the backfield, body-catches too often. Tends to dance in the hole if there is anyone in his sight. Does not have the quickness to make defenders miss once stopped. Must have more awareness of blitzers off the edge.
-------------------------
Everette_Brown 71227 43
The two-year starter emerged as one of the elite pass rushers in the collegiate ranks as a junior. With National Football League teams putting much more emphasis on speedy edge rushers, --NAME-- felt it was the right time to forgo his senior season and applied for the 2009 NFL Draft. With his athletic ability and quickness off the snap, the only question NFL teams have about --NAME-- is where to play him.
Teams that utilize the 3-4 alignment feel --NAME-- can make a successful move to strong-side outside linebacker, comparing him to Dallas' DeMarcus Ware, an undersized former college defensive end who has had great success after moving to linebacker. Other teams feel that his pass rush burst off the snap might be a better fit to play rush end, where he has been likened to Indianapolis' Robert Mathis.
In 25 starting assignments, the right defensive end registered 23 sacks, tying for fifth on the school career record list. He is just the fifth player in Seminoles history to record more than 40 stops behind the line of scrimmage (46.5), moving ahead of Hall of Fame nose guard Ron Simmons (44, 1977-80) for second on the FSU all-time record list behind Darnell Dockett (65, 2000-03).  Most of those totals came during his 2008 campaign, as his 13.5 sacks and 21.5 stops for loss both rank third on the school single-season record list.
--NAME-- also became one of Florida State's leaders when it comes to community service, donating his time freely. --NAME-- has volunteered at Riley Elementary and Speight Middle School, with booster groups, The Able Trust, MDA Summer Camp and the Tallahassee Seminole Club. He has also contributed his time to the Dick Howser Center for Childhood Services, Life Skills Center and Read Across America, among many others.
At Beddingfield High School, --NAME-- was rated a four-star prospect, the third-best weak-side defensive end and 78th-ranked overall player in the country by Rivals.com. He was rated the fifth-best player in North Carolina and the state's premier defensive lineman by Super Prep.
As a senior, --NAME-- recorded 120 tackles with 16 sacks. He also excelled as a tight end, coming up with 40 receptions for 770 yards (19.25 avg) and 10 touchdowns. After his final campaign, he played in the Shrine Bowl All-Star game. A heavy recruiting battle ensued, but Florida State emerged as the victors over North Carolina, Virginia Tech, Georgia and North Carolina State for --NAME--'s services. 
The freshman appeared in two games, but did not record any tackles in 2005 before the staff decided to grant him a redshirt. The following season, he played in 13 games, starting three contests. He finished ninth on the team with 27 tackles (16 solos), posting three sacks while ranking second on the squad with 13.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also blocked a kick, earning Freshman All-American honors from The Sporting News.
--NAME-- started eight games at left defensive end and one more on the right side in 2006. He led the Seminoles with 6.5 sacks and placed second on the squad with 11.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage. He also made 37 tackles (24 solos) while deflecting three passes.
In 2008, --NAME-- was stationed at right defensive end, where he led the Atlantic Coast Conference and finished third in the nation with 13.5 sacks, tying for third on the school single-season record list. The All-American second-team pick and ACC Player of the Year runner-up was also a finalist for the Ted Hendricks Award, given to the nation's premier defensive end. His 21.5 stops for loss ranked fourth nationally and also ranked third on FSU's annual record chart. He caused four fumbles and totaled 36 hits (30 solos) in 13 starts.
No major injuries reported Player has never missed any games due to injury.
Attended Beddingfield (Stantonburg, N.C.) High School Rated a four-star prospect, the third-best weak-side defensive end and 78th-ranked overall player in the country by Rivals.com Rated the fifth-best player in North Carolina and the state's premier defensive lineman by Super Prep As a senior, --NAME-- recorded 120 tackles with 16 sacks Also excelled as a tight end, coming up with 40 receptions for 770 yards (19.25 avg) and 10 touchdowns After his final campaign, he played in the Shrine Bowl All-Star game.
Rangy, athletic build with plenty of room for additional growth.   Rare initial quickness off the snap.   Has the speed to quickly force the blocking tackle wide.   Good flexibility and balance to dip his shoulder and slip under the tackle to collapse the pocket.   Wide variety of counter moves for an underclassman.   Good spin and reverse spin and uses his hands well.   Good hump, rip and swim technique.   Closes quickly and can explode into the ballcarrier, creating turnovers.   Impressive lower-body strength to hold up against the run, despite his lack of size.   Experienced as a stand-up rusher and out of the three-point stance.   Good lateral quickness and straight-line speed to keep contain and to make plays in pursuit.   Good change of direction agility and balance to turn and run in space.   Ascending talent.
Bit of a "tweener," surprisingly strong at the point of attack but lacks the bulk and upper-body strength to split double-teams.   Rarely used in coverage, so transition to 3-4 rush linebacker could take some time.   Moved around in the FSU defense to create mismatches.   Struggles of recent FSU pass rushers acclimating to the NFL cannot be ignored.
JOHN ABRAHAM, Atlanta -- --NAME-- is not as big as Abraham, unless a Florida State coach handles the measurements (school listed him close to three inches taller than he actually is), but both are elite pass rushers in an age where teams put great emphasis on explosive edge rushers wreaking havoc in the backfield. Some compare --NAME-- to Dallas' DeMarcus Ware, but he does not have the fluid hips to drop back in pass coverage, making it a potential unwise move to plant him in the linebacking unit. History says that Florida State defensive ends rarely excel in the pros, but if used in the right system like Indianapolis utilizes with Dwight Freeney and Robert Mathis, --NAME-- could be the one to break the Seminoles' jinx.
-------------------------
David_Buehler 71231 172
Unlike most place-kickers, --NAME-- is an impressive athlete with exceptional strength for a player at his position. He proved that recently at the NFL Combine, where his 25 repetitions bench pressing 225 pounds was more than even three of the 2009 NFL Draft's elite offensive linemen, Michael Oher of Mississippi, Eugene Monroe of Virginia and Max Unger of Oregon. One look at his family tree, you can see that stellar athletes are the norm in the --NAME-- household.
His father, John, was a three-year letterman (1969-71) on Southern California's track team as a shot putter. His uncle, George --NAME--, lettered in football at Stanford for three seasons (1966-68) and then played offensive guard with the Oakland Raiders (1969-78) and Cleveland Browns (1978-79). Another uncle, Charles, lettered in football at Stanford for three years (1960-62).
During his prep and junior college playing days, --NAME-- served as his team's place-kicker, linebacker and running back. He also competed in volleyball, golf and track. Upon his arrival at Southern California in 2006, he also worked at fullback and strong safety.
Still, it is his strong kicking leg that he will make his professional living. He holds the distinction of being the only the second kicker in school history to score at least 100 points (2007) in a season, joining Ryan Killeen (122 in 2003, 112 in 2004). --NAME--'s kickoff abilities are also quite special. On 180 kickoffs, 105 of them (58.3 percent) have pinned opponents within the 20-yard line, with 69 resulting in touchbacks (38.3 percent).
--NAME-- handled kicking chores at Canyon High School, where he also saw action as a fullback and linebacker. He earned 2004 All-Century League honors as a senior. He also lettered in volleyball, golf and track.
As a freshman, --NAME-- attended Santa Ana Junior College. Playing on both offense and defense, in addition to handling kickoff chores he was selected to the All-Mission Conference National Division first-team. He registered 25 touchbacks on his 58 kickoffs, and 29 tackles (19 solos) with one interception as a linebacker. Playing fullback, he rushed for 50 yards on nine carries (5.6 avg) with five touchdowns and also caught a pass for a 2-yard score in ten games.
--NAME-- transferred to Southern California in 2006, playing behind the late Mario Danelo during his first year in the program. He appeared in 11 games, making his only field-goal try, a 49-yarder vs. California, the longest three-pointer by a USC kicker since 1998. He kicked off eight times, pinning the opponent inside the 20-yard line on six of those attempts, including three touchbacks.
With the tragic death of Mario Danelo, --NAME-- inherited the place-kicking chores for the Trojans in 2007. The All-Pac 10 Conference honorable mention scored 100 points on 16 of 19 field goals and 52 of 54 extra-point attempts. He added three solo tackles and pinned the opponent inside the 20-yard line on 35 of his 84 kickoffs, producing 18 touchbacks.
--NAME-- was named the Trojans' co-Special Teams Player of the Year in 2008. He added All-Pac 10 Conference first-team honors, as he amassed 92 points, delivering on 9 of 13 field goals and 65 of 66 PATS. He pinned the opponent inside the 20-yard line 64 times on 88 kickoffs that included 48 touchbacks.
He made the 2005 All-Mission Conference National Division first team as a freshman placekicker, linebacker and running back at Santa Ana (Calif.) Junior College. He had 25 touchbacks on his 58 kickoffs in 2005, plus recorded 24 tackles and one interception
No injuries reported.
Attended Canyon (Anaheim, Cal.) High School, earning All-Century League team honors as a senior Also lettered in volleyball, golf and track.
NFL-caliber leg strength. Capable of handling kickoff and field-goal duties at the next level. Accurate. Gets good, quick elevation on his kicks. Rare size and athleticism for a kicking prospect. Can break down and make the open-field tackle in coverage. Practiced at fullback and safety with the Trojans. Unfazed by jump in competition from junior college to USC.
Regressed as a senior in his deep accuracy. Only made 1-of-4 career field goal attempts against rival UCLA. Lacks experience in clutch situations; USC rarely played in close games.
-------------------------
Deon_Butler 71233 91
It was not like Vincent --NAME-- was hiding in the shadows during his four seasons at Penn State. He is just not the type that needs to be in the limelight in order to feel appreciated. Despite being considered the "sidekick" to more heralded prep star turned Nittany Lions teammate Derrick Williams, --NAME-- went out and proved to be the more productive player, developing into Penn State's "go-to" guy on the way to capturing a pair of Big Ten Conference titles during his tenure at the university.
Breaking school records wasn't high on --NAME--'s list of goals when he came to Penn State as a walk-on defensive back in 2004. Making the squad was. Trying to have an impact and get the Nittany Lions back on the winning track was. The coaching staff saw something in the foreign squad member during the challenging fall of '04. The following spring, --NAME-- was asked to move to wide receiver, where he burst onto the college football landscape as a highly productive and reliable receiver, making a school freshman-record nine touchdown catches. 
--NAME-- was among the influx of highly skilled playmakers that helped lift Penn State to the 2005 Big Ten Conference and Orange Bowl titles and a 40-11 record the past four seasons.
He would close out his career as the school's all-time leader with 179 receptions, finishing second with 2,771 yards receiving and third with 22 touchdown catches. His 48 grabs in 2006 tied the school season record for sophomores and ranks seventh on PSU's annual record chart. He is just one of three players in Nittany Lions annals to gain over 200 yards receiving in a game, setting the record with 216 yards vs. Northwestern in 2006.
--NAME-- was a three-sport standout at Hylton High School, where he lettered four times in football, adding four more letters in basketball and one in track as a sprinter during his final campaign. The all-state wide receiver added all-metro, all-district and all-area honors as a senior, serving as team captain. 
In 2003, --NAME-- had 41 receptions for 1,029 yards and 16 touchdowns, leading the team to the Virginia Class AAA state championship. He also had 26 kickoff returns for 763 yards and two touchdowns. A two-way starter, he recorded 73 tackles and nine interceptions as a defensive back in 2003 and grabbed 16 career interceptions. Prior to graduation, he was selected to play in the 2004 VHSL All-Star game.
--NAME-- sat out the 2004 season after joining Penn State as a walk-on. Buried deep down the depth chart entering 2005 fall camp, he emerged as the team's starting flanker for the final eight games. He earned Freshman All-America third-team honors from The Sporting News, as he broke four school freshman records, including season receptions (37), receiving yards in a game (125 vs. Wisconsin) and season (691) and touchdown catches (nine). His 18.7 yards per catch average was tops among players with 10 or more catches and he posted 11 receptions of 20 yards or longer (seven for scores).
In 2006, --NAME-- was the Nittany Lions' leading receiver for the second consecutive season. He made 48 receptions for 637 yards (13.3 avg.) and two touchdowns to earn honorable mention All-Big Ten recognition. His 48 catches were tied for seventh all-time in a season at Penn State. He joined classmates Jordan Norwood (45) and Derrick Williams (40) in becoming the first triumvirate in school history to each make 40 receptions in a season. He was third on the squad with 634 all-purpose yards.
As a junior, --NAME-- made at least one reception in every game to run his streak to 15 straight and 36 of 38 career games. --NAME-- continued his climb into the top five slots on the school career receptions and receiving yardage charts. He had 47 receptions for a team-high 633 yards (13.5 avg.) and four touchdowns, including one score in each of the last three contests. His 47 receptions were tied for 10th on the school season list. --NAME-- and classmates Jordan Norwood and Derrick Williams duplicated their feat of becoming the first trio of Nittany Lions to each make 40 or more catches in a season, accomplishing the feat for the second consecutive year.
--NAME-- paced the Nittany Lions for the third time in four seasons with his 47 receptions, good for 810 yards (17.2 avg.) and seven touchdowns. He was again joined by Derrick Williams (44) and Jordan Norwood (41), as that trio each had 40 or more catches for the third consecutive season. He also ranked fourth in the Big Ten in receiving yards per game (62.31 ypg).
No major injuries reported.
Attended Hylton High School (suburban Washington, D.C.), playing football for head coach Lou Sorrentino A three-sport standout, he lettered four times in football and  basketball, adding one more letter in track as a sprinter during his final campaign  Earned all-state, all-metro, all-district and all-area honors as a senior, serving as team captain In 2003, --NAME-- had 41 receptions for 1,029 yards and 16 touchdowns, leading the team to the Virginia Class AAA state championship Also had 26 kickoff returns for 763 yards and two touchdowns A two-way starter, he recorded 73 tackles and nine interceptions as a defensive back in 2003 and grabbed 16 career interceptions Chosen to play in the 2004 VHSL All-Star game.
Wiry strong receiver with long arms. Reliable hands; uses his hands outside his frame even when challenged and high-points the ball. Has the initial quickness off the snap to get into his route. Good vision, elusiveness and stop-start acceleration in space. Able to run through cornerback tackles to extend the play. Set up corners well for out-routes, pressing them inside and using his arm and quickness to separate.
Short, lean receiver who is knocked off his routes by larger corners. Will struggle to get off the jam. Makes the effort blocking on the outside but lacks the strength to sustain. Questionable value as a deep threat against man coverage; will be best in the slot.
-------------------------
Demetrius_Byrd 71235 224
--NAME-- signed with LSU as one of the elite JUCO prospects in the country. He led the team with seven touchdown receptions in his first season, six of which came against elite SEC competition. But --NAME--'s senior season was a bit disappointing, as he failed to step up in the primary receiver role (37 receptions for 499 yards and four touchdowns). His value appears to be as a complementary receiver at the next level. Had an arm span of 33 3/8 inches and a hand span of 9 inches at the combine.
Came to LSU after two seasons at Pearl River Community College   Received a four-star rating as a member of Rivals.com's Top 100 junior college prospects.
Originally signed with Florida International after graduating from Miami Central High School   Timed at 4.3 seconds in the 40-yard dash   Coached by Tim Hatten.
Good initial quickness off the snap. Uses his hands well to fight through the jam. Good lateral agility and body control. Legitimate straight-line speed to challenge deep. Can track the ball over either shoulder and has the body control and self-awareness to remain in bounds. Able to snatch the ball with his hands outside his body. Used on bubble screens because he can be elusive in space. Willing to go over the middle to make the reception. A history of making the tough catch in pressure situations dating back to high school.
Thin build with little upper body strength. Loses physical battles at the line and for the ball. Does not run through many tackles. An effective deep threat, but has to build up to top speed. Marginal change of direction or acceleration to gain separation or make yards after the catch against top cornerbacks. Short-arms some passes over the middle, leading to some drops in traffic. Works at blocking but lacks the strength to be effective.
-------------------------
Antoine_Caldwell 71239 77
One of the most consistent snappers in college football, the four-time starter and two-time team captain began his career as an offensive guard before finding a home in the middle of the field. He also has filled in at offensive tackle when injuries depleted the depth along the Crimson Tide front wall. The unquestioned "heart and soul" of the offensive unit, he was the recipient of the 2008 Mal Moore Leadership Award.
The anchor of one of the most physical offensive lines in the major college ranks, --NAME-- has outstanding agility, foot speed and flexibility. His ability to handle the bull rush and widen the rush lanes saw Alabama improve its 60th-place national ranking in rush offense (149.23 ypg) in 2007 to a 30th-place ranking in 2008 (184.64 ypg). The Tide's success on the ground also greatly improved the numbers in the win column, as Alabama rushers scored 32 times in --NAME--'s final season, compared to 19 times during his junior year.
--NAME-- was the premier athlete on Montgomery's powerhouse Lee High School football team. He allowed just one quarterback sack and graded 85 percent for blocking consistency as a senior, earning first-team All-State honors. That year, he was rated the 10th-best overall prospect in the state of Alabama by Super Prep magazine. 
One of four All-State offensive linemen to enroll at Alabama, --NAME-- spent the 2004 season performing as an offensive guard on the scout team. In 2005, he took over left guard duties for the first 11 games, moving to center vs. Texas Tech in the Cotton Bowl. He registered 62 knockdowns while participating on 772 plays. He was named first-team Freshman All-American by Rivals.com, adding second-team accolades from College Football News. He added All-SEC Freshman Team honors and was selected SEC Freshman of the Week for his performance vs. Florida.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- was firmly entrenched at center, starting all 13 games. He was one of five players on the squad to log over 800 snaps (810), as he produced 58 knockdowns, leading the team in that category in four contests. He was selected SEC Offensive Lineman of the Week vs. Vanderbilt and chosen team Player of the Game vs. Louisiana-Monroe, serving as squad captain in that game and also vs. Louisiana State.
--NAME-- was named offensive team captain in 2007. He was a member of the Rimington Award (nation's best center) Watch List and started the first five games at center. Injuries forced the staff to shift --NAME-- to left offensive guard for the Houston clash and the following week, he started at right guard vs. Mississippi.
He was ruled ineligible for four midseason games, as he and several athletes were suspended for what school administrators called "a violation of institutional policy involving impermissible receipt of textbooks." When --NAME-- returned to the field for the final two contests, he was shifted to right offensive tackle vs. Auburn before moving back to center for the Independence Bowl. Despite all the position shuffling, he graded 84.67 percent for blocking consistency, delivering eight touchdown-resulting blocks.
The 2008 season saw --NAME-- garner the national attention that escaped him earlier in his career. The Rimington Award finalist earned All-American first-team recognition from The Sporting News and AFCA. He also received All-Southeastern Conference first-team honors. He started all 14 games at center, ranking second on the team with 92 knockdowns, as he finished with an 85.93 percent blocking consistency grade.
2004: Granted a medical hardship after breaking a bone in his foot during fall camp.
Attended Lee (Montgomery, Ala.) High School Allowed just one quarterback sack and graded 85 percent for blocking consistency as a senior, earning All-State first-team honors  That year, he was rated the 10-best overall prospect in the state of Alabama by Super Prep magazine.
Good height and plays with a wider base than his weight may signal. Excellent burst after the snap, getting up into his man very quickly to create a gap or pass protect. Strong enough to put tackles on the ground, but quick enough to get to the outside shoulder of either guard to help protect the quarterback. Strong, active hands to engage the defender and can drive defenders off the ball. Smart player who makes line calls. Adept at the shotgun snap. Durable. Four-year starter.
Could be more aware and help the quarterback as plays break down. Lacks elite lateral quickness to get down the line or get to linebackers in combo or zone blocks. Lumbers a bit when trying to get downfield to block.
-------------------------
Trevor_Canfield 71243 254
The three-time All-Big East Conference second-team selection was a driving force up front, serving as a mentor for a young offensive line that was called upon to protect six different quarterbacks on the way to the 2009 Orange Bowl. Always known for his dominance in the trenches, the right offensive guard simply mauled his opponents during his final campaign.
Boasting a starting string of 39 games, the longest consecutive mark on the team, --NAME-- has proven his dominance in the trenches. In 42 total career starts (including three as a freshman), he delivered 300 knockdowns/key blocks, including 26 blocks down field and 37 touchdown-resulting blocks. On 1,374 pass plays, the team has given up 134 sacks and 80 pressures during --NAME--'s tenure as a starter, but the right guard was charged with only seven sacks and three pressures during that span.
At Western Hills (Cincinnati, Ohio) High School, --NAME-- started his final three seasons as an offensive lineman for head coach Mike Irvin. He earned first-team All-Southwestern Ohio Public Schools League honors and was an honorable mention All-City and All-District selection as a senior.
The recipient of the team's Line of Scrimmage Award, --NAME-- was chosen the team's Outstanding Offensive Player and garnered second-team all-league accolades as a junior. As a freshman, he helped the team qualify for the state playoffs.
--NAME-- enrolled at Cincinnati in 2004, spending his first season as a member of the scout team. In 2005, he appeared in eight contests. He was one of four players to man the right guard position that year, starting three contests. As a starter, he posted 19 knockdowns that included three touchdown-resulting blocks.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- took over right offensive guard duties after the season opener, starting the final 12 games. He received All-Big East Conference second-team honors, as he delivered an 82.25 percent grade for blocking consistency. He registered 84 knockdowns with nine touchdown-resulting blocks and also recovered one fumble.
In 2007, --NAME-- again was named All-Big East Conference second-team. Despite a midseason left knee sprain that saw him miss most of the Louisville contest, he paced the Bearcats with 100 knockdowns, delivering 12 touchdown-resulting blocks in the process. While the front wall allowed 23 sacks, just two were credited to --NAME--. He started the first nine games on the right side, but finished the season with four straight starts at left guard.
As a senior, --NAME--'s blocking consistency grade of 84.07 percent was the best among the Big East Conference offensive guards. He generated 97 key blocks/knockdowns that also included nine blocks down field and 13 touchdown-resulting blocks. He allowed just three sacks and one quarterback pressure on 472 pass plays.
2009: Left hamstring strain prevented --NAME-- from doing jumps or shuttle runs during Combine workout.
2007: Suffered a left knee sprain vs. Louisville (10/14), missing the final three quarters.
Attended Western Hills (Cincinnati, Oh.) High School, starting three times as an offensive lineman for head coach Mike Irvin Earned first-team All-Southwestern Ohio Public Schools League honors and was an honorable mention All-City and All-District selection as a senior Recipient of the team's Line of Scrimmage Award Was chosen the team's Outstanding Offensive Player and garnered second-team All-League accolades as a junior As a freshman, he helped the team qualify for the state playoffs.
Tall and strong, but also nimble for pass protection and in reaching linebackers at the second level.   Plays mean, willing to destroy targets in space and keep them on the ground until the play is done.   Gets down quickly to cut linemen, but can also get up and immediately find someone to hit.   Sets quickly and anchors well in pass protection. Gets the shoulder of his defender to create the correct running lane.   Hands come up into his man's jersey quickly and he can move the defender as desired.   More than willing to help out his tackle with an outside pass rusher.   Is versatile enough to possibly move outside.
Not a power drive blocker, lacking the lower-body strength needed to move larger defensive tackles.   Must improve his punch to knock tackles off their moves.   Needs to find and lock onto defenders in the open and sustain those blocks more consistently.   He should dominate safeties and linebackers in space.   Does not keep his pads low enough in short-yardage situations, losing the leverage battle.   Fails to recover quickly from overextending.   Sometimes will get penalized when he plays with too much attitude.
-------------------------
James_Casey 71247 152
--NAME-- is a truly remarkable athlete and person, having overcome several obstacles in his personal life and athletic career to emerge as one of the finest prospects in the 2009 NFL Draft. His focus, determination and success on the field have created a story that a Hollywood producer would love to turn into a movie.
Growing up in Fort Worth, Texas, tragedy struck the --NAME-- family when --NAME-- was a sophomore at Azle High School. A fire caused by an electrical heater malfunction in the trailer his family lived in, taking the life of his mother, Susan. "It was a real rough moment in my life, --NAME-- recalled. "I think she'd be very proud of how I've handled myself and where I'm at right now." Where that is might be a first-day call from an NFL team in late April.
The family tragedy forced the young --NAME-- to grow up in a hurry. "It was a big turning point in my life," he said. "It made me be very driven, very motivated with a very, very good work ethic. I realized my mom would have wanted me to pick myself up and to succeed."
--NAME-- was a standout in football and baseball at Azle High, where he earned All- District honors as a quarterback during his junior campaign in 2001. He missed most of his senior football season with injury problems, leaving baseball as his only option for his immediate future.
--NAME-- earned All-State and Academic All-State honors in baseball and was named District 6-4A Most Valuable Player as a senior. He threw a no-hitter in first varsity game and major league scouts flocked to see him perform. He was also a member of the National Honor Society at Azele High.
--NAME-- excelled academically, and while he loved the game of football, he received more attention for his performance on the baseball diamond during his prep days. He was selected in the seventh round of the 2003 Major League Baseball Draft by the Chicago White Sox. 
Baseball America rated him as possessing the best fastball in the Sox minor league organization. The right-handed pitcher spent three years in the White Sox farm system before he was released in 2006. He played for a few independent teams in Fort Worth and Laredo before deciding to retire from baseball.
That became another turning point for him. --NAME-- enrolled at Rice University after one of his high school teammates, Dustin Hufsey, who was on the Rice team, forwarded his information on to the coaching staff. He was awarded a scholarship as a linebacker, but he eventually was shifted to defensive end. 
In the 2007 Southern Mississippi game, he played seven different positions, catching two passes while scoring once on 12 carries for 38 yards. He also posted three tackles, assisted on a sack, made another stop behind the line of scrimmage and recovered a fumble.
The coaches decided his athleticism would be better served on the offensive side of the ball. He was named a Freshman All American as a tight end by the Football Writers Association, The Sporting News and Rivals.com. The consensus Conference USA All- Freshman pick would also perform as a flanker, inside slot receiver, linebacker, H-back and quarterback in addition to seeing some action as a punt returner that campaign.
All told, --NAME-- started just four of the 12 2007 games he appeared in, but ranked second on the team with 46 receptions for 585 yards (12.7 avg) and four touchdowns. He scored five more times while gaining 144 yards on 45 carries (3.2 avg) and completed two of seven passes for 32 yards and an interception. He scored 54 points and totaled 711 all-purpose yards.
--NAME-- followed with a banner 2008 campaign. Used mostly at the "Y" receiver position, he established school single-season records with 111 receptions for 1,329 yards (12.0 avg) and 12 touchdowns, earning All-American and All-Conference USA accolades. He became just the second player in school history to score more than 100 points (116) in a season, as he also had six touchdowns and 248 yards on 57 carries (4.4 avg), connected on two of five throws for 5 yards and a pair of scores and returned 14 punts for 112 yards (8.0 avg). His 1,682 all-purpose yards ranked seventh in the league and rank fifth in Rice annals.
After the season, --NAME-- and his wife, Kylie, decided he should forgo his final two years of eligibility and he applied for the 2009 NFL Draft. In just two years at Rice, he received Academic All-American honors, compiling a 3.84-grade point average while holding a triple major in Economics, Managerial Studies and Sports Management.
No major injuries or lost game time reported at Rice.
Attended Azle (Texas) High School Standout in football and baseball Earned All- District honors as a quarterback during his junior campaign in 2001 Missed most of his senior football season with injury problems Named All-State and Academic All-State in baseball and was named District 6-4A Most Valuable Player as a senior Threw a no-hitter in first varsity game Member of the National Honor Society at Azele High.
Unique all-around athlete capable of contributing in various ways at the next level. Instinctive football player who simply makes plays. Good playing speed, though his actual 40 time is questionable. Good initial burst off the line of scrimmage. Good agility to make defenders miss in the open field. Good toughness. Willing to absorb the hit to gain positive yardage, but more often dishes out punishment. Natural hands for the reception. Good hand-eye coordination. Secure ball-carrier. Mature athlete with professional experience due to his baseball career.
Lacks a true role and will be drafted based on athletic potential. Though many scouts view him as a potential tight end prospect, --NAME-- has limited experience in this role and virtually none as a traditional blocker out of the three-point stance. Only two years of D-I experience and operated in a spread system perfectly tailored to his unique skill set. Due to his time playing baseball is older than most rookies (will turn 25 in September).
WES WELKER, New England meets DALLAS CLARK, Indianapolis -- It is very hard to find a comparison for --NAME--. His ability to play in a variety of blue collar roles brings back memories of what Welker did at Texas Tech and does for the Pats. --NAME--'s pass catching ability is on par with Clark's, but he does not have the size and blocking skills to be considered a traditional tight end. Using him as an H-Back or slot receiver is his best option, as he needs to be in motion to be productive, evident by his breakout performance in 2008. Still, he is a neophyte to football, with just two years of college experience and was away from the game for three years. His birth certificate has a lower date (8/22/84) on it than most prospects in this draft.
-------------------------
Patrick_Chung 71251 34
One of the strongest defensive backs in college football, the Kingston, Jamaica native has been a mainstay and one of the few bright spots on Oregon's defensive unit. He holds the distinction of starting more games than any defensive player in school history, having never come off the bench during his 51-game career.
--NAME-- evolved into an exceptional leader by mastering the mental aspects of the game and grasping an understanding of the team's defensive objectives. He closed out his career ranking fourth in school annals with 384 tackles and placed sixth on the Ducks' record charts with 26 pass deflections.
Considered to be the team's best defensive back since the Alex Molden era (1992-95), --NAME-- has also set several impressive marks in the training room. He posted the program's second-best bench press (345 pounds) in the 2008 winter testing, in addition to producing the Ducks' fifth-best power clean lift (324 lbs.) of all time among players in the secondary.
--NAME--'s family came to the United States during his childhood, settling in California, where he went on to star at Rancho Cucamonga High School. The two-time first-team All-Baseline League pick was rated among top 90 prospects in California by Super Prep magazine after helping lead the Cougars to a 7-4 record his senior year. 
He excelled at wide receiver and free safety in 2003, finishing as his team's second-leading tackler, recording 74 tackles while coming up with nine receptions for 209 yards and two touchdowns. He posted eight or more tackles five times, including a season-high 12 vs. Alta Loma High during his final campaign. He also contributed two interceptions, forced two fumbles and recovered two others.
--NAME-- enrolled at Oregon in 2004, learning the system while competing on the scout team. On that squad, he was named Defensive Player of the Week for his performances in practice before the Oklahoma, UCLA and Arizona contests.
In 2005, the youngster garnered considerable national attention. He was named Pac-10 Conference Defensive Freshman of the Year by The Sporting News, as the magazine also chose him for their Freshman All-American squad. He received the Len Casanova Award as the team's best newcomer and was an All-Pac 10 Conference honorable mention.
That year, --NAME-- began his string of 51 consecutive starts, taking over at the Rover position. He ranked second on the team with 91 tackles (5 solos), as he caused a fumble and deflected five passes. He also had two interceptions and saw brief action as a kickoff returner. First stepping onto the collegiate practice field at the age of 16, he was difficult to pull off the field due to his insistence of playing on the majority of special teams in addition to the line of scrimmage.
With --NAME-- firmly entrenched at Rover, the Ducks ranked 20th in the nation in pass defense for 2006. He was again named All-Pac 10 Conference honorable mention, as he finished third on the team with 84 tackles (49 solos) that included 3.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage and two sacks. He picked off four passes and batted down five other tosses. He also handled the brunt of the punt return duties, averaging 12.1 yards on 14 attempts that included one touchdown.
As a junior, --NAME-- was named second-team All-American and first-team All-Pac 10 Conference. He received the Gordon E. Wilson Award, given to the team's top special teams player. He averaged 22.3 yards on nine kickoff returns while leading the Ducks with a career-high 117 tackles (71 solos), adding 7.5 stops for loss. He broke up nine passes and was credited with a pair of interceptions.
--NAME-- garnered third-team All-American accolades in addition to making the All-Pac 10 Conference first-team for the second consecutive year in 2008. Along with offensive lineman Max Unger, the pair set the school record with 51 consecutive starting assignments. He had 92 tackles (58 solos) in 13 games, coming up with two sacks among his 6.5 stops for loss. He caused and recovered a fumble, batted down seven passes and returned his only interception 31 yards for a touchdown.
2009: Could not complete shuttle drills at the NFL Combine due to a right knee sprain.
Attended Rancho Cucamonga (Cal.) High School, playing football for head coach Chris VanDuyk Two-time first-team All-Baseline League pick Rated among top 90 prospects in California by Super Prep magazine after helping lead the Cougars to a 7-4 record his senior year Excelled at wide receiver and free safety in 2003, finishing as his team's second-leading tackler, recording 74 tackles while coming up with nine receptions for 209 yards and two touchdowns Posted eight or more tackles five times, including a season-high 12 vs. Alta Loma High during his final campaign Also contributed two interceptions, forced two fumbles and recovered two others.
Well-built, versatile athlete who has seen time at cornerback and as a returner.   Flashes explosive hitting ability.   Reads the action quickly and is seemingly always around the ball.   Good lateral quickness, acceleration and smooth change-of-direction agility while in zone coverage.   Attacks underneath routes and rarely allows the receiver to cross with the ball unscathed.   Closes quickly on the ballcarrier.   Receivers are cognizant of him when going over the middle.   Quick enough to hang with receivers for a few seconds in the deep half.   Among the more reliable open-field tacklers in the country and should be an excellent last line of defense at the NFL level.   Accomplished blitzer.   Few have --NAME--'s ability to explode into ballcarriers while wrapping their arms securely.   Whether deep in coverage or attacking the line of scrimmage, he limits the yards gained at the point he meets the ballcarrier.   Consistently swarms to the ball.   Durable, consistent performer.   Instinctive defender.   Should be a leader on defense and special teams.
Questionable deep speed and is a bit shorter than scouts prefer because of their coverage duties against tight ends.   Physical player who can get a bit grabby while in coverage, leading to some holding calls.   Attacks the line or underneath routes too quickly, leaving room for the deep ball behind him.   At his best facing the quarterback and running downhill toward the ball.
-------------------------
Chris_Clemons 71253 165
Overshadowed throughout his career by teammate Michael Hamlin, --NAME--' consistency in coverage might actually make him the safer NFL prospect. A three-year starter for the Tigers who leaves with 323 career tackles, 20 passes broken up and five interceptions, --NAME--' production warrants a closer look. If he can prove his speed in workouts, --NAME--' could surprise as a second-day defender capable of contributing immediately.
Two-way star at DeSoto High Ranked the Number 23 cornerback in the nation by Tom Lemming Rushed for 1,242 yards on 193 carries Averaged 6.4 yards per carry and had 11 touchdowns as a senior Number 39 running back in the nation by Rivals.com Number 5 running back and a Super Top 75 player by Florida Times-Union Top-100 player in Florida by Orlando Sentinel Named to All-Dixie team by SuperPrep team offensive MVP DeSoto County Offensive Player-of-the-Year by Port Charlotte Sun Returned kicks as a senior Offensive MVP of the South-Central All-Star game Named first-team running back by Sarasota Herald Tribune Had 951 rushing yards in 100 carries with eight scores as a junior Had five interceptions, including two for touchdowns Averaged over 16 points and 10 rebounds on the hardwood Ran a 10.52 in the 100m, the fourth-best time in the state AAA regional champion in the 100m team MVP as a junior and senior State qualifier in the 100 and 200m District champion in the 100m and 200m as a senior Coached by Gary Morton Chose Clemson over Michigan State, Pittsburgh, and South Carolina.
Lanky build with room for additional growth.   Has at least adequate pure game speed to be the last line of defense.   Takes good angles in pursuit.   Reads the quarterback and gets a jump on the ball.   Flashes a late burst to close.   Good open-field tackler.   Has the lateral quickness and balance to break down in space and wraps up.   Agile enough to slip blocks and make tackles near the line of scrimmage.   Durable.   Has never missed a game due to injury at Clemson.
Lacks the bulk many teams prefer at safety.   A reliable open-field tackler, but lacks the explosiveness to be an enforcer in the middle.   Isn't a natural playmaker.   Loses sight of the ball and doesn't have natural hands for the interception.   Surrounded by legitimate NFL talent and has been allowed to freelance as a centerfielder.
-------------------------
Chase_Coffman 71255 98
--NAME-- emerged as the elite pass-catching tight end in the college ranks during his senior year. A team-first athlete, he willingly shared playing time with Martin Rucker during his first three seasons, as they teamed to form college football's best 1-2 punch at the tight end position. That duo accounted for 341 receptions for 3,584 yards and 34 touchdowns during those three seasons, which was 35.45 percent of the team's receptions (962), 33.55 percent of the squad's receiving yardage (10,681) and 43.59 percent of its touchdown catches (78) during that span.
The Tiger would only start 20 of 50 games for Missouri, but his 247 receptions shattered the NCAA career record for tight ends, surpassing the previous mark of 217 catches by Ibn Green of Louisville (1996-99). Despite missing two games with a toe injury that would hamper him in his final three contests, he tied the NCAA single-season record for tight ends with 90 receptions, equaling a mark first set by James Whalen of Kentucky in 1999. He would also shatter the school career record with 30 touchdown catches, the sixth-best total in Big 12 Conference history.
Coming from a football family, --NAME--, the oldest of Paul and Amy's four children, spurned numerous collage scholarship offers to enroll at Missouri, including one from his father's school, Kansas State. Paul led KSU in scoring and was an Academic All-Big Eight Conference selection in 1977. He went on to star as a tight end for Green Bay (1978-85), earning two Pro Bowl invites before concluding his career at Kansas City (1986-87). --NAME--'s younger brother, Carson, followed his father, enrolling at Kansas State (2006-present), where he serves as a reserve quarter-back.
At Raymore-Peculiar High School, --NAME-- was rated the nation's fourth-best tight end by Super Prep, which also rated him the state of Missouri's seventh-best overall prospect. He was ranked third overall in the state by Rivals.com and was the recipient of the 2004 Simone Award, which is given annually to the top player in the Kansas City metro area.
He also earned first-team All-State honors for three consecutive seasons, and was a two-time All-District and All-Conference pick.
As a senior, --NAME-- teamed with his younger brother, Carson, the squad's starting quarterback, to set numerous state receiving records. Along the way, he helped lead the team to the Class V state championship during an undefeated 2004 season (13-0 record).
That season, --NAME-- was named Conference Player of the Year after catching 41 passes for 886 yards and 16 touchdowns. He snared three balls for 56 yards and a touchdown in the state title game, including a 14-yarder in the third quarter that effectively put the game out of reach as the team went on to a 37-18 win over McCluer North High.
As a junior, --NAME-- added 50 receptions for 817 yards and 13 scores. In his first varsity season, he collected 39 catches for 611 yards and 11 touchdowns as a sophomore. He also lettered three times in basketball, earning first-team All-Conference honors in hoops in 2003-04.
--NAME-- turned down scholarship offers from Kansas State, Iowa, Nebraska, Florida,
Michigan State, UCLA and Kansas, among others, to enroll at Missouri, where the 210-pounder was recruited as a tight end/defensive back. 
In 2005, he was named Freshman All-American first-team, as he tied for the team lead with 47 receptions for 503 yards (10.7 avg) and four touchdowns, despite starting just one game. He posted 31 first-down catches, including converting eight third-down plays. In addition to his four scoring grabs, he had key receptions that set up eight other touchdown drives and five more that ended with field goals. He also recorded four solo tackles on the punt coverage squad.
In 2006, --NAME-- was a second-team All-Big 12 Conference choice. He won the team's Receiver of the Year and Hammer (most blocks) Award. Even though he started just five times in 13 contests, he led the team and ranked fourth among the nation's tight ends with a then school single-season record for tight ends of 58 catches, good for 638 yards (11.0 avg). His nine touchdown grabs set another Missouri tight end season mark. Thirty-six of his catches were good for first downs, with 12 coming off third-down grabs. He had 29 grabs for more than 10 yards and in addition to his nine scores, he set up 11 other touchdown drives.
The Mackey Award semifinalist was bothered late in the year by an ankle injury that required surgery after the 2007 season. He still finished third on the squad with 52 catches for 531 yards (10.2 avg) and seven touchdowns. Twenty-five of those grabs were for 10 yards or longer, as he also had key receptions on 10 other touchdown drives and five series that ended with field goals. He closed out the year with 32 first downs, converting 14 third-down plays and another on fourth down.
As a senior, --NAME-- missed the Kansas State and Iowa State games with a hyper-extension of his left great toe. He still tied the NCAA single-season record for tight ends with a school annual record 90 receptions, good for 987 yards and 10 touchdowns, adding to his Tiger career record of 30 scoring grabs. The consensus All-American and unanimous All-Big 12 Conference first-team choice also earned the Mackey Award, given to the nation's premier tight end.
2007: Originally tweaked his right ankle during the Oklahoma game (10/13), nursing the injury for the next several games Re-injured the ankle when a defender rolled on him early in the Kansas (11/24) clash Forced to wear a protective boot, missing the following game vs. Oklahoma (second meeting) in the Big 12 title contest Underwent surgery after the Cotton Bowl (1/08/08) to remove bone chips and calcium deposits, undergoing rehabilitation for the next two months.
2008:  Sat out the Kansas State (11/08) and Iowa State (11/15) games with a left great toe sprain and hyperextension. Was forced to wear a protective boot for several weeks and played with a noticeable limp in his final three contests.
2009: Underwent surgery on his left big toe on Jan. 9 after he re-injured his foot. Doctors diagnosed his recent injury as a Jones fracture. --NAME-- stated that he suffered the injury on the last offensive play of the Alamo Bowl (12/31) vs. Northwestern, breaking the fifth metatarsal on his left foot. Recovery from the surgery forced --NAME-- to sit out the combine workouts and Missouri's pro day.
Attended Raymore-Peculiar (Peculiar, Mo.) High School, playing football for head coach Tom Kruse Rated the nation's fourth-best tight end by Super Prep, who also rated him the state of Missouri's seventh-best overall prospect Ranked third overall in the state by Rivals.com and was the recipient of the 2004 Simone Award, which is given annually to the top player in the Kansas City metro area Earned first-team All-State honors for three consecutive seasons, and was a two-time All-District and All-Conference pick As a senior, --NAME-- teamed with his younger brother, Carson, the squad's starting quarterback, to set numerous state receiving records Along the way, he helped lead the team to the Class V state championship during an undefeated 2004 season (13-0 record) That season, he was named Conference Player of the Year after catching 41 passes for 886 yards and 16 touchdowns Snared three balls for 56 yards and a touchdown in the state title game, including a 14-yarder in the third quarter that effectively put the game out of reach as the team went on to a 37-18 win over McCluer North High As a junior, --NAME-- added 50 receptions for 817 yards and 13 scores In his first varsity season, he collected 39 catches for 611 yards and 11 touchdowns as a sophomore Also lettered three times in basketball, earning first-team All-Conference honors in hoops in 2003-04 Graduated with a 3.3 grade point average.
Rare size potential for the position. Athletic enough to line up in a variety of positions, including split out wide, in motion or along the line of scrimmage. Good initial quickness off the snap. Has the lateral agility to avoid the jam at the line and get a clean release into his route. Uses his hands well in this area to break free from defenders when initially challenged. Good lateral quickness and body control to gain separation from defenders. Good balance and body control to make the acrobatic reception with defenders draped over him. Can make the tough catch in traffic and looks to get upfield to gain extra yardage. Reliable hands. Generally looks the ball into his hands to make the secure reception, but will trap the ball against his body when he anticipates a big hit. More physical as a blocker than you'd expect for a tight end split wide as often as he is. Provides a good initial jolt to the defender when blocking and gives good effort to sustain his blocks. Emerged as a standout as a true freshman. Good bloodlines. Father, Paul --NAME--, was an NFL tight end for 10 years.
Only marginal straight-line speed. Not a true deep seam threat. Flashes the physicality and toughness scouts want in a downfield blocker, but rarely blocks from a traditional three-point stance. Legitimate durability concerns following repeated foot injuries the past two seasons. Struggled for much of his senior season with turf toe and broke the fifth metatarsal in his left bone on the final play of the Alama Bowl. Played through recurring bone spurs as a junior that eventually resulted in corrective surgery in the offseason. Was not able to work out at the combine or at Missouri's pro day following surgery to fix the left foot.
HEATH MILLER, Pittsburgh -- Whether used in the classic tight end position or in motion, one thing is evident - --NAME-- has the natural hands and RAC ability to gain big yardage once he gets the ball in his hands. He has outstanding size, arm extension and balance to go along with good strength to break tackles. He shows great body control adjusting to off-target throws and flashes good aggression as a blocker. With Martin Rucker having graduated, --NAME-- emerged as the team's featured target in 2008 until he was injured late in the year. The foot surgery has set back his workouts for teams, making it possible that he will be drafted lower than his scouting report indicates.
-------------------------
Jared_Cook 71265 89
Most thought coach Gamecocks Steve Spurrier was simply hyping a recruit when he compared a freshman wide receiver to some of the best he has ever coach, calling him "another Calvin Johnson." However, three years later and coming off a dazzling performance at the NFL Combine, --NAME-- as backed up the lofty praise.
It is very rare to see a big, physical athlete with the explosive quickness and outstanding athleticism that --NAME-- displays. In Indianapolis, he finished first among the tight ends in the 40-yard dash (4.49), vertical jump (41 inches) and broad jump (10 feet, 3 inches) before injuring his quadriceps during his second 40-yard run. 
--NAME--'s 41-inch vertical leap earned 100 pairs of cleats for his old high school, North Gwinnett. Under Armour Inc. set up a deal at the combine where it will buy 100 new cleats for the high school alma mater of anyone who runs a 4.35 or better in the 40, posts a 41-inch vertical or higher or does the 20-yard shuttle in 3.85 seconds or faster. --NAME--'s performance left draft analysts and scouts buzzing.
While --NAME-- was highly recruited in football coming out of North Gwinnett High School, he was also a much-sought after basketball prospect. The first-team All-Conference, All-State and Super 11 Team selection by The Atlanta Journal Constitution was rated the 24th-best player in the state of Georgia and the 40th-best wide receiver in the country by Rivals.com as a senior. He also received Gwinnett Daily Super VI team accolades.
That year, --NAME-- caught 32 passes for 800 yards and 10 touchdowns as a senior. He also competed as a free safety for head coach Kyle Richardson. He added All-Conference honors while also receiving All-State recognition as one of Georgia's top basketball players.
"--NAME-- is a great football player and an outstanding young person. Coach Spurrier and his staff got a real steal out of the state of Georgia. He is definitely going to be a great player for South Carolina," Gwinnett coach Richardson said when --NAME-- signed with SC.
Performing as receiver on the scout team during his first year at South Carolina, the lanky 220-pounder redshirted in 2005. He appeared in 11 games in 2006, starting vs. Wofford at tight end, but also saw action at flanker and split end, finishing with 113 yards and one touchdown on six receptions (18.8 avg). 
The following season, he started three times while sharing tight end duties with Andy Boyd. Having bulked up to 235 pounds, --NAME-- was the sensation of fall camp, clocking a scorching 4.37 in the 40-yard dash. He was prepared for the punishment going over the middle, having also increased his bench press by more than 40 pounds. He finished third on the team with 30 receptions for 421 yards (14.0 avg) and three touchdowns.
The 2008 campaign turned into --NAME--'s coming out party. The Mackey Award semifinalist and All-Southeastern Conference first-team selection started 11 contests at tight end. The junior ranked second on the team with 37 receptions for 573 yards (15.5 avg) and three touchdowns, ranking 12 in the league with an average of 44.08 receiving yards per game.
After the season, --NAME-- decided to forgo his senior season and applied for the 2009 NFL Draft. It will be a busy --NAME-- family household on draft weekend, as his older brother, Mississippi fullback Jason --NAME--, is also expected to hear his name called.
2008: Arrived in August camp wearing a protective boot on his right foot (undisclosed injury thought to be a stress fracture), which prevented the coaches from shifting him to wide receiver Suffered a right ankle sprain and re-aggravated his foot injury on a 63-yard reception in the Mississippi game (10/04) Re-injured his foot in practice (10/29) prior to the Tennessee clash (11/01) and saw just limited action.
2009: Did not complete the agility tests or participate in the position drills at the February NFL Combine after suffering a pulled quadriceps muscle running his second 40-yard dash.
Attended North Gwinnett (Suwanee, Ga.) High School, playing football for head coach Kyle Richardson First-team All-Conference, All-State and Super 11 Team selection by The Atlanta Journal Constitution Rated the 24th-best player in the state of Georgia and the 40th-best wide receiver in the country by Rivals.com as a senior Received Gwinnett Daily Super VI team accolades Caught 32 passes for 800 yards and 10 touchdowns as a senior Also competed as a free safety Added All-Conference honors while receiving All-State recognition as one of Georgia's top basketball players.
Rare athlete. Reportedly ran a 4.37-second 40-yard dash and posted a 39.5-inch vertical leap in 2007. Long, lanky build capable of handling additional mass without a significant loss of quickness. Good burst off the line of scrimmage to challenge the seam and can throttle down, sink his hips and create separation against even athletic defenders. Flashes natural hands for the reception. Can snatch passes outside of his frame due to his long arms and big hands. Good elusiveness after the catch and can accelerate past defenders for long gains. Good burst off the snap to get to the second level. Has the lateral agility to mirror and effectively block defenders in space.
Not necessarily the sum of his parts. Often lined up wide in the Gamecocks' offense and may struggle to acclimate to a more pro-style offense. Relies on his athleticism rather than technique to get off the line of scrimmage. Tends to freelance a bit as a route-runner. Can make the spectacular catch, but is prone to lapses in concentration. Marginal effort and effectiveness as a blocker, especially in close quarters.
VERNON DAVIS, San Francisco -- --NAME-- might not be a great fit for a team looking for a traditional tight end, as he might be better served in motion. He is bigger than Davis and just as quick. --NAME-- won't match up strength-wise, but he is getting close. The problem is that he likes to freelance a lot and is too inconsistent as a blocker. At times, he reminds some of former South Carolina bust Troy Williamson, a speedster with a lack of focus. As for production, it has been ho-hum, meaning he will be drafted much higher based on his athleticism than his final numbers on the field. There were some very hush-hush moves on the SC staff's part in regards to his foot injury last year, and further medical evaluation would ease the minds of some teams there.
-------------------------
Michael_Crabtree 71269 10
In just 26 games at the university, --NAME-- rewrote school and Big 12 Conference records, while also etching his name in the NCAA books. His success on the football field saw him receive Fred Biletnikoff Award honors in each of his two college seasons. A model of consistency, he put together a string of 13 consecutive games with at least one touchdown and five receptions, tying an NCAA mark.
--NAME--'s 231 receptions in his first two seasons topped the old college record of 227 catches over a two-year span that was previously held by Nevada's Alex Van Dyke (1994-95). He ranks tied for sixth in NCAA annals with 41 touchdown catches, an average of 1.58 scores per game. That total also set a collegiate record for most touchdowns during a two-year span, surpassing the previous mark of 34 scoring catches by Larry Fitzgerald of Pittsburgh (2002-03).
Being a featured receiver was something new for --NAME-- when he arrived at Texas Tech. During his prep days at Carter High School, he competed as a quarterback, where he was ranked as the nation's 16th-best overall athlete and received a four-star rating from Rivals.com. The member of the Lubbock Avalanche-Journal Fab 44 team, he also earned All-Area accolades from the Dallas Morning News.
--NAME-- threw for 870 yards and 11 touchdowns on 45 of 100 passing in his final season. That year, he also ran for 646 yards and nine touchdowns on 100 carries. As a junior, he completed 30 of 67 passes for 897 yards and eight touchdowns with just one interception.
In addition to excelling in football, --NAME-- was also a nationally-ranked basketball player at Carter High. He was rated among the top 50 hoops prospects in the state and received several scholarship offers in that sport from major colleges.
However, --NAME-- was determined to play football, accepting a scholarship from Texas Tech while bypassing offers from Baylor, Illinois, Iowa, Kansas State, Oklahoma and Kansas. He spent the 2006 season performing on the scout team, acclimating to life as a wide receiver. He was on a two-sport scholarship, but dropped basketball due to the grueling football schedule.
Texas Tech featured three seniors ahead of --NAME-- on its 2006 depth chart entering fall drills, but the redshirt freshman beat out Joel Filani for the "Z" receiver position, starting every game. He earned Biletnikoff Award honors, given to the nation's top receiver, the first time a freshman ever captured that award. The unanimous All-American and All-Big 12 Conference first-team choice set NCAA freshman records, leading the nation with 134 receptions for 1,962 yards (14.6 avg) and 22 touchdowns, as he also led the major college ranks with an average of 10.31 receptions and 150.92 yards receiving per game.
While --NAME-- did not match his lofty 2007 totals in 2008, he still had a banner sophomore campaign. He was again the Biletnikoff Award recipient, in addition to garnering first-team All-American and All-Big 12 recognition. He ranked sixth in the nation with a team-high 97 receptions, good for 1,165 yards and 19 touchdowns, despite battling late season ankle issues.
2008: Suffered a right ankle sprain after twisting his leg returning a second quarter kickoff vs. Texas A&M (10/18).   Left the Kansas clash (10/25) with a left foot strain and after re-injuring his ankle Had to leave the field several times to have his right ankle re-taped vs. Texas (11/01) Did not play in the second half vs. Baylor (11/29) due to a high right ankle sprain Wore a boot to help his right ankle heal, missing several practices leading up to the Cotton Bowl vs. Mississippi.
2009: At the NFL Combine, doctors discovered a slight stress fracture in his left foot and the injury required early March surgery to insert a screw. Doctors believe --NAME-- will be sufficiently recovered in time for training camp this summer. After doctors found the slight stress fracture, they conducted more testing on --NAME--, including a bone scan that revealed that the injury happened only recently, possibly during training for the Combine.
Attended Carter (Dallas) High School, playing football for head coach Allen Wilson Competed as a quarterback, where he was ranked as the nation's 16th-best overall athlete and received a four-star rating from Rivals.com Member of the Lubbock Avalanche-Journal Fab 44 team Earned All-Area accolades from the Dallas Morning News Threw for 870 yards and 11 touchdowns on 45-of-100 passing in his final season That year, he also ran for 646 yards and nine touchdowns on 100 carries As a junior, he completed 30-of-67 passes for 897 yards and eight touchdowns with just one interception Also a nationally-ranked basketball player Rated among the top 50 hoops prospects in the state and received several scholarship offers in that sport from major colleges.
Ultra-productive, competitive playmaker with prototypical size. Excellent hands; snatches the ball from the air within or outside his body. Secures the ball quickly in his strong hands after the catch. Uses his size, initial quickness and hands to get inside or outside separation off the line of scrimmage. Runs quick slants and has the suddenness to take the route upfield. Excellent body control to high-point the ball in traffic, adjust to any poor throw, tiptoe on the sideline and find his way through creases. Can turn his man out, plant and get the inside shoulder, giving the quarterback a big target down the seam. Quick to stop and adjust for the ball behind him, whether purposely or not. Used outside, in the slot and even in the backfield at times. Always tries to make a play after the catch, keeping his legs moving when tackled low, stiff-arming smaller defenders on the run and extending the ball to get to the first down or goal line. Rubs defenders for other receivers. Displays a good attitude and appears to be a solid teammate without major ego issues.
March surgery to fix a stress fracture in his left foot will prevent --NAME-- from running for scouts leading up to the draft. It's an issue teams are grappling with because a lack of great top-end speed is one of the few concerns about --NAME--. Needs to speed up his release, as he jumps off the line too often trying to lull his defender to sleep. Does not have the elite speed to separate from quick corners on the outside, although the point typically was moot at Tech because he could overpower collegiate talent. Not sudden with the ball in his hands, dancing awkwardly at times instead of using his size and strength. Must improve consistency on downfield blocking, as he has the size to be effective but gives inconsistent effort to get to his man or sustain. Runs with the ball loose in the open field.
-------------------------
Will_Davis 71277 204
--NAME--, a former wide receiver and tight end, registered 12.5 tackles for loss, including 9.5 sacks, as a junior to earn second-team All-Big Ten honors. But he took a step backward in 2008 with teams having a year of film to study, and his production plummeted (seven tackles for loss, 3.5 sacks). --NAME-- has rare foot quickness and straight-line speed -- to be expected of a former receiver -- for a defensive end, though he was sapped of some of that speed by nagging ankle injuries. His lack of upper-body strength and hand technique usually means that if blockers can get their hands on him, he's rendered ineffective quickly. A team willing to spend a second-day draft pick could get a nice return on their initial investment if they can get --NAME-- to work in the weight room.
A member of the SuperPrep top-25 team   Started on both sides of the ball   Earned first-team All-State, All-Metro, All-League, and All-County honors   Named to the Maryland Super 44 All-Star team and the P.G. County North All-Star team   Averaged over 28 yards per reception as a senior   Made 21 receptions for 579 yards and 10 touchdowns as a wide receiver   Also recorded 136 tackles and 24 sacks on defense   Had eight passes broken up, one safety, one blocked punt and four forced fumbles   SuperPrep All-Region selection   Lettered two years in football and track and one year in basketball   High school football coach was Rick Houchens.
Good initial quickness off the snap.   Can force the tackle outside with his speed, creating lanes for blitzing teammates or for himself to spin back inside.   Rare straight-line speed for the position.   Good effort to make plays in pursuit. Understands his role in the defense and generally plays with good contain.   Can string the play out wide.   Adequate lower-body strength to anchor.   Good lateral agility and balance to tackle in close quarters.   Ascending player who is still learning the nuances of the position after moving from offense to defense.
Lacks the bulk and strength to consistently hold up at the point of attack.   Adequately effective holding up against one blocker in the running game, but lacks the sand in his pants to split the double team.   Struggles to disengage once the blocker gets a hand on him.   Relies on his speed as a pass rusher and is essentially a one-trick pony at this time.   Not often asked to play in space and has little experience in coverage, making the projection to a rush linebacker position a risky one.
-------------------------
Louis_Delmas 71279 33
One of the keys to the Broncos' offensive success in 2008 actually came from a player on the other side of the field - --NAME--. The emotionally charged pass defender's ability to roam the field and keep plays in front of him saw him lead the team with 111 tackles in 2008, his first injury free season since his freshman campaign.
--NAME-- only knows how to play the game - on sheer energy and at high speed, leading to some tremendously violent collisions on the football field. His hard-hitting style of play has drawn comparisons to former New England great Rodney Harrison.
"Just watching him practice and the speed in which he practices, I mean we've got to tone him down. The other day, I actually had to get him off the field. I said, 'You're too wrapped up.'" WMU coach Bill Cubit said about --NAME--.  
A starter in all but one game that he suited up for in a Broncos uniform, --NAME-- began his career as a left cornerback before moving inside to free safety as a sophomore. He became just the 14th player in school history to register 300 or more tackles in a career, finishing tied for eighth on that record list with 310 hits. In addition to his stellar performances on defense, he also appeared on special teams and saw brief action as a receiver in the 2008 Texas Bowl.
Playing a variety of roles is nothing new for --NAME--. While attending North Miami Beach High School, he was utilized as a cornerback, strong safety, wide receiver, kick returner and long snapper. As a senior, he played eight games where he never came off the field. The three-year starter was voted his team's best defensive back three consecutive seasons. He broke school records for single game and career kickoff return yardage, as he collected 178 tackles with three interceptions on defense and had 61 receptions for 841 yards and seven touchdowns on offense.
--NAME-- enrolled at Western Michigan in 2005, along with prep teammates Daniel Marks and E.J. Biggers. He was the only true freshman to start every game, earning second-team All-Mid American Conference honors, in addition to being selected to the College Football News' Freshman All-American squad. He registered the team's first safety since 2001 and finished third on the team with 82 tackles (54 solos), including 1.5 sacks. He recovered two fumbles, broke up eight passes and picked off three others from his left cornerback slot.
A left knee medial collateral sprain suffered in the third game of the 2006 season vs. Virginia sidelined --NAME-- for two contests, but he still ranked third on the team with 53 tackles (39 solos). He paced the Broncos with four interceptions, broke up five passes and caused a fumble that he recovered at his new position, free safety.
--NAME--' non-stop motor was sidelined for two early season games in 2007 after he suffered a concussion in a collision during the season opener vs. West Virginia. He came back for reserve duty vs. Central Connecticut before reclaiming his starting free safety job for the rest of the schedule. He collected three stops for loss that included a sack and was in on 64 tackles (48 solos). He picked off one pass and even tried his hand as a kickoff returner, averaging 23.1 yards on seven attempts.
National attention came the free safety's way in 2008, as he earned All-American status for the first time. The All-Mid American Conference choice led the Broncos with a career-high 111 tackles (61 solos) that included four stops for loss. He also had four interceptions, including one that he returned for a touchdown. His 111 hits ranked sixth among the nation's defensive backs during his final season.
2006: Suffered a left knee medial collateral ligament sprain vs. Virginia (9/16), missing the next two games vs. Temple (9/23) and Ohio University (10/07).
2007: Left the West Virginia game (9/01) after suffering a concussion that forced him to sit out the Indiana (9/08) and Missouri (9/15) contests.
Attended North Miami Beach (Fla.) High School, where he was teammates with fellow Western Michigan players Daniel Marks and E.J. Biggers Utilized as a cornerback, strong safety, wide receiver, kick returner and long snapper As a senior, he played eight games where he never came off the field The three-year starter was voted his team's best defensive back three consecutive seasons Broke school records for single game and career kickoff return yardage, as he collected 178 tackles with three interceptions on defense and had 61 receptions for 841 yards and seven touchdowns on offense.
Athletic build with the frame to carry additional mass.   Active safety, unafraid to come up and support the run.   Physical defender who flashes some explosiveness as a hitter.   Reliable form tackler who attacks ballcarriers at their knees and wraps up securely.   Good lateral agility to break down in space in the open field.   Good instincts in coverage.   Reads the quarterback and breaks on the ball.   Smooth backpedal and appears to have at least adequate straight-line speed.   Natural playmaker.   Times his leaps well and can highpoint passes.   Team captain.
Lacks the bulk most teams prefer.   Likes to evade blockers, rather than taking them on and shedding blocks.   Resorts to low tackles and will, occasionally, duck his head and swipe.   Can be more pesky than forceful as a tackler and will get dragged, at times.   Aggressive defender; can be beaten with play-action.   Questionable level of competition.
-------------------------
Jarett_Dillard 71281 144
Rice's first All-America selection by the Football Writers Association since Buddy Dial in 1958, --NAME-- also became the first Owl to be a consensus pick for conference honors (Conference USA) for three consecutive seasons. An electrifying scorer who plays a high-energy game that will remind New York Giants fans of one of their old favorites -- Phil McConkey. 
While not blessed with blazing speed, --NAME-- excels at weaving and darting through tight areas and surprising lethargic cornerbacks with his exceptional leaping ability to get to the ball at its high point. His exceptional ability to score saw him become the first Owl to be invited to play in the prestigious East-West Shrine Game since Dan Dawson in 2002.
Breaking the spirits of opposing defensive backs, --NAME-- also broke numerous school, Conference USA and NCAA records before completing a career that saw him start 46 of 49 games. His 60 touchdown catches topped the old collegiate record of 50 by Troy Edwards of Louisiana Tech. His 292 receptions set the school all-time record and rank second in league annals. His 4,138 receiving yards set school and conference marks and also placed the Owl receiver ninth in NCAA annals.
--NAME-- started all three seasons during his career at Sam Houston High School. He was a two-time All-District 28-4A selection at wide receiver, adding all-area honors as a senior, in addition to being named Academic all-state selection. He helped the Sam Houston basketball team reach the Class 4A state tournament in 2003, and competed in the regional track meet in both hurdles events that year. He graduated first in his class and was a member of the National Honor Society while also serving as a class officer.
In 2004, --NAME-- enrolled at Rice, spending the season redshirting on the scout team. The following year, he took over split end duties, starting eight games. He led the team with 35 receptions for 524 yards (15.0 avg.), finding the end zone five times. 
The 2005 season saw --NAME-- capture the national attention that no other Rice player ever enjoyed. He shattered school receiving records on the way to becoming a finalist for the Biletnikoff Award, given to the nation's top receiver. ESPN's All-America first-team pick broke the NCAA season record for consecutive games with at least one touchdown catch (13). 
His 21 scoring grabs set both the school and Conference USA mark. He collected 91 passes for 1,274 yards (13.7 avg.), ranking fifth nationally with 7.0 receptions and eighth in the major college ranks with 95.92 receiving yards per game. He also became the first Owl to ever generate over 1,000 yards receiving in a season.
As a junior, --NAME-- was an All-America honorable mention and All-Conference USA first-team selection. The "X" receiver started all 12 games, pacing the Owls again with 79 catches for 1,057 yards (13.4 avg.), scoring 14 times. He ranked second in the league with an average of 6.58 receptions per game and third with 88.08 yards receiving.
--NAME-- was named All-American and All-Conference USA as a senior, as he led the nation with 20 touchdown catches. He pulled down 87 passes for 1,310 yards (15.1 avg.), becoming the first player in league history to produce three consecutive 1,000-yard receiving seasons. He placed third in the conference, as he averaged 6.69 receptions and 100.77 receiving yards per game.
No major injuries reported by missed the bulk of the 2007 Texas game (9/22) with an undisclosed injury.
Attended Sam Houston (San Antonio, Texas) High School, playing football for head coach Russell Tatum Two-time All-District 28-4A selection at wide receiver, adding all-area honors as a senior, in addition to being named Academic all-state selection Helped the Sam Houston basketball team reach the Class 4A state tournament in 2003 Competed in the regional track meet in both hurdles events that year Graduated first in his class and was a member of the National Honor Society while also serving as a class officer.
Productive receiver with long arms and adequate size. Very reliable hands, snatching the ball away from his body. Can free himself off press coverage using his hands and quick movements on the line. Excellent route-runner as he stays low in his cuts, sells the jerk route well and does not round off out-cuts. Good vision and a naturally elusive runner with the ball in his hands. Lulls defenders to sleep off the line, then takes off down the seam. Adjusts to throws to his outside shoulder.
Lacks great athleticism and explosiveness off the line. Lacks the pure speed to separate from corners or safeties. Has trouble getting to corners and linebackers to block at the second level. Gets knocked off his routes too easily. Won't win many battles for the ball in the air because of relatively weak hands and vertical, although he can shield the defender. Likely a slot receiver. Must adapt to a new quarterback after building a great relationship with Clement.
-------------------------
Davon_Drew 71287 149
--NAME-- took advantage of ECU's climb to national prominence early in the season to improve his draft stock. The honorable mention All-Conference USA pick is an ideal H-back candidate because of his size and receiving skills (43 catches for 695 yards and three scores). Came to college a successful high school quarterback out of North Carolina and played quarterback his first two seasons at ECU, so he's still learning his new position. Scouts think his best football is yet to come. Had an arm span of 34 1/8 inches and a hand span of 9 1/2 inches at the combine.
Helped lead Bears to back-to-back state championship appearances in 2002 and 2003   Compiled a 30-3 record as a starting quarterback under the direction of coach Chip Williams   The Big East Conference Co-Player-of-the-Year as a junior   A two-time all-conference selection and an all-state pick during senior campaign   Completed 99 of 203 passes for 1,709 yards and 20 TDs while only suffering nine interceptions as a senior   Rushed for 492 yards and eight scores on 107 carries  An All-America selection by PrepStar Magazine   Ranked among the top 25 quarterbacks in the nation according to ESPN.com's Tom Lemming   Also rated as the 24th-best prospect in North Carolina by PrepStar Magazine   Earned a total of nine varsity letters (four in basketball, three in football and two in track).
Good height with long arms, strong biceps and adequate lower body build. Versatile enough to be used outside, in the slot, in motion and on the line. Reliable hands and will snatch the ball outside his frame. Good release off the line, and can use hands to shake off linebackers and get into his route. Will set up out routes well, using his long arms to get separation. Quick enough to threaten the seam and open up underneath routes. Fights off arm tackles and gain additional yardage after the catch. Former quarterback who knows when to sit down in zones and works to make himself available. Very willing run and pass blocker, giving good effort.
Body type somewhere between a receiver and tight end. Will be better as a H-back in the pros. Only average straight-line speed and does not separate from quicker linebackers. Potentially good blocker but needs a lot of technique work. Lunges in his in-line blocks, gets ripped too easily and loses his balance. Blocks downfield but does not always hit his target or sustain well as he fails to use his hands or move his feet. Will lower the shoulder instead of sustaining when in a fullback mode inside. Needs work on his route running - doesn't sink his hips and will round off his cuts.
-------------------------
Kevin_Ellison 71291 189
Steady, no-nonsense strong safety ended his career with 34 starts and earning first-team All-Pac-10 honors after each of the past two seasons. An instinctive defender, --NAME-- has morphed into a coach on the field for the Trojans. While every other member of the USC defensive backfield is superior as an all-around athlete, --NAME--, who was lightly recruited out of high school, makes up for a lack of eye-popping measureables with intelligence, physicality and a penchant for making the big play. Of concern to scouts, is whether --NAME-- has the straight-line speed to handle the transition to the NFL, especially considering the three knee operations he's undergone while at USC.
He was a 2004 Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Tom Lemming All-West, Long Beach Press-Telegram Best of the Rest, Tacoma News Tribune Western 100, Cal-Hi Sports All-State first team, All-CIF Division III, Los Angeles Times All-South Bay/Westside Player of the Year, South Bay Daily Breeze All-Area Player of the Year and All-Bay League MVP as a senior running back and linebacker at Redondo Union High in Redondo Beach (Calif.). He ran for 1,661 yards on 230 carries (7.2-yard average) with 32 TDs and had 25 receptions for 414 yards (16.6 avg.) with 5 TDs on offense and 115 tackles, 10 tackles for loss, five sacks, two fumble recoveries, two forced fumbles and two interceptions (one for a TD) in 2004. In one game, he ran for a school-record 322 yards on 18 carries (17.9 avg.). As a junior in 2003, he made Cal-Hi Sports All-State Underclass second team, All-CIF Division IV, South Bay Daily Breeze All-Area first team and All-Ocean League Co-MVP. He had 1,402 yards on 222 carries (6.3 avg.) with 15 TDs and 15 receptions for 161 yards (10.7 avg.) with 1 TD, plus 101 tackles, eight tackles for loss, three sacks, two interceptions (one for a TD) and one fumble recovery in 2003. He was a 2002 South Bay Daily Breeze All-Area and All-Ocean League Co-Defensive MVP selection as a 2002 sophomore. In his career, he rushed for a school-record 3,718 yards on 578 carries (6.4 avg.) and had 297 tackles.
Chiseled athlete who certainly looks the part.   Steady, dependable player who graduated a semester early from high school to enroll at Southern Cal.   Signed with USC as a running back and was so physical and instinctive that the staff considered him at linebacker before moving him to strong safety.   Quick to attack the line of scrimmage in run support.   Effective open-field tackler who can break down and make the stop in space.   Flashes explosiveness as a hitter and can intimidate receivers crossing the middle.   An accomplished blitzer from his safety position.   Can avoid blocks on his way to the quarterback and has good closing speed.   Good bloodlines. Brother, Keith --NAME--, is a linebacker for the Buffalo Bills.
Lacks the preferred straight-line speed for the position.   Not the same player in coverage that he is in run support or as a hitter over the middle.   Too often plays the man and not the ball.   Willing to give up the reception to make a big hit and play it safe.   Repeated knee injuries.   Missed most of the 2005 season due to a torn ACL and fractured left leg. Underwent surgery on his left knee again prior to the 2007 season.   Missed five games in 2008 with a torn meniscus in his right knee that also required surgery.
-------------------------
Paul_Fanaika 71293 213
A former walk-on, --NAME-- has used his unique combination of size, surprising foot quickness and determination to develop into one of the better, more underrated interior linemen in the country. --NAME-- has intriguing upside for the next level -- if scouts can find a place for him. Despite starting three years at right guard for the Sun Devils, --NAME--'s struggles with leverage could pose problems against shorter, powerful defensive tackles. There are some who believe --NAME--'s future lies at right tackle, where his size and arm length could be beneficial, but with questionable lateral quickness and no experience outside, it is a projection likely only worthy of a late-round pick. Had an arm span of 35 inches and a hand span of 10 7/8 inches at the combine.
A 2004 graduate of Mills High School in Milbrae, Calif.   Was named the Ocean Division Lineman of the Year as a senior.   Earned first-team all-league honors in 2003.   Was also an all-county selection.   Earned two letters in football.   Captained his team as a senior.
Naturally massive man with even weight distribution.   Powerful upper body.   Jolts the defender with his initial hand punch.   Knee-bender that plays on his feet with surprising balance in pass protection.   Agile enough to get out and lead the sweep.   Three-year starter.
Struggles with the leverage battle as a pass-blocker against the bull-rush.   Allows defenders to get into his chest and can be walked back into the pocket, despite his strength and size.   Surprising initial quickness, but only in small areas.   Will struggle to get to the second level and effectively block speedier linebackers.   May lack the lateral quickness to protect the edge if moved outside to right tackle.
-------------------------
Tony_Fiammetta 71299 128
The team's starting fullback his last two years, --NAME-- did not get many opportunities to touch the ball, but the team captain developed into one of the Orange's few bright spots. He also proved to be a capable receiver coming out of the backfield, as the Athletic Director's Honor Roll member pulled down 28 combined passes as a junior and senior.
--NAME-- was rated the 25th-best overall prospect in the Mid-Atlantic region by Super Prep during his senior year at Walkersville High School, but missed most of season after he suffered a left leg fracture in the season opener. He rushed for 144 yards and three touchdowns on 19 carries in that game before being sidelined.
--NAME-- added All-East Region accolades from Prep Star as the team captain during his junior year. In four seasons with the football team, he gained 499 yards on 60 carries 8.32 avg) and posted 12 touchdowns. He lettered on the wrestling team as a junior, competing in the 215-pound weight class. He also lettered four times as a midfielder for the school's lacrosse team.
--NAME-- enrolled at Syracuse in 2004, performing on the scout team. In 2005, he saw action with the special teams in 10 contests, recording one solo tackle in the season finale vs. Louisville. He played in every game as a reserve fullback in 2006, gaining just 15 yards on eight carries, but also returned three kickoffs for 32 yards (10.7 avg).
As a junior, --NAME-- earned eight starting assignments in 11 games, sitting out the Buffalo game as a precaution after suffering a concussion vs. Rutgers. He only carried three times for 8 yards, coming up with 12 receptions for 75 yards (6.2 avg) while registered four touchdown-resulting blocks and 39 knockdowns.
In 2008, --NAME-- started 12 contests, missing the South Florida clash due to a left leg contusion. He made the most of his five rushing attempts, generating 66 yards (13.2 avg) and also pulled down 16 passes for 127 yards (7.9 avg) and his only touchdown for his career. He continued to excel on special teams, causing two fumbles while making four tackles (3 solos).
2003: Missed all but the season opener of his high school senior year due to a left leg fracture.
2007: Sat out the Buffalo game (10/20) due to a concussion.
2008: Did not play vs. South Florida (10/18) due to a left leg contusion.
Attended Walkersville (Md.) High School, playing football for head coach Hal Grau Rated the 25th-best overall prospect in the Mid-Atlantic region by Super Prep during his senior year, but missed most of season after he suffered a left leg fracture in the season opener Rushed for 144 yards and three touchdowns on 19 carries in that game before being sidelined Added All-East Region accolades from Prep Star as the team captain during his junior year In four seasons with the football team, he gained 499 yards on 60 carries 8.32 avg) and posted 12 touchdowns Lettered on the wrestling team as a junior, competing in the 215-pound weight class Also lettered four times as a midfielder for the school's lacrosse team.
Very solid build in the upper and lower bodies with long arms. Lines up with his hand down on the line, as well as in motion and in the backfield. Quick to get to the edge when in motion. Takes outs the linebackers and safeties in the hole with a nice pop. Sustains his blocks through the whistle by locking on and moving his feet. Good hands, and can adjust to low throws or those behind him. Runs through cut blocks in the open field. Quick set in pass protection; able to handle oncoming blitzers. Sorts through trash to neutralize the middle linebacker, and has the strength to put him to the ground.
Not the wide-chested thumper some teams prefer. A bit slow getting into his routes as a receiver. Gives good effort blocking on the line, but gets ripped off too often. Will be more effective in an H-back or true fullback position because of his lack of height. Whiffs too much as a cut blocker. Lacks flexibility and lateral quickness, which allows defenders to run around or get off his blocks in space.
LAWRENCE VICKERS, Cleveland -- Fullback is becoming an endangered species in the NFL, and while some teams might look to convert --NAME-- to an H-Back, his route running just isn't up to snuff to handle those duties. He is better served on dump-offs as a receiver and has proven that he is incapable of carrying the ball. He is an efficient lead blocker thanks to quick feet and impressive strength, but must be conscious of playing at a low pad level to prevent defenders from neutralizing him and using him to clog the rush lane.
-------------------------
Xavier_Fulton 71307 155
A former defensive linemen, --NAME-- suffered a knee injury in 2005 that turned out to be very beneficial in his career. While rehabilitating from a torn anterior cruciate ligament, the redshirt junior was approached by the coaching staff about the idea of moving to the offensive line. With his naturally large frame, long arms and large hands, his athletic skills seemed to make him the ideal fit as a pass blocker.
Having arrived on the Illini campus as a 270-pound freshman, the now 300-pound junior was up to the task. He took over left tackle duties in 2007 and rapidly progressed, going on to earn second-team All-Big Ten Conference honors from the league's coaches, despite his relative inexperience as a blocker.
At Homewood-Flossmoor High School, --NAME-- was a nationally ranked defensive lineman. He was rated one of the Top 25 players in the state of Illinois by Insiders.com, Rivals.com and ESPN. He added All-Area honors from the Chicago Sun-Times, Daily Southtown and Star Newspapers, adding All-Region recognition from Super Prep.
As a senior, --NAME-- recorded 98 tackles (58 solo) with 7.5 quarterback sacks. He added 17 pressures, blocked three field goals, recovered three fumbles and deflected five passes.
Illinois landed --NAME--, who as a true freshman ended up starting the final three games at right defensive end, appearing in a total of eight contests while sharing time with junior Scott Moss. --NAME-- recorded six tackles (three solo), added two quarterback pressures and deflected a pass.
--NAME-- manned the right defensive end position for the first seven games of the 2005 season, but suffered a left knee ACL tear vs. Penn State, sitting out the rest of the campaign. He delivered 13 tackles (six solo) with an assisted sack and two stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also posted three pressures with a pass break-up and blocked one kick.
While recovering from knee surgery at a pace slower than expected, the staff decided to grant --NAME-- a medical hardship for the 2006 season. He returned as the starting left offensive tackle in 2007, picking up All-Big Ten Conference honors. He switched from jersey #98 he wore as a defensive end to #68 as an offensive tackle, as he delivered 78 knockdowns and nine touchdown-resulting blocks for an offense that ranked fifth in the nation in rushing (256.77 yards per game). He allowed just two quarterback sacks, as the front wall ranked second in the conference in sacks allowed, surrendering just 1.23 per game.
The Illini offense changed from a ground-oriented attack in 2007 to a more pass-friendly scheme in 2008. --NAME-- started every game, but was limited late in the year by a shoulder dislocation suffered vs. Iowa. The shoulder again popped out, limiting his snaps the following week vs. Western Michigan, but he gamely played in the final two contests.
--NAME-- struggled with the new offensive game plan, as he managed six touchdown-resulting blocks and 71 knockdowns. But, the opposition managed to register 9.5 of the team's 25 sacks allowed over the left tackle area. The team saw its rushing attack fall to 169.5 yards per game, but the aerial show ranked 20th nationally and led the league with an average of 269.33 yards per game.
2005: Suffered a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee vs. Penn State (10/22), missing the final four games vs. Wisconsin, Ohio State, Purdue and Northwestern.
2006: Granted a medical hardship while recovering from his 2005 knee injury.
2007: Left the Indiana game (9/22) in the third quarter with a right ankle sprain, but returned to the contest after several series.
2008: Suffered a shoulder dislocation in the third quarter vs. Iowa (11/01) Returned to start the following week vs. Western Michigan (11/08), but missed most of that contest when he again dislocated the shoulder.
Attended Homewood-Flossmoor (Ill.) High School, playing football for head coach Tom Bailey Rated one of the Top 25 players in the state of Illinois by Insiders.com, Rivals.com and ESPN Added All-Area honors from the Chicago Sun-Times, Daily Southtown and Star Newspapers, adding All-Region recognition from Super Prep Recorded 98 tackles (58 solos) with 7.5 quarterback sacks, seventeen pressures, three blocked field goals, three fumble recoveries and five pass deflections as a senior.
Naturally large man with the frame to add at least an additional 10-15 pounds without a significant loss of quickness. Raw, but possesses rare tools. Lacks consistency with his initial quickness off the snap, but gets excellent depth in his kick slide to protect the edge as a pass rusher. Natural knee bender who plays with balance. Still learning to use his hands effectively, but flashes explosiveness in his hand punch and the ability to turn and sustain. Athletic enough to block on the move. Hustles to the second and can even reach the third level. Only beginning to scratch the surface of his talent after spending the first three years of his career at defensive tackle.
Raw. Only made the transition to the offensive line in 2007 and was surrounded by experienced line mates and ultra-athletic skill position players, aiding in his development. Too often late off the snap for a player of his athleticism. Relies on this athleticism, rather than technique, to control his man and can be walked back to the quarterback when he plays too high, exposing his chest. Flashes a good initial pop in run blocking, but is not a masher. Good athleticism, but can get out of control blocking on the move, allowing his assignment to evade him. Legitimate durability concern: Torn ACL ended his 2005 season prematurely and forced --NAME-- to take a medical redshirt for the 2006 season. Struggled with a shoulder sprain throughout the second half of the 2008 season.
LEVI JONES, Cincinnati -- --NAME-- is an impressive specimen, even though he still needs to address glaring strength deficiencies. He has very good foot quickness to impact the outside running game and won't fit in every scheme (best as a zone blocker) due to his lack of power. For a former defensive player, he lacks aggressiveness but is sure to impress a few teams with his athletic ability. Don't overlook durability concerns, along with very inconsistent performances, which should draw questions as to whether he can ever develop the field savvy needed to play at the next level.
-------------------------
Andrew_Gardner 71311 181
--NAME-- earned his second consecutive first-team All-ACC recognition in 2008 despite missing the final four games following surgery on a torn labrum in his right shoulder. He had played through the injury most of the fall, which was no surprise given his streak of 48 consecutive starts up to that point. Although not particularly special in any one area, --NAME--'s sturdiness and dependability up front is not overlooked by NFL teams. Had an arm span of 34 1/2 inches and a hand span of 10 inches at the combine.
Honorable mention all-state selection (Class AAAA) and first-team all-area (Fayette/Coweta Counties) by the Atlanta Journal-Constitution   Ranked among the Top 100 in Georgia by TheInsiders.com   Top lineman for an offense that produced more than 4,000 yards   An all-county selection as a junior   Wendy's High School Heisman nominee for Sandy Creek High, where he lettered three years for coach Rodney Walker   Also an all-county basketball player who once grabbed 19 rebounds in a game.
-------------------------
Cody_Glenn 71315 158
Arrived in Lincoln as a highly touted running back and is leaving a linebacker with NFL potential. He switched positions in the spring of 2008 after struggling through leg and foot injuries for 18 months. Despite his lack of experience, he earned the starting nod on the weak side and showed himself to have the mentality to play at a high level on defense. He even played in the middle during the season. His senior season did not go exactly to plan, as he played only nine games due to a suspension for violating team rules. In that time he made 51 tackles, six for loss and had four pass breakups, causing scouts to wonder what he might become with more experience.
--NAME-- was a star running back for coach Wayne Mahaffey at Rusk High School for four seasons, rushing for 6,353 yards and 87 touchdowns (both school records) in his four-year career. --NAME--'s rushing total was the eighth-highest total in Texas Class 3A history and the 27th most in state history, regardless of class. He capped his prep career by rushing for 1,828 yards on 238 carries and scoring 28 touchdowns as a senior. He also caught 10 passes for 159 yards and a touchdown out of the Rusk backfield and helped his team to a 7-3 record and a berth in the Class 3A playoffs. 
--NAME--'s effort as a senior earned him second-team Class 3A all-state honors, and all-district honors for the fourth consecutive season. --NAME-- topped the 2,000-yard barrier as a junior, rushing for 2,006 yards and 27 touchdowns on 278 carries. His performance earned him third-team all-state honors in his class. He was an honorable-mention all-state pick as a sophomore when he racked up 1,866 yards and 25 touchdowns on the ground. --NAME-- was ranked as the nation's Number 28 running back prospect by Rivals.com. He committed to Nebraska after also visiting Kansas and had offers from Texas A&M and Oklahoma State, among others.
Active linebacker with adequate speed and long arms, which he uses to wrap up ball carriers consistently.   Attacks downhill, can go through a blocker when blitzing and is willing to throw a shoulder into a blocker to free up teammates.   Despite his lack of size, he can shed blocks on the edge and find his way through trash to the ball carrier.   Uses his hands to fight off cut blocks.   Gives good chase down the line and hustles downfield.   Physical with running backs coming out on routes and can stay with them in the flat.   Good drop into coverage, finds the receivers in his area and has the hands to knock away passes.
Has a safety build, is short and lacks upper- or lower-body bulk.   Runs around blocks instead of attacking them.   Nothing special in his change-of-direction agility -- best when he reacts to plays in front of him.   Gets engulfed when playing inside the tackles.   Inexperience at linebacker shows through in his lack of backfield awareness; consistently fooled by misdirection.   Must make plays on special teams to stick on a roster.   Durability concerns must be addressed at the NFL Combine.
-------------------------
Tyronne_Green 71317 133
In the Tigers' most trying season in recent memory, --NAME-- was one of the team's few bright spots. Having entered the program as a defensive tackle, it took the left offensive guard three years before he would crack the starting lineup, but he would go on to man that demanding position in each of his final 25 games.
Scouts compare --NAME-- to former Auburn standout Ben Grubbs (Baltimore), as he has great athletic ability and outstanding suddenness coming off the snap. Even though he never started at the position, the coaching staff experimented with --NAME-- at center in 2008 fall camp. He showed the quick hands and head-on-the-swivel agility that could see him possibly shift to the pivot position in the National Football League.
"Those were definitely the first snaps I ever took at center," --NAME-- said. "You have to make calls and pretty much tell everybody else who they've got and you have to snap the ball and get on your guy. I have a lot more respect for my teammates (centers Jason Bosley and Ryan Pugh) at center."
At Woodham High School, --NAME-- was rated a two-star prospect by Rivals.com. He only appeared in five games during his senior year due to injuries. But the defensive tackle was leading the team with 34 tackles, three sacks, nine quarterback pressures, three pass deflections and an interception before getting hurt. He also lettered in basketball.
--NAME-- performed on the scout team as a down lineman in 2004, earning redshirt status. The offensive coaches were impressed with his athletic ability and moved the 275-pounder to offensive guard. In 2005, he saw action vs. Ball State, Western Kentucky, South Carolina and Mississippi, playing behind Ben Grubbs at left offensive guard.
As a redshirt sophomore, the now 310-pound --NAME-- appeared in all 13 games, lining up behind Grubbs at left guard. He was in on 24 knockdowns, as the squad averaged 320.92 yards in total offense. 
Grubb's graduation saw --NAME-- replace him in the lineup for the 2007 campaign. He posted 83 knockdowns/key blocks with 11 touchdown-resulting blocks, paving the way as the Tigers averaged 335.15 yards per game. For that performance, he was the recipient of the Ken Rice Award, given to the team's best offensive lineman.
--NAME-- earned All-Southeastern Conference accolades as a senior. He registered a team-high 113 knockdowns/key blocks, the most of any guard in the conference. He added nine touchdown-resulting blocks and did not allow any quarterback sacks, helping the team average 302.92 yards per game. He showed tremendous field alertness in 2008, recovering three Auburn fumbles while recording a pair of tackles after Tiger interceptions, causing a fumble on one of those thefts.
2009: Suffered a right quad strain on his first 40-yard dash at the Combine, keeping him out of the remainder of the workouts.
2003: Only played in five high school games due to a knee injury.
Attended Woodham (Pensacola, Fla.) High School, playing football for head coach Mike Sherrill Rated a two-star prospect by Rivals.com Only appeared in five games during his senior year due to injuries. But the defensive tackle was leading the team with 34 tackles, three sacks, nine quarterback pressures, three pass deflections and an interception before getting hurt Also lettered in basketball.
Good quickness off the snap.   Wide set and has good lateral agility and balance to compete with athletic defensive tackles in pass protection.   Quick first step to pop the defensive tackle and release to the second level for combo blocks and on pulling plays.   Good vision to locate the secondary block and is athletic enough to hit the moving target.
Raw.   Was getting by on his athleticism at the college level.   Marginal upper-body strength and hand placement.   Struggles to sustain blocks.   A bit high in pass protection and can be bull-rushed into the pocket.
-------------------------
Courtney_Greene 71319 245
--NAME-- was a first-team All-Big East pick in 2008 after twice earning second-team All-Big East notice and also Freshman All-American honors. He's been exceptionally durable, starting 51 straight games during his career. A tackling machine, --NAME-- eclipsed 100 stops twice in his first three years as a starter at both the free and strong safety spots. His production dropped a bit this season (87 tackles, one for loss, two INTs), but his blend of size and speed could be enough to make him a top-75 pick.
Spent the 2004 season at Bridgton Academy in Maine   Was a starter on defense at Bridgton, leading the team in tackles   Rushed for 1,114 yards and 19 touchdowns as a senior in 2003   Led New Rochelle to the Class AA state championship   Earned MVP honors in the title game   Represented NY in the 2004 NY/NJ Governor's Bowl   Earned First Team All-Area honors in track and field (long jump) in the spring of 2004   Played scholastically with Glen Lee and Ray Rice at New Rochelle   Born 11/23/86.
Versatile, has started at free and strong safety. Nice height and solid upper and lower body.   Closes quickly on run plays from the deep secondary.   Greets receivers rudely across the middle.   Aware of down and distance and works hard to prevent long third-down conversions.   Reads the quarterback's eyes and closes on the ball quickly.   Can be effective on the blitz, timing his move well, but is not sent in very often.   Durable leader, plays through injuries.
Tends to hit more than tackle, and will drop his head too often in the open field.   Stays high in his backpedal and footwork is choppy.   Must work on man coverage technique and improve reaction as receivers chew up his cushion.   Discipline is an issue, as --NAME-- gets sucked in by play-action and at times fails to get deep.   Runners freeze him in the open field.   Does not have great lateral movement, and is best being a hammer when the play is in front of him.   Needs to prove he can play the ball in the air against taller receivers.
-------------------------
Nic_Harris 71323 147
--NAME-- became accustomed to being moved around during his collegiate career. Based on what professional teams are saying, he should expect to be moving again in the National Football League. He joined the Sooners program as a free safety in 2005, starting two games there as a freshman. In his second season, he moved around from free safety to nickel back, starting eight times.
As a junior, --NAME-- shifted to strong safety, where he would earn 26 of his next 27 starts. When injuries depleted the linebacker corps depth in 2008, he again packed his bags and took over as the starting middle linebacker in the seventh game of his final campaign vs. Kansas. Postseason all-star action saw him utilized at weak-side outside linebacker, where scouts feel his hitting and tackling skills vs. the run might be better suited.
At Alexandria High School, --NAME-- was rated the nation's fifth-best safety prospect by Rivals.com, seventh by College Football News and 11th by ESPN. The Scout.com All-Southeast choice added All-Central Louisiana and All-State honors as a senior. He was also named the state of Louisiana's unanimous Defensive Most Valuable Player.
--NAME-- recorded 74 tackles and intercepted 11 passes, returning four for touchdowns his senior season, leading the school to consecutive state playoff appearances in his final two campaigns. He also returned punts and started on offense as a receiver. He finished his prep career holding the school records with 21 interceptions and nine interceptions that he returned for touchdowns. In addition to his exploits on the football field, he graduated with economic honors.
Always active in his local community, --NAME-- displayed that work ethic off the field during his tenure at Oklahoma. He is a two-term president of Bridge Builders, an OU minority student organization focused on community service. Raised by his guardian, LaQuanda Harrell, he said the event that most shaped his life was "growing up without parents." He makes every effort in his spare time to interact with elementary school students, telling them of the importance of getting a good education.
--NAME-- enrolled at Oklahoma in 2005 and unlike most freshmen in the OU program, he was immediately thrust into the action. He appeared in 10 games at free safety, forcing his way into the lineup for two contests. He recorded 16 tackles (8 solos), assisted on a sack and caused a fumble.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- earned All-Big 12 Conference second-team honors from the league's coaches. He started five of the team's first 10 games at nickel back before finishing the year with three consecutive starts at free safety. He produced 68 tackles (40 solos), third-best on the team. He also had 2.5 sacks, seven stops for loss and five quarterback pressures. He broke up eight passes and paced the Sooners with four interceptions.
In 2007, --NAME-- was named to the AFCA Good Works Team and was a semifinalist for the Wooden Citizenship Cup. He was nominated for the FWAA Courage Award and received first-team All-Big 12 Conference honors. He started 13 times at strong safety, delivering 74 tackles (50 solos) and 9.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage that included 3.5 sacks. He caused two fumbles, broke up seven passes and intercepted two others, returning one for a touchdown.
A finalist for the Rudy Award that honors Division I players who exemplify "character, courage, contribution and commitment as members of their team," the first-team All-Big 12 Conference and third-team All-American started 14 times, seeing action at strong safety and middle linebacker in 2008. He registered a career-high 75 tackles (47 solos), adding four stops behind the line of scrimmage. He caused three fumbles, recovered another, intercepted one pass and broke up six others.
2008: Sat out spring drills with a shoulder sprain.
Attended Alexandria (La.) High School, playing football for head coach Butch Stroker Rated the nation's fifth-best safety prospect by Rivals.com, seventh by College Football News and 11th by ESPN The Scout.com All-Southeast choice added All-Central Louisiana and All-State honors as a senior Named the state of Louisiana's unanimous Defensive Most Valuable Player Recorded 74 tackles and intercepted 11 passes, returning four for touchdowns his senior season, leading the school to consecutive state playoff appearances in his final two campaigns Also returned punts and started on offense as a receiver Finished his prep career holding the school records with 21 interceptions and nine interceptions that he returned for touchdowns In addition to his exploits on the football field, he graduated with economic honors.
Prototypical size for the position.   Instinctive defender who reads the action well and is quick to close.   Flashes explosiveness as a hitter.   At least adequate lateral quickness to remain at safety and is an instinctive player who flows well, avoiding blockers to make the play.   Reliable one-on-one tackler in the open field.   Versatile defender has also seen time at nickel cornerback and free safety and is a mainstay on special teams.   Started at middle linebacker in 2008 due to team injuries.   Willing to take on blockers and has the lateral quickness and hand usage to meet, greet and discard blockers.
Bit of a "tweener."   Lacks the bulk to continue with the transition to linebacker and is a bit stiff in the hips for coverage.   Physical, but struggled disengaging from blockers when playing middle linebacker as a senior.   Questionable straight-line speed.   At his best facing the quarterback and making plays downhill.   Perfectly suited to Oklahoma's aggressive scheme, but could struggle if targeted in an NFL passing game.
CATO JUNE, Houston -- --NAME-- does not have the pass coverage ability of June, but both are more of a chase-and-trail type of linebacker who work better playing downhill and in the short-area pursuit than handling man coverage assignments. Like June, --NAME-- will be limited to playing in a Cover-2 scheme. It is evident by his poor hip turn and marginal speed for the position that he will not be considered to be a strong safety by many teams.
-------------------------
Anthony_Hill 71329 122
The future seemed bright for --NAME-- after a second-team All-ACC sophomore season in which he made 45 catches for 478 yards. However, he suffered a torn ACL in July 2007 and did not return until the fall of 2008. He got back to business during his senior year despite missing four games with a chest injury, scoring four touchdowns on his 19 receptions. --NAME--'s strength as a blocker and ability to give a quarterback a big target downfield makes him a prime candidate for Sunday selection in April. Had an arm span of 34 3/4 inches and a hand span of 10 1/8 inches at the combine.
Played one season at Hargrave Military Academy   Collected 10 catches after switching to tight end from the defensive side of the ball   Hargrave teammate of Wolfpack wide receiver Darrell Blackman. Played defensive end in high school   Rated Number 44 nationally at his position by Rivals.com.
Tall with some strength and long arms. Presents a nice target to his quarterback on bootlegs and in zones. Physical blocking for the run and pass. Finds his target in space, can latch on and push him downfield. Fair lateral movement to stay in front of defensive ends on the line. Lines up in the slot and with his hand down. Uses his length and height to stretch the field. Reliable, soft hands and physical enough to push off defenders and gain yardage after the catch.
Built like a receiver. Long strider who lacks quickness out of his stance or the speed to separate, although his height is an advantage downfield. Does not have suddenness in and out of routes, and will round them off. Fails to sustain blocks against quicker defenders in space because he does not bend his knees, has slow footwork and stiff hips. Waist-bender when blocking defensive ends on the edge. Durability concerns abound with ACL and chest injuries keeping him out over the past two seasons.
-------------------------
Stephen_Hodge 71331 197
Earned second-team All-Mountain West honors as a junior after being a special teams coverage leader his first two seasons. --NAME-- followed that up with a first-team All-Mountain West performance as a senior, making 91 tackles including 10 for loss. His eight sacks led all Football Bowl Subdivision defensive backs in 2007, though he basically played linebacker in TCU's defense and blitzed often. The question for NFL teams will be whether he's a safety, weak-side linebacker or a special teams player.
Regarded as one of the top athletes in East Texas   Played quarterback and defensive back for coach Andy Evans at Tatum High School   Led the Eagles to 28 wins in 38 varsity starts over three years   Also handled the punting chores   As a junior he rushed for more than 2,000 yards and passed for more than 1,600 yards, combining for 45 touchdowns, earning district MVP honors   As a senior he completed 105-of-160 passes for 1,471 yards, 20 touchdowns and five interceptions and rushed for 1,561 yards and 19 touchdowns in a 12-2 campaign to earn district MVP honors for a second time   In three seasons he rushed for more than 4,000 yards and 51 touchdowns while passing for nearly 4,500 yards and 48 scores   Member of the Star-Telegram's State 100 list   Ranked 56th on the state 100 list by Rivals.com   On the TexasPrepXtra.com's East Texas all-Underclassmen team and on their 2004 All-East team   Ran a 4.4 40-yard dash   Also excelled in baseball and basketball   Considered Baylor, Houston, Missouri, Texas A&M and SMU before deciding on TCU.
-------------------------
Kevin_Huber 71333 142
The arrival of new head coach Brian Kelly brought about a renaissance for the Bearcats' special teams. After patiently waiting for his opportunity, --NAME-- was named the squad's starting punter for the 2007 campaign. He rewarded his coach for having faith in him, as he went on to not only lead the nation in gross punting (46.88-yard average), but also helped Cincinnati lead the major college ranks in net punting (40.21 average by --NAME-- and 39.61 yards by the team).
With his stellar junior campaign under his belt, professional scouts were curious if --NAME--'s performance was a one-shot affair. Throughout the 2008 season, he backed up his performance, as his 44.95-yard gross average ranked seventh-highest in the major college division. He also became the first player in Division I history to lead the nation in net punting average (2006-08) in three consecutive seasons.
--NAME-- attended McNicholas (Cincinnati, Ohio) High School, playing football for head coach John Rodenburg. The three-time All-League selection was named the league's Punter of the Year as a junior and senior. In his final season, he helped the team gain a berth in the state playoffs.
In 2004, --NAME-- enrolled at Cincinnati, earning Conference USA Commissioner's Academic Honor Roll recognition as both a true and redshirt freshman. He was one of 16 Bearcats to make his collegiate debut in the 2005 season opener vs. Eastern Michigan, but did not get into a game again until the season finale vs. Rutgers. He finished that year with a 35.7-yard average on six kicks, including three that were downed inside the 20-yard line.
--NAME-- was relegated to understudy duties behind Brian Steel in 2006. His only action came vs. Western Michigan in the International Bowl. He made the most of that limited opportunity, as both of his punts were for 50 yards or longer, attaining a 50.5-yard average.
As a junior, --NAME-- was a consensus All-American and unanimous All-Big East Conference selection. The Ray Guy Award finalist (nation's top punter) also garnered Big East Special Teams Player of the Year accolades. He punted 57 times for 2,672 yards, setting school season (46.88 avg) and game (59.7-yard average vs. Marshall) records while leading the nation in gross and net yard average. He also gained 12 yards on a rushing attempt from punt formation and recorded a tackle.
--NAME-- continued his excellence as a senior. The Ray Guy Award semifinalist and All-American first-team choice ranked seventh in the nation with a 44.95-yard average on 60 punts and led the major college ranks with a 41.83-yard net average. He had 24 punts downed inside the 20-yard line, including 15 inside the 10-yard marker and seven that were placed inside the 5-yard line.
No injuries reported.
Attended McNicholas (Cincinnati, Ohio) High School, playing football for head coach John Rodenburg The three-time All-League selection was named the league's Punter of the Year as a junior and senior In his final season, he helped the team gain a berth in the state playoffs.
Left-footed punter, which can give return men fits because of the unusual spin on the ball.   Has adequate height and has a stout, but not muscular, build.   Has above-average leg strength.   Sells out to tackle return men, although he doesn't have to do it that often.   Improved his ability as a senior to get the ball to bounce straight up or softly inside the 10.   Holds on placements, able to handle poor snaps.
Slow three-step delivery (1.35 seconds), often with a stutter-step before receiving the snap, but has not had a punt blocked.   Inconsistent hang-time because he does not turn the ball over or always square the ball.   Many of his longer punts are line drives with around 3.5 seconds of hang-time, giving opponents great return chances.   Only punted two years.   Does not handle kickoffs.
-------------------------
Cornelius_Ingram 71337 153
Based on his performance at the NFL Combine, it is safe to assume that --NAME-- is well on the road to full recovery from the left knee torn anterior cruciate ligament he suffered in fall camp that sidelined him for the entire 2008 season. It was a bittersweet year for the former quarterback, as he observed from the sidelines as his Gators captured the national championship.
Considered to be the best athlete in the football program, it was a long road for --NAME--, as he was constantly switching positions during his first few years at Florida before finding a home at tight end. He arrived on campus as a heralded prep quarterback and even joined the school's renowned basketball program in 2004. 
At Hawthorne High School, --NAME-- was rated a four-star athlete and the 11th-best quarterback prospect in the nation by TheInsiders.com and was a member of that recruiting service's Hot 100 list. He also was listed as a four-star athlete and a Top 100 pick by Rivals.com, who rated him the third-best quarterback prospect, in addition to placing him on their Southeast Elite 88 list.
--NAME-- was ranked as the best quarterback and overall player on the GatorCountry.com Top 101 list. The two-time Class 1A All-State selection in both football and basketball, he threw for more than 1,400 yards and 22 touchdowns in 2003. For the hoops squad, he averaged more than 25 points per game as a shooting guard during his junior season.
In 2004, --NAME-- enrolled at Florida, turning down scholarship offers from Florida State, South Florida, Georgia, Georgia Tech and North Carolina during the recruiting process. The 206-pound passer impressed the staff by running a 4.5 40-yard dash during fall camp, but he would spend the year with the scout team. He later joined the 2004-05 Gators basketball squad, playing in 19 games as a shooting guard before returning to football for spring drills.
After playing in just two games during the 2005 football season, where he lined up as a receiver and at quarterback, the youngster told coach Urban Meyer in January 2006 that he wanted to quit. Suddenly, the kid from Hawthorne who had come to Gainesville with so much promise as a two-sport star -- the agile and athletic quarterback and big-time basketball player -- was gone. 
It took Vernell Brown to bring him back. Brown was a senior defensive back that season whom Meyer dubbed the "face of Florida football." In --NAME--'s case, Brown also was the voice of Florida football. ''If it wasn't for Vernell, I'd be gone,'' --NAME-- said. "I was out the door. That was it.'' 
The coaching staff knew they had to figure a way to get their talented athlete more playing time. The former quarterback became a full-time wide receiver in 2006. --NAME-- was used as a slot receiver/H-back hybrid, allowing the now 6-foot-4, 230-pound redshirt sophomore to create mismatches in the secondary. "I see him more as a receiver [than a tight end]," Meyer said. "He's extremely talented. We have a nice package for him." 
"I've been telling everybody this is the most fun I've had since I've been here," --NAME-- said. "The coaches did a great job giving me an opportunity during the spring to make plays." He started twice while appearing in 14 games, finishing fifth on the team with 30 receptions for 380 yards (12.7 avg) and a touchdown.
Now up to 245 pounds, --NAME-- shifted to tight end in 2007. He saw action in 13 games, including five starting assignments. He hauled down 34 passes, good for fourth on the team, as he totaled 508 yards (14.9 avg) with seven touchdowns. After the season, he declared that he would forgo his senior year and entered the 2008 NFL Draft. However, he later had a change of heart and returned to the school.
--NAME-- had a sensational spring camp and was primed to have a breakout season in 2008 for the Gators. However, early in August camp, he suffered a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee and had to miss the season. "It's the hardest part of the game, the hardest part of coaching. The hardest part of playing," Meyer said of --NAME--'s season-ending injury. "Especially when you've got a guy like that that does everything right." 
That was not --NAME--'s only troubles during that summer. He was not only out for the season, but also out of his apartment after he was issued a complaint for eviction and damages from a Gainesville apartment complex that said he failed to pay his rent, according to Alachua County court records. 
Things settled down shortly thereafter, as --NAME-- spent the season undergoing a grueling rehabilitation program. When Florida honored its seniors before The Citadel game (11/22), --NAME-- walked out last. He waved to the crowd, then crouched down in a sprinter's stance and jogged a 40-yard dash -- much to the delight of the 90,000 fans at The Swamp. It was quite surprising since --NAME-- was just three months removed from reconstructive knee surgery. "He looked pretty good to me," Meyer said. "We were going to throw him a pass there."
2008: --NAME-- suffered a left knee anterior cruciate ligament tear in August practice (8/05) and underwent reconstructive surgery that kept him out for the entire season.
Attended Hawthorne (Fla.) High School, excelling in football and basketball Rated a four-star athlete and the 11th-best quarterback prospect in the nation by TheInsiders.com and was a member of that recruiting service's Hot 100 list Listed as a four-star athlete and a Top 100 pick by Rivals.com, who rated him the third-best quarterback prospect, in addition to placing him on their Southeast Elite 88 list Ranked as the best quarterback and overall player on the GatorCountry.com Top 101 list The two-time Class 1A All-State selection in both football and basketball, he threw for more than 1,400 yards and 22 touchdowns in 2003 For the hoops squad, he averaged more than 25 points per game as a shooting guard during his junior season As a senior, he was one of six finalists for the Mr. Basketball Award for the state of Florida.
Good height for the position. Reliable hands, often catching the ball away from his body. Good release off the line, and can handle press coverage from safeties. Very quick across the middle on crossing routes, causing matchup issues for linebackers. Drops his hips into routes, and gets off plant foot quickly. Find holes in zones and presents a nice target. Runs with a lean after the catch, and can bounce off tackles to get yards after contact. Willing blocker who attacks the second level on run plays from the slot.
Has to prove he has recovered from the torn ACL that kept him on the sideline for his entire senior season. Has a wideout build in upper body and legs. A stand-up tight end who lines up in the slot or closer to the tackle, and must learn to get out of three-point stance. Does not offer much in terms of in-line blocking because of his lack of bulk. Needs to sustain blocks longer on the edge. Does not have elite speed to separate from safeties or quick linebackers, but can make the tough catch when covered. Character red flags after a complaint for eviction and damages from a Gainesville apartment complex in August of 2008.
DUSTIN KELLER, New York Jets -- If he is fully recovered from knee problems, --NAME-- has the ability to be a nice second-day draft find for a team looking for a motion back to stretch the field. If a team is looking for someone to block at the tight end position, they need to look elsewhere. It took him five years to play two seasons and --NAME-- almost quit on the team twice. Questions about his health are justified, but more questions need to be asked about his desire for the game before someone can invest anything more than a mid-to-late round pick on him. Those that compare him to Dallas Clark (Indianapolis) or Vernon Davis (49ers) need to check his dedication level first.
-------------------------
Tyson_Jackson 71341 3
--NAME--'s decision to return to school for his senior season in 2008 seems to have paid off. 
With more NFL teams expected to convert to a 3-4 defensive alignment in 2009, --NAME-- has the frame, strength and run-stuffing ability to fit the mold of the type of defensive end used in that system. In a classic 4-3 setup, most scouts felt he would be better suited playing inside at defensive tackle.
A three-year starter at left defensive end, --NAME-- proved to be a capable, yet unspectacular pass rusher, managing just eight quarterback sacks over his last two seasons -- compared to 8.5 as a sophomore. His forte was flushing the quarterback out of the pocket, as he boasts 30 pressures for his career, along with his run-containment skills, ranking 11th in school history with 27 tackles behind the line of scrimmage.
--NAME-- was regarded as the best defensive end in the state of Louisiana during his senior season at West St. John High School. The two-way lineman was named Class 2A Defensive Player of the Year after capping off a torrid senior season with 84 tackles, 16 sacks and 17 pressures, leading his team to the state championship.
--NAME-- was a member of the Baton Rouge Advocate Super Dozen and the New Orleans Times-Picayune's Top 20 Blue-Chip list in 2003. He was named All-District and All-Parish on the gridiron and also lettered in basketball.
After spending the 2004 season on Louisiana State's scout team, --NAME-- earned Freshman All-Southeastern Conference honors in 2005. He alternated between defensive end positions as the team's top reserve, posting 13 tackles (eight solo) with a pair of sacks and five quarterback pressures.
--NAME-- was named All-Southeastern Conference second-team as a sophomore, after he wrested away the starting left defensive end position. He collected 8.5 sacks with 10 stops behind the line of scrimmage and 37 tackles (13 solo). He also picked off a pass and deflected four others.
As a junior, he continued to excel as a disruptor for the opposing aerial attack, as his 10 pass deflections ranked second in the nation among down linemen. He again lined up at left end, posting 36 tackles (15 solo) to go with 3.5 sacks and ranked second on the squad with 12 pressures.
--NAME-- was selected to the All-SEC second-team in 2008. He started all season at left end, coming up with 36 tackles (17 solo) for the second straight year. He had 4.5 sacks, 10.5 stops for losses and seven pressures. He rumbled 18 yards with a fumble recovery and blocked four pass attempts at the line of scrimmage.
2007: Left the Florida contest (10/06) briefly after a helmet-to-helmet collision.
Attended West St. John (Edgard, La.) High School, playing football for head coach Larry Dupont Teammate of present LSU fullback, Quinn Johnson Regarded as the best defensive end in the state of Louisiana during his senior season The two-way lineman was named Class 2A Defensive Player of the Year after capping off a torrid senior season with 84 tackles, 16 sacks and 17 pressures on the way to leading his team to the state championship Member of the Baton Rouge Advocate Super Dozen and the New Orleans Times-Picayune's Top 20 Blue-Chip list in 2003 Named All-District and All-Parish on the gridiron and also lettered in basketball.
Versatile defender who operated as an end in LSU's base 4-3 alignment, but could also be moved inside as a 4-3 under (3-technique) tackle or as an end in the 3-4 alignment. Good team defender. Understands his containment responsibilities. Excellent size and strength to stack at the point of attack. Flashes the ability to shed blocks and make the play. Good initial quickness off the snap. Can pressure the tackle's outside shoulder and has the strength to push the blocker into the pocket toward the quarterback or use his hands to rip off the block. Gets his hands up in the passing lane. Good lateral quickness and hand technique to disengage from blocks and make the play as opportunities present themselves. Hustles to chase ballcarriers downfield.
Bit of a 'tweener for 4-3 teams. Lacks a great burst upfield, closing speed or repertoire of pass rush moves to ever be a dynamic outside pass rusher. Marginal speed to close. Does not change direction quickly in the backfield to prevent quarterbacks stepping up or getting yards with their feet.
MARCUS SPEARS, Dallas -- --NAME-- shows flashes of brilliance but you can see an overall lack of consistency in his game. He is probably a better fit as a defensive tackle, where his adequate burst and change-of-direction agility will not be exposed as they would on the edge. That versatility will likely make him more inviting to a team that will utilize a 3-4 alignment.
-------------------------
Rashad_Jennings 71345 250
Sometimes a change of scenery is best for a person, and that certainly was the case for --NAME--. The 265-pound redshirt freshman at the University of Pittsburgh decided to leave the school in 2006 for "greener pastures," returning close to home by enrolling at Liberty University. He shed his backup tag and more than 35 pounds in preparation to take over the starting tailback duties, going on to establish numerous school and Big South Conference records before he concluded his collegiate career.
In three seasons at Liberty, --NAME-- set the league career records for yards gained rushing (3,633), placing second all-time for touchdown runs (42), rushing yardage average (5.74), rushing attempts (633) and all-purpose yardage (4,155). He also established a Big South mark with four games with at least three touchdown runs.
As a senior, he broke the Big South single-season records for most rushing attempts (263), most touchdown runs (17), most yards rushing (1,500) and best rushing average (136.36 ypg). His 1,690 all-purpose yards in 2008 rank second in league season annals (third with a 153.64 ypg average) while his average of 154.33 all-purpose yards per game in 2007 also placed second on that list.
Football has always been the "right of passage" in the --NAME-- household, as --NAME-- is about to become the third family member to play in the National Football League. His brother, Butch, played at Virginia Military Institute and Liberty before moving onto the NFL's New York Giants as a running back. Another brother, Bryan, was a tight end at Virginia Tech and later with the San Diego Chargers, New England Patriots and Tennessee Titans.
At Lynchburg Liberty Christian Academy, --NAME--' star shined brightly. The two-time All-Virginia Division II, All-Virginia Independent Conference and Lynchburg News and Advance all-area selection was rated one of the top 25 prospects in Virginia by Rivals100.com. He added Super Prep All-Mid Atlantic honors and was rated Virginia's 30th-best prospect by that recruiting service. He also garnered Prep Star All-Atlantic accolades as a tailback and linebacker.
--NAME-- combined for 3,287 yards and 56 touchdowns during his last two seasons, gaining 1,978 yards on 192 attempts (10.3 avg.) with 28 touchdowns rushing as a senior. He scored twice on six receptions for 146 yards and returned two interceptions and one fumble for touchdowns while posting 75 tackles on the defensive side of the ball, earning team MVP and Offensive Player of the Year honors.
He led the team to a 10-1-1 record and a second-place finish in the Virginia Division II ranks in 2003. As a junior, he averaged 9.2 yards per carry, rushing for 1,309 yards on 142 attempts with 19 rushing touchdowns. He snared 15 passes for 285 yards, including three scores and also returned a fumble for a touchdown, helping the team compile an 8-3-0 record in 2002. He also lettered in basketball. He spent his first two seasons at Jefferson Forest High before transferring for his junior and senior seasons.
--NAME-- enrolled at the University of Pittsburgh in 2004, but deferred his enrollment until January 2005 due to academic issues and poor conditioning. He participated in 2005 spring drills and went on to play in eight games that year. He finished second on the Panthers squad with 411 yards and a touchdown on 86 carries (4.8 avg.), catching five passes for 35 yards.
--NAME-- decided to transfer to Liberty for the 2006 season. Because his father was battling diabetes and he didn't want the burden of caring for him to fall squarely with the rest of his family, he decided to be closer to his home in Virginia. One day, his brother, Butch, opened the door to his home. Standing there soaking wet from sweat was his younger brother. --NAME-- had run and walked 18 miles from his mother's home in Forest to his brother's home in Lynchburg. 
Expectations had followed --NAME--, thanks to the college football success of his two older brothers. But he wasn't particularly motivated to follow in their footsteps. --NAME-- had become a mama's boy early in high school, Butch said, "a big baby" who sat around the house with no direction. "I saw his GPA," Butch said. "He had no GPA."
--NAME-- was "a fat and chubby kid" -- his words -- who needed to be pushed and given a vision of what he could become. His weight, once 268 pounds, is now 231. His body fat, once 16 percent, is 5.5. His 40-yard dash time, once 4.67, is 4.4. "We've certainly had a lot of (NFL scouts) come through here to evaluate him," Liberty coach Danny Rocco said. "Everybody who has come through here likes him.   I think he's got a great chance to make it because he's got all the tools." 
--NAME-- earned All-Big South Conference first-team and All-Region third-team honors in his first year at Liberty. He started nine contests, leading the team while ranking second in the conference with 1,020 yards and 10 touchdowns on 179 carries (5.7 avg.). His average of 97.82 all-purpose yards placed fourth in the league.
--NAME-- was forced to sit out the first two games of the 2007 season by the NCAA for a rules violation. When he returned, he played with a vengeance, earning league Player of the Week honors four times en route to being named Big South Offensive Player of the Year. 
The All-American honorable mention led the league with 1,113 yards on 191 chances (5.8 avg.) that included a then-Big South single-season record 15 touchdown runs. He also became more involved in the passing game, scoring twice on 13 receptions for 276 yards (21.2 avg.), placing second in the conference and 25th in the nation with an average of 154.33 all-purpose yards per game, the second-best season average in Big South annals.
In 2008, the Big South Conference Player of the Year became just the second player in league history to become a finalist for the Walter Payton Award, given to the top player in the FCS ranks. The consensus All-American collected a school and league single-season record 1,500 yards, setting Big South annual marks with 263 carries (5.7 avg.) and 17 touchdowns. 
--NAME-- pulled down 24 passes for 190 yards and two scores, ranking sixth in the nation with an average of 10.36 points scored per game. He also led the Big South and ranked 16th nationally, as he averaged 153.64 all-purpose yards per game, setting another league record with an average of 136.36 yards per game rushing.
No injuries reported.
Attended Liberty Christian (Lynchburg, Va.) Academy as a junior and senior, playing football for head coach Wayne Lance The two-time All-Virginia Division II, All-Virginia Independent Conference and Lynchburg News & Advance All-Area selection was rated one of the top 25 prospects in Virginia by Rivals100.com Added Super Prep All-Mid Atlantic honors and was rated Virginia's 30th-best prospect by that recruiting service Garnered Prep Star All-Atlantic accolades as a tailback and linebacker Combined for 3,287 yards and 56 touchdowns during his last two seasons, gaining 1,978 yards on 192 attempts (10.3 avg.) with 28 touchdowns rushing as a senior Scored twice on six receptions for 146 yards and returned two interceptions and one fumble for touchdowns while posting 75 tackles on the defensive side of the ball, earning team MVP and Offensive Player of the Year honors Led the team to a 10-1-1 record and a second-place finish in the Virginia Division II ranks in 2003 As a junior, he averaged 9.2 yards per carry, rushing for 1,309 yards on 142 attempts with 19 rushing touchdowns Snared 15 passes for 285 yards, including three scores and also returned a fumble for a touchdown, helping the team compile an 8-3-0 record in 2002 Also lettered in basketball Spent his first two seasons at Jefferson Forest High before transferring for his junior and senior seasons.
Good size with well-developed upper body. Played in part-time zone read offense, sometimes in I-formation. Good vision, able to change directions using quick feet. Can stiff-arm and run through tacklers in the open field by lowering his pads. Very good second gear once in the open. Runs tough inside, able to lean forward for additional yards. Looks natural catching the ball out of the backfield. Will keep his feet churning after contact and fight for the first down or goal line. Can hit an inside hole quickly. Surprisingly quick stop-start if the hole is not there immediately.
Played against a lower level of competition, although he had one year of experience in the Big East. Runs loose; must consistently keep the ball high and tight to prevent fumbles. Only gets in the way as a blocker, giving marginal effort. A bit stiff in the hips, and is not overly shifty. Runs a bit tall, which will leave him open to big hits in the NFL. Must sink his hips when cutting.
-------------------------
Herman_Johnson 71347 167
One of the most physically imposing players in college football, --NAME-- is a tremendous physical specimen. The biggest player to ever wear the purple and gold, --NAME-- started the final 38 games he appeared in, lining up at right offensive guard in three of those contests before taking over left guard duties.
Despite his massive frame and considerable bulk, --NAME-- is surprisingly light on his feet, registering 16 down field blocks over the past two seasons. He shows very good mechanics for a player of his size and his road grading ability could see him shift to offensive tackle in the NFL, as he also has performed at right tackle during the earlier stages of his career with the Tigers.
Being the "big man on campus" is nothing new for --NAME--. He was the largest baby born in Louisiana, weighing in at 15 pounds, 14 ounces. The doctor who delivered --NAME-- told his mother at the time that he was a future LSU Tiger. To this day, the doctor who delivered him calls --NAME--'s mom each year, letting her know that her baby is still the largest ever born in the state of Louisiana.
His mother, Karen --NAME--, was a versatile athlete at LaSalle High School, and her son had many of her athletic traits. As he continued to grow, he did not seem interested in playing football. "When I played youth league football, I was always bigger than everybody, but I never liked it," said --NAME--, whose family moved from Olla to Denton, Texas, when he was very young. "I had a bad experience. We always lost." It was not until he enrolled at Denton High School that the "football bug" began to take hold.
Still it took several years before the school's coaching staff was able to convince him to give football a chance. Standing 6-foot-5 at age 14, he was soon noticed for his hulking presence by the staff. "They told me I could get a scholarship to college, get an education and maybe go off to the NFL and be a millionaire," --NAME-- said.
Affectionately nicknamed "House" by the Denton High School staff, --NAME-- was a standout offensive tackle, earning All-District first-team honors as a junior, and All-State first-team accolades in his final year. He was rated 30th on the Rivals.com national Top 100 list, and that recruiting service also ranked him as the third-best prep tackle in the country.
During his senior season, the almost 400-pound lineman was a member of the Texas Top 100 and Midlands Sweet 66 squads. He graded 88 percent for blocking consistency and did not allow any sacks in 2003, before going on to excel at the U.S. Army All-American Bowl.
Louisiana State beat out Oklahoma, Oklahoma State and Houston for --NAME--'s services. He appeared briefly in the Arkansas State and Mississippi State games before being granted a medical hardship in 2004. Prior to 2004 fall camp, he was bitten on his big toe by a spider back home and was slow to recover. After being limited to just 42 offensive snaps, the LSU coaching staff decided to retain his four years of eligibility and shut him down for the rest of the season.
--NAME-- appeared in 11 games as a redshirt freshman in 2005, seeing most of his action on the field goal and PAT protection units. He started against Vanderbilt at right guard, logging 160 snaps for the season. He allowed two quarterback pressures and no sacks while collecting 26 key blocks/knockdowns.
--NAME-- played in 12 games, starting the final 10 contests of the 2006 campaign. He sat out the Alabama clash with a toe injury, but earned two starting assignments at right guard for an injured Will Arnold before lining up at left guard for eight games. He posted 84 knockdowns/key blocks and played a big part in the team leading the Southeastern Conference and ranking 11th nationally with an average of 417.46 yards per game in total offense.
As a junior, --NAME-- started all 14 games at left guard. He delivered 60 key blocks/ knockdowns to go with 15 touchdown-resulting blocks. The big man also made eight down field blocks, as he allowed no quarterback sacks and just one pressure on 442 pass plays. With tackle Ciron Black and --NAME-- leading the way around the left side, the Tigers captured the national title while averaging 439.43 yards per game. For his efforts, --NAME-- was named to the All-Southeastern Conference first-team.
In 2008, --NAME-- repeated as an All-SEC first-team choice. He was also selected to the Associated Press All-American first-team. The offense failed to match their lofty numbers from their championship season, but still managed to average 368.08 yards per game. Their left guard recorded 64 knockdowns, 14 touchdown-resulting blocks and eight down field blocks. He allowed 3.5 sacks and three pressures on 391 pass plays.
2004: Suffered from an infected spider bite over the summer and, after playing in two of the team's first three games, he was granted a medical hardship.
2006: Sat out the Alabama contest (9/16) with turf toe.
2007: Hurt his ankle in the second quarter vs. Alabama (11/03) and did not return to the game.
2009: Did not participate in jumps or shuttle runs at the Combine due to a right groin pull suffered during drills.
Attended Denton (Texas) High School, playing football for head coach Gary Fischer A standout offensive tackle, earning All-District first-team honors as a junior, and All-State first-team accolades in his final year Rated 30th on the Rivals.com national Top 100 list, as that recruiting service also ranked him as the third-best prep tackle in the country During his senior season, the almost 400-pound lineman was a member of the Texas Top 100 and Midlands Sweet 66 squads Graded 88 percent for blocking consistency and did not allow any quarterback sacks in 2003, before going on to excel at the U.S. Army All-American Bowl.
Naturally massive man who looks to be in reasonable shape despite weighing in at nearly 350 pounds. Good initial quickness off the snap despite his size. Gives the defensive tackle a formidable jolt with his hand punch and settles into position. Generally plays with good leverage and has the upper body strength to extend his arms and keep the pass rusher at bay. Surprising lateral quickness and balance for a player his size. Alert pass blocker who keeps his head on a swivel. Good straight-ahead drive blocker. Gains movement on his initial surge and has the hand placement and strength to turn defenders from the hole. Slow to get to the second level, but gives good effort and is a such a huge diversion, he can effectively block defenders from the ballcarrier without making the play.
Only has one season of starting experience and teamed with left tackle Cirron Black, a legitimate NFL talent in his own right, to anchor the left side. Can improve his sustaining of blocks. Can get fundamentally lazy and attempt to latch on to defenders, rather than moving his feet, making him susceptible to coverage sacks. Has struggled with weight issues in the past -- arrived at LSU at more than 400 pounds.
-------------------------
Michael_Johnson 71351 70
After waiting three seasons for his opportunity, --NAME-- took over right defensive end chores as a senior, going on to earn All-American and All-Atlantic Coast Conference honors. Even though he started just fifteen games during tenure with the Yellow Jackets, he closed out his career with 19.0 quarterback sacks and 30.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage.
--NAME-- used a burst of closing speed and long wingspan to force 10 fumbles, including three in each of his last three seasons. He also used his reach and leaping ability to block a total of three field goals as a junior and senior.
One of the nation's premier tight ends during his playing days at Dallas County High School, --NAME-- was team captain, earning Most Valuable Player honors during his senior campaign. That season, he caught 42 passes for 650 yards and six touchdowns while making 92 tackles and 14 sacks. He also had 25 receptions for 300 yards and three touchdowns as a junior. In addition to football, he was also an outstanding basketball player and averaged 16 points and 10 rebounds as a junior. 
--NAME-- enrolled at Georgia Tech in 2005 as one of eight true freshmen to letter. The reserve defensive end saw action in 11 games, recording six tackles (five solo), but also caused a fumble for the kickoff-coverage team and registered his first career sack vs. Virginia Tech.
Playing as a Number 2 right defensive end, --NAME-- appeared in the team's final 12 games in 2006, missing the first two contests after suffering a neck stinger in August camp. He replaced an injured Oliver vs. Georgia, earning his first career start. He came up with 34 tackles (25 solo), finishing second on the squad with five quarterback sacks. He added six tackles behind the line of scrimmage, including three that resulted in forced fumbles.
--NAME-- saw considerable action coming off the bench in the team's passing situation package in 2007. He only started one game, but totaled 21 tacklers (11 solo). That included four sacks and six stops for losses. He recovered one of the three fumbles he caused and blocked a pair of field goals, including one in the waning moments vs. North Carolina.
The consensus All-Atlantic Coast Conference selection was also named to the American Football Coaches Association All-American first-team in 2008. Serving as one of three team captains, he led the squad sand placed third in the ACC with nine sacks and 17.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. For the third-straight season, he caused three fumbles and also deflected seven passes while returning his first career interception 26 yards for a touchdown.
2006: Missed the Notre Dame (9/02) and Samford (9/7) contests with a neck stinger suffered during August camp.
Attended Dallas County (Selma, Ala.) High School, playing football for head coach Richard Bush Rated the seventh-best tight end in the country and the second-best overall prospect in Alabama by Scout.com Served as team captain, earning Most Valuable Player honors during his senior campaign That season, he caught 42 passes for 650 yards and six touchdowns while making 92 tackles and 14 sacks Also had 25 receptions for 300 yards and three touchdowns as a junior An outstanding basketball player, who averaged 16 points and 10 rebounds as a junior.
Rare athleticism for the position, making a switch to outside linebacker possible at the next level. Lanky, athletic frame with room for considerable growth. Gained upper- and lower-body strength in his senior year and flashed the ability to bull rush tackles into the backfield. Takes advantage of his long arms to keep distance between he and the pass blocker. Able to keep tackles off his knees to avoid the cut block. Locates the ball quickly and can re-direct his charge. Good lateral agility and balance. Good straight-line speed. Accelerates quickly and has legitimate closing ability. Flashes the ability to punch, rip off and back up tackles using his length and increasing strength. Able to drop quickly, handle coverage responsibilities in the flat and has the hands to break up or intercept balls thrown in his area. Reads quarterback's eyes to get hands in passing lanes. Able to force fumbles during sacks and in the open field using his arm length.
Is still an unfinished product and needs to be more consistent in his technique and effort. Might be relegated to a role as pass-rush specialist until he gains strength and bulk. Too often relies on his speed to the outside to generate his pass rush, losing all gap responsibility. Inconsistent in his explosiveness off the ball and as a tackler. Has the speed and length to make life difficult for NFL tackles but must give more constant effort. Washed out when blockers (even smaller tight ends) get into his pads; his height is a detriment in these situations. Tendency to stand around instead of chasing plays. --NAME-- has struggled with various injuries over his career.
SIMEON RICE, ex-Tampa Bay -- --NAME-- has a lanky, wiry frame that gets him in trouble on running plays, on which he can't sink his pads well enough to prevent double teams from washing him out. Also like Rice, he seems too enamored with making the sack and will forget a lot of his other assignments, especially gap responsibility. Some "experts" compare him to the Giants' Mathias Kiwanuka or even to Julius Peppers -- neither comparison can be further from reality. --NAME--'s game isn't well-rounded. --NAME-- disappears for long stretches and that shouldn't happen for a player with his athletic ability and rare-sized frame. His physical attributes are what a team is going to drool over when they take him much earlier than his production indicates he should go on draft day.
-------------------------
Rashad_Johnson 71353 95
A complete unknown coming out of high school, --NAME-- was just grateful that former Tide head coach Mike Shula even let him try out for the team when he arrived on campus as a freshman in 2004. Now, after completing his final season, the team captain leaves the college game regarded as the premier safety in the Southeastern Conference.
When --NAME-- came to Tuscaloosa, he was a running back out of Sulligent, Alabama, a small town about an hour from Jasper and home to a tiny 1-A high school. After a redshirt season, --NAME-- made the move to defense in 2005, but saw no action short of special teams work. In 2006, he finally got a chance to start four times, but still saw limited action at safety. After a coaching change and a tireless spring, he earned a starting job in the defensive secondary, and he did little to disappoint during his stellar junior and senior campaigns. 
Now, the Tide will look to replace his 224 tackles and his senior leadership. Even the coaching staff admits that Alabama will be hard pressed to find someone who can replicate --NAME--'s sense of awareness and overall ball-hawking skills that led to a combined 11 interceptions over the past two seasons.
"--NAME-- did all those things," Alabama head coach Nick Saban said. "He played the deep part of the field all the time. He was good in sub (nickel or dime formations), in passing downs with his range, ball skills, ball judgment in the deep part of the field."
As a special teams performer in 2005, --NAME-- totaled eight tackles (5 solos) and caused one fumble in 12 contests. He forced his way into the starting lineup for four games at free safety in 2006, but missed two late season contests with an ankle sprain. He finished with 33 tackles (22 solos) and two forced fumbles, as he also tried his hand at kickoff returns, gaining 64 yards on three chances.
With Saban taking over the coaching reigns, --NAME--'s career began to take off. The junior free safety not only earned a starting job, but was named team captain. He collected a team-high 94 tackles (57 solos) with a sack and 5.5 stops for loss in 2007, picking up All-Southeastern Conference first-team honors. His six interceptions rank seventh on the school single-season record list and he also broke up eight throws and caused one fumble.
--NAME-- was a unanimous All-SEC first-team choice in 2008. He received SEC Defensive Player of the Year honors, as he delivered 89 tackles (60 solos), ranking second on the team. He had five stops behind the line of scrimmage and caused a fumble for the fifth time in his career. The safety led the Tide with five interceptions and 11 pass breakups, as he guided a squad that ranked third in the nation in total defense (263.5 ypg).
2006: Sat out the Louisiana State (11/11) and Auburn (11/18) contests with an ankle sprain.
Lettered as a running back at Sulligent (Ala.) High School, but did not garner any state or national recognition.
Cerebral defender.   Reads the action quickly and puts himself in position to make big plays.   Quick to recognize run and is able to often get to the ballcarrier before blockers can be effective.   Reliable centerfielder who understands his position as the last line of defense and can break down in space to make the open-field tackle.   Faster on the field than his 40 time would indicate due to his instincts.   Natural playmaker.   Baits the quarterback and has a good burst to close.   Will fight for the ball and can snatch the ball at its highest point.   Can track the ball over his shoulder.   Has a history of making the big play at critical moments.
Has a skinny build.   Needs to bulk up in both his upper and lower body to be able to handle taking on blockers at the NFL level.   May struggle to maintain his questionable pure speed with additional mass.   Can get caught up in the trash.   Not as reliable a tackler near the line of scrimmage, as he is willing to lunge with teammates supporting around him.   Not a tone-setter in the middle capable of intimidating with big hits.   A bit high-cut and struggles to keep up with receivers in man coverage.   Character red flags due to a February 2008 arrest for disorderly conduct.
-------------------------
Troy_Kropog 71359 135
No other offensive lineman in the league managed to deliver as many touchdown-resulting blocks (18) that --NAME-- produced during his junior campaign, when running back Matt Forte' ran for 2,127 yards and 23 TDs.
--NAME-- spent the summer in the training room and added 20 pounds before his senior season. With his 4.83 speed (40-yard dash), he became the complete lineman the team envisioned when he arrived on campus in 2004.
At Archbishop Rummel High School, --NAME-- garnered both athletic and academic honors. The two-time Beta Honor Roll recipient was an All-District selection on the football field as a senior. A two-year starter at the demanding left offensive tackle position, he was a member of the prestigious Clarion-Herald Elite Catholic Schools squad.
--NAME-- led the team to the 2003 district championship and a berth in the state quarterfinals and in 2002, he helped Rummel advance to the state semifinals after taking the district crown. The team also captured the district title in 2001.
In addition to football, --NAME-- lettered in track, where he was a state finalist in the shot put his junior year after winning the district title and finishing second in the regionals. He was also listed in the "Who's Who Among American High School Students" for 2002-03 and was a member of the 2003 All-State Academic squad.
--NAME-- enrolled at Tulane as a 260-pound freshman in 2004, spending the season on the scout team. He appeared in the squad's first eight games of the 2005 campaign, starting vs. Houston and Marshall at right offensive tackle. He posted 28 knockdowns while seeing action in 304 plays during his first year with the varsity, but sat out the final three contests (shoulder/elbow issues). He also saw brief action on defense, assisting on one tackle.
In 2006, --NAME-- moved into the starting lineup at left offensive tackle. He was one of the few bright spots for an offense that averaged just 89.9 yards rushing and 320.9 yards in total offense per game. He delivered 73 knockdowns with six touchdown-resulting blocks. He also recorded a solo tackle.
As a junior, --NAME-- earned All-Conference USA recognition. He started eleven games at left tackle, sitting out the Alabama-Birmingham clash due to a shoulder sprain. Despite the injury, he led the team's down linemen with 89 knockdowns and had fifteen of those blocks down field. His stellar performance in the trenches saw the team rank 20th in the nation in rushing, averaging 201.0 yards per game.
In 2008, --NAME-- served as one of the team's captains. His added bulk allowed him to anchor the front wall, as he produced 90 knockdowns and led Conference USA offensive linemen with 14 touchdown-resulting blocks and an 87.33% grade for blocking consistency.
2005: Did not play in the team's final three games vs. Rice (11/12), Tulsa (11/19) and Southern Mississippi (11/26) due to shoulder and elbow issues.
2006: Started vs. Houston (9/09), despite playing with a high ankle sprain suffered in August camp.
2007: Did not play vs. Alabama-Birmingham (10/13) with a shoulder sprain.
Attended Archbishop Rummel (Metairie, La.) High School, playing football for head coach Jay Roth .Two-year starter at the demanding left offensive tackle position Member of the prestigious Clarion-Herald Elite Catholic Schools squad, adding All-District X first-team honors as a senior Led the team to the 2003 Class 5A District X championship and a berth in the state quarter-finals In 2002, he helped Rummel advance to the state semi-finals after taking the district crown The team also captured the district title in 2001 In addition to football, --NAME-- also lettered in track, where he was a state finalist in the shot put his junior year after winning the district title and finishing second in the regional  Two-time Beta Honor Roll recipient Listed in the "Who's Who Among American High School Students" for 2002-03 and was a member of the 2003 All-State Academic squad.
Eases out of his stance in pass protection. Good lateral quickness and balance to mirror the defender. Good depth on his kick-step and can accelerate laterally if beaten off the snap. When he uses his hands, can be effective latching on and riding the pass rusher wide. Good burst off the snap to block down and to get to the second level. Flashes agility in space to block on the move. Good effort and surprising straight-line speed to make blocks downfield.
Only marginal initial quickness off the snap for pass protection. Often beaten off the snap and has to rely on his kick-step and speed to recover. Marginal upper-body strength to sustain blocks. Absorbs, rather than delivering blows while in pass protection and can be walked back into the pocket. Better blocking on the move than as a drive blocker. A bit thick around the middle. Could struggle with the adjustment in speed at the NFL level.
-------------------------
Andy_Levitre 71363 51
Whether playing either tackle position, --NAME-- was a beacon for the OSU offense, as his punishing hand punch left several of the Pac-10 Conference's elite defensive linemen with no choice but to avoid getting into a battle in the trenches with the Beavers captain. The anchor of the team's front wall started 39 games during his career, including his final 35 contests (16 at left tackle, 23 at right tackle).
--NAME-- is the second of Sheri and Gene --NAME--'s sons to star as a collegiate offensive lineman, as his brother, Erick, was an offensive center at the University of Arizona (2002-06). In addition to garnering All-Pac-10 Conference and All-America honors, --NAME-- has been honored by the school and league for his academic excellence. Having graduated with degrees in Finance and Sociology, he played last season as a graduate student.
At San Lorenzo Valley High School, --NAME-- earned first-team All-CIF, All-Santa Cruz Coast League and San Jose Mercury News All-Region accolades following his senior year. The team captain and co-MVP started as an offensive tackle and defensive lineman, leading the team to a 13-0 record and the Central Coast Section title in his junior season. That year, he was named honorable mention All-State and first-team All-Conference on offense and second-team All-Conference on defense. He also earned two letters in track, throwing the shot put. 
--NAME-- enrolled at Oregon State in 2004, redshirting that season while competing on the scout team. He also spent that season shedding 30 pounds from his 340-pound frame. He earned Academic All-Pac-10 honors while seeing action in 11 games as a reserve at both offensive guard positions. In the season finale, he earned his first career starting assignment vs. Oregon, lining up at right offensive tackle.
--NAME-- played behind Josh Linehan at right tackle to begin the 2006 campaign, but when Linehan suffered a knee injury in the third game of the season vs. Idaho, --NAME-- took over those starting duties for the final 10 contests. He collected 66 knockdowns as OSU ranked fourth in the Pac-10 in scoring (27.79 ppg) and passing offense (242.36 ypg). --NAME-- earned second-team All-Pac-10 honors (also second-team on the academic list).
As a junior, --NAME-- was again selected to the All-Pac-10 Conference second-team and the league's gridiron academic squad. He started the first nine games at right tackle before shifting to the left side for the final four contests. He delivered 82 knockdowns and nine touchdown-resulting blocks, helping the Beavers rank fourth in the conference in rushing, averaging 174.92 yards per game on the ground.
In 2008, --NAME-- started all 13 games at left tackle. The All-American and All-Pac-10 Conference first-team choice registered a career-high 91 knockdowns and 14 touchdown-resulting blocks. He missed some playing time in the season opener vs. Stanford with leg cramps, but led the way as the Beavers averaged 360.57 yards per game in total offense.
2008: Missed a good portion of the Stanford game (8/28) with leg cramps.
Attended San Lorenzo Valley (Ben Lomand, Cal) High School Earned first-team All-CIF, All-Santa Cruz Coast League and San Jose Mercury News All-Region accolades following his senior year The team captain and co-MVP started as an offensive tackle and defensive lineman, leading the team to a 13-0 record and the Central Coast Section title in his junior season That year, he was named honorable mention All-State and first-team All-Conference on offense and second-team All-Conference on defense Also earned two letters in track, throwing the shot put.
Good initial quickness off the snap.   Physical initial punch.   Recoils quickly and with balance.   At least adequate flexibility and foot quickness to block in space.   Gets to the second level quickly.   Good vision to locate the secondary target and has the body control to hit the moving target.   Good use of leverage and leg drive in short-yardage situations.   Experienced at both tackle and guard positions.   Durable; finished his career starting 36 consecutive games.
Lacks the height, arm length and foot speed preferred at offensive tackle.   Marginal depth on his initial kick-slide to handle speed rushers.   Effective short-area run blocker due to technique, but not a masher.   Marginal upper-body strength as drive blocker.
-------------------------
DeAndre_Levy 71365 76
The defense's sparkplug from the strong-side linebacker position, --NAME-- provided the Badgers with a quality blitzer with the quickness to easily cover receivers on deep routes. Ever since he was inserted into the starting lineup as a junior, he has consistently delivered impact plays in the opposition's backfield.
In 21 of his last 39 games, he registered at least one tackle behind the line of scrimmage or a sack. Creating turnovers has been his specialty, as he blocked one kick, intercepted two passes, caused six fumbles and registered six fumble recoveries during his time in the starting lineup.
--NAME-- was a Midwest Top 100 selection by Super Prep during his senior year at Vincent High School. The two-time All-Conference selection added All-State first-team honors as a senior. He served as team captain in each of his last three seasons, twice earning squad Most Valuable Player honors.
In his final season, the linebacker recorded 84 tackles, including 21 stops behind the line of scrimmage, along with five sacks and four forced fumbles. He also saw action on offense that year, catching 12 passes for 260 yards and three touchdowns. In addition to football, he also lettered in basketball and track.
--NAME-- made an immediate contribution on special teams for Wisconsin as a true freshman in 2005. He also saw limited action at strong-side outside linebacker, producing 18 tackles (13 solos) with a 7-yard sack. He also caused two fumbles and recovered one on the coverage units.
--NAME-- moved into the starting lineup at strong-side linebacker in 2006, earning All-Big Ten Conference academic honors. He ranked fourth on the team with 50 tackles (26 solos), registering three turnovers on an interception and two forced fumbles. He had a career-high six sacks to go with seven pressures and 7.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also blocked a kick and knocked down a pair of pass attempts.
In 2007, --NAME-- earned Player of the Week honors three times, as he again manned the strong-side position. He was in on 70 tackles (49 solos), the second-highest total on the team. He added three sacks among his career-high 10 stops for loss and posted a pair of pressures. He caused two fumbles, recovered two others and deflected two passes in 13 contests.
The Tom Weisner Award recipient was named All-Big Ten Conference honorable mention as a senior. He struggled during the first month, playing with a groin injury that had sidelined him late in fall camp. He still managed to place second on the squad with 73 tackles (28 solos). He recovered two fumbles, advancing one 45 yards to set up a Badgers' field goal and broke up three passes to go with his second career interception. His 9.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage led the second-level defenders, much like his five sacks did.
2008: Limited in fall camp and early in the season by a groin pull.
2009: Suffered a right hamstring strain that prevented him from completing agility tests at the NFL Combine.
Attended Vincent (Milwaukee, Wisc.) High School, playing football for head coach Elliot Lightfoot Midwest Top 100 selection by Super Prep during his senior year The two-time All-Conference selection added All-State first-team honors as a senior Served as team captain in each of his last three seasons, twice earning squad Most Valuable Player honors In his final season, the linebacker recorded 84 tackles, including 21 stops behind the line of scrimmage, along with five sacks and four forced fumbles Also saw action on offense that year, catching 12 passes for 260 yards and three touchdowns Added letters in basketball and track.
Very physical at the line, takes on fullbacks in the hole or tight ends on the edge to allow other players to make the tackle.   Uses above-average arm length to effectively wrap up and form tackle in the open field.   Has better straight-line speed and quickness than most college strong-side linebackers.   Handles coverage responsibilities against tight ends and running backs in the flat.   Smart, assignment-sure defensive leader.
A bit stiff in the hips, works best in a straight line.   Backpedal is tall and choppy.   Not explosive closing on the ball.   Gets caught up in traffic too much.   Does not use his hands or speed to beat linemen when blitzing, although he can dispose of running backs.   Lines up in a stack, but must learn how to play as a nine-technique.
ALEX LEWIS, Detroit -- Both are smaller than you want, but has that incredible quickness just looking to be harnessed. --NAME-- is very effective blitzing off the edge, but seems to generate a better burst when he comes off the snap with his hand on the ground rather than when standing in a normal linebacker's stance. He is more comfortable working in space, as he likes to use his speed to avoid rather than utilize his strength to take on offensive linemen. Some scouts compare him to the Titans' Keith Bulluck, but --NAME--'s inability to locate the ball or eye the quarterback in passing situations shoes he is not the complete player some would like you to believe he is. In a draft that is lacking in quality linebackers, some team will overlook his pass coverage deficiencies and draft him higher than his grade indicates.
-------------------------
Phil_Loadholt 71369 54
The massive offensive tackle teamed with All-American guard Duke Robinson to give the Sooners one of the largest -- and most punishing -- offensive lines in college football. 
Oklahoma went on to shatter NCAA records for scoring, as its total of 716 points topped the previous record of 656 points set by Hawaii in 2006. 
Robinson delivered 14 touchdown-resulting blocks -- --NAME-- chipped in with 16 -- helping the offense total 96 touchdowns for 2008, which bettered the old NCAA season record of 89 touchdowns by Nebraska in 1983. The Sooners also became the first team in collegiate annals to score 60 or more points in five straight contests, as their left tackle registered 94 knockdowns in his final season.
The Colorado native attended Fountain Fort Carson High School, where he also was a standout basketball and track and field athlete. Named the Colorado Springs Area Player of the Year as a senior, he recorded 113 tackles as a defensive lineman, adding eight touchdowns on offense as a tight end and H-back. The two-time gridiron team captain also earned All-State accolades as a junior and senior.
--NAME-- led the basketball team to the state title game as a senior. He averaged 17.1 points, 11.2 rebounds and three blocked shots per game, garnering All-State recognition. He also excelled in the discus for the track team, capturing the state title.
--NAME-- had originally intended to attend Louisiana State, but was a non-qualifier coming out of high school. He then enrolled at Garden City Community College, twice receiving All-American honors (2005-06). As a sophomore, he was named the Kansas Jayhawk Community College Conference Lineman of the Year. The left offensive tackle produced 93 knockdowns in 2006 and had 113 knockdowns during the 2005 season.
The recipient of Garden City's Student Support Service Award and named to the 3.0 Student Excellence List, --NAME-- was rated the 17th-best overall junior college prospect in the country on Super Prep's JUCO 100 List. He was also rated the 20th-best overall prospect in the JUCO ranks by Rivals.com.
--NAME-- enrolled at Oklahoma in 2007. He earned All-American honorable mention from Sports Illustrated, adding All-Big Twelve Conference first-team accolades from the Dallas Morning News and second-team recognition from the league's coaches. He started all 14 games at left offensive tackle, where the 360-pounder produced 118 key blocks/knockdowns and graded an overall 80.5% for blocking consistency. He was also credited with 13 touchdown-resulting blocks, but suffered through a rash of penalties, as he was flagged a team-high 13 times.
--NAME-- received All-Big Twelve first-team honors from the league's coaches and the Associated Press as a senior. He was suspended for the season opener after he was arrested in June for suspicion of driving under the influence and transporting an open beer can. He returned to start the final 13 games, receiving an 85.62% grade for blocking consistency. He led the team and the conference's offensive linemen with 16 touchdown-resulting blocks, showing more quickness at 340 pounds to record eight blocks downfield. He also showed better field awareness, reducing his penalty total from 13 in 2007 to four in his final season.
--NAME-- enrolled at Garden City (Kan.) Community College in 2005 after he failed to qualify for enrollment at Louisiana State Played for head coach J.J. Eckert Was twice named All-Kansas Jayhawk Community College Conference and All-American first-team, lining up at left offensive tackle Rated the 17th-best overall junior college prospect in the country on Super Prep's JUCO 100 List Also rated the 20th-best overall prospect in the JUCO ranks by Rivals.com Recipient of Garden City's Student Support Service Award and named to the 3.0 Student Excellence List Named Kansas Jayhawk Community College Conference Lineman of the Year in 2006, as he registered 93 knockdowns and twelve touchdown-resulting blocks Totaled 113 knockdowns and nine touchdown-resulting blocks during the 2005 season.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Fountain Fort Carson (Fountain, Colo.) High School, playing football for head coach Mitch Johnson Named the Colorado Springs Area Player of the Year as a senior, he recorded 113 tackles as a defensive lineman, adding eight touchdowns on offense as a tight end and H-back The two-time gridiron team captain also earned All-State accolades as a junior and senior .Also excelled in basketball and track In basketball, he led the team to the state title game as a senior That season, he averaged 17.1 points, 11.2 rebounds and three blocked shots per game, garnering All-State recognition Competed in the discus for the track team, capturing the state title in that event.
Potentially dominant drive blocker. Massive man who can engulf his opponent, turn him away from the ballcarrier and pancake him to the ground. Looks to intimidate. Only adequate initial quickness off the snap, but has a deep kick-slide and the long arms to keep the pass rusher at bay. Natural knee bender who plays with impressive leverage and balance for a man of his size. Better lateral quickness than initial.
Bit of a "tweener." Too often beaten off the snap by ends to remain at left tackle and might even have to be moved inside -- where his height would be a liability. Marginal lateral quickness to recover when beaten initially. Too often relies on his size, failing to sustain blocks as effectively as he should.
-------------------------
Jonathan_Luigs 71373 106
Much like the Pac-10 Conference, where California's Alex Mack and Oregon's Max Unger battled for the title of that league's premier center, --NAME-- had a similar situation, as he and Alabama's Antoine Caldwell split All-Southeastern Conference first-team honors over their last three seasons. While the Pac-10 duo is known for their physicality, the SEC tandem is known more for their quickness and field savvy.
The two-time All-American was a three-time finalist for the Rimington Trophy, given to the nation's top center. He captured that honor as a junior and has been the centerpiece of the Razorback's front wall, compiling a string of 49 consecutive starts, every game he appeared in at Arkansas. He has also excelled in the classroom, as he was a member of the school's Academic Honor Roll in each of his last four seasons.
At Pulaski Academy, --NAME-- was a three-year starter on the offensive line, lining up at center and offensive tackle, as well as defensive end. He was named to the Associated Press Arkansas Super Team and the Arkansas Democrat-Gazette All-Arkansas team as a senior, adding All-Metro squad honors as a junior. He was also a member of the National Honor Society. 
--NAME-- was the 2003 recipient of the Brandon Burlsworth Award, named after the former Razorback All-American offensive guard. Super Prep rated him as the 12th-best overall prospect in Arkansas while The Morning News had him rated 14th. In each of his three varsity seasons, he graded at least 90 percent for blocking consistency.
As a senior, --NAME-- capped his prep career by helping his squad win its first state title (Class 3A) in school history with a 13-2 mark. As a junior defensive tackle, he recorded 77 tackles (26 solos), four sacks, three more stops for losses of 30 yards and two pressures.
--NAME-- was heavily recruited by Louisiana State, Memphis, Alabama, Iowa, Kansas State and Nebraska, but decided to enroll at Arkansas. He spent the 2004 season on the scout team, seeing action mostly as an offensive guard, but also performed at center. 
In 2005, the redshirt freshman earned Freshman All-American and Freshman All-Southeastern Conference honors. He started 10 games, lining up at right guard in seven contests and at center in three late-season clashes. He sat out the Alabama game with a high ankle sprain, but went on to register 53 knockdowns with eight touchdown-resulting blocks, posting an 84.2 percent grade for blocking consistency.
--NAME-- was a Rimington Trophy finalist, adding All-SEC first-team and All-American second-team honors in 2006. He made 34 knockdowns with seven touchdown-resulting blocks. He graded 85.1 percent for a running attack that led the conference and ranked fourth in the nation with an average of 228.5 yards per game on the ground. He led the team in knockdowns three times, as he was part of a front wall that led the major college ranks, giving up just nine quarterback sacks for the campaign. He also recorded one tackle.
--NAME-- captured the Rimington Trophy in 2007 and shared the SEC's Jacobs Blocking Trophy (conference's top offensive lineman) with Alabama's Andre Smith. The consensus All-American first-team choice was credited with a career-high 84 knockdowns and led the league's interior linemen with 14 touchdown-resulting blocks. With their center leading the way, the Razorbacks again led the SEC and ranked fourth in the country with an average of 286.54 yards per game rushing. Arkansas also ranked second in the league and 17th nationally in total offense with an average of 450.0 yards per game.
With both Darren McFadden and Felix Jones having left Arkansas for the NFL, the team's once formidable running game came to a screeching halt in 2008. --NAME-- was again named a finalist for the Rimington Trophy, but lost out to Alabama's Antoine Caldwell for first-team All-SEC honors. He delivered 66 knockdowns and graded 85.42 percent for blocking consistency. But the Hogs finished 97th in the nation in rushing (113.5 ypg). The team's offensive line was the main problem, as the front wall placed 118th among the 119 major colleges, allowing 46 sacks for the season.
2005: Suffered a high ankle sprain in the first quarter vs. Southern California (9/17), missing the final three quarters and the following week vs. Alabama (9/24).
2007: Missed three days of August practice (8/20-22) due a virus Was shaken up on a helmet-to-helmet collision vs. Kentucky (9/22), missing two plays before returning to the game.
Attended Pulaski (Little Rock, Ark.) Academy, playing football for head coach Kevin Kelley Three-year starter on the offensive line, lining up at both center and offensive tackle, as well as playing defensive end Named to the Associated Press Arkansas Super Team and the Arkansas Democrat-Gazette All-Arkansas team as a senior, adding All-Metro squad honors as a junior Also a member of the National Honor Society 2003 recipient of the Brandon Burlsworth Award, named after the former Razorback All-American offensive guard Super Prep rated him as the 12th-best overall prospect in Arkansas while The Morning News had him rated 14th In each of his three varsity seasons, he graded at least 90 percent for blocking consistency As a senior, --NAME-- capped his prep career by helping his squad win its first state title (Class 3A) in school history with a 13-2 mark  As a junior defensive tackle, he recorded 77 tackles (26 solos), four sacks, three more stops for losses of 30 yards and two pressures.
-------------------------
Alex_Mack 71375 21
The "poster boy" for the 2009 NFL Draft center class, --NAME-- has been a model of consistency on the field, anchoring the Bears' front wall since taking over for All-Pac-10 Conference center Marvin Phillips as a sophomore. The two-time finalist for the Rimington Trophy, given to the nation's top center, he has not only excelled on the gridiron, but also in the training room and the classroom. His power clean lift of 374 pounds is a school record for all positions.
--NAME-- was recently awarded the Draddy Trophy, given to college football's top scholar-athlete, an award that also includes a $25,000 post-graduate scholarship. He was named the Pac-10 Conference's Scholar-Athlete of the Year in 2008, having earned league academic honor roll recognition four times while attending Cal. 
As a senior, he was also a finalist for the Lowe's Senior CLASS Award, given for academic and athletic accomplishment. In addition, he was named the school's 2008 winner of the Schlessinger Coaches Award, which recognizes outstanding athletic ability, academic success and community service.
--NAME--'s work ethic speaks volumes for the player he has become. "Being a center, there's a lot of thinking that's involved," says --NAME--. "Before the play, you get the play, you go to the line, you have to remember what the snap count is, you have to call out the front and what everyone's assignment is, tell both the guards what they have to do and then I have to focus on what I have to do." 
But such attention to detail goes far beyond game day. --NAME-- is usually the last lineman off the field after practice, always getting in a little extra footwork and hand work while other players grab some Gatorade. For such a large individual, he is surprisingly quick. He can run the 40-yard dash in 5.0 seconds, a feat only four linemen at the 2008 NFL Combine surpassed. That quickness and --NAME--'s brute strength have terrorized opposing defensive lines. 
--NAME--'s experience was with a primarily ground-based offense in high school. Since coming to Cal, however, he has had to learn to protect pocket passers. "In high school, I didn't know what a pass set was," says --NAME--. "Here, half the day we work on pass blocking, pass sets, pass technique. It's so technical. It's amazing how hard it is." But those extra hours spent after practice has helped him make the job look easy. 
When --NAME-- was named the Pac-10 Conference's Morris Trophy winner in 2008, it marked the second time he had received that honor, joining Southern California's Roy Foster (1980-81) and Washington's Lincoln Kennedy (1991-92) as the only players in league history to capture that honor twice. He is also the third Golden Bear offensive lineman to receive the honor, joining Todd Steussie (1993) and Ryan O'Callaghan (2005). Defensive end Andre Carter also won on the defensive side in 2000. 
At San Marcos High School, --NAME-- excelled on the gridiron and on the wrestling mat. He was named to PrepStar's All-West team as a senior, helping his team rush for 2,031 yards in 2003. He was a member of Super Prep's Top 132 seniors in California squad, landing him on that service's All-Far West team. The 2003 San Marcos Most Valuable Player, he was named the Channel League's Co-Most Valuable Player on defense and a first-team All-League selection. He was also a two-time All-CIF choice and a three-time All-County and All-League member.
--NAME-- played on both the offensive and defensive lines during his time at San Marcos High. As a senior, he registered 93 tackles and eight sacks. He added four letters in wrestling, advancing to the state wrestling tournament as a CIF heavyweight champion. As a senior, he compiled a 26-1 record on the mat. 
--NAME-- enrolled at California in 2004, spending the season acclimating to center while performing on the scout team. He was an Academic All-Pac-10 honorable mention as a redshirt freshman, playing behind Marvin Phillips while making five knockdowns in seven games in 2005.
The team's Most Improved Offensive Lineman took over center duties in 2006, earning All-Pac 10 first-team and Academic All-League second-team recognition. He delivered 83 key blocks/knockdowns and was named to ESPN's All-Bowl Team after registering nine knockdowns and paving the way for two 100-yard  rushers vs. Texas A&M in the Holiday Bowl.
--NAME-- received All-American and All-Pac-10 first-team honors in 2007. The Rimington Trophy finalist captured the league's Morris Blocking Trophy, given to the best offensive lineman in the conference. He was a semifinalist for the Lombardi Award as he anchored a line that allowed only 11 quarterback sacks. He led the team with 81 key blocks/knockdowns and his 11 touchdown-resulting blocks were the most by any major college center in 2007.
The All-American center seriously considered leaving school early to apply for the 2008 NFL Draft. He submitted his paperwork to the league's advisory board, but when he was told that he would be a second-round draft choice, he decided to return to college for the 2008 campaign.
"This is a really great opportunity for me to help the team," --NAME-- said. "There is a lot I can do at Cal to improve my game and to further my career. I didn't want to miss the experience of my senior season and helping the team get back on track and finish things right. This also gives me an opportunity to finish my degree and continue my education. I came to Cal because of the outstanding education and I want to finish that before I'm done. I'm really just looking forward to getting into spring ball and seeing how the team comes together for 2008."
--NAME-- was again awarded with All-American and All-Pac-10 Conference honors as a senior. He was a finalist for both the Lombardi Award and Rimington Trophy and received numerous national honors for academics. On the field, he started all 13 games in the pivot. He again paced the Bears with 92 knockdowns/key blocks and matched his junior season total with 11 touchdown-resulting blocks.
2009: Did not work out at the combine due to an ankle sprain.
Attended San Marcos (Cal.) High School Named to PrepStar's All-West team as a senior, helping his team rush for 2,031 yards in 2003 Member of Super Prep's Top 132 seniors in California squad, landing him on that service's All-Far West team The 2003 San Marcos Most Valuable Player, he was named the Channel League's Co-Most Valuable Player on defense and a first team All-League selection Two-time All-CIF choice and a three-time All-County and All-League member Played on both the offensive and defensive lines during his time at San Marcos High As a senior, he registered 93 tackles and eight sacks Added four letters in wrestling, advancing to the state wrestling tournament as a CIF heavyweight champion As a senior, he compiled a 26-1 record on the mat.
Tall, athletic center with large biceps and a solid lower body build. Puts in full effort on every play, often getting downfield for a second or third block. Nimble enough to get in front of screens, trap block inside and eliminate linebackers at the second level. Keeps his legs moving once making contact with his target, often putting his man on the ground in the process. Gets under the pads of taller tackles, able to push them back 5-7 yards. Creates huge holes on combination blocks inside. Adept at regular and shotgun snaps, getting his hands up quickly afterwards. Despite his size, he can quickly get low to cut block and will continue to work after the initial contact. Leader of the line.
Plays a bit high at times, occasionally losing leverage or getting pushed back against wide-bodies. Does not play with a particularly wide base. Will lean forward too much when in space, losing his ability to sustain the block and allowing defenders to get him off balance. Sometimes misses his target in space. Lacks a great push in short-yardage situations. Needs quicker feet and lateral movement in pass protection to handle quick, penetrating three-technique tackles and adjust to blitzing linebackers inside.
-------------------------
Sherrod_Martin 71383 59
After two injury-plagued seasons, --NAME-- was fully healthy in 2008, going on to establish himself as one of the premier pass defenders in the South. He tied the school single-game record and set an NCAA record for most interceptions in a quarter, picking off three passes in the second quarter in the 2008 Alcorn State game.
Those were --NAME--'s first interceptions since Oct. 20, 2005 vs. Florida International. Since then he has undergone three major operations and missed one entire season. "I'm speechless," --NAME-- said after that game. "The team did a lot of good things tonight. The defensive line and linebackers hustled and executed. I had the easy job, all I had to do was catch the football."
One of the hardest hitting safeties in college football, --NAME-- was known for initiating contact. He ranks 14th in the school's storied history with 292 tackles, which are the second most by a Trojans defensive back. His 191 solo stops rank 10th overall and set the school all-time record for secondary performers.
--NAME-- lettered three times as a free safety and wide receiver at Griffin High School. The team captain earned first-team All-Area honors and received the All-Purpose Player of the Year Award from the Griffin Daily News in 2002. He was also named to the All-Area team by Kudzu Magazine as a senior.
In his final season, --NAME-- recorded three interceptions, returning two for touchdowns as a senior, finishing with 70 tackles and five stops for loss. He gained more than 700 yards rushing on 80 carries, as well as scoring seven touchdowns. He caught seven passes for 177 yards and led the team and region in punt returns. He also lettered in basketball four times and participated in track & field for two seasons.
--NAME-- originally signed with Troy in 2003, but deferred enrollment until January 2004. He opened the 2004 season as a reserve, taking over strong safety duties for the final seven games. He finished fourth on the team with 68 tackles (41 solos), including 4.5 stops for loss. He caused two fumbles, deflected five passes, intercepted three others and also blocked one kick.
Despite playing with damage in both shoulders, --NAME-- finished second on the team with 78 tackles (54 solos) in 2005. He switched from jersey Number 13 to Number 6, as he added a sack to go with five stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also broke up 11 passes and intercepted two others. After the season, he underwent surgery on both shoulders and was slow to recover, sitting out the 2006 campaign.
--NAME-- returned to action in 2007 and was brought along slowly the first two games, but he suffered bone fractures in his hand vs. Florida that required surgery, keeping him on the sidelines for the next two games. When he returned, he went on to start six contests as the team's nickel back. He posted 52 tackles (35 solos), sixth on the team, as he tallied three sacks and nine stops for loss. He also caused a school single-season record six fumbles.
--NAME-- returned to his familiar position at free safety for the 2008 season, starting all 13 games. The All-Sun Belt Conference choice ranked third on the squad with a career-high 94 tackles (61 solos). He broke up seven passes and intercepted four others, including three in the second quarter vs. Alcorn State.
2005: Played the entire season with shoulder problems, undergoing surgery to repair his AC joints after the season and was granted a medical hardship for the 2006 campaign.
2007: Suffered broken bones in his hand vs. Florida (9/08) that required surgery, forcing him to sit out vs. Oklahoma State (9/14) and Louisiana-Lafayette (9/22).
Attended Griffin (Ga.) High School, playing football for head coach Steve Devoursney Lettered three times as a free safety and wide receiver, as the team captain earned first-team All-Area honors and received the All-Purpose Player of the Year Award from the Griffin Daily News in 2002 Named to the All-Area team by Kudzu Magazine as a senior In his final season, --NAME-- recorded three interceptions, returning two for touchdowns as a senior, finishing with 70 tackles and five stops for loss Gained more than 700 yards rushing on 80 carries, as well as scoring seven touchdowns Also caught seven passes for 177 yards and led the team and region in punt returns Lettered in basketball four times and participated in track & field for two seasons.
Good height and has a wiry, strong frame.   Flies around the field.   Gets to the opposite sideline in a hurry.   His speed and coverage skills take away opponents' deep routes, allowing the defensive line to wreak havoc.   Can work through trash and find the ball.   Has nice length to wrap up in the open field.   Despite his height, --NAME-- has the low, smooth backpedal necessary to play corner.   Has speed to blitz effectively from 10 yards out or close quickly on inside runs.   Used as a gunner on punt returns.
May become a safety/corner "tweener."   Instincts are questionable and he will take bad angles to the ballcarrier.   Gets sucked in on play-action.   Is not a consistent tackler in space as he fails to break down, drops his head or tries to tackle the ballcarrier's shoulder pads.   Not the physical force putting fear into receivers over the middle.   Is only adequate against receiver blocks downfield.   Redshirted in 2006 after having surgery on both shoulders (labrum) prior to spring practice.   Missed four games in 2007 with broken bones in his left hand.   Turned 24 during his senior season.
-------------------------
Darcel_McBath 71391 48
It's easy to understand how a defensive player can fly under the radar when he plays for a team with one of the most prolific offenses in the nation.
That didn't stop --NAME-- from being one of the best playmakers in the Big 12. Having to practice against a top offense -- namely sophomore WR Michael Crabtree -- is sure to help any defensive back hone their coverage skills. --NAME--, a former cornerback, was the Red Raiders' secondary anchor at the demanding free safety position since shifting there as a sophomore, going on to start his final 39 games.
The opposition, often playing from behind and passing on most every day, challenged the middle of Tech's defense last season. --NAME-- more than stood up to the challenge, pulling in seven interceptions that included a school season-record tying two returns for touchdowns. Six of his seven pass deflections came on third-down plays.
At Gainesville High School, --NAME-- was rated the 36th-best cornerback in the country by Rivals100.com. He was named District 9-3A Most Valuable Player by the Dallas Morning News, as he helped lead GHS to a 16-0 mark and Class 3A Division I title as a senior. That year, he picked off six passes, returning one for a score as a defensive back and logged 75 tackles (50 solo). He also caught 14 touchdown passes as a wide receiver and had two punt returns for touchdowns. As a junior, he totaled 50 tackles and rushed for 800 yards as a running back.
--NAME-- enrolled at Texas Tech in 2004, turning down scholarship offers from Oklahoma State, Texas A&M and Notre Dame, but spent that season on the scout team. His college career would be delayed further, as he suffered a broken arm in 2006 fall camp and did not get on the field until the final six games. Seeing action mostly on special teams, his only tackle came vs. Oklahoma State while being listed second on the depth chart at left cornerback.
During his rehabilitation, --NAME-- bulked up to the point that the coaches felt his speed and hitting ability would be best at free safety in 2006. The move was a total success, as he earned All-Big Twelve Conference second-team honors, ranking third on the team and 11th among the league's defensive backs with 75 tackles (35 solo). He also picked off three passes and deflected five other throws.
The 2007 campaign saw --NAME-- firmly entrenched at free safety, as he received All-Big Twelve Conference honorable mention, as he led the team with eight pass deflections. He ranked third on the squad with 73 tackles (48 solo), causing one fumble while returning a fumble recovery 16 yards for his first career touchdown in the Iowa State. He also had a pair of interceptions for a defense that ranked 32nd in the nation during his sophomore year and 12th in 2007.
--NAME-- received All-American and All-Big Twelve Conference first-team accolades in 2008. He registered 75 tackles (55 solo), good for second on the team. He caused a fumble and broke up seven passes. He also led the conference and tied for third in the NCAA with seven interceptions, tying a school season-record with two returns for touchdowns.
2005: Suffered a broken bone in his arm during fall camp, sitting out the first four games of the season vs. Florida International (9/10), Sam Houston State (9/17), Indiana State (9/24) and Kansas (10/01) Also missed the Texas and Baylor games (coach's decision).
Attended Gainesville (Tex.) High School Rated the 36th-best cornerback in the country by Rivals100.com Named District 9-3A Most Valuable Player by the Dallas Morning News, as he helped lead GHS to a 16-0 mark and Class 3A Division I title as a senior That year, he picked off six passes, returning one for a score as a defensive back and logged 75 tackles (50 solos) Also caught 14 touchdown passes as a wide receiver and had two punt returns for touchdowns As a junior, he totaled 50 tackles and rushed for 800 yards as a running back.
Centerfielder with the build of a strong safety and good upper-body development. Comes downhill in a hurry, diagnosing the run and attacking receivers over the middle. Solid last line of defense and secure tackler in space. Reads the quarterback's eyes and has the speed to jump routes. Good hands for the interception. Finds his way through trash to the ballcarrier when near the line. Became a more vocal leader as a senior, and has always tried to lead by example. Directs the defense from the deep secondary. Contributes on special teams and should do so in the NFL due to his size and speed.
Only adequate height for a free safety and might have to move down into the box. Better when the play is in front of him and lacks the lateral quickness and recovery speed to stay with quick tight ends or receivers in space. Must improve his hand usage to get off the blocks of bigger wide receivers. Slow in run-pass recognition. Not a dominant hitter.
-------------------------
Scott_McKillop 71395 146
Playing alongside his brother, Chris, a starting defensive end, --NAME-- helped lead Panthers defense in 2007 that ranked fifth in the nation, allowing the opposition just 297.67 yards in total offense per game. 
Taking over for departed 2006 Big East Conference Defensive Player of the Year, H.B. Blades, --NAME-- repeated as the conference Defensive Player of the Year (by The NFL Draft Report and College Football News), en route to leading the nation with an average of 12.58 tackles per game. 
--NAME--'s 151 total tackles in 2007 rank fourth on the school single-season record list and are the most by a Panther defender since the inception of the Big East Conference in 1991. Only Steve Apke (168 in 1984 and 162 in 1985) and Troy Benson (162 in 1983) have recorded more tackles in a season at Pittsburgh.
Proving his 2007 season was no fluke, he again led the Big East Conference and ranked tied for 10th in the nation with 137 tackles (10.54 tpg) in 2008. His 82 solo tackles (6.31 tpg) were good for third in the major college ranks, earning Big East Conference Defensive Player of the Year honors.
At Kiski Area High School, --NAME-- earned Associated Press Pennsylvania Class AAAA All-State first-team honors. He was a member of the Pittsburgh Post-Gazette "Fabulous 22" and Pittsburgh Tribune-Review "Terrific 25" teams, in addition to receiving Harrisburg Patriot-News "Platinum 33" and Valley News All-Star accolades.
--NAME-- was rated the 20th-best overall prospect in Pennsylvania by Rivals.com and rated the nation's 31st-best outside linebacker prospect by that recruiting service. He was rated the 24th-best prospect in Pennsylvania by Super Prep, as that service also named him to their All-Northeast team. He added Prep Star All-East Region honors and was selected to play in the Big 33 Football Classic.
--NAME--'s 161 solo stops and 332 total tackles are Kiski Area High career records. As an outside linebacker and fullback, he recorded 132 tackles as a senior and rushed for 1,121 yards with 14 touchdowns over his final two seasons. He led the team to three consecutive WPIAL Class AAAA playoff berths, earning three letters in football, three in wrestling and two in track and field.
--NAME-- enjoyed an exceptional wrestling career at Kiski Area, as he finished his senior season as the state runner-up (215-pound division) with a 38-1 record. He went 79-2 his last two years and had a career mark of 109-10. His record of 41-1 as a junior was the winningest season ever by a Kiski wrestler. He advanced to the WPIAL track and field championships in the shot and discus. Academically, he was an Honor Roll and National Science Merit Award winner, along with being a member of the Pride Club, German Club and Wrestling Club.
As a true freshman at Pittsburgh, --NAME-- spent the 2004 season on the scout team. In 2005, he played in 11 games behind H.B. Blades at middle linebacker. He recorded 28 tackles (13 solos) with three quarterback pressures. He also added five tackles on the kickoff coverage unit. Six of his tackles came on third-down plays, with another on fourth-down action.
In 2006, --NAME-- again backed up Blades. He tallied 29 tackles (18 solos), a sack and two stops behind the line of scrimmage. He batted away two passes and posted a pressure. He led the Big East Conference with 18 special team tackles, totaling 14 of those hits on the kickoff coverage squad. Six of his stops came on fourth-down snaps, as he stopped opposing ball carriers three times for no gains on nine running plays directed at him.
The All-American and All-Big East Conference first-team selection led the NCAA Division 1-A ranks with a career-high 151 tackles (98 solos) in his first season as a starter in 2007. Most middle linebackers compile most of their tackles via assists, but --NAME--'s average of 8.17 solo tackles per game was the second-best average of any major college defender during his junior campaign.
--NAME-- had seven double-digit tackle performances. He added three hits on special teams, three sacks, nine stops for losses and three pressures. He recovered three fumbles and caused two others, as he deflected seven passes and had his first career interception.
--NAME--'s numbers were even more impressive when it was revealed that 27 of his stops came inside the red zone, including 12 on goal-line plays. He delivered 23 third-down tackles and eight more on fourth down. Even though he was dominant vs. the run, as teams averaged just 2.56 yards per carry vs. him, he was even more impressive in pass coverage. The opposition completed just 21 of 56 passes (37.5 percent) vs. him, averaging just 3.41 yards per pass attempt, the lowest figure of any Division 1-A linebacker in 2007.
As a senior, the Big East Conference Defensive Player of the Year and All-American choice led the league with 137 tackles (82 solos), adding four sacks, as his 17.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage was also a league-high mark. He picked off two passes, returning one for a touchdown and also deflected four tosses.
No injuries reported.
Attended Kiski Area (Export, Pa.) High School, playing football for head coach Dave Grimm Earned Associated Press Pennsylvania Class AAAA All-State first-team honors  Member of the Pittsburgh Post-Gazette "Fabulous 22" and Pittsburgh Tribune-Review "Terrific 25" teams, in addition to receiving Harrisburg Patriot-News "Platinum 33" and Valley News All-Star accolades Rated the 20th-best overall prospect in Pennsylvania by Rivals.com and rated the nation's 31st-best outside linebacker prospect by that recruiting service Rated the 24th-best prospect in Pennsylvania by Super Prep, as that service also named him to their All-Northeast team Added Prep Star All-East Region honors and was selected to play in the Big 33 Football Classic --NAME--'s 161 solo stops and 332 total tackles are Kiski Area High career-records As an outside linebacker and fullback, he recorded 132 tackles as a senior and rushed for 1,121 yards with 14 touchdowns over his final two seasons Led the team to three consecutive WPIAL Class AAAA playoff berths, earning three letters in football, three in wrestling and two in track and field Enjoyed an exceptional wrestling career at Kiski Area, as he finished his senior season as the state runner-up (215-pound division) with a 38-1 record Went 79-2 his last two years and had a career mark of 109-10 His record of 41-1 as a junior was the winningest season ever by a Kiski wrestler Advanced to the WPIAL track and field championships in the shot and discus Academically, he was an Honor Roll and National Science Merit Award winner, along with being a member of the Pride Club, German Club and Wrestling Club.
Productive, instinctual player who sorts through the trash to get to the ballcarrier, seems to have an innate sense of how and when to slide through oncoming blockers.   Very good backfield awareness, always seems to know where the ball is.   Recognizes tight ends going out on delayed routes.   Breaks down well in space and makes secure tackles in the open field.   Can get to the outside to meet the back at the edge.   Drops quickly and hustles to meet receivers in intermediate routes.   Gets a good hit on slot receivers to knock them off their route.   Knows where the sticks are and tries his best to keep underneath receivers from getting there.  
Only adequately developed in the upper and lower body.   Does not have great speed to chase plays from behind, but generally makes up for it by taking good angles.   Lacks physicality and runs around blocks instead of taking them on.   Unable to get off blocks when engaged and is more of a catcher than a hard-hitter or fierce tackler.   Is not explosive off the snap when blitzing.
ZACH THOMAS, Kansas City -- --NAME-- is slightly bigger than Thomas, but both rely on their field vision, intelligence and quickness to gain advantage on the blocker in order to compensate for a lack of ideal size. The Pitt linebacker is a classic knee bender who plays in good football position, as he always seems to be on his feet working through trash. He a smart playmaker who reacts decisively and can step up, stay square and take on/shed the bigger blockers with good force. He has that quick reactionary ability to fill holes and make plays in-line and even at his size, blockers struggle in attempts to contain him at the point of attack.
-------------------------
Jamon_Meredith 71397 162
One of the smartest offensive linemen in the Southeastern Conference, the fifth-year senior boasted a 3.74 grade-point average, receiving the school's Harold White Award for his academic excellence in 2008. As a sophomore, he was named the university's recipient of the Andrew Sorensen Scholar-Athlete Award for Football.
--NAME-- started 38 games during his career at South Carolina and had a string of 28 consecutive starts snapped heading into the 2008 campaign. He lined up at both tackle positions prior to shifting to left guard as a senior. That move was brought about so that he could mentor Georgia Military Institute transfer, Jarriel King, at --NAME--'s familiar left tackle slot.
--NAME-- was a standout strong-side defensive end at Hillcrest High School, where he lettered three times under the guidance of head coach Wayne Garrick. He earned All-League honors as a senior and received a two-star prospect rating from Rivals.com.
Despite a banner senior prep season, --NAME-- was lightly recruited by the colleges. Former South Carolina offensive line coach Dave DeGuglielmo saw that --NAME-- had great athleticism when he recruited him at Hillcrest, the high school that produced former USC and current Carolina Panthers offensive lineman Travelle Wharton. 
"He had that athletic ability like Wharton. He was long, he was lean and he was athletic," said DeGuglielmo, who is a coach with the Miami Dolphins. "He was low-key and had an even temperament -- and I liked that about him. I didn't want someone who was too excitable."
--NAME-- enrolled at South Carolina in 2004, spending most of the season acclimating to the right offensive tackle position on the scout team. He received his first collegiate game action in the seventh contest vs. Vanderbilt, but did not play the rest of the year.
In 2005, --NAME-- spent the first part of the season as a key reserve at both right and left tackle. He took over right tackle duties midway through the Arkansas clash, going on to start four games, including the Independence Bowl vs. Missouri. He finished the year with 34 knockdowns and six touchdown-resulting blocks, as the offense averaged 315.92 yards per game.
The following season, the Andrew Sorenson Scholar-Athlete Award winner started all 13 games. He started the first seven contests at right tackle and the final six on the left side, delivering 62 knockdowns for the campaign. He was named Southeastern Conference Offensive Lineman of the Week vs. Clemson, helping the Gamecocks improve their offense from a 100th-place ranking in 2005 to 20th in 2006 (395.0 yards per game).
As a junior, --NAME-- earned ESPN Academic All-District honors and was named his team's Outstanding Offensive Lineman. Starting all 12 games at left tackle, he made 75 knockdowns and twelve touchdown-resulting blocks. He allowed just three quarterback sacks on 443 pass plays and also recorded three solo tackles, along with recovering a fumble.
After sitting out the first two games of 2008, based on his agreement with the NCAA, --NAME-- returned to the lineup at left tackle vs. Georgia, but then spent the rest of the year at left guard. A right ankle sprain in fall camp affected his foot speed and balance, and was further compounded when he again injured it early in the Louisiana State game. He saw limited action the next two games, finishing with nine starts. He posted 48 knockdowns and five touchdown-resulting blocks, as both --NAME-- and USC struggled, with the offense ranking 97th nationally with an average of 316.54 yards per game.
2008: Suffered a right ankle sprain when a defender rolled on his leg during a scrimmage in fall camp (8/08).
Re-injured his right ankle and also suffered a slight left ankle sprain, missing most of the Louisiana State (10/18), Tennessee (11/01) and Arkansas (11/08) games before returning to the lineup.
Attended Hillcrest (Simpsonville, S.C.) High School, playing three seasons as a strong-side defensive end for head coach Wayne Garrick Earned All-League honors as a senior and received a two-star prospect rating from Rivals.com.
Good height with long arms and an athletic build, typical of top-tier left tackles. Adequate punch, and will extend his arms and get his hands on the numbers to keep defenders at bay. Gets to linebackers at the second level very well and hits the moving target. Able to adjust to oncoming defenders in space. Positions himself to seal the edge using quick feet and good hand placement. Can cut-block ends on his side to give the quarterback a lane on quick throws.
A bit slow to move his feet at times, relying on his length too much. Other times he drops back too far, allowing the end to twist inside untouched. Plays a bit tall in pass protection. Struggles to reach down to block to the guard when he doesn't explode from his stance. Could sustain blocks better in space.
-------------------------
Eugene_Monroe 71401 8
From a family of 16 children that included 10 brothers, --NAME-- and his siblings could have fielded a team of their own. 
--NAME-- overcame knee problems that slowed him during the 2006 and '07 seasons, and was one of the most dominating linemen in the college game during his final campaign. The Cavaliers struggled, but their offensive line leader excelled, producing 16 touchdown-resulting blocks for an offense that scored only 23 times in 2008.
Many scouting departments labeled --NAME-- as a certain early first-round draft selection, especially based on his 2008 performance and ability to remain healthy throughout his senior year. Many of those experts feel that his strength, technique and hand placement is superior to former Virginia first-round offensive linemen, D'Brickashaw Ferguson (New York Jets) and Branden Albert (Kansas City).
At Plainfield High School, --NAME-- was rated the best offensive lineman in the country by numerous recruiting services. The U.S. Army, USA Today, Parade, EA Sports and Super Prep All-American choice received a five-star prospect rating from both Scout.com and Rivals.com. He was the third-rated overall prospect, according to Rivals.com and Scout.com, and ranked second overall among high school football players, by College Football News.
The top-rated player of Super Prep's Elite 50 list, --NAME-- added Scout.com East Hot 100 list honors. He was named Super Prep's Northeast Offensive Player of the Year as a senior, adding top player in New Jersey recognition by Super Prep, Scout.com and Rivals.com. He was a first-team All-State pick by the Newark Star-Ledger as a senior and a first-team All-State selection as a junior. The offensive lineman did not allow any quarterback sacks during his final three seasons as a starter.
As a true freshman, --NAME-- appeared in 12 games for Virginia in 2005. He lined up mostly behind All-American D'Brickashaw Ferguson at left offensive tackle, but also saw action at right guard and on the placement-kick unit. He played briefly in two games as a defensive tackle in short-yardage situations, but did not record a tackle.
Primed to replace Ferguson at left tackle in 2006, --NAME-- suffered a dislocated kneecap in April camp and underwent surgery. He was slow to recover, but showed his "true warrior" attitude by playing in all 12 games, including six starts (seven total) at left tackle. He posted 39 knockdowns with eight touchdown-resulting blocks and graded 84.43% for blocking consistency (81.2% overall) in the contests he started while allowing just four quarterback pressures and no sacks on 345 pass plays.
--NAME-- missed two games in 2007 after injuring his knee late in the Georgia Tech clash, but still earned All-Atlantic Coast Conference recognition. He led the team with an 87.09% grade for blocking consistency, playing on a line that featured All-American offensive guard Branden Albert (Albert graded 83.5% in 2007). The left tackle registered 55 knockdowns and led ACC linemen with 15 touchdown-resulting blocks, as he did not allow any sacks and gave up just one pressure on 428 pass plays.
A consensus All-American and All-Atlantic Coast Conference preseason selection entering his senior season, --NAME-- was one of the few bright spots, as the Cavaliers struggled on offense throughout the 2008 campaign. He was the recipient of the Jacobs Blocking Trophy, the highest honor to be bestowed on an Atlantic Coast Conference lineman. He set school single-season records with 16 touchdown-resulting blocks and was the first Cavalier to register over 100 knockdowns/key blocks (105) in a season.
2005: Suffered a patella tendon strain in his left knee while practicing for an all-star game (1/11).
2006: Suffered a left kneecap dislocation during April camp (4/01), undergoing surgery on 4/07. He returned to practice by August camp, but was slow to recover until later in the season.
2007: Injured his knee late in the fourth quarter vs. Georgia Tech (9/24), sitting out the next two games vs. Pittsburgh and Middle Tennessee State.
Attended Plainfield (N.J.) High School, playing football for head coach Clinton Jones 
Rated the best offensive lineman in the country by numerous recruiting services U.S. Army, USA Today, Parade, EA Sports and Super Prep All-American choice Received a five-star prospect rating from both Scout.com and Rivals.com Rated third overall in the nation, according to Rivals.com and Scout.com Ranked second overall among high school football players, by College Football News Was the top-rated player on Super Prep's Elite 50 list Added Scout.com East Hot 100 list honors Named Super Prep's Northeast Offensive Player of the Year as a senior, adding top player in New Jersey recognition by Super Prep, Scout.com, and Rivals.com First-team All-State choice by the Newark Star-Ledger as a senior and a first-team All-State selection as a junior Did not allow any quarterback sacks during his final three seasons as a starter.
Prototypical left tackle build -- good height, long arms and a thick lower body. Good feet, and keeps them moving in pass protection to mirror his man. Rarely gets beat, handling bull rushes as well as most inside and outside moves with ease. Keeps his balance. Blocks down inside often to take defensive tackles out of the play. Able to neutralize linebackers at the second level. Shifts to tight end on some strong-side run plays in order to use his strength and athleticism. Blocks through the whistle, often blocking two or three jerseys on one play when on the move.
A bit bigger in the middle than you'd like. Tends to catch ends instead of using his punch to keep them off balance. Must improve his awareness of inside blitzers or late rushers when plays break down. Could get to second level or moving targets a little more quickly and sustain blocks better in the open field.
WALTER JONES, Seattle -- Both players are blessed with excellent athleticism and agility, along with the quick feet to mirror speedy edge rushers. --NAME-- is a solid run blocker, plays on his feet with very good balance and has excellent body control. He has the strength to gain position when working in-line and creates and widens rush lanes. He is capable of staying on his feet and sustaining blocks, using his hand strength well to lock on and control his man. He competes until the whistle and plays with good aggression. His field vision and awareness are evident by his ability to pick up line games and blitzes. His body control lets him readjust and deliver crunching blocks in the second level. With his fluid body flexibility, he has no problem sinking his hips and anchoring to protect the pocket. By remaining healthy as a senior, he has the athletic ability and pedigree to be the first offensive lineman taken in the 2009 NFL Draft.
-------------------------
Kyle_Moore 71403 117
--NAME-- was voted the team's most inspirational player last season.
Hampered by preseason knee problems and used mostly to contain the run, he still managed to break free from blockers to registered 9.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage, including a career-high five quarterback sacks as a senior.
At Houston County High School, --NAME-- earned USA Today, EA Sports, Super Prep, Parade and Pre Star All-American honors as a senior. He was a member of the Super Prep Elite 50, Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team, Student Sports Top 100, Rivals 100, Super Prep All-Dixie, Prep Star All-Southeast and Atlanta Journal-Constitution Super Southern 100 squads.
--NAME-- was also named the Georgia Class 5A Defensive Player of the Year. In his final season, he recorded 93 tackles, 22 sacks, 18 deflections, eight forced fumbles, two fumble recoveries and one blocked punt (for a touchdown) in 2004. As a junior in 2003, he made All-Middle Georgia, All-Region and All-County while getting 110 tackles, 23 tackles for loss and 15 sacks. 
--NAME-- was determined to play for an elite program and was used to the travel. Part of a military family, he was born in Germany and lived in Europe and Texas before moving to Georgia.
--NAME-- served as a reserve defensive end in his first year at Southern California, playing behind All-American strong-side end Lawrence Jackson in 2005. He suffered a right knee sprain in his collegiate debut vs. Hawaii, missing the next two games. He saw brief action in 11 games that campaign and while he recovered a pair of fumbles, he managed just six tackles (five solo).
--NAME-- shifted to right defensive end in 2006, but lost a fierce preseason battle with Brian Cushing for the starting position. He appeared in 13 games, collecting only five tackles (four solo) with a pass deflection.
With Lawrence Jackson having an All-American season on the strong side, --NAME-- helped give the Trojans matching bookends, starting 11 games at weak-side end in 2007. He played the bulk of the running downs and was spelled by Everson Griffen on obvious pass plays, but still produced 35 tackles (15 solo) that included a pair of sacks, a forced fumble and a fumble recovery. His long wing span proved to be a major problem for the opposition, as he not only batted down five passes at the line of scrimmage but pulled down two interceptions.
As a senior, --NAME-- garnered All-Pac-10 Conference honorable mention. He started every game at Jackson's old position (strong-side), collecting 30 tackles (16 solo). He made five sacks with 9.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage while deflecting two passes and also recovered a fumble as a 13-game starter.
2005: Suffered a right knee sprain vs. Hawaii (9/03), missing the nest two games vs. Arkansas (9/17) and Oregon (9/24).
2008: Limited in spring camp after undergoing right knee arthroscopic surgery.
Attended Houston County (Warner Robins, Ga.) High School, earning USA Today, EA Sports, Super Prep, Parade and Pre Star All-American honors as a senior Member of the Super Prep Elite 50, Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team, Student Sports Top 100, Rivals 100, Super Prep All-Dixie, Prep Star All-Southeast and Atlanta Journal-Constitution Super Southern 100 squads Named the Georgia Class 5A Defensive Player of the Year in his final season, as he recorded 93 tackles, 22 sacks, 18 deflections, eight forced fumbles, two fumble recoveries and one blocked punt (for a touchdown) in 2004 As a junior, he made All-Middle Georgia, All-Region and All-County while getting 110 tackles, 23 tackles for loss and 15 sacks.
Rare height and wingspan for the position. Flashes initial quickness off the snap to pressure the outside shoulder of offensive tackles. Good overall playing strength. Can get into the tackle's body with his long arms and bull rush. Stout at the point of attack when he plays with leverage.
Struggles with leverage and negates his own strength at times. Can get pushed back off the line when he plays too high. Needs to use his length more to disrupt passes. Doesn't bat enough passes down at the line of scrimmage. Arthroscopic knee surgery before the 2008 season that requires a medical check.
MARK ANDERSON, Chicago -- --NAME-- has a developing frame with an impressive wing span, but has put up just pedestrian numbers throughout his career. USC's attack is predicated on their linebackers making plays. --NAME-- did flash to get on the edge of a blocker and outrun the play. He needs technique refinement, as he gets too tall in his stance, negating any leverage. Inconsistency at the college level will cost him on draft day.
-------------------------
William_Moore 71405 55
--NAME-- has been used to changes in his football life. He was a standout prep receiver who converted to cornerback upon his arrival at Missouri. But, as his body continued to grow, he was shifted to free safety, a position he would go on to record 32 career starts. 
With his professional career about to begin, some teams are now looking at his 220-plus pound frame and ball-hawking skills as a potential strong safety. Other teams are also eyeing him as a potential outside linebacker candidate, likening him to Houston's Cato June, a former safety who shifted to linebacker in the Cover-2 defensive scheme.
All --NAME-- asks for is an opportunity. Much like the opportunity he takes when he picks off a pass. With his receiver-like hands and quickness, he converted four of his 11 career interceptions into touchdowns, breaking the school career record of three scoring returns by Erik McMillan (1984-87). His hitting ability also rank with the Missouri elite, as his 284 tackles placed him fourth among all-time Tiger defensive backs.
At Hayti High School, --NAME-- was rated the 64th-best receiver in the country and the 12th-best overall prospect in the state of Missouri by Rivals.com. He earned All-State honors on both sides of the ball during his career, leading his team to three consecutive conference titles before finishing second the Class 2A ranks during his junior campaign.
--NAME-- set the school career records with 74 catches for 1,768 yards and 34 touchdowns receiving. His 35 total career scores ranks him fifth on Hayti's scoring chart. In addition to earning four letters in football, he also competed four seasons on the school's basketball team. He added team MVP and All-Conference honors on the hardwood as a junior.
--NAME-- enrolled at the University of Missouri in 2004, turning down scholarship offers from Oklahoma, Purdue, Mississippi, Arkansas and Illinois, among others. He redshirted that season, competing on the scout team as a cornerback, but was shifted to free safety the following season. Wearing jersey Number 21, he started two of nine games he played in, missing three early-season contests with a hamstring injury. He totaled 30 tackles (23 solos) with a forced fumble and returned his first career interception 62 yards for a touchdown.
While starting the 2005 Independence Bowl, --NAME-- suffered right foot fracture on the game's opening series, but continued to play with the injury for the entire first quarter. He would be limited in 2006 spring drills, but was fully recovered by August camp, going on to start five of 13 games at free safety as a sophomore. He posted 51 tackles (33 solos) and continued to find the end zone, returning his only interception 22 yards for a score.
--NAME-- changed jerseys from Number 21 to Number 1 as a junior and had perhaps one of the finest seasons ever by a Missouri defensive back. His 117 tackles (71 solos) rank fifth on the school single-season record list for secondary players, as he also had two sacks and nine stops for loss. He broke up six passes and set the Tigers' single-season record with eight pass thefts, returning one for a touchdown. That performance earned him All-American and All-Big 12 Conference first-team honors.
The preseason favorite to capture 2008 Thorpe Award (nation's top defensive back) honors, --NAME-- did earn semifinalist status, but struggled through an injury-plagued final campaign. He suffered a foot sprain in the season opener vs. Illinois and was never 100 percent healthy the rest of the year. He missed two full games and parts of two others. He was also still recovering from offseason shoulder surgery, as it was discovered after the Cotton Bowl that he had torn his labrum, requiring January surgery. Later in the '08 schedule, he suffered rib cartilage damage vs. Oklahoma.
Through all his injuries, --NAME-- still managed to register 86 tackles (55 solos), good for fourth on the team. He had one sack and 6.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage, as he also caused three fumbles. He also returned an interception for a touchdown and had six pass deflections.
2005: Sat out the New Mexico (9/10), Troy (9/17) and Texas (10/01) games after suffering a hamstring strain in the season opener vs. Arkansas (9/03) Played the entire Independence Bowl vs. South Carolina (12/30) despite suffering a broken bone in his right foot in the opening series of the game Underwent surgery to have a screw inserted in his foot, sitting out the bulk of 2006 spring camp.
2008: Did not participate in spring drills due to offseason shoulder surgery he had following the Cotton Bowl to repair a torn labrum in a shoulder he suffered in the bowl game while he was winning the game's defensive MVP award. He didn't actually know about the injury until after he returned to campus for second semester classes, when he had continuing pain in shoulder during winter weight-lifting sessions. After examination, the injury was discovered.
Sprained his foot late in the season opener vs. Illinois (8/30), missing the next game vs. Southeast Missouri (9/06) Re-injured his foot vs. Nevada (9/13), sitting out the Buffalo clash (9/20) Played in the Oklahoma game (12/06) with hurt ribs but still managed to record four tackles. According to coach Gary Pinkel, he pulled cartilage in his ribs in the Wednesday practice leading up to the game. He tried to play in the game, and he came out fast with two tackles on the Sooners' first possession. The medical staff ended up making the decision that --NAME-- could not finish the game.
Attended Hayti (Mo.) High School, playing football for head coach Jerry Bethune Rated the 64th-best receiver in the country and the 12th-best overall prospect in the state of Missouri by Rivals.com Earned All-State honors on both sides of the ball during his career, leading his team to three consecutive conference titles before finishing second the Class 2A ranks during his junior campaign Set the school career records with 74 catches for 1,768 yards and 34 touchdowns receiving His 35 total career scores ranks him fifth on Hayti's scoring chart In addition to earning four letters in football, he also competed four seasons on the school's basketball team Added team MVP and All-Conference honors on the hardwood as a junior.
Well-built athlete with a prototypical blend of size, speed and instincts.   Fast and agile enough to be a true centerfielder in coverage, as well as possessing the explosiveness to be an intimidating hitter over the middle.   Reliable open-field tackler -- has rare body control to break down in space and make the reliable tackle.   Reads the quarterback's eyes and can close on the ball.   Led the Big 12 and broke the school single-season record with eight interceptions in 2007.   Has a history of turning INTs into TDs, with four of his 11 career picks returned for scores.   Showed his toughness by playing through a torn labrum for much of the 2007 season.   Experienced at both safety positions.   Dynamic athlete who should improve as he gains more experience.
Flashes explosiveness as a hitter, but is too inconsistent in this area.   Leads with his shoulder to create the sensational hit, but doesn't wrap up effectively.   Too often resorts to shoestring tackles that were effective at the college level, but could be high-stepped through by better athletes.   Dynamic athlete whose aggression and inexperience can get him in trouble while in coverage.   Willing to gamble and can be beaten over the top with an effective double-move.   Was not the same player in 2008 that flashed in 2007, prompting some concerns that he could be a bit of a one-year wonder.   Sat out spring drills recovering from surgery to repair a torn labrum.
-------------------------
Thomas_Morstead 71407 164
One of college football's hidden gems, --NAME-- might not have gotten the media attention of other kicking specialists, but professional teams are certainly aware of his ability. Few specialists have the ability to be equally effective in multiple roles, but the SMU Mustang has proven that no task is too daunting. 
--NAME-- did not begin kicking for the Mustangs until the 2006 season, but he ranks fifth in school history with 217 points scored, just behind some of the program's elite players in football annals - Doak Walker, Eric Dickerson, Eddie Garcia and Reggie Dupard. His 78 consecutive extra points made set a school record and his 2007 extra point percentage of 100.0 is a Conference USA mark. He ranks second on the league single-game record chart with a 55.6-yard average punting vs. North Texas in 2007 and his 43.4-yard career average is good for third in C-USA annals.
At Pearland High School, --NAME-- received second-team All-District honors and was named Brazoria County Special Teams MVP as a senior, handling all kicking chores. He also lettered in soccer and was a member of the National Honor Society, adding Academic All-State honors.
--NAME-- decided to enroll at Southern Methodist in 2004, turning down scholarship offers from Texas Christian, Rice, Texas and Missouri, but spent the season as a redshirt. He was a member of the Conference USA's Academic Honor Roll in 2005, but never appeared in a game.
--NAME-- took over place-kicking and punting chores in 2006, earning All-Conference USA third-team honors. He led the league and ranked 15th in the nation in punting, averaging 43.82 yards on 50 attempts, the best average by an SMU punter since Craig James averaged 44.9 yards in 1982. He made 13 of 18 field goals and 34 of 35 extra points for a total of 73 points, as he also recorded one solo tackle.
As a sophomore --NAME-- was a consensus All-Conference USA first-team pick and also gained league academic honors. He again led C-USA and finished eighth nationally with a 44.65-yard average, as the Mustangs also ranked fourth in the NCAA with a 39.33-yard net average. He scored 82 points and set the league single-season record by making all 43 PAT attempts, as he also connected on 13 of 20 field goals.
--NAME-- concentrated more on directional punting in 2008. The All-Conference USA honorable mention averaged a career-low 41.78 yards on 59 punts, but only 19 were returned, as the Mustangs placed third in the league with a 37.22-yard net average. He made 11 of 15 field goals, 29 of 30 extra points and amassed 62 points.
No injuries reported.
Attended Pearland (Texas) High School Received second-team All-District honors and was named Brazoria County Special Teams MVP as a senior, handling all kicking chores Also lettered in soccer and was a member of the National Honor Society, adding Academic All-State honors.
Tall, with an adequate build and long legs.   Good extension on field goal attempts.   Uses his height to bring in high snaps (may have issues with lower snaps).   Has a quick two-step delivery as a punter (about 1.25 seconds) and kicks the ball at a low position, but still gets 4.7-4.8 seconds of hang-time on 40-yard punts.   Adept placing the ball inside the 10-yard line.   Has the size and speed to be an effective last line of defense covering punts.   Improved his accuracy as a kicker in 2008, making 5-of-6 from 40-49 yards. Made 3-of-4 FGAs from 50-plus yards in 2007 and didn't attempt a kick from that distance in '08.
Does not turn the ball over enough in his full-length punts.   Has not been a kickoff specialist, but may be tried there due to his leg strength.   Must prove himself as a holder if not used as a kicker.   Missed three kicks inside of 40 yards in 2008, four in both 2006 and 2007.
-------------------------
Shawn_Nelson 71413 121
The tall, lanky receiver developed into the Golden Eagles' best pass catcher during his time with the team, but also showed impressive blocking technique, averaging 45 knockdowns per season during his career. He also proved to be a clutch pass catcher, scoring 16 times on 155 receptions, the second-highest total by a USM player. 
--NAME--'s 16 scores placed fourth on the school's all-time record list while his 2,038 receiving yards rank third. His catches and yards gained receiving rank second in Conference USA annals among the league's tight ends, while his 16 scores tied for third.
At East Ascension High School, --NAME-- helped lead the team to a 10-3 record and the tri-district championship (7-4A) in 2003, serving as team captain during his final campaign. 
He was named to the Louisiana Football Coaches Association All-State team, adding All-District accolades. He also earned Max Emfinger's Blue Chip Recruiting Louisiana High School Football Super Team All-State honors and received a four-star rating by that recruiting service.
Recruited by Indiana, Mississippi State, Louisiana Tech and Tulane, --NAME-- enrolled at Southern Mississippi, spending the 2004 season performing on the scout team as a tight end while adding bulk to his 215-pound frame. The following season, he appeared in 12 games, starting the final 11 contests. The Gridiron Report Freshman All-Conference USA pick led the team with 35 receptions for 540 yards (15.4 avg) and five touchdowns. His 35 catches were the most by a freshman tight end in a season at USM.
After emerging in 2005, --NAME-- continued his progression the following year. In addition to leading the team in receptions for the second consecutive season, he was a valuable contributor on special teams. He totaled 36 receptions, good for 506 yards (14.1 avg) with three touchdowns. 
--NAME-- also registered four tackles (2 solos). What made his receiving totals even more impressive was the fact that he played most of the second half of the season with a broken bone in his right hand. He was also suspended for the first half of the Houston game for a curfew violation.
As a junior, --NAME-- started 12 of the 13 games he played in. He had 33 catches for 451 yards (13.7 avg) and five scores, ranking second on the squad. He also delivered eight touchdown-resulting blocks for the ground game and posted six tackles (3 solos) for the coverage units.
--NAME-- garnered All-Conference USA accolades in 2008. He ranked second on the team, third in the league and ninth in the nation among tight ends with a career-high 53 catches for 557 yards (10.5 avg) and three touchdowns while starting 12 contests. His 53 grabs set a school single-season record for tight ends and tied for fifth overall. 
After the season, he joined John Sawyer (1975) as the only USM tight ends to be selected to play in the Senior Bowl (--NAME-- missed the game with a hamstring injury) and became just the third Golden Eagles tight end to be selected to play in a postseason all-star game (Marvin Harvey was in the 1980 Blue-Gray Game).
2006: Originally suffered an ankle sprain during a 10/07 practice and re-injured it in the Tulane game (11/11) Suffered a broken bone in his right hand two days before the Tulsa clash (10/03).
2009: Had to pull out of the Senior Bowl after he tweaked a hamstring earlier in the week during practices.
Attended East Ascension (Gonzales, La.) High School, playing football for head coach Bill Beasley Helped lead the team to a 10-3 record and the tri-district championship (7-4A) in 2003, serving as team captain during his final campaign Named to the Louisiana Football Coaches Association All-State team, adding All-District accolades Also earned Max Emfinger's Blue Chip Recruiting Louisiana High School Football Super Team All-State honors and received a four-star rating by that recruiting service.
Long, lean, athletic frame capable of handling additional mass without a significant loss of quickness. Good initial quickness off the snap. Good body control and lateral agility to dip and avoid the jam at the line of scrimmage to gain a quick release into his route. At least adequate straight-line speed to challenge the seam. Can sink his hips and shows some burst out of his breaks to gain separation. Flashes the ability to snatch the ball out of the air and contort his body to make the difficult reception. Versatile athlete who lines up out of the three-point stance and in the slot. Good effort as an in-line blocker, though he needs to add strength in this area.
Lacks the bulk at this time to compete as an in-line blocker. Struggles as a drive blocker and laterally due to a lack of upper body strength. Inconsistent burst out of his breaks as a route-runner. Prone to concentration lapses and will drop easy passes. Lacks the agility in the open field to consistently make defenders miss. Marginal ability to track the ball over his shoulder. In many ways, seems to be the same player as a senior he was a freshman, leading scouts to question if he is either maxed out or lacks the drive to improve.
TONY SCHEFFLER, Denver -- Like Scheffler, --NAME-- is best served lined wide or in motion than when asked to work in-line. He has just adequate strength, which prevents him from being much of a blocker at the line of scrimmage. He shows very good open-field acceleration and works back to the ball well, but does struggle tracking the deep throws, especially those over his outside shoulder. He is the type that you will need to compensate by having a physical blocker to share positional duties.
-------------------------
Troy_Nolan 71415 223
--NAME-- was forced to redshirt in 2006 after suffering a knee injury in only his third practice with the Sun Devils. Returned to the field in 2007, when he left little doubt about his athleticism, starting all 13 games and leading the team with six interceptions -- two of which he returned for a touchdown. --NAME--'s propensity for making the big play showed up again in 2008, as he picked off another four passes and returned two of them (along with a fumble) to give him five defensive touchdowns in only two seasons of Pac-10 play. If he can improve on his marginal 40 time, --NAME-- could emerge as one of the hotter safety prospects in this draft.
A 2005 graduate of the College of the Canyons in Santa Clara, Calif Named All-Western States Conference first-team on defense in 2005 Led College of the Canyons to the National Championship, the Western States Conference Championship and the California State Championship in 2004 Also led the College of the Canyons to the Western States Conference Championship in 2005 Coached by Chuck Lyon.
Graduated from El Camino Real High School in Woodland Hills, Calif named first-team All-West Valley Conference on defense in 2003 and second-team on offense was the Most Valuable Player of the West Valley Conference in 2003 named second-team All-West Valley Conference on defense in 2003 and first-team on offense named the El Camino Real High defensive Player of the Year in football in 2003 captained the football team in 2003 lettered in football, basketball, track and field and soccer.
Good size.   Standout player both years of Pac-10 competition.   Ball hawk at free safety.   Willing to bait quarterbacks and can make the big play.   Reads the quarterback's eyes and gets a good break on the ball.   Better field speed than timed speed in coverage.   Can time his leaps.   Good hands for the interception.   Good agility to avoid blocks and come up to support the run.   Heavy hitter willing to throw his body into the pile.
Has to prove the straight-line speed to be effective as a free safety in the NFL.   Despite size, ducks his head too often when taking on blocks and can lose track of the ball.   Overaggressive.   Can put his defense in a tough position by overrunning the action.   Takes questionable angles to the ball.   Medical check on 2006 knee injury.
-------------------------
Michael_Oher 71419 23
The subject of the New York Times bestseller by --NAME-- Lewis, "The Blind Side: The Evolution of a Game," --NAME-- has been the anchor of the Rebels' offensive line since being inserted into the starting lineup after the second game of his freshman season. He lined up at right offensive guard during his first season at Mississippi before shifting to the demanding left tackle position as a sophomore. He would end his career with the third-best active consecutive starts string (47) among Southeastern Conference players.
Received more national attention as a senior, as the Southeastern Conference's Jacobs Blocking Trophy recipient, the honor going to the league's top offensive linemen. Behind --NAME--'s drive blocking, the Rebels improved from ranking 84th in the nation in rushing (131.5 yards per game) to 28th (second in the SEC) in 2008 (186.46 yards per game).
New coach Houston Nutt was very confident in putting young quarterback Javon Snead on the field, knowing that --NAME-- would help protect his passer's blind side. Ole Miss let its left tackle carry them to a 2009 Cotton Bowl victory, as the 2008 squad went from being the 91st-ranked offense in the nation (345.25 yards per game) in 2007 to 29th overall and third in the SEC with an average of 407.62 yards per game in '08.
--NAME-- was regarded as one of the finest offensive linemen in the nation at Briarcrest Christian School. The EA Sports and USA Today All-American choice was a member of the 2005 Tennessee Athletic Coaches Association All-Star team selected to compete against the Kentucky prep all-stars. He also competed in the U.S. Army All-America Bowl in San Antonio, Texas, and was named to Rivals.com's All-American Bowl All-Time Team.
--NAME-- was picked by Tom Lemming/ESPN as the nation's top offensive tackle and named to the Super Prep All-America team (ranked Number 24 among offensive linemen by that service), which also had him on its Dixie Team. He was rated the fifth-best offensive lineman in the country and eighth-best overall prospect in the South by Scout.com, as well picking up first-team All-American recognition.
--NAME-- was named the best player in the state of Tennessee by the Knoxville News-Sentinel and rated the second-best player in the South by the Mobile Register as a member of its Super Southeast 120 squad. He was named to the Atlanta Journal-Constitution Super Southern 100 and chosen Tennessee "Mr. Football" and Offensive Lineman of the Year.
As a senior, the first-team All-South selection by Fox Sports and the Orlando Sentinel was credited with 130 knockdown blocks, grading over 90% for blocking consistency, as he did not allow a quarterback sack. As a junior, he posted 83 knockdowns and graded 85%, helping lead Briarcrest to a 10-3 record and 2004 state championship.
In addition to earning two letters in football, --NAME-- also lettered twice in both basketball and track. The basketball team went 27-6 in 2004, winning the district championship, as --NAME-- averaged 22 points and 10 rebounds per game, earning All-State honors as well as making the Sun Coast All-Tourney team. In track, he was state runner-up in the discus.
Heavily recruited by many major colleges, --NAME-- enrolled at Mississippi in 2005. He moved into the starting lineup in the second game of the season, starting the final 10 contests at right offensive guard. He produced 64 knockdowns, a remarkable total for a team that managed to average only 73.27 yards per game rushing, as the ground attack produced just six touchdowns for the season. For his performance, he was selected Freshman All-American first-team by Rivals.com and The Sporting News.
--NAME-- was named All-Southeastern Conference second-team as a sophomore. He shifted to left offensive tackle in 2006, delivering 83 knockdowns while clearing the way for BenJarvus Green-Ellis to become just the third player in school history to rush for over 1,000 yards in a season.
Rated the third-best offensive tackle in college football by Lindy's magazine in 2007, --NAME-- received All-American fourth-team accolades. He started all 12 games at left tackle, coming up with 99 knockdowns that included 12 touchdown-resulting blocks, including each of the team's eight rushing scores. Green-Ellis gained more than 70% of his 1,137 yards rushing (second-best season total by an Ole Miss player) running behind --NAME--.
--NAME-- contemplated leaving school after his junior year. He originally applied for inclusion in the 2008 NFL Draft, but two days after announcing his intention to leave, the left tackle had a change of heart and withdrew his application. "While I felt good about being projected as a possible first-round pick and had everybody in my corner, it just kept coming back to me that I was leaving some unfinished business at Ole Miss," --NAME-- said. "It's really about winning more games and going to a bowl game. I wanted to be a part of making that happen."
--NAME-- worked hard in the offseason, greatly improving his overall strength and increased his bench press by over 70 pounds. He was a consensus All-American and unanimous All-Southeastern Conference first-team pick. The team captain won the Jacobs Blocking Trophy and was one of three finalists for the Outland Trophy, given to the nation's top blocker. He was also one of three finalists for the Conerly Trophy, given to the state of Mississippi's top collegiate player. He led the SEC blockers with an 87.77% grade for blocking consistency, en route to producing 99 knockdowns with a league-high seventeen touchdown-resulting blocks.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Briarcrest Christian (Memphis, Tenn.) School, playing football as a junior and senior for head coach Hugh Freeze EA Sports and USA Today All-American choice Member of the 2005 Tennessee Athletic Coaches Association All-Star team selected to compete against the Kentucky prep all-stars Also competed in the U.S. Army All-America Bowl in San Antonio, Texas and was named to Rivals.com's All-American Bowl All-Time Team Picked by Tom Lemming/ESPN as the nation's top offensive tackle and named to the Super Prep All-American team (ranked Number 24 among offensive linemen by that recruiting publication), which also had him on its Dixie Team Rated the fifth-best offensive lineman in the country and eighth-best overall prospect in the South by Scout.com, as well picking up first-team All-American recognition Named the best player in the state of Tennessee by the Knoxville News-Sentinel and rated the second-best player in the South by the Mobile Register as a member of its Super Southeast 120 squad Was named to the Atlanta Journal-Constitution Super Southern 100 and chosen Tennessee "Mr. Football" and Offensive Lineman of the Year As a senior, the first-team All-South selection by Fox Sports and the Orlando Sentinel was credited with 130 knockdown blocks, grading over 90% for blocking consistency, as he did not allow any quarterback sacks As a junior, he posted 83 knockdowns and graded 85%, helping lead Briarcrest to a 10-3 record and 2004 state championship .Earned two letters each in football, track and basketball The basketball team went 27-6 in 2004, winning the district championship, as --NAME-- averaged 22 points and 10 rebounds per game, earning All-State honors as well as making the Sun Coast All-Tourney team In track, he was state runner-up in the discus.
Prototypical left tackle build. Has good height and excellent athleticism. Unlike some left tackles, he has girth in his lower body. Uses his long arms to his greatest advantage, locking onto the jersey to nullify the pass rush of defensive ends. Gets into his pass set quickly and has very good lateral movement. Not fooled by dancing on the line. Shows the feet to pull inside, get to either shoulder to position block and nullify linebackers outside on screen passes. Sustains and mirrors as long as possible and will play through the whistle. Improved as a run blocker as a senior. Began to play with more aggression and physicality at the second level. An ascending talent who should only get better. Has gained experience as a celebrity due to the success of best-selling novel, "The Blind Side" and is potentially better prepared for the glamour of being a high pick.
Only has three years experience at left tackle and is still learning the game. A better pass protector than power run blocker, as he does not consistently get great push off the edge. Needs more consistency in using his punch, which can be devastating against rush ends. Can be beaten in pass protection by quicker hands. Loses balance at times when lunging in pass pro. A bit tentative in the open field at times. Gets a bit lazy moving his feet when the play is run away from him and could stand to gain more stamina. Does not always adjust to outside blitzes, but handles inside pressure just fine. Has a very quiet, passive demeanor that some may characterize as lacking passion. Some concerns about how he'll acclimate to a new environment if he's drafted by a team geographically distant from his adopted family.
-------------------------
Brian_Orakpo 71423 13
--NAME--, a product of the Texas training program, came to the university as a lanky basketball player, but is leaving the school as a rock-solid defensive end. 
He worked his way up the depth chart to earn a starting job as a junior. Despite lost time in each of his last two years due to knee injuries, he filled his mantelpiece this winter, capturing Big Twelve Conference Defensive Player of the Year honors. He also claimed the Lombardi Award (best lineman), Nagurski Trophy (best defensive player) and Hendricks Award (best defensive end). 
When --NAME-- arrived on campus as a freshman, he weighed 210 pounds. He has added over 50 pounds of muscle to his frame, yet still maintains a body fat level of just eight percent. Teammate and fellow defensive lineman Roy Miller says that --NAME-- transformed from Steve Urkel into Arnold Schwarzenegger over the past five years. One of the strongest members of the team, he was named the nation's top workout warrior by ESPN. In a recent workout exhibition, he bench pressed 515 pounds, with a 600-pound squat and a 380-pound power clean.
At Lamar High School, --NAME-- lettered three times in football as a defensive end. He was a two-time first-team All-District selection and helped his team to a 29-8 mark in those three seasons. He also saw action at tight end. In his final season, he was tabbed second-team All-Greater Houston and All-District 18-5A, despite missing one-third of his year with an injury.
--NAME-- managed to register 36 tackles, nine quarterback sacks and 12 stops for loss in 2003, helping the team compile an 11-2 record to reach the state quarterfinals. As a junior, the All-District and All-Greater Houston choice was credited with 10 sacks as his team went to the regional finals. He also lettered in basketball during his freshman through junior years.
--NAME-- suited up for the first two games of the 2004 season for Texas, but the coaches decided it was best to redshirt their lanky first-year player. The following season, he appeared in 13 games, starting the Baylor clash at "quick" defensive end, a position manned by --NAME-- Robison. --NAME-- posted 19 tackles (11 solo) with a sack, three stops for losses and nine pressures in 2005.
Robison still held on to the defensive end job in 2006, but eventually shared time with --NAME--. An intense offseason weight-training program helped --NAME-- return to fall drills as a 248-pounder. He started vs. Ohio State and played in reserve the rest of the season, but registered 17 tackles (13 solo) to go with five sacks and five pressures.
With both starting ends having departed, --NAME-- laid claim to the quick end position, starting eight of the nine games he appeared in. A right knee sprain vs. Arkansas State sidelined the junior for four contests. He would collect 27 tackles (19 solos) to go with 5.5 sacks and seven pressures, but the best was yet to come.
The consensus All-American ranked sixth in the nation with 11.5 sacks, as Texas paced the NCAA in that category, as the defense averaged 3.62 sacks per game. He delivered 40 tackles (32 solo) with 17.5 stops for losses and 15 pressures in 12 games, sitting out vs. Baylor after spraining his left knee in the third quarter vs. Texas Tech, doing what he does best -- chasing down the quarterback.
2007: Suffered a right knee sprain in the season opener vs. Arkansas State (9/01), missing the next four contests vs. Texas-El Paso, Rice, Arkansas and Colorado.
2008: Left the Texas Tech game (11/01) in the third quarter with a left knee sprain, sitting out the next game vs. Baylor and only appeared for a handful of plays vs. Kansas (11/15).
2009: Could not complete the agility tests at the NFL Combine due to a hamstring strain.
Attended Lamar (Houston, Tex.) High School, playing football for head coach Tom Nolan Lettered three times in football as a defensive end Two-time first-team All-District choice and helped his team to a 29-8 mark in those three seasons Also saw action at tight end  In his final season, he was tabbed second-team All-Greater Houston and All-District 18-5A, despite missing one-third of his year with an injury Still managed to register 36 tackles, nine quarterback sacks and 12 stops for losses in 2003, helping the team compile an 11-2 record to reach the state quarterfinals As a junior, the All-District and All-Greater Houston choice was credited with 10 sacks as his team went to the regional finals Also lettered in basketball during his freshman through junior years Honor Roll student, graduating with a 3.0 grade point average.
Good height and upper-body build. Plays with his hand down and can also stand up. Easily gets off blocks from tackles to make a play in the hole. Can also hold his ground well against larger tackles. Has good backfield awareness, watching for misdirection, cutbacks and bootlegs. Closes on the quarterback well and secures the tackle. Shows adequate fluidity dropping on zone blitzes to handle short-area zone coverage as a 3-4 rush linebacker.
Might need to play on the strong side in the pros because he lacks great explosion and pass rush off the edge. Can be easily pushed around the pocket if he tries to use an outside speed move. Gets sacks from hustle and effort. Does not always change direction quickly enough to make the play on the outside. Needs to use his punch more often to get tackles off balance on the pass rush. Durability concern. Missed multiple games due to knee injuries in both 2007 and '08 -- his two seasons as a starter.
LEONARD LITTLE, St. Louis -- Don't get fooled by all the awards he won in 2008, as Texas did a great job of publicizing him with "padded" statistics (they claimed he recorded 30 pressures in 2008, but the NCAA recognized just 15; his profile reports 62 pressures for his career, but verified totals are 36). Still, he is a quality edge rusher that some teams are looking at as a potential linebacker, but whether he has the range to play there is a big question. Use him as a rush end, much like the Rams do with Little, and he will get a good piece of the quarterback. Put him in a stand-up position and you run the risk of seeing him struggle like former Houston Texan Jason Babin.
-------------------------
Brandon_Pettigrew 71431 20
Regarded by many as the most complete tight end in the 2009 NFL Draft, --NAME-- has not only proven to be a clutch short-area receiver, but an outstanding blocker. A physical open-field runner, he has gained more than 40 percent of his yardage after the catch. He has also shown his pedigree as a pass catcher, becoming the first tight end in school history to amass more than 100 receptions (112) in a career.
Playing for a team known more for its running game, --NAME-- is likely to become just the second tight end in school history to hear his name called in the first round of the draft, joining Reuben Gant (1974, Buffalo).
Playing in the Big 12 Conference, a league that has produced numerous NFL tight ends, many opposing coaches agree that --NAME-- is that rare breed with unlimited potential, regarding him as the best product to play that position since the league expanded from eight teams in 1996. Ranked ninth overall on the school's receiving yardage record list with 1,450, --NAME-- averaged more than 54 knockdown blocks per season for the Cowboys. 
--NAME-- was one of three players from Robert E. Lee High School to earn All-State honors in 2003. Despite playing primarily as a blocker, he was rated as the best tight end in Texas by numerous recruiting services. The All-District and All-East Texas choice also competed on the defensive line.
--NAME-- enrolled at Oklahoma State in 2004, spending the season as a red-shirt after turning down offers from Texas A&M, Texas Christian, Southern Methodist and Arkansas.
In 2005, he started nine games, including the last seven, for the Cowboys. He gained 128 yards with a touchdown on 11 catches (11.6 avg). He delivered 30 knockdowns and also recorded a solo tackle.
The following season, --NAME-- was firmly entrenched as the team's starting tight end, leading the squad with eight touchdown-resulting blocks. He finished third on the team with 24 receptions, gaining 310 yards (12.9 avg) with four touchdowns. He also excelled on special teams, recording six tackles (3 solos) and recovered a fumble.
As a junior, --NAME-- captured All-Big 12 Conference honors. He was credited 540 yards and four scores on 35 receptions (15.4 avg), third-best on the team. He paced the league's tight ends with 10 touchdown-resulting blocks and also made a solo tackle.
Off-field issues occupied most of --NAME--'s 2008 spring and summer, and he was further hampered by a high ankle sprain early in the campaign that would sideline him for three games. He was still named a finalist for the Mackey Award, given to the nation's top tight end. He snared a career-high 42 passes, ranking second on the squad. He totaled 472 yards (11.2 avg) with four touchdowns, as he posted 43 knockdowns and two solo tackles, but failed to score for the first time during his collegiate career.
With professional scouts regularly visiting Oklahoma State leading up to the draft, OSU tight ends coach Doug Meacham noted, "--NAME-- is a classic tight end. In the era of increasingly athletic players and spread offenses, the college tight end has become more of an oversized receiver. But not in Stillwater, where even in the spread, they run the ball nearly 50 times a game. In today's game, you see a lot of tight ends that split out a majority of the time. --NAME-- can go down inside and grind with the best of 'em, then he can get out and mismatch linebackers or safeties. He's an every-down guy.
"Once last season, --NAME-- came to the sidelines begging his coaches to call a play to his side of the field. A running play. That's what makes him special. Plenty of tight ends will beg for the ball, trying to get their receiving numbers up. But --NAME-- wants to win, whether he's scoring touchdowns or opening holes for others to score them."
Oklahoma State offensive coordinator Trooper Taylor said, "With his 6-foot-6, 265-pound frame, athletic ability and soft hands, --NAME-- would have a future in the NFL. His brutally physical blocking makes him a likely first-round draft choice. I've had tight ends that like to catch and not block, and ones that could block, but couldn't catch. But I've never had the combination like this. Whatever NFL team takes him is going to have them a special gem."
2006: Suffered a left leg contusion/ankle sprain vs. Missouri State (9/02).
2007: Suffered a hip bruise when he needlessly dived after scoring the game-winning touchdown vs. Texas Tech (9/22) and limped off the field.
2008: Saw minimal action vs. Missouri State (9/13) and sat out the Troy (9/27), Texas A&M (10/04) and Missouri (10/11) contests with a high ankle sprain.
Attended Robert E. Lee (Tyler, Texas) High School, earning All-State honors in 2003  Despite playing primarily as a blocker, he was rated as the best tight end in Texas by numerous recruiting services The All-District and All-East Texas choice also competed on the defensive line.
Prototype size for the position. Good overall musculature, yet has the frame to add additional mass. Physical and determined as a run blocker. Good initial pop and has the lateral quickness and upper body strength to sustain his blocks. Seems to enjoy the physical nature of blocking. Presents a large target to the quarterback and has strong, secure hands. Looks the pass in and quickly turns upfield to generate positive yardage after the catch. A mismatch for defenders due to his size and athleticism. Bullish runner who will drag defenders for extra yardage.
Remains a bit raw in his technique considering he has started four years. Relies on his size and advantage in athleticism to get a clean release from the line of scrimmage and gain separation from defenders as a route-runner. Struggled with an ankle injury in 2008, failing to capitalize on his opportunity to break out as a senior. Held without a touchdown in 2008. Arrested for a felony charge of assault and battery of a police officer outside of a Stillwater, Okla. party on Jan. 20, 2008. He pleaded guilty to a lesser charge and was sentenced to one year of probation. It appears to have been an isolated incident.
JIMMY KLEINSASSER, Minnesota -- --NAME-- towers over Kleinsasser, but both are regarded as outstanding blockers with underrated short-area receiving skills. The OSU product does not have the speed to rank with the elite pass catchers, but few show the power blocking skills that he brings to the table. He has also shown he is a good chain mover in the short-yardage passing game. He will never be a Tony Gonzalez-type of receiver, but will bring some value catching underneath. But, his true value lies in the hardware he brings blocking for the ground game.
-------------------------
Jason_Phillips 71433 137
--NAME-- has been the anchor of one of college football's premier defenses. He is the only player in league history to earn All-Mountain West Conference honors in four consecutive seasons, a testament to the consistency he brings. In three of those seasons, he led the team in tackles and in the year that he didn't the middle linebacker placed second.
The success that the Horned Frogs experienced on defense coincided with --NAME--' maturing game. In 2005, the team ranked 25th in the nation in total defense, leading the conference by allowing just 329.08 yards per game. The Horned Frogs again paced the MWC and ranked second in the NCAA in total defense (234.92 ypg) and rush defense (60.85 ypg) while placing third in scoring defense (12.31 ppg) during --NAME--' sophomore campaign.
In 2007, --NAME-- helped the front wall hold the opposition to just 103.46 yards per game on the ground. In his final campaign, the Horned Frogs captured the total defense (217.77 ypg) and rush defense (47.08 ypg) titles while ranking second nationally in scoring defense (11.31 ppg).
--NAME-- served in a variety of roles during his career at Waller High School. He competed as a quarterback and linebacker, in addition to handling deep snapping chores. The District 18-4A MVP in 2003 was a member of Team USA in the 2004 Global Bowl and was selected to play in the 2004 Bayou Bowl. 
--NAME-- carried 172 times for 1,291 yards and hit on 61 of 138 passes for 1,070 yards as a senior. The two-time team captain also rushed 91 times for 734 yards with nine touchdowns as a junior. In his first varsity season, he was named the District 18-4A Newcomer of the Year in 2001. He also lettered in track, where he was a regional qualifier in the 110 meter hurdles. He graduated with Texas Scholar honors.
--NAME-- turned down scholarship offers from Texas A&M, Baylor and Houston to enroll at Texas Christian in 2004. He spent that season competing on the scout team as a fullback before moving to middle linebacker in 2005 spring camp. He became the first freshman to earn All-Mountain West Conference honors in 2005, as he was also named the league's Freshman of the Year by College Football News, adding second-team Freshman All-American honors.
That season, he started all 12 games at middle linebacker, leading the team with 71 tackles (41 solos), including a sack and 8.5 stops for loss. The All-MWC first-team pick ranked second on the team with 73 tackles (38 solos) in 2006. He had six stops behind the line of scrimmage, a fumble recovery and his first career interception.
--NAME-- was named the state of Texas' best linebacker by Dave Campbell, as he captured All-MWC honors for the third consecutive year in 2007. In 13 games in the middle, he led the Horned Frogs with a career-high 87 tackles (58 solos), including 10.5 stops for loss. He picked off a pass and deflected six others while coming up with two sacks.
--NAME-- added All-MWC first-team honors as a senior. That year, Dave Campbell elevated his assessment of the TCU middle linebacker, rating him the best defensive player in the state. He did not disappoint, as he again led the team with 84 tackles (57 solos). He ranked fourth in the conference with 13.0 stops behind the line of scrimmage and also chipped in with 3.5 sacks in 12 games, sitting out the Stephen F. Austin clash with a knee sprain.
2008: Sat out the Stephen F. Austin game (9/06) with a knee sprain.
2009: Could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine after suffering a left knee torn meniscus that required surgery to repair in early March. 
"The timing could be worse, but it could be a lot better, too," --NAME-- said. "It is what it is, and I'm just taking it with a grain of salt and fighting through it." 
--NAME-- tore his meniscus during position drills at the Combine in Indianapolis on Feb. 23. Dr. Dan Cooper, the head team physician for the Dallas Cowboys, performed arthroscopic surgery on --NAME--' knee. --NAME-- said his rehabilitation should take six to eight weeks. 
Scouts were surprised when --NAME-- arrived at TCU's Pro Day on crutches. "It hurts him a little bit," said Alonzo Highsmith, a scout for the Green Bay Packers. "Teams are going to be interested in how soon he can be healthy. He's still a good football player. He worked out well at the Combine, so it's just going to be a matter of healing up. Teams are going to know he's probably not going to be ready for minicamp."
Attended Waller (Texas) High School, where he competed as a quarterback and linebacker, in addition to handling deep snapping chores The District 18-4A MVP in 2003 was a member of Team USA in the 2004 Global Bowl and was selected to play in the 2004 Bayou Bowl Carried 172 times for 1,291 yards and hit on 61 of 138 passes for 1,070 yards as a senior The two-time team captain also rushed 91 times for 734 yards with nine touchdowns as a junior In his first varsity season, he was named the District 18-4A Newcomer of the Year in 2001 Also lettered in track, where he was a regional qualifier in the 110 meter hurdles Graduated with Texas Scholar honors.
Has the size to play inside, probably in a 3-4 scheme, and should continue to gain mass and develop in the upper body.   Avoids blocks from guards in trash to reach the ballcarrier, but is also physical enough to punch linemen and maintain his gap.   Very tough and won't back down from anyone.   Aggressive, instinctual player with the straight-line speed to attack plays behind the line of scrimmage.   Adequate drop and good awareness in coverage, reads the eyes of the quarterback and anticipates receivers' routes well.   Secure tackler, has the length to wrap up and strength to bring the man down.   Was a long snapper in high school.
Mostly a grab-and-drag tackler.   Better when the play is in front of him, as he lacks great lateral movement and struggles to change direction in space.   He often reads the play correctly but is a step slow to break down or react against faster players, leading to lunging and shoestring tackles that won't be made at the next level.   Can be effective as a blitzer, but is not explosive and will whiff.   His aggressiveness sometimes causes him to leave his gap responsibility, and he does not have the quickness to recover.
MONTY BEISEL, Kansas City -- Like Beisel, --NAME-- has very good speed and football intelligence, but does not have that classic explosive tackling ability you look for in a middle linebacker. He might be a better fit in a 3-4 alignment, where he can stay mostly on gap responsibilities, as he does get out of control too much when having to generate a long pursuit. Unless he can improve his overall strength to match with his impressive quickness, he might join Beisel as a reserve instead of being starting material.
-------------------------
John_Phillips 71435 208
Carrying in the suddenly strong UVA tradition of producing NFL-caliber tight ends under coach Al Groh, --NAME-- went from being a part-time starter to first-team All-ACC selection in 2008. Teams looking for an athletic receiver to threaten the seam should look elsewhere, but as a secure short- to medium-range target with the size and strength to contribute immediately as a blocker, --NAME-- quietly ranks as one of the draft's better all-around tight ends. Had an arm span of 34 1/2 inches and a hand span of 10 1/4 inches at the combine.
Talented two-way player at tight end and defensive end for coach Will Fields at Bath County HS   considered the 24th-best tight end nationally by CollegeFootballNews.com and ESPN.com, and 30th by Scout.com   3 stars by Scout.com   87th on Scout.com's East Hot 100 list   listed as the Number 15 player in Virginia by SuperPrep, 16th by Scout.com, 21st by TheSabre.com and 24th by Rivals.com   listed 16th among players in Virginia by the Roanoke Times and 24th on the Charlottesville Daily Progress "Gold List"   named first-team All-State tight end as a senior when he caught 40 passes for 714 yards and five touchdowns   Roanoke Times All-Timesland tight end and region defensive Player of the Year his final year   first-team All-State at tight end and second-team as a defensive end as a junior   caught 25 passes for 495 yards and six touchdowns in just 10 games that season   finished his career with 87 receptions for 1,513 yards and 16 touchdowns   defensively he had 324 tackles, including 90 for loss and 42 sacks   also a standout in basketball and baseball   three-time All-Pioneer District honoree in both sports   All-State and MVP in baseball in 2004.
Prototype height for the position with long limbs. Solid build with room for additional growth. Reads the defense and can find the soft spot in the short and medium levels of zone coverage. Reliable hands. Catches the ball cleanly with his hands and secures it quickly. Good body control to catch the pass outside of his frame. Lacks the quickness off the snap that teams prefer, but accelerates smoothly. Physical inline blocker. At least adequate quickness off the snap and laterally for the down block. Provides a good initial pop and effort as a drive blocker. Veteran with four years of starting experience.
Strictly a short- to medium-range target. Lacks the straight-line speed to challenge the seam. Only adequate elusiveness to make defenders miss in space. Occasionally lines up in the slot, but lacks the burst off the snap to continue in this role in the NFL. Could use more bulk in his upper body. Provides pop as a blocker, but lack of initial quickness evident in this area, as well. Struggles to recover if beaten initially.
-------------------------
Glover_Quin 71441 112
Came into his own as a senior as the Lobos' Number 1 cornerback, replacing DeAndre Wright (injury). He garnered first-team All-Mountain West honors after compiling 53 tackles, 4.5 for loss, five interceptions and 11 pass breakups. He was honorable mention all-conference his first two seasons, credited with two picks and 20 pass breakups. Started his career at Southwest Mississippi Junior College, redshirting his first season with a broken right arm. --NAME--'s physical nature makes him a natural zone corner or free safety.
SOUTHWEST MISSISSIPPI CC: Posted 40 tackles, eight pass deflections, two interceptions and a TD in 2005 for head coach Dom Green   Broke his right arm the second game of the 2004 season and missed the remainder of the year.
A 2004 graduate of North Pike HS in Summit four-year letterman in football and basketball, and he was the Jaguar's team MVP in both sports as a senior totaled 2,552 rushing yards, 224 tackles and 13 interceptions in his prep career played for head c
Adequate height and very solid overall build for a corner or free safety.   Has the strength to jam on the line.   Likes contact, will bring his hips and wrap up in the open field.   Good awareness, reads screens, play action and misdirection.   High-points the football and had good hands for the interception.   Breaks up passes by jumping routes or fighting for the ball in the air.   Returned 10 kickoffs for 323 yards as a senior and can be dangerous running back interceptions.   Played through pain and returned quickly from groin surgery during junior season.   Physical runner on returns -- goes straight upfield, is willing to take a hit and can bounce off to get additional yardage.
Some teams will grade him as a safety and cornerback "tweener."   Does not have great straight-line or recovery speed.   Best when attacking the play in front of him.   Will throw his shoulder to make a hit instead of wrapping up.   Lacks great height and vertical leap to challenge tall NFL receivers.   Inconsistent getting off receiver blocks on the edge.   Lacks great quickness, vision or speed on returns.
-------------------------
Richard_Quinn 71443 64
With only 12 career receptions for 124 yards and two touchdowns, --NAME--'s value lies in his blocking. Nicknamed "Big Rich," he plays up to his moniker, giving the Tar Heels essentially another offensive tackle at the line of scrimmage. With many of today's NFL offenses preferring receiving specialists at tight end, --NAME-- could still be waiting to hear his name called late in the draft. However, there are always teams on the lookout for physical run blockers capable of sneaking off the line of scrimmage for short-yardage passes. In this capacity, --NAME-- could find a niche in the pros. Had an arm span of 33 1/2 inches and a hand span of 9 1/2 inches at the combine.
Ranked the Number 15 tight end in the country by Rivals.com   Member of SuperPrep's All-Midwest Team   Two-time all-conference and all-district selection   Led Maple Heights to a 10-2 record and a berth in the playoffs as a senior   Team offensive MVP   Had 32 catches for 468 yards and 10 touchdowns as a senior   Caught 12 passes for 254 yards and one touchdown as a junior   Coached by Jeff Rotsky   Played two seasons at Butler High School in Huntsville, Ala., before moving to Ohio during his sophomore year   Also played basketball and was the top rebounder in the conference in 2004.
Naturally large man with a powerful upper and lower body. Good initial quickness off the snap to gain an advantage as a run blocker. Good hand placement and upper body strength to pop the defender. Plays with leverage. Can get under the pads of the defender and drive him off the line of scrimmage. Has the phone booth quickness to get to the second level and shows at least adequate lateral quickness to block in space. Uses his big frame to shield defenders from the ball as a receiver. At least marginal hands for the reception. Gets low and can run through arm-tackles to gain positive yardage after the reception.
Lacks the straight-line speed to be more than a short-range target in the passing game. Lumbers off the snap, and lacks the quick feet to consistently gain separation as a route-runner. Has to gather himself and too often rounds off his routes. Lacks the flexibility to consistently make receptions outside of his frame. Requires a Combine check on his shoulder; missed the entire 2006 season after fracturing his right shoulder blade in August 2006.
-------------------------
Garrett_Reynolds 71453 156
--NAME-- may lack the flashy athleticism that characterizes many of this year's top tackle prospects, but his toughness and reliability on the right side could help him ultimately enjoy a more established pro career than some rated ahead of him. A three-year starter, with his action almost exclusively at right tackle, --NAME-- has the frame and physicality to remain at the position at the next level. He lacks the speed to handle speed rushers, however, and isn't the consistent drive blocker his size might indicate. Had an arm span of 34 1/2 inches and a hand span of 9 3/4 inches at the combine.
Ranked among the top 15 players in Tennessee by Rivals.com and SuperPrep   Named all-state at defensive tackle in 4-A schools   Associated Press honorable-mention all-state selection on offense   Three-year starter on both the offensive line and defensive line   Had four sacks and 76 tackles on defense as a senior   Coached by Heath Woods.
High-cut with the thick-lower body build scouts prefer for the strong-side tackle position. Good initial burst off the snap as a run blocker. Provides an initial pop at the line and can generate movement. Good upper body strength to lock up defenders. Improved sustain of blocks as a senior. Alert in pass protection. Recognizes the blitz and reacts accordingly. Good bloodlines; father, Art, and uncle, Jack, both played professional football. Jack, better known by his nickname "Hacksaw," played 15 years in the NFL for the Los Angeles Rams and San Francisco 49ers.
Over-achiever type. Has the size and toughness, but may lack the pure athleticism for the NFL. Too high in his stance and in his hand placement in pass protection and can be pushed into the pocket because he loses the leverage battle. Good effort to block on the move, but isn't particularly nimble, especially laterally.
-------------------------
Duke_Robinson 71455 163
The great nephew of singer/songwriter Smokey --NAME--, --NAME-- is a versatile athlete who has experience at offensive guard and tackle. Regarded as one of the premier blockers in the collegiate game, he was the unquestioned leader of the Sooners' front wall that cleared rush lanes and protected the pocket for one of the most explosive offenses in the history of the game.
Oklahoma shattered NCAA season records for scoring, as its total of 716 points topped the previous record of 656 points, set by Hawaii in 2006. --NAME-- delivered 14 touchdown-resulting blocks as a senior, helping the offense total 96 touchdowns, which bettered the NCAA season record of 89 touchdowns by Nebraska in 1983. The Sooners also had a string of five consecutive games with at least 60 points.
At Washington High School, --NAME-- was rated the 13th-best prep offensive lineman in the country by ESPN and 15th by Rivals.com (also ranked 51st overall by Rivals). The three-year starter at offensive tackle was named the Atlanta Touchdown Club Offensive Lineman of the Year in 2004. He also garnered Prep Star All-American, All-City and All-State first-team recognition.
In 2004, --NAME-- recorded 87 pancake blocks and graded 91 percent for blocking consistency. He also played nose guard on short yardage defensive plays. Named to the Super 11 squad by the Atlanta Journal Constitution in 2004, the youngster also spent his prep summers working as a hawker selling programs and peanuts at Atlanta Braves games.
--NAME-- enrolled at Oklahoma in 2005. He was the line's "sixth man" as a true freshman, appearing in 10 games as a reserve offensive guard, but also saw action at left offensive tackle earlier in that season. Weight issues (played at 360 pounds, but was as much as 380) were the reason keeping him on the bench that year, but an intense 2006 offseason training program saw him arrive for fall camp 30 pounds lighter.
That earned --NAME-- a starting job at left offensive guard. He went on to produce 108 knockdowns with eight touchdown-resulting blocks while participating in 809 offensive plays. He earned All-Big 12 Conference honorable mention, helping the team average 368.7 yards per game in total offense.
As a junior, --NAME-- was a consensus All-American and unanimous All-Big 12 Conference first-team choice. The starting left guard delivered 102 knockdowns while grading 84.64 percent for blocking consistency, appearing in 13 games. He logged action in 663 plays, coming up with a team-high 15 touchdown-resulting blocks.
--NAME--, with a baby on the way, seriously considered entering the 2008 NFL Draft. But, hoping to capture a national title, he returned to the Sooners, where he improved upon his impressive junior campaign with a stellar final season. The senior guard led the team with 117 knockdowns and registered 14 touchdown-resulting blocks. 
If not for eight costly penalties, --NAME--'s blocking consistency grade would have been even more impressive than his 85.62 percent mark (minus penalties, his grade would have projected to 87.46 percent). He was a finalist for the Outland Trophy and again earned All-American and All-Big 12 Conference first-team honors, but the season was not without some drama. He was benched for the season opener vs. Chattanooga and suspended for the first half of the Texas Christian game due to team rules violations.
2009: Didn't lift at the Combine due to a hyperextension and a right hip flexor prevented him from him from doing jumps, shuttle and cone drills.
Attended Booker T. Washington (Atlanta, Ga.) High School, playing football for head coach Rodney Cofield Rated the 13th-best prep offensive lineman in the country by ESPN and 15th by Rivals.com (also ranked 51st overall by Rivals) The three-time starter at offensive tackle was named the Atlanta Touchdown Club Offensive Lineman of the Year in 2004 Also garnered Prep Star All-American, All-City and All-State first-team recognition In 2004, --NAME-- recorded 87 pancake blocks and graded 91 percent for blocking consistency Also played nose guard on short yardage defensive plays Named to the Super 11 squad by the Atlanta Journal Constitution in 2004.
Massive player who can engulf defenders and physically dominate his opponent.   Good initial quickness off the snap to get out and block on the move.   Good drive blocker with excellent size and strength.   Plays with good leverage despite his height.   Can generate movement at the point of attack in short-yardage situations.   Plays with some nastiness and has the raw power to turn and pancake his opponent.   Quick, strong hand punch to jolt the defender in pass protection.   Natural knee-bender who plays with good leverage and balance in pass pro.   Long arms and strong hands to keep the defender at bay.
Only marginal balance and lateral quickness to block at the second level, and spends too much time on the ground when trying to block on the move.   Lack of great quickness shows in pass protection, as he struggles to adjust if his initial punch doesn't slow the defender.
-------------------------
Jamarca_Sanford 71459 231
A four-year starter, --NAME--, the conference's leading tackler over his career, leaves Ole Miss without a single all-conference selection. The heavy-hitting strong safety's 287 career tackles did earn him an invitation to the Scouting Combine. If --NAME-- can prove his athleticism, the versatile, durable performer could move into middle-round consideration for the 2009 draft.
Helped the Tigers to a 15-0 record, 5A state championship and Number 9 USA Today national ranking as a senior   Voted the Most Valuable Player of the 2003 state title tilt   Led South Panola to a 14-1 record and state runner-up finish in 2002   A Top 40, All-State and All-Region choice by The Clarion-Ledger   Picked up Mississippi Association of Coaches Class 5A first team All-State honors as an outside linebacker   Named to PrepStar All-Region team, which represented the top 275 players   Ranked Number 7 among strong safeties on the 2003 Max Emfinger Super South Top 200 list   Rated Number 19 in Mississippi by Rivals.com   Listed as a Top 30 Prep Recruit by the Sun-Herald   Selected to play in the 2004 Mississippi-Alabama All-Star Classic in Mobile, Alabama   Collected 320 career tackles and 25 QB sacks   Recorded 98 tackles, seven QB sacks, four forced fumbles and three interceptions as a senior   A versatile leader for the 2003 Tiger defense which allowed only 38 rushing yards per game  Was named Player of the Week eight times as a senior and seven times junior year   Earned four letters in football   Coached in high school by Ricky Woods.
Tough.   Signed with Ole Miss as a linebacker and started four games at this position -- at 200 pounds -- as a sophomore.   Reliable open-field tackler.   Lacks the bulk scouts prefer at strong safety, but is a physical hitter that wraps up cleanly.   Isn't afraid to take on blockers and can disengage to make the tackle near the line of scrimmage.   High-effort player who doesn't give up on the play.   Good upside as a special teams defender due to his toughness and reliable open-field tackling.
Lacks size teams prefer at safety and the size to transition back to linebacker.   Marginal speed for coverage.   Lacks the change-of-direction agility to stick with receivers in man coverage and too often appears satisfied with making the tackle after the reception is made.   A steady collegiate defender, but rarely made the flashy play.
-------------------------
A.Q._Shipley 71461 226
The first center to serve as team captain since Barry Tielsch in 1996, --NAME-- had a banner senior campaign for the Nittany Lions. In addition to being named the recipient of the Rimington Trophy, given to college football's best center, he became the 92nd player in school history to be named a first-team All-American.
--NAME-- proved to be a tough competitor, anchoring a front wall that led the Big Ten Conference and ranked fourth in the nation for fewest quarterback sacks allowed (1.00 spg). That stellar protection allowed PSU to generate 243.08 passing yards per game, the third-best total in the league.
A respected team leader, --NAME-- is an intense and physical presence on the line. He is also one of the squad's most engaging personalities and played a jovial Santa Claus at the team's bowl game Christmas party during the 2005 and '06 seasons. An accomplished golfer, he graduated last December with a degree in Labor and Industrial Relations.
At Moon Area High School, --NAME-- was a standout defensive lineman in four seasons with the varsity. He was a member of the Pittsburgh Post-Gazette Fabulous 22, the Pittsburgh Tribune-Review Terrific 25, and the Harrisburg Patriot-News Platinum 33 squads and also played in the 2004 "Big 33" Classic. As a senior, he helped the squad reach the Western Pennsylvania District Class AAA semifinals after winning the Parkway Conference title.
--NAME-- recorded 53 tackles as a senior, including 13 for loss and three sacks, as he also forced two fumbles. He ended his career with 243 tackles, 41 for loss and 13 sacks. He also was a three-year starter in basketball and was a two-year captain of the football and basketball teams. 
In 2004, --NAME-- competed on the Penn State scout team as a defensive tackle. The following year, he shuttled between the offensive and defensive lines. He moved to center in 2005 spring drills, providing depth there and at offensive guard the first half of the season. Prior to the Illinois game, he went back to defensive tackle, making five tackles with two sacks the remainder of the season, participating in 226 snaps for the 2005 campaign.
In 2006, --NAME-- secured a starting job at center, competing in 897 plays. He tallied 54 knockdowns with seven touchdown resulting blocks and also recorded a solo tackle vs. Northwestern. PSU's offense managed to average 349.92 yards per game, as the offensive line allowed only 23 sacks.
As a junior, --NAME-- was named to the All-Big Ten Conference first-team by the league's coaches and was a candidate for the Rimington Trophy. He registered 76 knockdowns that included nine touchdown-resulting blocks. He made ESPN's All-Bowl team, experiencing every lineman's dream, as he caught a deflected pass for a 4-yard gain vs. Texas A&M in the Alamo Bowl. Behind his block-calling, he helped the team rank third in the Big Ten Conference in rushing (193.77 ypg), as the Nittany Lions also amassed 5,201 yards in total offense.
In 2008, Penn State's offense was explosive, thanks to the stellar play of its senior-laden front wall. The Big Ten Conference's Offensive Lineman of the Year recorded 11 touchdown-resulting blocks to go with 78 knockdowns. The team finished as the league leader in pass efficiency (145.35 rating), total offense (448.92 ypg) and points scored (38.92 ppg).
No major injuries reported.
Attended Moon Area (Coraopolis, Pa.) High school, playing football for head coach Mark Capuano Standout defensive lineman in four seasons with the varsity Member of the Pittsburgh Post-Gazette Fabulous 22, the Pittsburgh Tribune-Review Terrific 25, and the Harrisburg Patriot-News Platinum 33 squads Played in the 2004 "Big 33" Classic As a senior, he helped the squad reach the Western Pennsylvania District Class AAA semifinals after winning the Parkway Conference title Recorded 53 tackles as a senior, including 13 for loss and three sacks, as he also forced two fumbles Ended his career with 243 tackles, 41 for loss and 13 sacks Three-year starter in basketball and was a two-year captain of the football and basketball teams.
Stout, tough and physical at the point, plays like the former nose guard he is. Strong anchor in pass protection, and does not get bull-rushed as he uses his wide base to maintain leverage. Battles everyone and anyone on the field, playing through the whistle. Good enough feet to combo (in either direction) then get to the linebacker or safety and angle him while engaged. Adept at shotgun. Gets hands up quickly after the snap. Gets off his man to pick up late blitzers using his feet and hands. Only adequate moving laterally on pulls, but is still able to wall off linebackers inside. Team leader. Makes accurate line adjustments.
Lacks height, bulk and arm length. Projects to center only, probably in a zone-blocking system. Short arms prevent him from maintaining contact with tackles on the move, which lets his man shed or get past him. Initial punch is only adequate. Does not consistently sustain his blocks, especially against stronger tackles.
-------------------------
Lawrence_Sidbury_Jr. 71463 125
Sidbury, who the coaching staff at Richmond called the team's best athlete, excelled as the premier pass rusher in the NCAA Football Championship Subdivision. He was a valuable track and field performer, competing in the throws and the 100-meter dash. An Honor Roll student, Sidbury led the team to the national championship in 2008, the first title won by any sports program at Richmond. 
No one could've scripted a better end to his college career. Facing one of the most dominating teams of the last decade, he led a spirited defense that held Montana to 34 yards rushing -- its lowest output in more than two seasons. Sidbury almost won that championship game by himself, accounting for four sacks to lead the Spiders to a 24-7 victory and the FCS title.
Sidbury earned All-State, All-Metro, All-County and All-League as a senior at Oxon Hill High School, serving as team captain his final two seasons. The three-year starter was a member of the Washington, D.C. Golden 11 team and played in the Prince Georges County All-Star Game. He also lettered in track, winning the county title and finished second at the state finals in the shot put. He received academic accolades and was an Honor Roll student as part of the Science and Vo-Tech program.
In 2004, Sidbury appeared briefly in the season opener vs. North Carolina State before sitting out the rest of the Richmond schedule, retaining freshman eligibility. He appeared in 13 games in 2006, earning on start at left defensive end, helping the team rank fourth in the Atlantic Ten Conference in total defense. He finished that year with 24 tackles (12 solos), three sacks and four stops for losses.
As a sophomore, Sidbury played in nine games for the Spiders, collecting 17 tackles (11 solos) that included 5.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also lettered on the outdoor track team, posting a season-best 41-feet 4 1/2-inch-toss in the shot put.
Sidbury moved into the starting lineup at left defensive end as a junior. He earned All-Colonial Athletic Association and All-State first-team honors. He totaled 48 tackles (22 solo) that included five sacks, making 8.5 stops for loss. He again competed on the school's track team, clocking a season-best 12.07 in the 100 meters at the Atlantic Ten Conference Championship.
As a senior, Sidbury was again an All-CAA first-team choice, as he was also named an All-American first-team choice. He registered 11.5 sacks, the third-highest season total by a Spider, as he collected a career-high 56 tackles (26 solos), along with 20 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also caused three fumbles and recovered another, helping the team rank 12th in the nation vs. the rush, allowing only 94.0 yards per game.
2006: Sat out the Delaware (10/14) and William & Mary (11/18) games with an ankle sprain.
2007: Missed most of the Wofford clash (12/01) and sat out the Appalachian State game (12/07) with a high ankle sprain.
Attended Oxon Hill (Cheltenham, Md.) High School, playing football for head coach Randolph Warren Earned All-State, All-Metro, All-County and All-League as a senior Served as team captain his final two seasons The three-year starter was also a member of the Washington, D.C. Golden 11 team and played in the Prince Georges County All-Star Game Lettered in track, winning the county title and finished second at the state finals in the shot put Received academic accolades and was an Honor Roll student as part of the Science and Vo-Tech program.
Solidly built athlete with room for additional mass, especially in his upper body. Long arms. Flashes initial quickness off the snap to pressure the outside. Good lateral quickness to redirect back to the inside if he senses the tackle leaning outside. Good hand placement and use of leverage to bull rush the tackle into the pocket. Can close quickly with an open lane. Good effort in pursuit. Helped himself with a solid week of practice at the East-West Shrine Game.
Lacks the height and bulk in his lower body most teams prefer in a defensive end. Marginal strength at the point of attack and can be targeted in the running game. Likes to run around blocks in space, rather than take them on and discard. Lacks explosiveness off the snap and is often late.
HUGH DOUGLAS, ex-Philadelphia -- Sidbury could also be compared to Philadelphia's Trent Cole and Denver's Elvis Dumervil. They all might lack the size you look for in a 4-3 defensive end, but all have been able to compensate for that deficiency with their long wing span and explosion off the snap. Some scouts compare him to the Colts' Dwight Freeney, but Sidbury is not that fast or explosive and has shown more consistent leverage as a run defender at this stage in his career. His style of play is similar to that of Douglas, in that he uses leverage and natural power to defeat bigger blockers but can also pick up sacks in bunches with effort.
-------------------------
Andre_Smith 71465 6
An impressive physical specimen who compares to Dallas Cowboys' guard Leonard Davis, --NAME-- possesses outstanding agility and quickness for his size. Regarded as a premier offensive line prospect out of high school and one of the standouts of the 2005 recruiting class, he went on to establish himself as the elite at the college level, as evidenced by being named the recipient of the 2008 Outland Trophy.
Even at 343 pounds, --NAME-- displays excellent foot speed and agility. He started every game (38) in which he played for the Crimson Tide, missing the 2009 Sugar Bowl when he was ruled ineligible for direct contact with an agent. In addition to earning the Outland Trophy in 2008, he was won Alabama's Paul Crane Offensive Lineman Award, shared the Southeastern Conference's Jacobs Blocking Trophy with Arkansas' Jonathan Luigs, was twice chosen an All-SEC first-team pick and added consensus All-American first-team notice in 2008.
--NAME-- was a three-year starter at Huffman High School. He was the consensus top-rated offensive lineman in the country as a senior. The first-team All-American choice by USA Today and the U.S. Army, he was also a two-time All-State selection. In 2005, he was the recipient of the Bobby Dodd Award and named Alabama's Mr. Football by the Alabama Sports Writers Association, becoming the only offensive lineman to ever win the honor.
--NAME-- was also named Mr. Football and the state's best prospect by The Birmingham News. The Rivals.com Alabama Offensive Lineman of the Year recorded 88 knockdown blocks and was named the Class 6A Lineman of the Year in 2005. He was one of four finalists for the Walter Payton Award, given to the best prep player in the nation.
--NAME-- enrolled at Alabama in 2005, taking over at left tackle. He became the seventh true freshman in school history to start in his first career game since 1972, joining Larry Rose (1985), Jon Stevenson (1991), Terry Jones, Jr. (1988), Dante Ellington (1999), Saleem Rasheed (1999) and Tim Castille (2003). He delivered 70 knockdown blocks as he led the team by being on the field for 831 offensive and special teams plays.
--NAME-- garnered team Player of the Week honors four times during his sophomore season, when he shed over 25 pounds from his once 370-pound frame prior to the season opener.
He started all 13 games, as he was named All-SEC and earned the league's Jacobs Blocking Trophy. He led the conference down linemen with 116 knockdowns and had fifteen touchdown-resulting blocks while allowing only 1.5 quarterback sacks on 472 pass plays. He was penalized five times and played the second part of the season with a left ankle sprain suffered vs. Tennessee and a right ankle sprain incurred the next week in the Louisiana State clash.
As a junior, --NAME-- was a consensus All-American and unanimous All-SEC first-team pick. The Outland Trophy and Jacobs Blocking Trophy recipient saw his campaign get off to a rough start. He suffered a knee sprain in the season opener vs. Clemson that forced him to sit out the following week vs. Tulane and play just two quarters upon his return, vs. Western Kentucky. He also sprained his elbow in the season's sixth contest vs. Kentucky, but still delivered 103 knockdowns while pacing SEC blockers with seventeen touchdown-resulting blocks.
2007: Suffered a left ankle sprain vs. Tennessee (10/20) Left the Louisiana State game (11/03) in the second quarter after spraining his right ankle.
2008: Left the Clemson game (8/30) in the third quarter and sat out the following week vs. Tulane with a right knee medial collateral ligament sprain Suffered an elbow strain in the Kentucky clash (10/04) Played with a flu-like virus vs. Mississippi (10/18).
Attended Huffman (Birmingham, Ala.) High School, playing football for head coach Curtis Coleman The three-year starter was the consensus top-rated offensive lineman in the country as a senior The first-team All-American choice by USA Today and the U.S. Army, he was also a two-time All-State selection In 2005, he was the recipient of the Bobby Dodd Award and was selected Alabama's Mr. Football by the Alabama Sports Writers Association, becoming the only offensive lineman to ever win the honor Also named Mr. Football and the state's best collegiate prospect by The Birmingham News The Rivals.com Alabama Offensive Lineman of the Year recorded 88 knockdown blocks and was named the Class 6A Lineman of the Year in 2005 One of four finalists for the Walter Peyton Award, given to the best prep player in the nation.
Flashes rare initial quickness for such a large man, especially on the down block. Surprisingly quick getting to the second level as a run blocker or on screens. Explosive upper-body strength and can pancake defenders when he keeps his feet. Massive man with the deep kick-step and long arms to keep defenders at bay when in pass protection. Allowed only one sack in 2008. Can absorb the bull rush. Intuitive football player. Recognizes and reacts well to surprise blitzes. If presented with two rushers, chooses his correct assignment and effectively neutralizes at least one of the defenders, instead of trying (and failing) to handle both. Good effort downfield. Hasn't missed a game due to injury in three seasons at Alabama.
Inconsistent initial quickness. Can be a step slow off the snap in pass protection, though his deep kick-step and massive frame allow him to catch up to the defender quickly. Inconsistent hand punch. Might be more passive than scouts would like. Too often absorbs blows from the defender, rather than initiating the action. Allows defenders to slip free from his blocks when he gets fundamentally lazy and leans, rather than driving his feet. Suspended for his final game, the Sugar Bowl against Utah, due to a violation of team rules.
-------------------------
Jason_Smith 71471 2
A converted tight end with three years as a starter on a veteran-laden offensive line that featured four returning starters in 2008. It proved to be a season of redemption for the fifth-year senior, who was limited to seven games as a junior due to a MCL sprain in his right knee.
Known for his pass-protection skills, --NAME-- displayed solid drive-blocking technique in 2008. The team gained more than 65% of its rushing yardage on running plays to the left. With --NAME-- leading the way, the Bears finished 21st in the nation and third in the Big Twelve Conference with an average of 195.75 yards per game on the ground. With their left tackle hobbled in 2007, Baylor ranked 113th nationally with 77.83 yards per game rushing.
--NAME-- earned All-American honors in 2008 and became the school's first non-special teams All-American since safety Adrian Robinson in 1995. He also became the Bears' first All-American offensive lineman since Mark Adickes in 1975 to receive national postseason honors. Only seven other offensive linemen since Barton Koch in 1930 have been able to claim All-American recognition in school history.
--NAME-- was a standout performer at W.T. White High School, where he was named to The Dallas Morning News Top 100 Area List (Number 95) as a senior. After earning first-team All-District honors as a sophomore and junior at offensive tackle, he moved to tight end, serving as team captain during his senior season. 
That year, he caught seven passes for 101 yards and one touchdown en route to 2003 All-District 10-5A honors. The two-time team Most Valuable Player also competed in the 2004 Coca-Cola High School Football All-Star Game.
--NAME-- enrolled at Baylor in 2004, spending the season performing on the scout team as a tight end. He would be named that squad's MVP after the schedule was concluded. He was chosen Baylor's Most Improved Player in 2005, starting eight games at tight end. He made six of the thirteen receptions by Baylor tight ends that year, gaining 70 yards (11.7-yard average) that included a 2-yard touchdown vs. Oklahoma State.
--NAME-- shifted from tight end to right offensive tackle in 2006, starting all 12 games. He delivered 71 knockdowns and six touchdown-resulting blocks, leading the offense by appearing in 789 plays. A right knee sprain in the 2007 season opener vs. Texas Christian put --NAME-- on the shelf for the next three contests. He returned, but re-injured the same knee vs. Colorado and missed two more games. 
Played 436 of the team's 859 offensive snaps, but managed to pace the Bears with 47 knockdowns and six touchdown-resulting blocks. In four of the seven games he appeared in, he did not allow his main coverage assignment to record a tackle. Based on that impressive showing, he was named All-Big Twelve Conference honorable mention by the Associated Press.
Nicknamed "Smooth," for his ability to easily slide out and lead on the sweep, --NAME-- was an All-American and unanimous All-Big Twelve Conference first-team choice. The Bears' co-MVP delivered 96 knockdowns and led conference down linemen with 17 touchdown-resulting blocks. The team's 29 scoring runs rank third on the school's single-season list and were the most by a Bears' squad since 1994.
2007: Suffered a right knee medial collateral ligament sprain vs. Texas Christian (9/01) in the season opener, missing the next three games vs. Rice (9/08), Texas State (9/15) and Buffalo (9/22) Returned vs. Texas A&M (9/29), but re-injured his knee the following week vs. Colorado (10/06), sitting out the next two contests vs. Kansas (10/13) and Texas (10/20).
Attended W.T. White (Dallas, Tex.) High School, playing football for head coach Mike Zuffuto Named to The Dallas Morning News Top 100 Area List (Number 95) as a senior After earning first-team All-District honors as a sophomore and junior at offensive tackle, he moved to tight end, serving as team captain during his senior season That year, he caught seven passes for 101 yards and one touchdown en route to 2003 All-District 10-5A honors The two-time team Most Valuable Player also competed in the 2004 Coca-Cola High School Football All-Star Game.
Tall, athletic left tackle prospect. Excellent straight-line speed and hustle, getting downfield on screens and long runs. Can pull and trap, running smoothly and adjusting to oncoming defenders. Moves to the second level quickly, using good angles to keep linebackers out of the play. Should work well in zone-blocking schemes with his ability to lock onto defenders and move. Gets down quickly to cut block despite his height. Adjusts well to outside blitzers. Willing to throw his man to the ground and keep him there. Has made significant improvement in terms of technique and strength over the past two years at left tackle.
Typically operates out of a two-point stance for Baylor. Raw in his pass-set technique, standing a bit upright and backpedaling instead of sliding to mirror his man. Locks onto his man at first, but eventually loses his balance and grip due to his average upper-body strength and footwork. Does not have much of a punch in pass protection. Can lose the hands battle on the line. Could use a bit more bulk in the lower body to be more effective as a drive blocker. May initially have to be moved inside to left guard for a zone-blocking team.
ERIC STEINBACH, Cleveland -- Steinbach is an offensive guard, but both have the initial quickness and outstanding athleticism to excel in a zone-blocking scheme as an interior lineman. --NAME-- needs to add at least another 20 pounds of bulk to handle the rigors of playing left tackle at the next level. His lack of great footwork and need to improve his stance could be covered up better playing inside for a year or two because he's still a neophyte at the left tackle position (19 starts). Once his body matures, his athletic skills will make him a quality left tackle in the mold of another former college tight end, --NAME-- Peters (Buffalo).
-------------------------
Stryker_Sulak 71477 199
A three-time All-Big 12 honoree, --NAME-- has the production and burst upfield to generate interest from every NFL team. He shared freshman of the year honors with tight end Chase Coffman of the Tigers, starting the final seven games of that season for Missouri and finishing with 38 tackles, 6.5 tackles for loss and four sacks. --NAME--'s production increased as he gained experience, topping out with eye-popping numbers as a senior -- 55 tackles, 15.5 tackles for loss, 10.5 sacks and an NCAA-leading six forced fumbles. With opposing offenses focusing much of their attention upon Missouri's other defenders, --NAME--'s production was inflated. Without the bulk to remain at defensive end full time in the NFL, he'll have to show he has the athleticism to make the transition to linebacker to avoid the "tweener" label.
Standout defensive end at Rockdale High School who was a  first-team all-state selection in 2003 by the Texas Sports Writers Association after leading his team with 83 tackles   Returned an interception 78 yards for a touchdown and also caught one touchdown and a 2-point conversion playing the tight end spot   Was his team's 5th-leading tackler as a junior in 2002, with 70 total tackles   Earned first-team all-district mention as well as his team's defensive MVP award that year   Solid all-around athlete who competed in baseball, basketball and track at Rockdale, and was a regional qualifier in the high jump in 2002   High school coach was Casey Creghan.
Good initial quickness off the snap.   Has some flexibility to get under the tackle and around the edge to close on the passer.   Good short-area burst to close effectively and can explode into the quarterback to create fumbles.   Good use of hands to rip the ball away from the ballcarrier.   At least adequate feel for the running game.   Good lateral quickness to scrape and stretch the play wide.   Can break down in space to make tackles in the open field.
Classic "tweener" lacking the fluid hips to change direction and the straight-line speed for coverage.   Lacks the bulk and strength to hold up in the running game.   Too often loses sight of the ball by rushing vertically upfield, leaving gaping holes for the offense to exploit.   Has a naturally lanky build and may struggle to add considerable mass.
-------------------------
Curtis_Taylor 71481 219
--NAME-- replaced All-American LaRon Landry in 2007 and proved capable of handling the challenge, posting 54 tackles and three interceptions. His production dropped in 2008 (43 tackles, one for loss, two INT), partially because he missed three starts due to injury but also because his inconsistent play allowed younger players to earn playing time late in the season.
One of the state's most underrated players in 2003   A versatile, all-around athlete who played safety, quarterback and wide receiver during his prep career   Made the move from quarterback to wide receiver midway through his junior year   Racked up 562 yards with 28 catches and 6 touchdowns as a senior   Named to the Baton Rouge Advocate Super Dozen and to the New Orleans Times-Picayune's Top 20 Blue-Chip list   All-district selection who helped the Demons to a 7-5 record and a state regional appearance in 2003   One of the highest recruited players to ever come out of Franklinton   Coached by Shane Smith.
Long, chiseled frame.   Prototype size for the position -- rangy and athletic.   Reads the field well and reacts quickly to the action.   Good straight-line speed and range in coverage.   Has natural hands for the interception and times his leaps well to pluck the ball at its highest point.   Competitive.   Has long arms and strength to wrap up tacklers.   Flashes explosive hitting ability.
Can be too aggressive and can be tricked by effective play-action.   Takes poor angles in run support and when attacking receivers in the open field.   Is not a physical intimidator.   Will go for the hit instead of the secure tackle or interception.   Tight in the hips and is best when coming straight into the action.   Lacks the change-of-direction agility to handle running backs or receivers one-on-one in the open field.
-------------------------
Jaimie_Thomas 71483 236
A three-year starter at left guard for the Terrapins, --NAME-- developed into an honorable mention ACC pick as a senior and could have contended for higher honors if not for an inconsistent offense. NFL teams looking for a drive-blocking guard will scout --NAME-- closely. Big and strong, --NAME-- is at his best attacking in short areas and driving straight ahead to create holes. Though he flashes the quickness to get to the second level, --NAME--' lack of balance and agility in the open field doesn't make him a fit for zone-blocking teams. Had an arm span of 35 inches and a hand span of 9 1/2 inches at the combine.
Bishop McDevitt High School: A three-year letterwinner and starter who played offensive tackle all three years while spending significant time at defensive tackle as a junior and senior   Allowed no sacks in his junior or senior seasons while only giving up one as a sophomore   Had over 40 pancake blocks as a senior   Was the lone returning starter on a line that ended up blocking for the state's leading rusher, sophomore LeSean McCoy, who had 2,561 yards in 10 games in 2003   A SuperPrep All-American and All-Northeast region selection   First-team all-state as a senior   First-team all-conference as a junior and senior   An honorable-mention pick by PrepStar   Lettered three years in basketball   Also recruited by Notre Dame, Tennessee and Penn State   Coached by Jeff Weachter.
Good upper-body strength.   A bit high with his hand placement, but keeps his feet chugging and can pop, turn and pancake his opponent to clear a hole.   Good first-step quickness to get to the second level.   Aggressive.   Looks to hit someone and keeps his head on a swivel to help teammates when not covered up.   Good effort downfield to block.   Three-year starter.
Carries some unnecessary weight around the middle.   Marginal lateral quickness.   Struggles laterally in space, losing his balance when asked to make blocks in the open field or when helping with unexpected blitzes.   Requires a medical check on right leg; missed half of the 2007 season due to a broken right fibula.
-------------------------
Fenuki_Tupou 71487 159
--NAME-- had a stellar career at Sierra College, but head coach Mike Belotti gambled that --NAME-- (pronounced fen-UU-kee TUU-puu) would be better served spending the 2006 season acclimating to major college life.
That plan proved to be a good one. --NAME-- would go on to anchor the demanding left offensive tackle position for a unit that led the Pac-10 Conference in total offense during the last two seasons. --NAME-- registered 154 knockdowns and 25 touchdown-resulting blocks while starting 23 of the 24 games in which he appeared for the Ducks.
--NAME-- did a little bit of everything for the Center High School football team. He lined up at quarterback, defensive end, tight end and defensive tackle. In addition to competing in football, he earned three letters in track and also rugby.
Upon graduating, --NAME-- enrolled at Sierra College. The two-time All-Mid Empire Conference selection lined up at offensive tackle. The team went undefeated during his freshman season and in 2005 compiled a 9-2 mark, snapping a string of 37 consecutive victories. The Wolverines finished 12th in the state junior college ranks in total offense, averaging 430.7 yards per game his sophomore season.
That year, --NAME-- was named an All-American honorable mention by J.C. Grid-Wire and ranked 34th in the country among junior college recruits by Rivals.com. He received a four-star prospect rating from Scout.com, and closed out his career with 15 knockdowns and two touchdown-resulting blocks in a 35-24 win over Butte College in the community college Holiday Bowl.
The list of suitors for --NAME--'s services was as long as any other prospect's in the 2006 junior college recruiting class. He had offers from Nebraska, Arizona, Washington, California, Brigham Young, Oregon State, Texas Christian and Michigan. His deciding factor on selecting a program was the quality of education.
"Number one, the most important thing for me is the education," --NAME-- told Scout.com, noting he hoped to major in law or business. "I want to go to a school with a quality education, because after I'm done playing I will need that to fall back on." Oregon would soon be his next "port of call," as he enrolled in time to compete in 2006 spring drills.
Most young players would have been disappointed by the decision to redshirt him in 2006, but --NAME-- saw the benefit of sitting out the year. 
In 2007, --NAME-- took over left offensive tackle duties for the Ducks. He earned second-team All-Pac 10 Conference honors and was the recipient of the Jimmy Rogers Jr. Most Valuable Lineman Award in the Sun Bowl, as he manhandled All-American pass rusher George Selvie, holding the South Florida standout to one assisted tackle while knocking him down 10 times and recording two touchdown-resulting blocks.
As a junior, --NAME-- started 12 of the Ducks' 13 games, seeing limited action vs. California due to a mild concussion. He finished his first season at Oregon with 85 knockdowns and 12 touchdown-resulting blocks. He allowed just two quarterback sacks on 413 pass plays, helping the Ducks average 467.54 yards in total offense and 41.92 points per game, leading the Pac-10 in both categories.
In 2008, --NAME-- almost saw his season come to an end before it began. He was suspended for the season opener after accepting a meal and $100 from a sports agent. The senior served the one-game, NCAA-imposed suspension after reporting his violation to the athletic department and turning the money over to its compliance office. He told university officials he met with a representative at a Eugene restaurant in July. The representative, according to --NAME--, paid for the $10 meal and gave him five $20 bills during a parting handshake. 
--NAME-- said he tried to return the cash several times, but was refused. According to NCAA bylaws, athletes can meet with agents, but can't accept any benefits or enter a formal agreement until their playing eligibility is complete. The university notified the Pacific-10 Conference and the NCAA, who in turn notified the NFL Players Association, the union that oversees agents. The NCAA issued the one-game suspension and ordered --NAME-- to donate the money to charity. 
The left tackle returned to his familiar position in the second game, starting 10 contests. He sat out the UCLA contest due to a right knee sprain that he suffered in the first quarter against USC. --NAME-- posted 74 knockdowns and 13 touchdown-resulting blocks as Oregon again led the conference with an average of 484.85 yards in total offense per game. For his performance, he was named an All-American third-team and All-Pac 10 Conference first-team choice.
--NAME-- lettered twice at Sierra (Rocklin, Cal.) College (2004-05), playing for head coach Jeff Tisdel The two-time All-Mid Empire Conference selection lined up at offensive tackle, as the team went undefeated during his freshman season and in 2005, compiled a 9-2 mark, snapping a string of 37 consecutive victories The Wolverines finished 12th in the state junior college ranks in total offense, averaging 430.7 yards per game during his 2005 campaign That year, --NAME-- was named an All-American honorable mention by J.C. Grid-Wire and ranked 34th in the country among junior college recruits by Rivals.com Also received a four-star prospect rating from Scout.com Closed out his career with fifteen knockdowns and two touchdown-resulting blocks in a 35-24 win over Butte College in the community college Holiday Bowl.
2007: Saw limited action in the California game (9/26) after suffering a mild concussion in practice (9/26) prior to the meeting.
2008: Did not play vs. UCLA (10/11) after suffering a right knee lateral collateral ligament sprain in the first quarter vs. Southern California (10/04), missing the final three quarters of that contest.
Attended Center (Antelope, Cal.) High School, playing football for head coach Jon Gallagher Was a gridiron jack-of-all-trades, lining up at quarterback, defensive end, tight end and defensive tackle Added three letters in both track and rugby.
Girth is spread evenly throughout his body and he looks natural despite his massive size. Good initial quickness. Keeps his hands active in pass protection. Shuffles his feet quickly and with good balance to gain depth on his kick-slide while in pass protection. Can turn and flatten his opponent as a drive blocker. Cognizant, aggressive blocker who looks for defenders to hit and often combos before breaking free to block at the second level.
Protected a bit by the rollouts and spread attack utilized by Oregon. Can get caught leaning to the outside on his initial kick-slide, and is vulnerable to quick inside spins. Despite his strength and long arms, doesn't always use them to his advantage, too often short-arming defenders and allowing them to dictate the action. Struggles hitting targets and sustaining blocks at the second level. Slow in recognizing and reacting to outside blitz. Not effective as a cut blocker.
-------------------------
Brandon_Underwood 71489 187
The 2008 first-team All-Big East free safety showed nice versatility playing cornerback after senior star Mike Mickens went down with a knee injury. --NAME-- played only sparingly in three years (including a redshirt season) at Ohio State, then had his scholarship revoked due to missed meetings and academic issues. But in his only year playing for the Bearcats, --NAME-- proved to be a playmaker, recording 60 tackles, including 3.5 for loss, three interceptions, six pass deflections and two forced fumbles. His brother, E.J., played briefly in the NFL after playing at Ohio State and Pikeville College.
Finished his senior year with 60 tackles   Had 50 stops, 15 passes broken up and three interceptions as a junior   Ranked as the 13th-best prospect in the state by The Ohio Football Recruiting News   Rivals.com ranked him as the 16th-best cornerback prospect in the nation and the 13th best overall prospect in Ohio   TheInsiders.com ranked him as the nation's 14th-best cornerback prospect   Also played wide receiver on offense   Ran track in high school and was one of the top sprinters in the state, qualifying for the state meet.
-------------------------
Tiquan_Underwood 71491 253
--NAME-- is an unheralded athlete who had to take a back seat to the team's emphasis for a strong running game earlier in his career. But given an opportunity as a junior, he went on to etch his name into the school record books. The cat-quick moves, long wing-span, outstanding leaping ability and sure hands allowed the talented receiver to become just the second player in school history to gain more than 1,000 yards receiving in a season, joining Tres Moses (1,056 yards in 2004).
His stellar performances on the field forced the opposition to place constant double coverage on him the second part of 2007. That allowed fellow receiver Kenny Britt to match --NAME--'s exploits, as he tallied 1,232 yards receiving last season. They became just the 26th tandem in NCAA history and the first in Big East Conference annals to gain more than 1,000 yards receiving in the same season.
At Notre Dame High School, --NAME-- earned All-County honors as a sophomore wide receiver and was again recognized as an All-County quarterback during his junior campaign. He returned to the receiving unit as a senior, catching 17 passes for more than 400 yards with five touchdowns in the team's first two games before an injury in the third contest would sideline him for the rest of 2004.
In 2003, --NAME-- completed 70 of 103 passes for 1,144 yards and 16 touchdowns, as he also rushed for two touchdowns and caught 10 passes for 212 yards with five scores. During his sophomore campaign, he made 35 catches for 606 yards and 10 touchdowns.
--NAME-- was the starting point guard on the school's basketball team as a sophomore and junior, leading the team in scoring in 2003-2004. He also competed in hurdles and triple jump for outdoor track team, where he set the state record for sophomores and juniors in the triple jump.
During his first season at Rutgers, --NAME-- was a jack of all-trades. He saw action at both receiving positions, in addition to lining up as a quarterback to take direct snaps in shotgun formation. He only threw the ball once, resulting in an interception, but gained 63 yards on the ground, as five of 16 carries resulted in first downs. He snatched four passes for 47 yards and fielded two punts for no gain, fumbling one in the Insight Bowl. He led the Big East Conference and ranked 19th in the nation, averaging 27.1 yards on 11 kickoff returns for 298 yards in 2004.
--NAME-- changed from jersey Number 10 that he wore as a freshman to jersey Number 7 for his 2005 campaign. He took over flanker duties in the team's fifth game when Shawn Tucker suffered a season-ending ankle injury. He finished fourth on the team with 23 receptions for 290 yards (12.6 avg), leading the Scarlet Knights with four touchdowns. A broken bone in his right foot in the regular-season finale would sideline him for the Insight Bowl.
Eighteen of his catches produced first downs, converting five third-down plays in the process. In addition to his four touchdowns, he had key catches that set up five other touchdown drives and three series that ended with field goals. He also returned one kickoff for 11 yards and recorded three tackles (2 solos), including one for a 2-yard loss.
As a junior, --NAME-- earned All-American third-team accolades and was a consensus All-Big East Conference choice. He led the team with 65 receptions, the third-best season total in school history, as his 1,100 yards rank second on the Rutgers' annual record chart. He had seven touchdown grabs, along with 55 first downs, converting 20 third-down catches. Forty-two of his grabs were for 10 yards or longer, including 18 for at least 20 yards. He had key catches to set up 13 other touchdowns for the Scarlet Knights and nine others that led to team field goals. He also registered seven touchdown-resulting blocks.
--NAME-- entered the 2008 season as one of the premier pass catchers in college football. A member of the AFCA "Good Works" team for his outstanding work in the community, he was also named to the Maxwell Award Watch List. He garnered All-American second-team preseason recognition, in addition to being a unanimous All-Big East preseason pick. He ranked second on the team with 40 receptions for 494 yards (12.4 avg) and five touchdowns in 13 games. He also gained 337 yards on 18 kickoff returns (18.7 avg) and assisted on two tackles, in addition to returning a blocked punt 70 yards.
2006: Sat out the Insight Bowl vs. Kansas State (12/28) after breaking a bone in his right foot vs. West Virginia (12/02) in the regular season finale.
Attended Notre Dame (Lawrenceville, N.J.) High School, earning All-County honors as a sophomore wide receiver and was again recognized as an All-County quarterback during his junior campaign Returned to the receiving unit as a senior, catching 17 passes for more than 400 yards with five touchdowns in the team's first two games before an injury in the third contest would sideline him for the rest of 2004 In 2003, --NAME-- completed 70 of 103 passes for 1,144 yards and 16 touchdowns, as he also rushed for two touchdowns and caught 10 passes for 212 yards, with five scores During his sophomore campaign, he made 35 catches for 606 yards and 10 touchdowns Was the starting point guard on the school's basketball team as a sophomore and junior, leading the team in scoring in 2003-2004 Also competed in hurdles and triple jump for outdoor track team, where he set the state record for sophomores and juniors in the triple jump.
Good height for the position. Has enough straight-line speed to make plays deep down the seam. Uses his long arms to block defensive backs in space for a short time. Reliable hands and able to make a move after the catch. Good vision as a runner. Has experience returning kickoffs, and should get a chance there. Special teams gunner who works hard to keep punts out of the end zone.
Very wiry build. Long strider who lacks suddenness. Does not get off the line very quickly and lacks the strength to get off a jam outside. Likely best as a third or fourth receiver out of the slot. Better when facing the quarterback than trying to track the ball over his shoulder. Hustles to get to his target in the run game, but can get destroyed due to his lack of upper body strength. Seems reluctant to go over the middle and looks to get hit before the ball gets there, although he usually makes the catch.
-------------------------
Max_Unger 71493 49
The Pac-10 has been known to feature standout offensive linemen to supply to the National Football League every draft, but organizations looking for a quality center in 2009 have spent more time than usual out on the West Coast. --NAME-- and California's Alex Mack have long been regarded as the two elite centers in the collegiate ranks, as both have garnered numerous postseason awards. Based on their stellar performances throughout the week of practices at the Senior Bowl, a team selecting either of these players is sure to find their center issues will soon be resolved.
Over the past three seasons, either --NAME-- or Mack has received first-team All-Pac-10 Conference honors, with the other settling for second-team. Both are strikingly similar in size (6:04.5), weight (both are more than 300 pounds) and strength (--NAME-- ranks second on the team with a 363-pound power clean lift and Mack holds the Cal squad record with a 374-pound lift). They have also provided excellent blocking in the middle of the line for their rushing attacks, as both have registered double-digit totals in touchdown-resulting blocks in each of their seasons as starters.
--NAME-- ranked among nation's top 50 offensive guards by Rivals.com as a senior at Hawaii Preparatory Academy. The All-State choice did not begin playing organized football until the ninth grade, but in only his second season he was a member of the Honolulu Star-Bulletin's 2002 second-team All-State squad. Playing on both sides of the ball during his last two campaigns, he received first-team All-Big Island Interscholastic Federation honors in both years. As a junior, he recorded 100 knockdown blocks as Hawaii Prep captured the Big Island Interscholastic Federation (BIIF) title with an 8-2 record.
--NAME-- enrolled at the University of Oregon, where he spent the 2004 season playing for the scout team, competing on the left side of the offensive line at guard and tackle. He took over left tackle duties as a redshirt freshman, starting all 12 games. He paced the Ducks with 80 knockdowns and 10 touchdown-resulting blocks. His protection of the quarterback's blind side helped the team rank eighth in the nation in passing offense (304.5 ypg) and 12th in scoring offense (34.5 ppg).
--NAME-- remained at left tackle for the 2006 campaign. He produced 11 more touchdown-resulting blocks and delivered a team-high 94 knockdowns. He was not responsible for any of the 16 sacks allowed by the front wall, which was the second-lowest figure in the Pac-10 Conference and 12th in the nation.
--NAME-- shifted to center in 2007, earning All-American first-team honors in his first year at his new position. He was named the recipient of the Ed Moshofsky Award for the second consecutive year, an honor given to the team's outstanding offensive lineman. He was limited in preseason drills due to hernia surgery, but was fully recovered by the season opener. He posted 90 knockdowns, including 12 touchdown-resulting blocks. Most of those blocks came for the rushing attack that ranked sixth in the nation with an average of 251.69 yards per game.
As a senior, --NAME-- started all 13 games, including 11 at center. He also lined up at left tackle in the Washington and UCLA contests. He matched last year's total of 90 knockdowns and delivered 16 touchdown-resulting blocks for one of the nation's premier ground games. The Ducks led the Pac-10 and finished second in the nation with an average of 280.08 yards per game on the ground. They also led the league in scoring (41.92 ppg, seventh in the country) and total offense (484.85 ypg). For his efforts, the OU center was again named to several All-American teams, in addition to earning All-Pac 10 Conference recognition.
2007: Missed spring drills after undergoing hernia surgery.
Attended Hawaii Preparatory (Honaunau, Hi.) Academy, playing football for head coach Tom Goodspeed Ranked among nation's top 50 offensive guards by Rivals.com as a senior The All-State choice did not begin playing organized football until the ninth grade, but in only his second season, he was a member of the Honolulu Star-Bulletin's 2002 second-team All-State squad Playing on both sides of the ball during his last two years, he received first-team All-Big Island Interscholastic Federation honors both times As a junior, he recorded 100 knockdown blocks as Hawaii Prep captured the Big Island Interscholastic Federation (BIIF) title with an 8-2 record.
Understands positioning and can turn and seal his opponent away from the ballcarrier. Sustains his block through the whistle. Excellent hand placement, balance, anchor and mirroring technique as a pass blocker. Good technician who relies on his short-area quickness rather than size or strength for his success. Recognizes blitzes and picks them up consistently. Quick off the snap and able to get his hands into the defender's chest smoothly. Outside at tackle, has at least adequate quickness out of his stance to maintain a wall for the passer. Effective cut blocker inside and gets off the ground quickly. Few collegiate centers have his size and effectiveness on inside traps as well as pulls outside the tackle. Excellent quickness and balance getting out of his stance. Good foot speed to find targets downfield. Athletic enough to adjust to linebackers and safeties in space. Uses his feet and proper angles, instead of pure strength, to sustain. Very durable. Team leader on and off the field. Versatile enough to play left tackle and center at Oregon, moving inside to make room for JUCO transfer Feneki Tupou before 2007.
Oregon's offensive scheme hid his deficiencies in drive blocking. Better suited inside than out. Adept at the shotgun snap, but needs experience with the quarterback under center. Will whiff in space when he overextends.
-------------------------
Kraig_Urbik 71495 79
When --NAME--'s streak of 45 consecutive starts came to an end when he injured his knee vs. Penn State in 2008, the Badgers' midseason struggles began. Without their offensive leader, Wisconsin lost five of six contests before a fully recovered --NAME--, the right offensive guard, guided the team to a 3-1 record to close out the season.
Wisconsin has been known for developing quite a bit of offensive line talent for the NFL ever since former head coach Barry Alvarez arrived on campus. A member of that renowned coach's best recruiting class, --NAME-- was the first Badger freshman to start at offensive tackle since All-American Chris McIntosh did in 1996. --NAME-- would go on to start 16 games at right tackle and 34 at right guard during his career -- and that versatility has made him one of the most coveted linemen in the 2009 NFL Draft.
Coach Alvarez hit the "mother lode" when he went recruiting at Hudson High School, as he not only secured the services of --NAME--, but those of his prep teammate, Eric Vanden Heuvel, who went on to start on the right side of the Badger's front wall for the last three seasons.
At Hudson High School, --NAME-- was named to Prep Star's All-American team and was rated one of the top 55 players in the Midwest, according to Super Prep, as a senior. He was rated the third-best player in Wisconsin by Rivals.com, earning first-team All-State honors from the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel.
The team captain and MVP was also a first-team All-Conference selection while starting every game as a junior and senior. --NAME-- lettered in basketball and track, in addition to playing football. As a senior, he placed fifth in shot put at the Division I state meet.
--NAME-- enrolled at Wisconsin in 2004, earning Scout Team Player of the Week honors for his performance on that squad prior to the Michigan State clash. In 2005, he started 13 games at right offensive tackle, delivering 66 knockdowns and nine touchdown-resulting blocks to earn second-team Freshman All-American honors. The team ranked 14th in the nation in scoring (34.31 ppg) and 11th in pass efficiency (149.51 rating) during his first year with the varsity.
In 2006, --NAME-- shifted to right offensive guard. He tallied 83 knockdowns and eight touchdown-resulting blocks to help the Badgers average 29.23 points and 373.2 yards per game in total offense. Even though the front wall allowed 30 quarterback sacks, only one was charged to its sophomore offensive guard.
As a junior, --NAME-- received consensus All-Big Ten Conference second-team honors. He started the first 10 games at right guard, closing the season with three more starting assignments at left tackle. He registered a team-high 104 knockdowns and led the Big Ten guards with 15 touchdown-resulting blocks. Behind his stellar performance, the team averaged 408.77 yards per game, finishing second in the league and 21st nationally with a rushing average of 200.77 yards. He also recorded the only tackle of his career, coming vs. Penn State.
Despite suffering a knee injury vs. Penn State that would sideline --NAME-- for two midseason games, he was named to Phil Steele's All-American first-team and chosen first-team All-Big Ten Conference by several publications. He made 72 knockdowns and 11 touchdown-resulting blocks, paving the way for the conference-leading ground attack that averaged 211.15 yards per game, the 14th-best figure in the nation.
2008: Sat out the Iowa (10/18) and Illinois games (10/18) after suffering a left knee medial collateral ligament sprain in the third quarter vs. Penn State (10/11).
Attended Hudson (Wis.) High School, playing football for head coach Craig Jilek Was a teammate of current Wisconsin Badgers offensive tackle Eric Vanden Heuvel Named to Prep Star's All-American team and was rated one of the top 55 players in the Midwest, according to Super Prep, as a senior Rated the third-best player in Wisconsin by Rivals.com, earning first-team All-State honors from the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel as a senior The team captain and MVP was also a first-team All-Conference selection while starting every game as a junior and senior Lettered in basketball and track, in addition to playing football As a senior, he placed fifth in shot put at the Division I state meet.
Versatile player who could handle strong-side guard or tackle duties. Tall and strong with a solid punch. Very difficult to bull rush, as he uses his hands and anchors very well. Moves feet fairly well in pass protection, walling off tackles to create holes inside and getting to linebackers at the second level. Traps and pulls inside, usually finding a target to negate. Combos well, pushing with one arm on the tackle and reaching the linebacker. Willing to head downfield on pass plays to get to safeties and corners. Comes out of his stance with power and gets his hands up on his man's jersey quickly. Picks up twists and blitzes well.
Plays a bit tall at times, and can get off balance. Loses the leverage battle at times as his pads aren't low enough in short-yardage situations. Best at trapping or pulling just outside the right tackle. Doesn't dominate smaller players in space as much as you'd think at his size. Tends to lean into his man a bit too much at the line, getting off balance and only adequately recovering.
-------------------------
Louis_Vasquez 71501 78
Texas Tech's potent offense would go nowhere without talent in the offensive line. --NAME--, a three-year starter at left guard with great size, is one of QB Graham Harrell's strongest companions. His nimble feet allow him to keep his quarterback's jersey clean and create angles inside for an underrated running game. He was named second team All-Big XII in 2008 after receiving honorable mentions the previous two seasons. Scouts wonder, however, if Tech linemen can transition from a two-point, wide-split offensive line scheme to the NFL. Had an arm span of 34 3/4 inches and a hand span of 10 3/8 inches at the combine.
Corsicana High School in Corsicana, Texas   Top 300 overall prospect nationally (Max Emfinger Recruiting)   Three-Star recruit (TheInsiders.com; Rivals.com)   Top 50 Offensive Linemen nationally (CollegeFootballNews.com)   Number 24 offensive tackle prospect nationally (Rivals.com)   Number 40 overall prospect (Scout.com Texas Hot 100)   Number 47 overall prospect (Rivals.com Texas Top 100)   Number 50 overall prospect (Scout.com Southwest Hot 100)   Number 18 overall prospect (Dallas Morning News Area Top 100)   Associated Press Class 4A First-Team All-State pick   Texas Sports Writers Association Class 4A All-State Second Team   Lubbock Avalanche-Journal State Fab 44 selection   Dallas Morning News All-Area Team   one of the top-rated offensive linemen in the state of Texas   Projected as left tackle at Tech   Helped lead team to 11-2 record last year; 10-2 junior season   first-team all-District 14-4A   Graded at 91 percent as a senior   56 pancakes and no sacks allowed during senior season   Excellent size, good strength   second-team all-district honors following junior season   clocked at 5.2 in the forty   benches 385, squats 450 and has a power clean of 310   also offered by LSU, Baylor, Kansas State, Iowa State, Nebraska, Oklahoma State, Texas and Texas A&M   High School Coach: David Henigan.
Tall with large middle, but not overly so, and strong legs. Strong anchor in pass protection, rarely gets beat one-on-one. Has enough foot speed to get to linebackers or safeties at the second or third level. Dominates smaller defenders in space. Good, not great, punch. Willing to stay on his man for a few yards downfield on run plays. Inexperienced as a drive blocker, but looks capable of getting low and maintaining the line of scrimmage in his limited chances.
Needs to prove he can transition from Tech's scheme to the NFL. Does not combo block much in wide split scheme. Is not quick to pick up late blitzers. Lacks explosiveness out of his stance and his pads are too high when his hand is down. Plays a bit upright in general, may lose leverage battles against stronger defensive tackles. Will lean forward and lose his balance when pass protecting for more than a couple of seconds.
-------------------------
Chip_Vaughn 71503 116
Along with linebacker Aaron Curry and cornerback Alphonso Smith, --NAME-- was another cornerstone of a defense that dominated in the Atlantic Coast Conference. A great special teams performer earlier in his career, he wrested the starting free safety job as a junior, but many professional scouts feel that --NAME--'s speed, size and ability vs. the run is more suited for strong safety at the next level.
Discipline in his game is one of his strongest suits, as it is very rare to see --NAME--'s emotions get the better of him on the field. He has shown excellent timing in competing for the ball in flight, as his 14 pass deflections in 2007 rank fourth on the school's single-season record list. He also has proven to be a capable hitter, as he became just the fourth defensive back in Wake Forest history to lead the team in tackles during a season, producing 105 hits during his junior campaign.
--NAME-- was known for his versatility during his career at Robinson Secondary High School. He was an Atlantic Hot 100 selection and rated the 56th-best wide receiver in the country by TheInsiders.com. As a senior, he caught 12 passes for 180 yards and a touchdown while playing for an offense that featured a strong running attack.
As a defensive back, --NAME-- was named first-team All-State, All-District and All-Region. He was rated the 10th-best overall prospect in the state of Virginia and named to the Top 66 squad by VirginiaPreps.com. In his final campaign, he recorded 96 tackles with 24 stops behind the line of scrimmage, two fumble recoveries, a pair of forced fumbles, six pass deflections and two interceptions, returning one pass theft for a touchdown.
--NAME-- enrolled at Wake Forest in 2004, spending the season adjusting to playing safety after originally being recruited as a wide receiver. He appeared in all 11 games in 2005, starting in the nickel package vs. East Carolina. He finished his first season with the varsity by delivering 25 tackles (16 solos) with a forced fumble. He also delivered 18 plays for the special teams coverage unit, using his quickness to down seven punts inside the 20-yard line, the best figure of any Division 1-A player that campaign.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- played mostly behind Josh Gattis at free safety, starting for an injured Gattis vs. Florida State. He switched from jersey Number 20 to Number 9 before the season opener, as he registered 41 tackles (33 solos), the 10th-best figure on the team. He deflected two passes, blocked a kick and was in on 14 key plays for the special teams squads, twice stopping punt returners for no gains and two more times that resulted in lost yardage by the opposition.
--NAME-- was an All-Atlantic Coast Conference honorable mention in 2007. He started 11 of 13 games at free safety, but suffered a concussion late in the season. He led the team with a career-high 105 tackles (62 solos), making 4.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He recovered two fumbles, returning one for a touchdown, as he also picked off a pass and led the Demon Deacons with 14 pass breakups. He also totaled nine special teams stops, all coming with the punt coverage squad.
As a senior, --NAME-- started 12 of the 13 games he appeared in. The All-ACC choice ranked third on the team with 87 tackles (59 solos), including 2.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He recovered two fumbles and deflected six passes. He also gained 37 yards on a pair of interceptions. He led a young secondary that ranked tied for 12th in the nation, as the Demon Deacons allowed only 172.54 yards passing per game.
2007: Suffered a concussion in the North Carolina State game (11/17).
Attended Robinson Secondary (Fairfax, Va.) High School, playing for head coach Mark Bendorf Atlantic Hot 100 selection and rated the 56th-best wide receiver in the country by TheInsiders.com As a senior, he caught 12 passes for 180 yards and a touchdown while playing for an offense that featured a strong running attack As a defensive back, --NAME-- was named first-team All-State, All-District and All-Region Rated the 10th-best overall prospect in the state of Virginia and named to the Top 66 squad by VirginiaPreps.com In his final campaign, he recorded 96 tackles with 24 stops behind the line of scrimmage, two fumble recoveries, a pair of forced fumbles, six pass deflections and two interceptions, returning one pass theft for a touchdown.
Looks the part. Rare size and upper-body development for the position. Aggressive defender that attacks in run support. Reliable open-field tackler. Heavy hitter that can separate the ballcarrier from the ball, resulting in forced fumbles and passes broken up. Appears to have at least adequate straight-line speed, good balance and a low backpedal. Good leaping ability to battle for the ball. Has developed a reputation for game-changing plays over his career. Came to Wake Forest as a wide receiver and is still an ascending player.
Better in run support than against the pass. Questionable instincts. A step slow in recognizing the action and has a hitch in his turn. May lack the agility to mirror routes. Better facing the quarterback. Loses track of the ball and has only marginal hand-eye coordination for the interception. Surrounded by a great deal of talent at Wake Forest.
-------------------------
David_Veikune 71505 52
Despite giving up as much as 80 pounds to opposing offensive tackles, --NAME--, with his relentless motor, collected 16 sacks and 25 tackles behind the line of scrimmage during his final two seasons with the Warriors.
--NAME-- is part of a military family, and has lived everywhere from Anchorage, Alaska, to Winslow, Ariz., to Las Cruces, N.M., and Hawaii. Several members of his family (mostly uncles) are nobles from the Tongan Islands. 
A cousin, Tony Fulilangi, was the fourth-ranked light heavyweight boxer in the world at one point. After fighting George Foreman, he went on to train Paea Wolfaram, who won a silver medal for the Tongan Islands at the 1996 Olympics Games in Atlanta. A cousin, Mapa Malupo, was a running back at College of the Canyons in California. 
--NAME--'s fierce warrior nature was evident even during his prep football career. At Campbell High School, he was rated one of the top defensive tackles in the country by Rivals.com. He added first-team All-State and All-Hawaii Red West honors from the Honolulu Star Bulletin and Honolulu Advertiser after his senior year, where he competed as a defensive end.
During his senior and junior years, --NAME-- was named to the Larry Prince All-Katoosh Team, which is a list of the state's "11 hardest hitters." He was also an All-State honorable mention selection his junior season. That year, he made 85 tackles (20 solo), five sacks and 12 stops for loss, as he also forced five fumbles, deflected eight passes, picked off another, blocked three kicks and registered 45 pressures.
As a senior, --NAME-- posted 92 tackles (21 solo), 26 stops for losses and 16.5 sacks. He recovered three fumbles, had 56 pressures, deflected three passes and blocked three blocked kicks. He also competed as a tight end.
--NAME-- also lettered in track (throws) at Campbell High, participating in both the discus and shot put, as well as also playing for the school's baseball team. As a freshman and sophomore, he lettered in football at Onate High School in Las Cruces.
In 2004, --NAME-- enrolled as a 230-pound defensive end at the University of Colorado, spending the season on the scout team. He never played for the Buffaloes, transferring to Fresno City College in 2005, where he earned All-Northern California Conference honor-able mention.
--NAME-- was again on the move in 2006, enrolling at the University of Hawaii. He spent the 2006 campaign playing behind Melila Purcell at left defensive end. The 235-pounder had a pair of sacks to go with 11 tackles (nine solos), as he also returned two kickoffs for 25 yards.
As a junior, he started just one of 13 games, but shared left end duties with Amari Purcell. He tallied 34 tackles (22 solo), as he led the team with seven sacks and finished third on the squad with 8.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage, including one that resulted in a safety.
--NAME-- was a second-team All-Western Athletic Conference choice as a senior. The Lombardi Award Watch List member ranked third on the team with 73 tackles (47 solo). He again paced the Warriors with nine sacks, the fourth-best total in the league. He also led Hawaii and ranked fifth in the WAC with 16.5 stops for losses. He chipped in eleven pressures while breaking up three passes and causing four fumbles.
Played at Fresno City College for one season after attending Colorado his first season   Lettered in football at FCC and was a honorable mention all-conference selection.
No injuries reported.
Attended Campbell (Ewa Beach, O'ahu, Ha.) High School as a junior and senior, playing football for head coach Tumoana Kenessey Rated one of the top defensive tackles in the country by Rivals.com Added first-team All-State and All-Hawaii Red West honors from the Honolulu Star Bulletin and Honolulu Advertiser after his senior year, where he competed as a defensive end During his senior and junior years, --NAME-- was named to the Larry Prince All-Katoosh Team, which is a list of the state's eleven hardest hitters  All-State honorable mention selection his junior season That year, he made 85 tackles (20 solos), five sacks and 12 stops for loss, as he also forced five fumbles, deflected eight passes, picked off another, blocked three kicks and registered 45 pressures As a senior, --NAME-- posted 92 tackles (21 solo), 26 stops for losses and 16.5 sacks Also recovered three fumbles, had 56 pressures, deflected three passes and blocked three blocked kicks. He also competed as a tight end Also lettered once in track (throws) at Campbell High, participating in both the discus and shot put, as well as also playing for the school's base-ball team As a freshman and sophomore, he lettered in football at Onate High School in Las Cruces, New Mexico.
High-motor power defensive end. Hustles down the line and chases downfield. Sheds blocks using strong, violent hands when he's fresh. Uses his stout frame to split double-teams and move to the ball while engaged. Has the explosiveness to get the edge by dropping his shoulder or using an over-arm move. Stands up on some plays and is able to contain bootlegs or cover backs or receivers in the flat on zone blitzes.
Not likely to out-quick NFL tackles to get an immediate pass rush off the edge. A bit shorter than scouts prefer, although he can get his hands up to deflect passes. Will get engulfed by larger tackles as he wears down. Has an inside spin move, but needs to be more consistent maintaining his balance to finish. Lacks elite athleticism.
TEDY BRUSCHI, New England -- Coming out of Arizona, Bruschi was the same type of player that --NAME-- is in that he made up for a lack of blazing speed with a relentless motor. With his ability to explode into bigger offensive linemen and make plays vs. action in front of him, --NAME-- could be a "poor man's" Bruschi in a 3-4 alignment. What better place for him to hone his skills than learning from the master himself in New England?
-------------------------
Pat_White 71511 44
There have been many quarterbacks attempt to break into the NFL after great success in college spread offenses. Some have been blessed with impressive athletic ability but usually have ended up moving to another position. 
--NAME-- understands his days as a quarterback could be over, but based on his work ethic and quickness, a shift to wide receiver or even tailback could see him find a quicker path to realizing his dream of playing in the National Football League.
--NAME-- has drawn comparisons to Pittsburgh's Hines Ward and Redskins' WR Antwaan Randle-El. Both were college quarterbacks who went on to great success as receivers in the NFL. For every Ward and Randle-El story, there are reminders of failures of other spread quarterbacks, most notably former Nebraska quarterback and Heisman Trophy winner Eric Crouch and West Virginia's Major Harris.
--NAME-- is a fine athlete. Many pro baseball scouts felt that he could be
a standout pitcher or outfielder, if he went to a baseball diamond. Coming out of high school, where he was a pitcher/outfielder on two state championship baseball teams, he was a fourth-round draft pick of the Los Angeles Angels in 2004. 
The nation's most versatile threat at quarterback, --NAME-- closed out his career as the NCAA's all-time leader in rushing yardage by a quarterback, registering 4,480 yards. Before he concluded his Mountaineers career, he would go on to establish 19 school, Big East Conference and major college records. The first starting quarterback to win four bowl games, he also is the first player in league history to gain over 10,000 yards in total offense (10,529). He also set the Big East mark for touchdowns responsible for (103).
Named the team's Most Valuable Player in each of his final three seasons, --NAME-- became the first three-time winner of the West Virginia Amateur Athlete of the Year Award. He was named MVP of the Senior Bowl in his home state of Alabama after guiding the South to a 35-18 victory over the North at Mobile. 
At Daphne High School, --NAME-- finished third in the "Mr. Football" voting by the Alabama Sports Writers Association as a senior. The first-team All-State Class 6-A quarterback rushed for 1,905 yards and 31 touchdowns as a senior, he passed for 1,488 yards and 15 scores. Daphne won 14 straight games before losing the state final, 22-17. 
--NAME-- was named to the All-Super Southeast team and was a member of the Mobile Register's Elite 18 squad in addition to being named the 2003 Sideline and 1st-and-10 Player of the Year. He also pitched and played in the outfield for three seasons, leading the baseball team to a pair of state championships.
Four months after --NAME-- signed with West Virginia in 2004, the Angels selected him in the fourth round of the Major League Baseball draft and offered a six-figure signing bonus. --NAME-- decided to stick with football. 
"My favorite moment as a player was when I realized I wanted to be a Mountaineer," he said. "The day of my visit, when I ran out on that field, it felt like nothing I've ever felt before." 
--NAME-- spent the 2004 season performing on the scout team. To help acclimate him to the system and more so because of his keen grasp of the playbook, he traveled with the team and was assigned to relaying signals to the WVU offense.
In 2005, --NAME-- was a consensus Freshman All-American and Freshman All-Big East Conference first-team choice. He appeared in twelve games, starting five contests for an injured Adam Bednarik. He gained just 828 yards on 65-of-114 passing (57.0%), but ranked second on the squad in rushing, gaining 952 yards with seven scores on 131 carries (7.3-yard average). He proved to be a running threat with great elusiveness and was sacked just five times during his first season on the varsity.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- was named the Big East Conference Offensive Player of the Year. He added All-ECAC first-team honors and was voted both Alabama and West Virginia Athlete of the Year. One of 18 semifinalists for Davey O'Brien Award, he completed 118-of-179 attempts (65.92%) for 1,655 yards, 13 touchdowns and seven interceptions. 
He finished second on the team in rushing, producing 1,219 yards and 18 scores on 165 attempts (7.4-yard average). Despite all the running, --NAME-- was sacked only 12 times, averaging 239.5 yards per game in total offense. A high ankle sprain vs. South Florida kept him out of the meeting vs. Rutgers. Along with tailback Steve Slaton (1,744), they became the 14th tandem in NCAA major college annals to give their team two 1,000-yard runners in the same season.
In 2007, the Big East Conference Offensive Player of the Year finished sixth in the voting for the Heisman Trophy. He was named to ESPN's All-Bowl Team, in addition to being selected the MVP of the Fiesta Bowl. He led the team in rushing with 1,335 yards and fourteen touchdowns, the second-best rushing total of any major college quarterback during the season. 
Along with Steve Slaton (1,051), they became the second tandem in NCAA annals to each rush for over 1,000 yards in consecutive seasons. The semifinalist for the Walter Camp Player of the Year Award and Davey O'Brien Award connected on 144-of-216 passes (66.67%) for 1,724 yards, 14 scores and only four interceptions. He also averaged 235.31 yards per game in total offense, despite missing good portions of the South Florida (right quad bruise) and Pittsburgh contests (right thumb dislocation) with injuries.
--NAME-- was selected All-Big East Conference first-team as a senior. Lacking his partner in the backfield, tailback Steve Slaton (Houston Texans), the quarterback anchored a young offense, completing 180-of-274 passes (65.69%) for a career-high 1,842 yards, 21 touchdowns and just seven interceptions. He finished second on the squad with 974 yards and eight scores on 191 rushing attempts (5.1-yard average), despite poor protection up front, as he was sacked a career-high 16 times.
The senior also averaged 234.67 yards per game in total offense in 12 contests. A helmet-to-helmet collision in the second quarter vs. Rutgers would knock him out of that contest and force him to sit out the next week vs. Syracuse.
"He is an electrifying athlete," North Carolina coach Butch Davis said of --NAME--. "The thing I think makes him equally as dangerous is that he can throw the football very, very well." Some Mountaineers fans have labeled him the greatest football player in school history. "Everybody's entitled to their opinion," --NAME-- said. "And I'm grateful to those that think so."
2006: Suffered a high ankle sprain vs. South Florida (11/25), sitting out the regular season finale vs. Rutgers (12/02), but he played with the injury in the Gator Bowl (1/01/07).
2007: Missed a good portion of the South Florida game (9/28) with a right quadriceps bruise Sat out part of the Pittsburgh contest (12/01) with a right thumb dislocation.
2008: Sat out the Syracuse game (10/11) after injuring his head due to a helmet-to-helmet collision the previous week vs. Rutgers (10/04).
Attended Daphne (Ala.) High School, playing football for head coach Steve Savarese Finished third in the "Mr. Football" voting by the Alabama Sports Writers Association as a senior The first team All-State Class 6-A quarterback rushed for 1,905 yards and 31 touchdowns as a senior, as he also passed for 1,488 yards (59-118) and 15 scores, as Daphne won 14 straight games before losing the state finals, 22-17 Named  to the All-Super Southeast team and was a member of the Mobile Register's Elite 18 squad, in addition to being named the 2003 Sideline and 1st-and-10 Player of the Year Also pitched and played in the outfield for three seasons, leading the baseball team to a pair of state championships.
Excellent speed and vision with the ball in his hands. Shows make-you-miss ability and a spin move to get out of a defender's grasp. Will take and deliver big hits despite his wiry frame. Has a solid throwing arm. Adequate accuracy on skinny posts and longer throws down the middle of the field. Will look off the safety before throwing to primary targets. Team leader. Keeps his eyes downfield when scrambling, gets the ball to a teammate after defenders suck up due to his running threat.
Doesn't appear to be a natural fit at any position. Lacks prototypical quarterback size and is not strong enough to take hits for a full season. Relied on wide passing lanes and play-action to get the ball downfield at WVU. Needs to prove he has the hands to play in the slot as a receiver. Does not always secure the ball, and will keep it in his strong (left) hand even when running right. Worked exclusively in the shotgun and spread offense. Can throw it deep but is not accurate on well-defended passes of more than 10-12 yards. Struggles with accuracy when on the move. Makes too many throws off his back foot. Doesn't have great touch on short throws. Delivery is stiff and mechanical. Lacks patience in the pocket, will take off too soon and misses open targets.
ANTWAAN RANDLE EL, Washington -- --NAME-- is likely to make a position switch to wide receiver. He lacks the arm strength and size to stay at quarterback at the next level, unless he plays in the CFL. Even with his outstanding rushing totals, he has not been the most durable player and with his slight frame, will not be able to withstand NFL punishment as an every-down running back. A move to slot receiver or flanker appears to be his quickest route to success, but he will need time to learn the techniques of being a receiver.
-------------------------
Brandon_Williams 71515 120
Big 12 opponents fully appreciated the impact --NAME-- had on the Red Raiders' in 2008, even if others paid more attention to the high-flying offense. After all, --NAME-- led the conference with 13 sacks, earning first-team All-Big 12 accolades as a junior, and leaves Tech ranked fourth in school history with 22.5 career sacks. --NAME-- is strictly a speed rusher, as he lacks the bulk and strength to provide much in the running game. Teams are always looking for pass rushers and this fact could make --NAME-- a top-100 selection come April, but another year at Texas Tech to get stronger would have been beneficial.
South Hills High School in Fort Worth, Texas   Number 69 overall prospect in Dallas area (Dallas Morning News)   District 8-4A first team after posting 102 tackles and 11 sacks during senior season   Rated as one of the state's top 20 defensive linemen   Timed at 4.8 second in the 40-yard dash   Also offered by Arkansas, Colorado, Iowa State, Central Florida and SMU   High school coach was Jerry Watson.
Lanky, athletic frame with room for at least an additional 15-20 pounds of added mass.   Good initial quickness off the snap.   Can pressure the edge immediately with his burst and has the balance and flexibility to get under the tackle and close.   Has a late short burst to close.   Good straight-line speed.
Essentially a one-trick pony at this time because he lacks the bulk and strength required to be dependable against the run in the NFL from the traditional defensive end position.   Lacks the balance and flexible hips to change direction fluidly and project as a linebacker.   Relies on his long arms and speed to trip up ballcarriers too often.   Is not a strong tackler and opponents break his arm tackles.
-------------------------
Derrick_Williams 71517 82
The 2004 National Prep Player of the Year, --NAME-- could have elected to attend any college or university of his choice. He knew that he would have an opportunity to be an immediate contributor and return Penn State to national prominence. Just days before Christmas four years ago, --NAME-- made the commitment to Penn State and three weeks later he was enrolled at the University Park campus. 
He made an immediate impact, bringing the play-making skills the team lacked and helping Penn State to an 11-2 record capturing the 2005 Big Ten Conference and 2006 Orange Bowl titles. 
Although he wasn't formally elected a team captain until his senior season, --NAME-- has been a highly respected leader throughout his career. The fruits of --NAME--' leadership have been a 40-11 record over the past four years, among the 10 best in the nation. He was instrumental in leading Penn State to its second Big Ten crown in four years and its
third different New Year's bowl game, having already beaten foes from the ACC, SEC and Big 12 in the postseason.
The highly-skilled --NAME-- further solidified his status as one of the nation's most versatile and dynamic playmakers. He was one of just three players in the Joe Paterno era to gain more than 1,000 yards via kickoff returns in a career (1,095). He finished third in PSU annals with 161 receptions and fourth with 4,156 all-purpose yards. After hitting the trifecta as a sophomore and junior, scoring via receiving rushing and punt returns, --NAME-- added a new scoring opportunity to that accomplishment by also returning two kickoffs for scores to go along with his four touchdown grabs, three rushing scores and one punt return for a touchdown in 2008.
At Eleanor Roosevelt High School, --NAME-- fashioned a tremendous career. He was a consensus All-American and was named the Rivals.com and G&W Recruiting Report National Player of the-Year. An All-USA Today selection, he also was an All-Metro choice by the Washington Post. Parade Magazine honored him as an All-American all-purpose player. In 2004, he was the subject of a series of stories in the Washington Post on his senior season and recruitment.
During his senior season of 2004, --NAME-- was 56 of 91 passes for 972 yards and 13 touchdowns, ran for 1,123 yards and 12 touchdowns and caught 11 passes for 203 yards and two more scores. He also accumulated 479 punt return yards and added another score. As a defensive back, he had four interceptions and 34 tackles. 
In his junior year, --NAME-- rushed for 1,350 yards and 28 touchdowns and threw for 700 yards and five scores. He also recorded 46 tackles, 13 pass break-ups, three interceptions and three fumble recoveries in 2003, adding 760 return yards. He also was a sprinter on the track and field squad. 
--NAME-- made an immediate impact when he joined the Nittany Lions for the 2005 spring semester. While he was sidelined for Penn State's final five games (including the Orange Bowl) after breaking his left arm while returning a kickoff late in the game at Michigan, --NAME--' speed and athleticism helped jump start Penn State's drive to the Big Ten Championship while diversifying what developed into a very potent offense. 
Named to The Sporting News Freshman All-Big Ten Conference team, he had six plays of 20 yards or more and averaged 11.7 yards on his 57 touches. He caught 22 passes for 289 yards (13.1 avg) and a score, adding 105 yards and three touchdowns on 22 carries while also returning 13 kickoffs for 274 yards (21.0 avg). He lined up at split end, flanker and in the backfield and demonstrated his ability to beat teams running and receiving.
--NAME-- again was a catalyst for the Penn State offense and special teams in 2006. A starter in 12 games, he was second on the team with 955 all-purpose yards, averaging 9.1 yards on his 105 touches. He made 40 receptions for 440 yards, giving Penn State a trio of players with 40 or more catches in a season for the first time. 
--NAME-- had 36 carries for 145 yards (includes a sack when lined up at quarterback), 25 punt returns for a 12.0-yard average (second-best in the Big Ten), four kickoff returns for a 17.2-yard average and one pass attempt.
A starter in all 13 games, --NAME-- gained 1,121 all-purpose yards, second-highest on the team in 2007. He averaged a superlative 10.37 yards on his 108 touches, as he took on a larger role in the passing game, making a team-high 55 catches for 529 yards and three touchdowns. 
--NAME--' 55 receptions were tied for third on the school single-season record list. He ranked third in the Big Ten in punt returns, averaging 11.0 yards on 23 returns. He also had an impressive rushing average, gaining 101 yards on 16 carries for a 6.3-yard average, with one touchdown.
Graduating in December 2008, --NAME-- was selected a second-team All-American by The Sporting News and Walter Camp Football Foundation, adding first-team All-Big Ten Conference honors. He was the only player in the nation to score this season via a rush, reception, kickoff return and punt return. He accomplished three of the above during a brilliant performance in the primetime win over Illinois, becoming the first player under Joe Paterno to score a via a rush, reception and kick return in the same game.
--NAME-- accumulated a career-high 241 all-purpose yards vs. the Illini, the most by a Nittany Lion since Larry Johnson in 2002. He ranked second in the conference with a 25.75-yard average on 20 kickoff returns, adding 169 yards and a score on 18 punt returns (9.4 avg). 
--NAME-- hauled in 44 passes, second on the team, good for 485 yards (11.0 avg) and four touchdowns. He also had 243 yards and three scores on 43 carries, finishing the season with 1,412 all-purpose yards, the 12th-best season total in school history.
2005: Missed the team's final five games after he suffered a left arm fracture vs. Michigan (10/15).
Attended Eleanor Roosevelt (suburban Washington, D.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Rick Houchens Consensus All-American and was named the Rivals.com and G&W Recruiting Report National Player of the Year All-USA Today selection All-Metro choice by the Washington Post Parade Magazine honored him as an All-American all-purpose player During his senior season of 2004, --NAME-- was 56 of 91 for 972 yards and 13 touchdown passes, ran for 1,123 yards and 12 touchdowns and caught 11 passes for 203 yards and two more scores Also accumulated 479 punt return yards and added another score As a defensive back, he had four interceptions and 34 tackles In his junior year, --NAME-- rushed for 1,350 yards and 28 touchdowns and threw for 700 yards and five scores Also recorded 46 tackles, 13 pass break-ups, three interceptions and three fumble recoveries in 2003, adding 760 return yards Was a sprinter on the track and field squad In 2004, he was the subject of a series of stories in the Washington Post on his senior season and recruitment.
Good height with a strong upper body. Quick off the line, reaching top speed within a couple of steps. Uses moves and his hands to get off press coverage. Lines up in the slot and outside. Finds holes in the end zone and presents a target. Typically solid hands, catching the ball away from his frame. Cognizant of the sidelines, and can tightrope or tiptoe to stay in-bounds. Good hands on returns, catching punts over his shoulder if necessary. Retains the catch after a big hit. Excellent straight-line speed and quickness; able to make the first defender miss. Takes direct snaps and handoffs, and is willing to run tough inside. Shows nice vision and toughness after the catch, as a returner and getting the occasional carry as a running back. Very willing blocker downfield, using his strength, good angles and sound technique to keep safeties and corners out of the play. Team captain as a senior, and a vocal leader in practice and during games. Deflects credit to his teammates after big games. Stayed a positive leader while not putting up huge numbers in 2008.
Was never "the guy" at Penn State, so it's not clear if he's an elite receiver. Lacks the short-area quickness or elusiveness most top NFL returners exhibit. Needs to work a bit on his footwork coming in and out of routes. Does not always separate from defenders as his timed speed would indicate. Concentration lapses occasionally when trying to make a move after the catch.
-------------------------
Eric_Wood 71523 28
--NAME-- is the picture of durability. The unquestioned leader of the Cardinals' front wall, he finished his career with 49 consecutive starts at center, the second-longest streak in school history behind Travis Leffew (51, 2002-05). It was also the sixth-longest streak among active NCAA players last season, topped by Andrew Hartline of Central Michigan (51), Andrew Gardner of Georgia Tech (51), Jason Phillips of Texas Christian (50), Dallas Reynolds of Brigham Young (50) and Clint Sintim of Virginia (50).
Called by many the "most prepared player in the nation," --NAME-- has been known to be found in the wee hours of the morning still examining game tapes in the film room, preparing for his upcoming opponent. He not only brings incredible knowledge and instincts to the field, but plays with the true nastiness that has scouts comparing him to the NFL's old time centers like Mike Webster of the Pittsburgh Steelers and Tim Grunhard of the Kansas City Chiefs.
Performing as his team's Iron Man is nothing new for --NAME--. He started every game in his final two seasons at Elder High School, as the team compiled a 28-2 record during that span. As a 15-game starter at offensive tackle, he guided the school to its second straight state title with a 31-7 win over St. Edward's High as a senior, picking up all-league first-team accolades. 
As a junior, --NAME-- started at both offensive guard and tackle, in addition to lining up at tight end, earning all-district honorable mention. He also earned a pair of letters playing on the basketball team, picking up all-league recognition during his final campaign.
--NAME-- enrolled at Louisville in 2004, turning down scholarship offers from Bowling Green, Ohio University, Cincinnati, Indiana and Columbia. He spent that season performing on the scout team, but a stellar performance in 2005 spring drills earned him the starting center position, a job he would maintain throughout his playing career. He was a consensus Freshman All-American, adding Academic All-Big East Conference honors, as he delivered 85 knockdowns and had touchdown-resulting blocks on nine of the team's 41 scores on the ground.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- received All-Big East Conference second-team recognition. He started all 13 games, registering 79 knockdowns to go with 10 touchdown-resulting blocks. He made all the line calls, as the offense ranked second in the country, averaging 475.31 yards per game. He also posted a pair of tackles.
In 2007, --NAME-- led the nation's sixth-ranked offense, picking up All-Big East first-team honors. He collected 86 knockdowns and 11 touchdown-resulting blocks. He was one of the few bright spots on a turnover-prone offense, grading 83.25 percent for blocking consistency. He helped the team average 488.0 yards per game, but the Cardinals' running game was halted, placing 64th in the country (146.08 ypg) after finishing 12th the previous season (185.31 ypg).
For the second season in a row, Louisville failed to make the bowl season in 2008. --NAME-- continued his stellar play, receiving third-team All-American and first-team All-Big East honors. The offense scored only 34 times, with --NAME-- ranking second among the nation's centers with 16 touchdown-resulting blocks. He graded 87.08 percent for blocking consistency and made 78 knockdowns as the Cardinals averaged 376.67 yards per game. He also recorded an assisted tackle.
2008: Sat out the second half of the Tennessee Tech game (9/06) with a slight knee sprain.
Attended Elder (Cincinnati, Ohio) High School Started every game over the course of his final two seasons, as the team compiled a 28-2 record during that span As a 15-game starter at offensive tackle, he guided the school to its second-straight state title with a 31-7 win over St. Edward's High as a senior, picking up All-League first-team accolades As a junior, --NAME-- started at both offensive guard and tackle, in addition to lining up at tight end, earning All-District honorable mention Also earned a pair of letters playing on the basketball team, picking up All-League recognition during his final campaign.
Taller than most centers, but not too upright in pass protection and can still cut block. Works hard on every play, and goes through the whistle. Gets off the ball quickly and gets into the numbers of his man. Can drive back smaller tackles and sustain. Leader of the line and makes the calls. Permanent team captain in 2008. Solid anchor, using his arms and feet to keep tackles on the line. Will pancake smaller tackles when he gets the inside shoulder. Uses his hands and feet to position blockers, creating holes inside. Picks up late blitzers up the middle. Reliable snap to the quarterback.
Not as nimble as some teams may want their pivot man. Can adequately combo to the middle linebacker and get in front of screens at the college level, but may have issues handling NFL speed in the open field. Only adequate in getting his pads low to drive block, and could improve there.
-------------------------
Ron_Brace 79535 40
--NAME-- might not dazzle you in the statistical department, but he has played a critical role to the success of the team in shutting down the run the last two years. With his wide body, long wing span and impressive power, he can terrorize guards and centers in the trenches. What he offers an NFL team is an athlete who can play the three-technique (under-tackle) position in a 4-3 alignment or easily handle multiple blockers as a nose guard in a 3-4 scheme.
As a junior, he led a front wall that ranked second in the nation, as the Eagles allowed only 75.50 yards per game on the ground. During his senior campaign, he teamed with fellow tackle B.J. Raji to pace a unit that led the Atlantic Coast Conference in rush defense (91.21 ypg, seventh in the NCAA) and total defense (268.14 ypg, ranked fifth nationally). --NAME-- and Raji combined for 11 of the team's 35 sacks (31.43 percent) and 27 of the Eagles' 108 tackles behind the line of scrimmage (25.0 percent). 
--NAME-- excelled in football and track at Burncoat High School. He earned All-State and Worcester Telegram & Gazette All-Star honors in 2003. The defensive lineman was a three-time Inter-High All-Star choice and captured team MVP recognition as a senior. The team captain also played in the 2004 Massachusetts Shriners Football Classic. He excelled as a member of Burncoat's track and field team, winning the state shot put title in 2003 and 2004. 
--NAME-- enrolled at Boston College, spending the 2004 season playing on the scout team. He appeared in eight games in 2005, starting vs. Wake Forest, as he finished with 11 tackles (6 solos) with a stop for a loss. The following season, he started 11 times at the left defensive tackle position. He registered 20 tackles (11 solos) that included 3.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage and also recovered a fumble.
As a junior, --NAME-- was named All-Atlantic Coast Conference honorable mention. He was in on just 27 tackles (14 solos), but ranked third on the squad with 7.5 stops for losses, including 2.5 sacks. He was awarded the Nugent Family Football Scholarship before his final season.
--NAME-- earned All-ACC second-team honors in 2008. He extended his starting string to 37 games, producing 27 tackles (19 solos) from his left defensive tackle position. He finished second on the team with eleven stops behind the line of scrimmage, as he also caused a fumble and recorded a career-high three sacks.
2007: Left the Florida State game twice (11/03) with back spasms.
2008: Bothered by back problems that limited him in August camp Was helped off the field vs. Georgia Tech (9/15) due to back problems Injured his toe, missing the bulk of the second half vs. Maryland (11/29).
Attended Burncoat (Worcester, Mass.) High School, playing football for head coach Chris Moriarty Earned All-State and Worcester Telegram & Gazette All-Star honors in 2003  The defensive lineman was a three-time Inter-High All-Star choice and captured team MVP recognition as a senior The team captain also played in the 2004 Massachusetts Shriners Football Classic Excelled as a member of Burncoat's track and field team, winning the state shot put title in 2003 and 2004.
Square-framed, naturally large man. Surprising initial quickness off the snap to disrupt the play before it has a chance to begin. Good lateral quickness to slide down the line. Good use of hands to slap away the blockers' attempts to control him. Good overall strength, especially in his lower body, to hold up at the point. Can anchor against the double-team and flashes the ability to split. Able to close if given a free lane. Recognizes the action quickly and can slide off the block onto the runner as he goes by. Versatile defender capable of projecting as a zero-, one- or three-technique at the next level.
Only "phone booth" quickness. Requires a free lane to close on the quarterback and isn't going to provide significant interior pass rush. Marginal effort and ability in pursuit. Flanked by a better prospect in Raji and often faces only one blocker. Struggled with a recurring back injury in 2008. Concern over back injury only heightened considering his heavy build and potential to allow his weight to get out of control.
MAAKE KEMOEATU-Carolina -- Like Kemoeatu, --NAME-- has surprising athleticism for a big man, but lacks the foot speed to make plays in long pursuit. Playing in a phone booth, he does a good job of clogging the rush lanes. While he can play in a classic 4-3 alignment, he is much more effective handling action in the middle of the field. With so many teams utilizing the 3-4 defensive alignment in 2009, he is more enticing as a nose guard.
-------------------------
Robert_Brewster 79539 75
Despite being a four-year starter and two-time first-team All-MAC recipient at left tackle, --NAME-- ranks as one of the more underrated components in Ball State's emergence into the national spotlight. He won't be underrated by scouts. --NAME--'s lateral agility makes him not only effective mirroring defenders in pass protection, but when blocking for the run. As with many tackles coming to the NFL as products of the spread offense, however, scouts are curious to see how effective --NAME-- would be in the running game out of a three-point stance. Had an arm span of 34 inches and a hand span of 9 1/4 inches at the combine.
Good initial quickness off the snap.   Good lateral agility.   Good flexibility for the cut block.   Can get out and run to make blocks at the second level.   Good initial pop.   Can turn the defender and seal.   Flashes some nastiness and looks to finish his opponent when he feels vulnerability.   Good initial quickness for pass protection and is light on his feet.   Bends naturally at the knees and eases out of his stance fluidly with the balance to mirror defenders.
Operates out of the spread and is rarely asked to block out of a three point stance. Inconsistent hand punch. Only marginal hand quickness. Will allow his hands to get outside the chest-plate when run blocking. Provides a good initial pop, but lacks the strength to consistently sustain.
-------------------------
Donald_Brown 79543 27
--NAME-- will not only be missed on the field for the Huskies, but also off it. He had become the university's "poster child" for his work within the community and recently began work on organizing a mentoring program for high school players from the New Jersey Shore League that produced --NAME-- and Georgia's Knowshon Moreno. He also unveiled plans to present the --NAME-- Player-to-Player Leadership Conference back in his home state.
Ask anyone on the Connecticut staff to name the team's hardest worker and it sounds like a choir with everyone singing the praises for --NAME--. Ask any teammate who they would go to for mentoring or extra help and the first name you hear is --NAME--'s. "Donnie understands the importance of giving back and how to prepare for life after football," his former head coach at Red Bank Catholic High School, Frank Edgerly, recently said. "He has a great perspective on life."
During his prep days, --NAME-- was named first-team all-division, All-Monmouth County and All-Jersey Shore, in addition to earning second-team all-state honors as a senior. The Divisional Offensive MVP and team captain rushed for 2,032 yards and scored 27 touchdowns that year. The recipient of the All-American Scholar Award, he also lettered six times on the school's indoor and outdoor track teams.
--NAME-- enrolled at Connecticut in 2005, where he was the top offensive player on the Huskies' scout team while redshirting that season. In 2006, --NAME-- earned All-Big East Conference recognition, taking over as the team's starting tailback for four games after Terry Caulley was injured. 
He led the team with 896 yards and seven touchdowns on 161 carries (5.6 avg.) in 12 games. He ran for 118 yards and two touchdowns on just nine attempts in his college debut vs. Rhode Island and totaled 205 yards rushing vs. Pittsburgh, the 14th time a Connecticut player totaled more than 200 yards on the ground in a game.
--NAME-- was primed for a banner sophomore campaign, but after starting the first five games, he suffered an ankle sprain vs. Akron and when he returned, he was used in a reserve role. Undaunted, he still piled up 821 yards on 170 runs (4.8 avg.) that included eight touchdowns.
In 2008, --NAME-- won his starting job back by default, as Andre Dixon, who took advantage of --NAME--'s 2007 injury to take over as the Huskies' starting tailback, suffered the same fate in fall camp. This time, --NAME-- would not give the job back. He became the first player in school history to lead the nation in rushing, averaging 160.23 yards per game. The nation's only 2,000-yard rusher set school and Big East Conference season records with 2,083 yards on 367 carries (5.7 avg.). He also scored on 18 rushes and finished third on the squad with 21 receptions, good for 125 yards (6.0 avg.).
2007: Suffered a left ankle/foot sprain vs. Akron (9/29) Forced to wear a protective boot for two weeks, sitting out the next game vs. Virginia (10/13).
Attended Red Bank (N.J.) High School, playing football for head coach Frank Egerly Named first-team all-division, All-Monmouth County and All-Jersey Shore, in addition to earning second-team all-state honors as a senior The Divisional Offensive MVP and team captain rushed for 2,032 yards and scored 27 touchdowns that year The recipient of the All-American Scholar Award, he also lettered six times on the school's indoor and outdoor track teams.
Compact build. Runs with a low center of gravity. Good speed to and through the hole. Best attributes might be his vision and stop-and-start ability. Shifty runner who can slide in and out of the hole at the point of attack and hit the seam before it really opens. Deceptively fast once he gets to the second level. Good balance to appear to lean one way to deceive the oncoming safety, only to bounce the other. At least adequate straight-line speed to gain yardage in chunks. Soft hands out of the backfield and an alert receiver. High effort player.
A bit narrow in his shoulders and might lack the frame to add much weight. Might lack the bulk and leg drive to be a true bell-cow runner at the NFL level. Lacks elite speed to breakaway from NFL defenders. Marginal size and strength as a pass blocker. Struggles of past Connecticut backs to translate their collegiate success to the NFL will force some teams to pause on draft day, especially considering the role left tackle William Beatty -- himself a first-day prospect -- had on --NAME--'s success.
-------------------------
David_Bruton 79545 114
--NAME-- flashed as a playmaker in his first season as a starter in 2007, when he had 85 tackles, three interceptions and 4.5 tackles for loss. His production increased in some ways during his senior year (91 tackles, four interceptions, two forced fumbles), but his overall play did not result in Notre Dame's defensive improvement. A team captain, he has the size, speed and athleticism to potentially be a good starter and very good special teams player at the next level.
Graduated from Miamisburg (Ohio) High School   Made 54 tackles, three interceptions and broke up seven passes as a senior   Caught 10 passes for 200 yards as a receiver   Averaged 41 yards on four kickoff returns   Earned All-Division I-II all-area honors from Dayton Daily News   Won all-district honors on defense   All-conference and special mention all-Southwest Ohio as a junior   As a junior in 2003, intercepted eight passes, made 58 tackles and had 270 receiving yards   Attended Notre Dame football camp in the summer of 2004   Coached by Tim Lewis.
Centerfielder with good height and upper-body build.   Nice straight-line speed and overall athleticism for his size.   Usually able to track down ballcarriers from behind, although he will usually take the correct angle to prevent the catastrophic play.   Covers a lot of ground in the deep half, with the ability to high-point the ball on the sideline for the interception.   Good hands make to quarterbacks pay for overthrows.   Also moves inside-out well to get to ballcarriers on stretch plays, either behind the line of scrimmage or working through trash.   Breaks down well, getting low to make the tackle in the open field.   Long enough to wrap up in space and get a hand on the ball to force the turnover.   Major special teams contributor for the Irish as a gunner, winning hand-play at the line, beating the double team, showing good speed down the field and securing the tackle.   Good leader and hard worker.
Stiff in the hips.   Has trouble flipping open in transition.   Adequate closing on underneath patterns and staying with tight ends, but struggles manning up against quicker receivers.   Needs to improve reading quarterback so he can be involved in more plays.   Not physical enough against the run or in coverage.   Often loses hand battles and fights for the ball with receivers.   Doesn't explode into tackles, but is more of a catcher.   Running backs drive through his arm tackles.   Will whiff in the open field when ducking his head instead of seeing what he hits.
-------------------------
Joe_Burnett 79547 168
--NAME-- made headlines since starting as a freshman because of his skills as a cornerback (16 career interceptions, 35 pass breakups) and return man (three punt, two kickoff returns for touchdown). The four-year starter was named first-team All-Conference USA at cornerback and kickoff and punt returner as a senior. A bit smaller and slower than most teams would like in a starter, --NAME-- is a strong, confident Tampa-2 corner in the making.
Second team Class 2A defensive back selection   Coached by Steve Moser   Impressive athlete who lettered four years in football and basketball   Nominated for the McDonald's All-America game in basketball   Also earned three letters in track and one in baseball   Second in Florida history with 31 career interceptions   Three-star recruit according to rivals.com   Ranked Number 85 prospect in the state of Florida according to the Orlando Sentinel   First-team all-state selection   Named regional MVP   Earned defensive player of the year honors in both football and basketball during standout career   All-area first-team selection four times   Tallied five interceptions with 78 solo tackles and 24 assists as a senior   Also contributed 689 passing and 874 rushing yards offensively   Productive junior season featured nine interceptions, along with 68 solo tackles and 20 assists   Rushed for 20 touchdowns and 1,300 yards as a junior   528 kickoff return yards and 340 punt return yards during junior season.
Confident and a leader on the field.   Stronger than you'd expect for his size.   Good vertical, able to make a play on jump balls.   Solid hands for the interception and is elusive enough to make yardage after the catch.   Good recovery and closing speed -- is never out of a play.   Nice hand-eye coordination to break up passes.   Quality kickoff and punt returner because he has solid hands, good vision and patience, hits the open lane hard, makes the first man miss and runs through arm tackles.
A bit small and light to handle larger NFL receivers, although he has a good lower-body build.   Lacks elite top-end speed.   Not particularly strong on the line and struggles to get off blocks.   Brings pressure as a blitzer but does not finish off the quarterback.   Usually plays off the receiver in order to get cushion on deep routes.   More of a cut tackler, does not wrap up often enough.   Probably best in a zone system with help over the top.   Is not a typical pro punt returner with great speed and quickness.
-------------------------
Glen_Coffee 79549 74
Much like former Crimson Tide great Shaun Alexander, --NAME-- is a running back with a perfect mix of size and speed. He is not only effective between the tackles, but also showed with his long-distance runs in 2008 that he is perfectly capable of turning the corner and racing to the end zone.
A backup most of his career, --NAME-- made the most of his first opportunity to start during his junior campaign. His 1,383 rushing yards tied Alexander for the second-best season total in school history. He also showed good "pedigree" off the field, as he shared the 2008 Derrick Thomas Community Service Award with linebacker Cory Reamer, an honor awarded at the conclusion of spring practice. 
The Fort Walton Beach High School graduate led his prep squad to the District 2-4A title and an appearance in the regional championship game as a senior. He rushed for 1,886 yards that season, adding 350 yards receiving while amassing a total of 29 touchdowns. As a junior, he scored seven times and generated 850 yards on 132 carries, as he also caught 18 balls for 275 yards and four more scores.
--NAME-- enrolled at Alabama in 2005 and saw considerable action in 12 games as a reserve. He rushed 48 times for 179 yards (3.7 avg.) and caught eight passes for 91 yards (11.4 avg.), including a touchdown. He added 25 yards on two kickoff returns, finishing his first year in a Tide uniform with 295 all-purpose yards.
Looking to claim the starting tailback position in 2006, --NAME-- spent the season in rehabilitation rather than on the football field. He missed spring drills with an ankle injury and also underwent hernia surgery. During August camp, he suffered right knee ligament damage and a bone bruise. Even though he did not require surgery, the staff decided that with the depth the Tide had in the running unit, that it was best that --NAME-- be granted a medical hardship.
--NAME-- started three of the nine games he appeared in during the 2007 campaign. He was suspended for four midseason games as part of the university-wide textbook scandal, but still finished second on the team with 545 yards and four touchdowns on 129 rushing attempts (4.2 avg.). He snatched 18 passes for 142 yards (7.9 avg.), made a pair of tackles and produced 687 all-purpose yards.
As a senior, --NAME-- earned All-Southeastern Conference first-team honors. Despite a late-season hip bruise, he finished second on the school season-record list with 1,383 yards on 233 carries (5.9 avg.), finding the end zone 10 times. He also gained 118 yards with a score on 16 receptions and delivered two tackles. His yards per rushing attempt average of 5.94 yards also rank second on the Tide's annual record chart.
2006: Missed most of April camp with an ankle sprain Underwent surgery (5/31) to repair an athletic hernia Suffered a bone bruise and a severe right knee medial collateral and anterior cruciate ligament sprain in August camp (8/14) and was granted a medical hardship.
2007: Suffered a slight shoulder contusion vs. Vanderbilt (9/08).
2008: Missed the bulk of the second half vs. Arkansas State (11/01) with a bruised hip.
Attended Fort Walton Beach (Fla.) High School, leading his prep squad to the District 2-4A title and an appearance in the regional championship game as a senior Rushed for 1,886 yards that season, adding 350 yards receiving while amassing a total of 29 touchdowns  As a junior, he scored seven times and generated 850 yards on 132 carries, as he also caught 18 balls for 275 yards and four more scores.
Well-built athlete. A bit of a slasher. Sees the hole and shows surprising burst to it, considering his height. Can make defenders miss in the open field, but seems to prefer physically taking them on at times. Lowers his shoulder into the defender and looks to intimidate. Runs with a chip on his shoulder. Good acceleration through the second level of the defense and into the open field. At least adequate straight-line speed. Good vision at the second level for the cutback. Experienced receiver out of the backfield. Good upper-body strength and effort as a pass blocker. Has been a weight room monster since high school. Has matured during his college career, and is now a faith-driven leader and sought-after speaker in the community.
Has a bit of an odd build for a running back. Thin hips, and though well built he lacks the bulk in his core and lower body that scouts prefer for a power runner. Runs a bit upright, which just adds to the concern regarding his build and power-running. Likes to run over defenders, but too often goes down on contact. Suspended for four games in 2007 as part of an Alabama textbook scandal. Redshirted 2006 with a knee injury.
-------------------------
James_Davis 79551 195
--NAME-- earned a second-round grade from the NFL Advisory Committee in 2007 after rushing for more than 3,000 yards and 36 touchdowns over his first three years at Clemson. But the two-time first-team All-ACC pick elected to return for his senior season, again showing a player's stock doesn't always increase by returning to school. He rushed for only 751 yards and 11 touchdowns in 2008; still, --NAME-- flashed the speed, power and aggression to run over defenders to be a fine NFL back in his limited chances behind a struggling quarterback and offensive line. In the right system, he could contribute immediately. Had an arm span of 30 1/2 inches and a hand span of 10 inches at the combine.
Rushed for 2,389 yards and 28 touchdowns on 350 carries as a senior at Douglass High rushed for 300 yards or more in two games as a senior rushed for 7,339 yards and 80 touchdowns in his career #42 player in the nation, #7 running back in the nation, and #16 player in Georgia by Rivals.com SuperPrep Dixie team pick as the #4 prospect in Georgia Georgia North/South game co-MVP; scored the only touchdown to lead the North to victory #17 running back in the nation by ESPN.com #17 running back in the nation by CollegeFootballNews.com honorable mention All-Southern team by Orlando Sentinel team captain as a senior received the Golden Helmet Award as the team MVP SuperPrep All-American as the #24 running back in the nation; listed #26 by Scout.com #56 player in the southeast by SuperPrep AAAAA all-state by Atlanta Constitution as a senior honorable mention AAAAA all-state as a junior coached by Gary Cantrell chose Clemson over Alabama, Florida, Georgia, Kentucky, Louisiana State, Mississippi State, Tennessee, and Virginia Tech born Jan. 1, 1986 majoring in sociology.
Tight skinned athlete with good overall musculature. Good all-around athleticism. Quick to the hole. Good lateral quickness to make defenders miss in the open field. Can stop and start to elude defenders and is a threat to gain big yardage every time he touches the ball. Not a bullish runner, but has good lower leg drive and is at his best when he gets significant carries. Flashes explosiveness and can run through tackles. Secure ball handler.
Characterized as the "Thunder" in Clemson's "Thunder and Lightning" combo of he and C.J. Spiller, but isn't necessarily a strong interior runner. Effective interior downhill runner and will bowl over the occasional unsuspecting defender, but lacks the explosive power to gain the tough yards after contact. Only marginal production as a receiver, but shows the hands and body control to be productive in this area. Lacked effort and technique as a pass blocker and really struggled in this area during the Senior Bowl. Missed most of the 2008 spring recovering from offseason shoulder surgery.
-------------------------
Dominique_Edison 79553 206
--NAME-- has been a consistent performer for the Lumberjacks since his freshman season, gaining more than 500 yards each of his first three seasons and scoring 10 times. But his productivity jumped into the stratosphere in 2008 (67 catches, 1,106 yards, 18 scores), as did his NFL draft stock. Unlike many small-school receiver prospects, this first-team All-Southland Conference selection has the size/speed combination to be more than just a complementary weapon. Had an arm span of 32 1/2 inches and a hand span of 8 1/2 inches at the combine.
Four-sport athlete lettering in football, basketball, baseball and track   Had 90 catches for 1,916 yards and 17 touchdowns in his high school career   Helped Wolves to 2003 state 2A title   Had eight catches for 306 yards and three TDs vs. Omaha Paul Pewitt as a senior   Won the 2A 200-meter state title in 2004.
Overmatches lower-level talent with good height and sinewy upper body strength. Separates from most FCS corners with his elite speed. Catches with his hands and is able to go outside his frame to adjust to poorly thrown passes in any direction. Uses his hands or feet on the line to free himself off the jam. Quick into and out of routes. Has good body control, and is able to get his feet down, high-point the ball in traffic and make a quick move after the catch. Typically runs stay-routes on the sideline and posts, but is also used on underneath crossing routes to get him the ball quickly. Sells the outside route fake, and uses his body to shield corners on the post. Covers up and locks onto defensive backs while run blocking.
Lanky frame that is thin in the hips and legs. Productive, but at a lower division playing in a spread offense regularly using four- or five-receiver sets. Lacks suddenness off the line and takes a couple of steps to get to full speed. Only average elusiveness in space, lacking wiggle in his hips. Faced lower-level corners, so it may take some time until he's physical enough against NFL veterans on the jam and downfield. Must prove he can handle going over the middle. Could increase his value by returning kicks, but is inexperienced there.
-------------------------
Josh_Freeman 79557 17
Georgia's Matthew Stafford and Southern California's Mark Sanchez are getting most of the attention, but a team could turn out to be the ultimate winner with --NAME-- as its consolation prize on draft day.
There are teams that consider --NAME-- the finest all-around athlete available at the position. The junior has been a model of consistency and an outstanding leader who possesses a strong, accurate arm to go along with his unbelievable frame.
He never had the weapons that both Stafford and Sanchez had to work with but he made things happen with his strong arm and mobility. He also developed touch and has top physical skills. He might have the best opportunity of the three top-level quarterbacks to succeed at the next level.
--NAME-- was one of the most highly sought recruits during his senior year at Grandview High School, where he played for head coach Jason Godfrey, whose staff also included --NAME--'s father, Ron (defensive coordinator). --NAME-- received a four-star prospect rating from both Rivals.com and Scout.com, throwing for over 7,000 yards during his career. Rivals.com rated him the fourth-best pro-style quarterback in the nation and he was rated ninth in the prep ranks at his position by Prep Star. Super Prep rated him the country's eighth-best passer and sixth-ranked overall prospect in the Midwest.
--NAME-- was also named to Prep Star's Top 100 Dream Team and earned first-team Class IV All-State honors from the Missouri Sportswriters and Sportscasters Association. He was selected to the Kansas City Star All-Metro team and was the 2005 Tony Simone Award winner as the top player in the Kansas City metro area. He was a participant at the 2005 EA Sports Elite 11 Camp and was chosen to play in the prestigious U.S. Army High School All-America game.
--NAME-- led Grandview to a 7-4 record, a district title and a berth in the sectional round of the Missouri state playoffs as a senior. That year, he completed 151-of-286 passes (52.8%) for 2,622 yards and 33 touchdowns and rushed for five scores. He also topped 2,400 yards passing with 23 touchdowns as a junior.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- threw for 1,946 yards and 24 touchdowns, leading Grandview to a 9-3 record and a spot in the quarterfinals of the Class IV playoffs. He set 10 school records during his career, including career passing yards (7,175), passing touchdowns (78), attempts (809), completions (385), yards passing in a game (403) and touchdowns in a game (six).
--NAME-- graduated from high school early and enrolled at Kansas State in time to participate in 2006 spring drills. He played in 11 games as a true freshman, starting the final eight contests as the blue-chip prospect from head coach Ron Prince's first recruiting class. The Freshman All-American honorable mention earned Big Twelve Conference Player of the Week honors vs. Colorado and Texas, becoming the first Wildcat freshman to earn those honors in back-to-back weeks and the first KSU player to accomplish that feat since 2001.
That year, --NAME-- threw for a school freshman record 1,780 yards on 140-of-270 passes (51.85%) and was the only true freshman to lead his team to a bowl appearance in 2006. He threw six touchdown passes, but was intercepted 15 times while also getting sacked 25 times. His pass completion percentage of .846 vs. Colorado is the second-best average in a game by a Wildcats passer.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- earned All-Big Twelve Conference honorable mention from league coaches. The strong-armed quarterback started all 12 games, set five school passing records -- most completions in a game and season, most attempts in a season, most passing yards in a season and most 300-yard passing games in a season.
--NAME-- totaled 3,353 yards on 316-of-499 passing, completing 63.33% of those attempts while adding 18 touchdowns and 11 interceptions. He completed at least 20 passes in 11-of-12 games, scoring four times of 53 carries. His 276.08-yard per-game average in total offense ranked 26th in the nation and he led a passing attack that ranked 19th in the major college ranks in 2007, averaging 269.58 yards per game.
In 2008, --NAME-- ranked 17th in the nation in total offense (279.08 yards per game) and 11th in points responsible for (17.17 per game). While his passing yards were down from the previous season (2,945), he did complete 58.64% of his attempts (224-of-382), a career-high 20 touchdowns and a career-low eight interceptions. He exploded for 14 scores and 404 yards on the ground. Only Colin Kaepernick of Nevada (17) ran for more touchdowns among major college quarterbacks in 2008.
No major injuries reported Never missed a game due to injury during his career at KSU.
Attended Grandview (Kansas City, Mo.) High School, playing football for head coach Jason Godfrey. --NAME--'s father, Ron, served as the team's defensive coordinator One of the most highly sought recruits during his senior year Received a four-star prospect rating from both Rivals.com and Scout.com, throwing for over 7,000 yards during his career Rivals.com rated him the fourth-best pro-style quarterback in the nation and he was rated ninth in the prep ranks at his position by Prep Star Super Prep rated the quarterback as the country's eighth-best passer and sixth-ranked overall prospect in the Midwest Named to Prep Star's Top 100 Dream Team and earned first-team Class IV All-State honors from the Missouri Sportswriters and Sportscasters Association Selected to the Kansas City Star All-Metro team and was the 2005 Tony Simone Award winner as the top player in the Kansas City metro area Participant at the 2005 EA Sports Elite 11 Camp and chosen to play in the prestigious U.S. Army High School All-America game Led Grandview to a 7-4 record, a district title and a berth in the sectional round of the Missouri state playoffs as a senior That year, he completed 151-of-286 passes (52.8%) for 2,622 yards and 33 touchdowns, as he also rushed for five scores Topped 2,400 yards through the air with 23 touchdowns as a junior As a sophomore, --NAME-- threw for 1,946 yards and 24 touchdowns, leading Grandview to a 9-3 record and a spot in the quarterfinals of the Class IV playoffs By the time he was done, he had set ten school records during his career, including career passing yards (7,175), passing touchdowns (78), attempts (809), completions (385), yards passing in a game (403) and touchdowns in a game (6).
Tall frame with a solid build. Arm strength allows him to make all of the NFL throws and attack the deep half. Stands tall, will step up in the pocket, keep his eyes downfield and deliver the ball to secondary target. Good, not great, quickness on release. Keeps the ball low over the middle, away from defenders. Can be accurate on fades and corner routes, although he needs a bit more air under the ball. Good straight-ahead runner with long strides and deceptive speed, can shed arm tackles and uses his tall frame to get extra yards after contact. Dropped some weight to better his footwork and speed. Works under center and in the shotgun.
Must improve his footwork. His height makes him take long strides in his drop. Fails to step into his throws or square his shoulders at times, relies on his arm strength too often. Inconsistent accuracy from the pocket and throwing on the run. Needs to anticipate downfield throws better, sometimes getting the ball to his receiver a second early or late. Prone to turnovers, makes poor decisions trying to make plays that aren't there. Does not feel backside pressure. Lacks touch on shorter throws. Ball comes out of his hands poorly at times, negating his arm strength. Sometimes pats the ball before the throws. Loose with the ball in the pocket and as a runner. Doesn't move the pile as you'd expect in short-yardage situations, but his height allows him to be effective.
JASON CAMPBELL, Washington -- --NAME-- is a bit bigger and has more bulk. Both came from programs that really did not highlight their athletic talents, but like the Redskins did with Campbell, a team will have to show patience. He has a great arm that can rival Matthew Stafford's but has to work on his delivery and release. With such a weak draft class at this position, he could be the third quarterback chosen in the first round. If Detroit trades down from the top spot, it is because they are convinced that --NAME-- will be around at number 20.
-------------------------
Jarron_Gilbert 79559 68
--NAME-- has been rising up draft boards since his stellar 2008 campaign and postseason all-star game showing. Blessed with impressive size and quickness, his versatility has many professional teams considering --NAME-- for a variety of roles on the D-line.
The son of former New Orleans Saints offensive tackle Daren --NAME--, --NAME--'s on the football field might have garnered him the attention of the NFL, but it was his recent display of athleticism that has made him a YouTube "sensation." While working out with his trainer after the 2008 season, he was told that former St. Louis Rams safety Adam Archuleta could jump out of a swimming pool. 
--NAME-- took the bait. From the shallow end of the pool, he amazed everyone by simply jumping out and landing on his feet. 
"I went out there one day -- it wasn't that big a deal to me -- and I just went and jumped out of the pool. I found out that I could do it, so I put it on film to make everybody else believe me," --NAME-- stated.
--NAME-- can thank his bloodlines for his athletic ability. While attending Chino High School, he lettered in football, basketball and track. The two-way lineman earned All-Sierra League honors on the gridiron. As a forward, he was also an All-League choice for the basketball squad. He also handled the weight for the track squad.
The 240-pound defensive lineman enrolled at San Jose State in 2004, spending the season performing on the scout team and working out in the training room. With 10 pounds of muscle, the redshirt freshman started four of the 11 games he appeared in, lining up at right defensive end in 2005. He posted 22 tackles (14 solo) with three sacks and five stops for losses during his first varsity campaign.
--NAME-- shifted to left defensive end in 2006 and his weight jumped to around 270 pounds. He started 10 of 13 contests, coming up with 32 tackles (14 solos), including five sacks and 7.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also used his impressive wingspan to deflect six passes, tops among the down linemen in the Western Athletic Conference.
In 2007, --NAME-- started all 12 games, seeing action at both right defensive end and tackle. The All-WAC second-team choice, continued to add bulk and strength, listing at 280 pounds. He led the team's down linemen with 38 tackles (23 solo). He collected 7.5 stops for losses that included four sacks, as he also broke up four passes.
One of four team captains, --NAME-- received All-American, All-WAC, conference co-Defensive Player of the Year and team MVP honors in 2008. Now measuring in at 290 pounds, he started all twelve games at left defensive tackle. He registered 52 tackles (36 solos), leading the nation with 22 stops for losses of 116 yards. His 9.5 sacks led the Spartans with 9.5 sacks, the second-best total in the league.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Chino (Cal.) High School, playing football for head coach John Monger Lettered in football, basketball and track and field The two-way lineman earned All-Sierra League honors on the gridiron As a forward, he was also an All-League choice for the basketball squad Handled the weight for the track squad.
Rare athleticism for a player of his size. Versatile defender with experience at tackle and end. Good size potential. Naturally large man with room for plenty of additional muscle mass. Good initial quickness off the snap. Flashes the functional upper-body strength to disengage from blockers. Surprising balance for his height. Can break down in space and make the secure tackle.
Struggles with leverage inside, and might lack the burst off the snap and flexibility to flank the tackle and close effectively as a defensive end. Too often allows blockers to get into his chest. Inconsistent getting his hands up in the passing lanes. Questionable level of competition. Better raw athlete than football player.
TY WARREN, New England -- --NAME-- is more of a 3-4 defensive end rather than an edge rusher in a 4-3 alignment. He seems comfortable shooting the gaps to get to the quarterback rather than trying to loop around the edge. If taken by a team operating from primarily a 4-3 base defense, he will be better off playing inside. He has a lot of potential and a rare-sized frame with an excellent wing span, but it took him more than three seasons to start to produce consistently. It could have been due to him settling in at defensive tackle in 2008.
-------------------------
Shonn_Greene 79563 65
Prior to the 2008 season, --NAME-- knew he had his work cut out for him. Academic problems forced the bruising tailback to leave the university and enroll at Kirkwood College in 2007. When he rectified his academic standing and rejoined the Hawkeyes, he found himself listed behind Jevon Pugh, Paki O'Meara, Nate Guillory, Jeff Brinson and Jewel Hampton for the starting tailback job.
--NAME-- not only emerged from that fierce battle as the victor, he went on to earn 2008 Big Ten Conference Offensive Player of the Year honors. He was also the recipient of the Doak Walker Award, given to the nation's top running back. He became Iowa's first consensus All-American running back since Nile Kinnick in 1939. The Chicago Tribune awarded him with the Silver Football, given to the Most Valuable Player in the Big Ten.
At Winslow Township High School, --NAME-- was a first-team all-conference and second-team all-state choice as a senior. The previous year, he was the recipient of all-state, All-South Jersey and all-conference honors. He ended his prep career with 4,266 yards and 43 touchdowns on 503 rushing attempts (8.48 avg.).
The tailback and linebacker registered 191 tackles with one interception during his career. He carried 172 times for 1,378 yards (8.0 avg.) and 16 touchdowns as a senior and rushed for 1,267 yards and 18 touchdowns on 221 attempts (5.7 avg.) as a junior. After graduating, he spent the 2004 season at Milford Academy, where he rushed for 1,274 yards.
--NAME-- enrolled at Iowa for the 2005 season. He appeared in 11 games as a reserve, managing just 137 yards on 37 carries (4.7 avg.) with a touchdown. He also excelled on special teams, recording five tackles (four solos). His performance with that unit almost saw the coaching staff shift him to linebacker the following year. Iowa defensive coordinator Norm Parker apparently has thought about having --NAME-- play defense. 
"He'd be an awesome linebacker; gosh would he be good," Iowa head coach Kirk Ferentz said of --NAME--. "Don't think Norm hasn't sniffed around on that one -- like from the day (--NAME--) walked in. But it's just not going to happen. It's kind of like (Chad) Greenway or (Jonathan) Babineaux; if you have two or three of those guys, you'd have them here, here and here. --NAME--'s that kind of guy. --NAME--'s no nonsense on the field. He works hard, and he likes playing."
--NAME-- changed jersey numbers from 45 to 23 as a sophomore, but an ankle sprain forced him to miss three midseason contests. In nine games, he finished third on the team with 205 yards and a touchdown on 32 rushing attempts (6.4 avg.) in 2006. He grabbed three passes for 23 yards (7.7 avg.) and averaged 19.0 yards on six kickoff returns. 
Primed to step into the starting lineup in 2007, --NAME-- was ruled academically ineligible and left Iowa. He enrolled at Kirkwood College to improve his grades, but did not play football. Back with the Hawkeyes for the 2008 campaign, the All-American set the school single-season record with 1,850 yards on 307 carries (6.0 avg.), finding the end zone 20 times on the ground while scoring 120 points.
Because he would be 24 in 2009, and due to family issues, --NAME-- decided to bypass his senior year at Iowa to enter the 2009 NFL Draft. His parents divorced early in his life. He chose to live with his grandmother, Cheryl --NAME--. He has a big heart with "Cheryl" tattooed in the middle of it on his neck. "She's probably the Number 1 woman in my life right now," --NAME-- said. "She raised me. I have a lot of love for her, a lot of respect. I pretty much owe her this whole ordeal here.
   "She's a great woman. I owe her the world," he stated when announcing his decision.
2005: Did not play vs. Purdue (10/08) after spraining his ankle vs. Illinois.
2006: Sat out the Michigan (10/21), Northern Illinois (10/28) and Northwestern (11/04) games with an ankle sprain.
2008: --NAME-- missed the game's final 12 minutes after taking a blow to the head in the Northwestern contest (9/27).
Attended Winslow Township (N.J.) High School, playing football for head coach Felton Jones First-team all-conference and second-team all-state choice as a senior The previous year, he was the recipient of all-state, All-South Jersey and all-conference honors Ended his prep career with 4,266 yards and 43 touchdowns on 503 rushing attempts (8.48 avg.) The tailback and linebacker registered 191 tackles with one interception during his career Carried 172 times for 1,378 yards (8.0 avg.) and 16 touchdowns as a senior and rushed for 1,267 yards and 18 touchdowns on 221 attempts (5.7 avg.) as a junior.
Stout frame with good overall musculature, but especially in his lower body. Good initial quickness off the snap. Downhill runner who attacks the line of scrimmage. Quick to recognize the hole and takes what the defense gives him. Rare flexibility and use of leverage for a back of his size. Runs with a very low pad level, giving defenders little to hit between his knees and shoulder pads, which is one of the reasons why he bounces off of some many tackles. Very good leg drive to take defenders for extra yardage. Finishes his runs. Falls forward to gain additional yardage to end each attempt. Good vision for the cutback. Surprisingly quick feet to bounce laterally and accelerate into the open field. Stout pass blocker who will provide a pop to the rusher and gives a good effort. At least adequate hands for the reception. Despite his relatively advanced age, should have fresh legs due to only one season as the starter.
Lacks the speed to consistently get to the outside or to be a true breakaway threat. Appears to have at soft hands, but lacks experience out of the backfield as a receiver, with only 11 career receptions (for 72 yards). Only one dominant season, so must convince scouts he will be productive over the long term. Might struggle with a complicated playbook. Turns 24 on August 21.
-------------------------
Michael_Hamlin 79565 166
--NAME-- showed his leadership skills in 2008, speaking up and imploring his teammates to play up to their ability after the team struggled and underwent a midseason coaching change. The young players responded, with Clemson winning four of its final six games to earn a spot in the 2009 Gator Bowl.
--NAME-- and his two brothers all followed in their father's footsteps and became defensive backs. While --NAME-- went on to star at Clemson, his siblings, Markee and Marquais, play for South Carolina State. The two teams played each other in 2008, marking the first time since 1981 that brothers competed vs. each other in a Clemson game (Mark Richardson of Clemson and his brother, Jon, who attended North Carolina, played vs. each other at Chapel Hill that year).
The Tigers' defensive captain started 43 games for Clemson, the most by a defensive back in school history. His 14 interceptions rank third in school annals and his 243 yards gained on interception returns rank second. He also ranks second in school history with 18 takeaways (four forced fumbles, 14 pass thefts).
At Lamar High School, --NAME-- was a finalist for Mr. Football in South Carolina. Rated the 11th-best safety in the nation by Tom Lemming, he was named the state's Defensive Player of the Year by High School Sports Report. He added All-State honors as a junior and senior and was a three-time All-Region selection, capturing Region Player of the Year honors in each of his final two campaigns.
--NAME-- registered 23 career interceptions, including a team-high four as a senior. He threw three passes as a senior and two were touchdowns, including one to his brother in the state title game. He had 20 catches for 290 yards and four scores, and gained 148 punt return yards and 179 kickoff return yards. He added All-Region accolades in both baseball and basketball, as Lamar's baseball squad won the state championship as a junior.
--NAME-- enrolled at Clemson in 2004, participating on the scout team. He shared "Cat" (strong safety duties) with C.J. Gaddis in 2005, as the 190-pound defensive back started the final seven games. On 492 defensive plays, he recorded 55 tackles (30 solos), broke up three passes and intercepted two others as the first freshman to start in the Tigers secondary since Justin Miller in 2002.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- missed three games after breaking a bone in his left foot vs. Boston College. He still managed to get on the field for 576 plays in 10 starts. He was in on 64 tackles (47 solos), including five stops for loss. He picked off two passes, returning one 74 yards and knocked down three other throws while recovering a pair of fumbles.
--NAME-- received All-Atlantic Coast Conference recognition in 2007. He started all 13 games for the first time in his career, producing 97 tackles (73 solos), the fifth-highest total among league defensive backs that year. Three of his stops were for losses, as he also picked off four passes and deflected six others. Three of his four fumble recoveries led to Clemson scoring drives. He also intercepted a two-point conversion attempt and returned it 100 yards vs. North Carolina State for the first defensive score off an opponent's extra point in school history.
--NAME-- was an All-American honorable mention by Sports Illustrated and an All-ACC first-team choice as a senior. He ranked eighth in the nation with six interceptions and was second in the conference with a total of 16 passes defended (10 breakups, six interceptions). He also placed second on the team with a career-high 110 tackles (74 solos), as he served as the squad's first two-time team captain since the 2001 campaign.
2006: Suffered a fifth metatarsal bone fracture in his left foot during fourth quarter action vs. Boston College (9/09), missing the next three games vs. Florida State (9/16), North Carolina (9/23) and Louisiana Tech (9/30).
2007: Left the Chick-fil-A Bowl with an undisclosed injury.
2009: Suffered a hamstring pull working out nine days prior to Pro Day (3/24).
Attended Lamar (S.C.) High School, playing football for head coach J.R. Boyd Finalist for Mr. Football in South Carolina Rated the 11th-best safety in the nation by Tom Lemming, he was named the state's Defensive Player of the Year by High School Sports Report  Added All-State honors as a junior and senior and was a three-time All-Region selection, capturing Region Player of the Year honors in each of his final two campaigns Recorded 23 career interceptions, including a team-high four as a senior Threw three passes as a senior and two were touchdowns, including one to his brother in the state title game  Added 20 catches for 290 yards and four scores, and had 148 punt return yards and 179 kickoff return yards Earned All-Region accolades in baseball and basketball, as Lamar's baseball squad won the state championship as a junior.
Rangy player with the frame to add an additional 10-15 pounds of mass.   Quick to come up in run support.   Willing to take on blocks to get to the action.   Reliable tackler in the open field who flashes hitting ability.   Wrap-up tackler who looks to punch or rip the ball out to create a turnover.   Instinctive in coverage. Reads the quarterback's eyes and gets a good break on the ball due to his feel for the game.   Natural hands for the interception.   Competes for the ball and can time his leap to catch it at its highest point.   Good vision and elusiveness with the ball in his hands.   Cerebral player who lines up the Clemson defensive backfield and was voted a permanent team captain as a junior.
Questionable straight-line speed.   Much better with his eyes pointed toward the quarterback, as he lacks the deep speed most teams want as the deep safety.   Reliable open-field tackler, but lacks bulk and explosive hitting ability to be an intimidator over the middle.   Durability red flags: broke both feet in his career, missing three games in 2006 after breaking one against Boston College and undergoing postseason surgery after the 2007 season with a stress fracture in the other.
-------------------------
Ra'Shon_Harris 79567 205
--NAME-- only produced three tackles in his first two seasons in Eugene, but the light started to come on during his junior season. He then stepped up his game as a first-year starter in 2008, making 47 tackles, nine tackles for loss and sacking the opponents' quarterback three times. His ability to take up blockers made everyone on the line more effective. His potential as a interior presence could get him drafted.
High School (Coach): Pittsburg (Sly Hunter) 2004.   Rated among the top 50 prep prospects in California by SuperPrep magazine as well as one of the best 11 defensive linemen in the state.   Two-time all-Bay Valley League defender possessed the proficiency to force opponents to devise game plans around him.   Two-time all-area honoree (Contra Costa Times) and Tacoma News Tribune Western 100 pick led the league in quarterback sacks (five) in addition to forcing one fumble and recovering another.   Completed his prep career with 15 quarterback sacks.
Tall with good build and length inside.   Fair straight-ahead speed when closing on the ball.   Stands up his man and falls off to wrap up backs coming through the hole.   Anchors well to hold up double-team blocks.   Gets great push to collapse the pocket in passing situations, keeps his arms extended and legs churning.   Threat to impact passing lanes and block field goals using his push, height and length.   Big in the weight room.
One-year starter.   A bit soft in the middle.   Offensive linemen use his height to their advantage, cutting him down like a tree although he is adequate recovering.   Slow off the snap and takes time to get his body going forward.   Plays with his head down at times, minimizing his awareness.   Needs a stronger punch.   Inconsistent in his push and hustle.   Does not change direction quickly, will get ridden out of plays too easily.   Inconsistent shedding blocks inside even if much bigger than his opponent.   Stamina and work ethic are issues.   Missed first half of the 2006 season with a torn triceps muscle.
-------------------------
Sammie_Lee_Hill 79571 115
--NAME-- is regarded by many to be the premier small college prospect at his position. The four-year starter lined up at left defensive end as a junior and senior, but with explosive burst penetrating the gaps and wide frame, many teams feel that he is better suited to play inside at tackle at the next level, his original college position. His ability to shut down the running game saw him produce 44.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage during his career, setting the school career record.
--NAME-- is much more than your typical defensive lineman, though. He served as a tight end in goal-line blocking situations, where he scored on a 16-yard reception and also on a two-point conversion. He competed as an up-back and wedge buster on special teams, as the 330-pounder was seen rumbling with his first kickoff return as a senior. He also got to drop back in coverage as a giant middle linebacker, racing 38 yards into the end zone for a touchdown with an interception as a junior.
At West Blockton High School, --NAME-- was an All-Conference and All-Area gridiron selection. He competed on both lines, in addition to seeing time at tight end and linebacker. He saw playing time as a place-kicker. In addition to his football exploits, he also excelled on the basketball court, where he actually got more attention from those recruiters than in football. 
--NAME--'s high school coach convinced the Stillman College staff to offer him a full scholarship and the then 270-pounder enrolled at the university in 2004, red-shirting that season. He lined up at strong-side defensive tackle in 2005, posting 39 tackles (13 solos) with 3.5 sacks and six stops for losses on defense. In brief action as a tight end, he also caught one pass for a 16-yard score.  
As a sophomore, --NAME-- appeared in 10 games as an interior lineman. He collected 41 tackles (15 solos) that included a pair of sacks and three pressures. He deflected thee passes and intercepted another. He also placed third on the team with nine stops behind the line of scrimmage.
With the arrival of new head coach Greg Thompson, --NAME-- was shifted to left defensive end in 2007. The coaching staff felt the move was necessary, as it eliminated their best defensive player from having to deal with double-team blocking inside and also allowed him to shut down one half of the field. The move certainly paid off. 
After posting 15 stops for loss during his first two seasons at tackle, the All-Southern Intercollegiate Athletic Conference first-team selection registered 14 stops for loss, along with 4.5 sacks, to go with 52 tackles (29 solos). He also caused four fumbles and returned a pass theft 38 yards for a touchdown.
He also put his life on the line in 2007. --NAME-- and two other Stillman players were heading back to campus when they saw flames and smoke coming from a house. A young woman was frantically trying to flag down help. When they backed up and stopped, Cassandra Webb told them that her father, Curtis Webb Sr., was inside. 
--NAME-- tells it this way: "Sure enough, there was a lady outside saying that her father needs help. All we could do was put our hands over our faces and hope that we didn't get hurt. We looked up, and, well, it was a blessing that we could grab him and protect ourselves so we all were safe. We all grabbed hold of him and carried him out of the house. It's not a situation I ever thought I would be in, but that's the way I was raised. I was happy I did it."
--NAME-- added, "There was a lot of media and press coming around after that happened. It was OK. I felt like I didn't need all that, because I would want somebody to do the same thing for my father or mother in the same situation. God blessed us in that situation. If it was me and my parents were in that situation, I would want somebody to help me." 
--NAME-- was again an All-SIAC first-team choice in 2008. In 11 games at left defensive end, he registered a career-high 59 tackles (32 solos), as he led the team with 7.5 sacks and paced the league with 15.5 stops for loss. He also had a career-high eight pressures, including three that caused interceptions. He scored on a two-point conversion pass, deflected seven passes and recovered three fumbles.
No injuries reported, but did sit out the 2005 Clark-Atlanta contest and the 2007 Langston game for undisclosed reasons.
2009: Suffered a hamstring pull during East-West Shrine Game practices.
Attended West Blockton (Ala.) High School All-Conference and All-Area pick  Competed on both lines, in addition to seeing time at tight end and linebacker Also saw playing time as a place-kicker Also excelled on the basketball court, where he actually got more attention from those recruiters than in football.
Tall with muscular overall build and long arms.   Displays excellent agility and quickness for his size.   Uses a punch and good hand play to discard offensive tackles at the line of scrimmage.   Swats chipping running backs away like flies on the outside.   Good closing speed and has the length to wrap up in the backfield.   Flashes the initial quickness inside.   Bull rushes his man into the pocket when one-on-one inside.   Breaks down on the edge and changes direction well for his size.   Could project as a 3-4 defensive end.
Looks like a man among boys against lower level competition, especially when lined up on the edge, but must prove he can handle the next level physically.   Fails to consistently get off double teams when inside.   Must work on lowering his pad level so he's not stood up to lose the leverage battle against NFL offensive linemen and be susceptible to cut blocks.   Doesn't chase or hustle consistently.
SHAUN ROGERS, Cleveland -- --NAME-- has the potential to be much more consistent than Rogers, but will just need time to adjust to NFL life from the low level of competition he played in. --NAME-- flashes a burst to finish and shows effectiveness stopping the running game as a three-tech defender. He has a very strong anchor vs. the run and uses his hands well to cross over the offensive lineman's face to make the play. He generates excellent leverage to stack at the point of attack. He has the quick, strong and active hands to split double teams and his long arms allow him to consistently push the pocket.
-------------------------
Evander_Hood 79575 32
The secondary was the obvious weak link of the Tigers' defense the past two years, but with --NAME-- in the trenches Missouri more than held its own up front. That unit allowed only 124.86 yards per game rushing in 2008, ranking second in the Big 12 Conference and 12th in the nation in tackles for loss, registering an average of 7.43 stops behind the line of scrimmage per game.
Called by head coach Gary Pinkel, "the most tenacious player on the team," --NAME-- lived up to that reputation. Despite constantly battling double-team coverage, he collected 10 sacks, 15 stops behind the line of scrimmage and 16 quarterback pressures the last two seasons as the team's starting weak-side defensive tackle.
--NAME-- was a highly-regarded athlete who excelled on defense and also played tight end for Palo Duro High School. He ranked as the Number 35 weak-side defensive end in the nation, according Rivals.com, and was named District 3-4A Defensive Player of the Year as a senior, when he registered 93 tackles and 13 sacks. 
That season, --NAME-- also scored three defensive touchdowns and recovered three fumbles. He earned All-District honors each of his last two years. He registered 76 tackles as a junior, including five sacks and also returned an interception for a touchdown. In addition to football, he threw the shot and discus for his school's track team.
--NAME-- chose to attend Missouri in 2005, turning down scholarship offers from Arizona State, Oklahoma State, Texas Christian, Texas-El Paso and Baylor, among others. The coaches were originally going to redshirt him, but in August camp --NAME-- earned a spot with the second unit at weak-side defensive tackle, going on to play in 12 games. He was in on 23 tackles (13 solos), 1.5 sacks and 2.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage.
The sophomore seized a starting opportunity in 2006. In the third game vs. New Mexico he suffered a foot fracture that required surgery to insert a screw. The staff projected that he would be forced to miss the rest of the season, but each week --NAME-- predicted he would be back the following game. He returned after just three games and played through the pain the remainder of the season. --NAME-- went out and delivered 36 tackles (24 solos) that included four sacks, four pressures and two forced fumbles while playing weak-side tackle and nose guard. That was just the start of great things to come.
In 2007, --NAME-- was named All-Big 12 Conference honorable mention. The weak-side tackle started all 14 games, coming up with 49 tackles (30 solos). Despite constant double coverage, he finished third on the squad with five sacks and had a career-high eight stops for losses. He caused three fumbles, recovered another and broke up five passes. After producing six tackles and 1.5 sacks vs. Arkansas in the Cotton bowl, Pinkel called that --NAME--'s best game in a Tigers uniform.
--NAME-- continued to be relentless in his pursuit of quarterbacks in 2008, as five of his 12 pressures caused interceptions. The team captain and All-Big 12 first-team choice was in on 62 tackles (31 solos) that included seven stops behind the line of scrimmage and five sacks. He also recovered two fumbles and blocked one kick.
2006: Suffered a right foot fracture vs. New Mexico (9/16), undergoing surgery two days later to have a screw inserted and was forced to sit out the Ohio University (9/23), Colorado (9/30) and Texas Tech (10/07) games.
Attended Palo Duro (Amarillo, Texas) High School, playing football for head coach Steve Parr Also played tight end Ranked as the 35th-best weak-side defensive end in the nation, according to Rivals.com, and was named District 3-4A Defensive Player of the Year as a senior, when he registered 93 tackles and 13 sacks That season, --NAME-- also scored three defensive touchdowns and recovered three fumbles Earned All-District honors each of his last two years Registered 76 tackles as a junior, including five sacks and also returned an interception for a touchdown In addition to football, he threw the shot and discus for his school's track team Member of the National Honor Society.
More than the sum of his parts.   Legitimate NFL size.   Plays with a passionate, physical style.   Locates the ball quickly and pursues well down the line.   Flashes initial burst off the snap and the lateral quickness to make plays behind the line of scrimmage.   Recognizes the trap block and can burst through the hole to make the play behind the line of scrimmage.   Physical at the point.   Seems to enjoy the hand-to-hand combat in the trenches and doesn't back down from contact.   Active hands and can disengage from blocks due to his hand play.   Durable performer.   Showed great toughness in 2006, missing only three games after breaking his foot and having a screw inserted, before returning to play the final seven games at less than 100 percent.
Lacks the elite explosiveness or strength usually associated with highly rated defensive tackles.   Only moderate initial quickness.   Flashes the lateral quickness to elude and collapse the pocket, but is too inconsistent in that area.   Often plays too high and loses leverage, negating his own strength and size.   Missed three full games and parts of others in 2006 with a broken foot suffered midway through the season.
JASON FERGUSON, Miami -- Like Ferguson, --NAME-- plays well when lined up over the center's head. He needs to learn how to keep his pads down, as he has this nasty habit of popping up at the snap, leaving his chest exposed for the physical block. He has good lateral agility and uses his hand jolt effectively to push the blocker back, redirect and shoot the gaps. When he moves down the line, he is quick to pick up schemes and plays with urgency to prevent the ball carrier from turning the corner. He will often face multiple blockers and would be more effective shedding them, if he can improve his pad level.
-------------------------
Jake_Ingram 79577 198
A former defensive end switched to long snapper during the 2005 season, head coach June Jones believed --NAME-- was too valuable to be a reserve on defense. NFL scouts are likely to agree with Jones' assessment of --NAME-- as a long-snapper. --NAME-- is clearly the top prospect in the country at the vital, if underappreciated, position. He's not a big bruiser who could play center in a pinch but his accuracy and velocity will be valued by teams looking for a reliable snapper. Had an arm span of 31 3/4 inches and a hand span of 9 inches at the combine.
A 2004 graduate of Mililani High School on Oahu   Earned two varsity letters in football   Named to the 2004 all-league team   Made the honor roll   Also earned one varsity letter in track.
Excellent velocity on punt snaps -- ball consistently reaches punter in less than 0.7 seconds, can be as quick as 0.65 seconds.   No wasted motion in snap.   Very good accuracy. Punter rarely has to work to secure the snap.   Works hard to maintain his lane on punt coverage.
Not especially quick getting downfield on punts and didn't make many coverage tackles.   Lacks great size, although there are snappers his size in the NFL.   Inconsistent accuracy on placement snaps. Puts them high or toward holder's right shoulder at times, making it difficult to get the ball back to the spot.
-------------------------
Corvey_Irvin 79579 93
Like most junior college players who join an established major college program, --NAME-- had to patiently wait down on the depth chart for his opportunity to start. When standout Jeff Owens was lost for the season after the Bulldogs' third game last year, --NAME-- dusted off 16 games of reserve duty to step in and fill the void at left defensive tackle.
With --NAME-- teaming with fellow defensive tackle Geno Atkins, Georgia saw its anchors in the middle of the defensive front wall hold the opposition to 312.0 yards in total offense, including 122.31 yards rushing in 2008. Once in the lineup, --NAME--'s solid play would see him hold on to that job for the final 10 games of his career.
--NAME-- was a Class AA All-State honorable mention by the Atlanta Journal-Constitution at Laney High School as a senior, but when the major colleges failed to recruit him he enrolled at Georgia Military College. At GMC, he was rated 32nd on the Junior College Top 100 List compiled by Rivals.com. He registered 11 tackles, four for losses, and two sacks during the 2006 season, helping lead the team to the Golden Isles Bowl.
--NAME-- enrolled at Georgia in time to compete in 2007 spring drills. He spent his first season as a Bulldog playing behind Owens at left defensive tackle, appearing in 13 games. He managed 14 tackles (10 solos), including a quarterback pressure and 2.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage to earn his first varsity letter.
The senior could not unseat Owens or Atkins for a starting position on the interior front wall coming out of 2008 fall camp. When Owens suffered a season ending knee injury, --NAME-- stepped in to fill the void at left tackle. He went on to record 34 tackles (22 solos) that included three sacks, five pressures and 8.5 stops for loss. He also deflected a trio of passes.
Perhaps none of the seniors on Georgia's football team were less ready to play their final game than --NAME--. "It feels like I just got here," he said. "And now I'm going to have to leave. I was a pup, I'm going to miss it - the good times, my teammates, the coaches, UGA itself. I'm glad I got to experience a big-time program like this. I'm going to be able to tell my kids and grandkids about it."
Attended Georgia Military College (2005-06), playing football for head coach Bert Williams Rated 32nd on the Junior College Top 100 List compiled by Rivals.com Made 11 tackles, four for losses, and two sacks during the 2006 season, helping lead the team to the Golden Isles Bowl.
No injuries reported.
Class AA All-State honorable mention by the Atlanta Journal-Constitution at Laney (Augusta, Ga.) High School as a senior, playing football for head coach Eric Parker.
Long arms with a square build and room for additional growth.   At least adequate initial quickness off the snap.   At least adequate lateral quickness to generate some pass rush from the interior.   Learning to utilize his long arms to keep blockers off his body.   Locates the ball and plays with good hustle in pursuit.   Good lower leg drive to anchor against the run.   Gets his arms up to provide obstacles in the passing lanes.   Improved throughout the week of practice at the Senior Bowl.
Raw and lacks the eye-popping athleticism to indicate high upside.   Not quick enough off the snap or when msoving laterally to generate much of a pass rush.   Only short-area quickness.   Needs an open lane to close.   Adequate size and strength to hold up against the run, but struggles to disengage.
ROCKY BERNARD, New York Giants -- --NAME-- has good athleticism and a great wingspan, but he has limited production at both levels of college competition. He can create problems coming off a single block, but he lacks great lateral agility to chase down plays in space. He is more of a bull rusher than one who can get an edge off a tackle. He uses his hands with force, but is not a quick engage-and-shed type. He needs to show more aggression in his play, but might not be anything more than a rotation player than a starter.
-------------------------
Ricky_Jean-Francois 79583 244
Regarded as one of the nation's top prep defensive linemen during his days at Carol City High School, --NAME-- never lived up to that billing during his time at LSU. While a member of the Tigers football team, he was suspended by the NCAA for 12 months, had academic problems and angered his head coach for unflattering comments made about Florida quarterback Tim Tebow before the teams met in 2008. 
--NAME-- was being counted on to replace All-American Glenn Dorsey as the leader of the defensive front wall in 2008, but that plan was sidetracked by the junior's groin injury. "Nobody can replace Glenn Dorsey," defensive end Tyson Jackson said before the 2008 season, "but a guy like --NAME-- Jean can come in and be the man."
--NAME--, a junior from Miami, is an inch taller than Dorsey at 6-foot-3 and about 10 pounds lighter at 290. He may not be able to clog the middle and toss linemen around as Dorsey did, but he can run better and can also play defensive end. "He's not as heavy," LSU coach Les Miles said of --NAME--. "But I think he's more angular. I think he may be more athletic, and he plays with great leverage. He's really a very strong man, so I like both of them."
--NAME-- was rated the premier defensive line prospect in the state of Florida as a senior at Carol City High School. He was rated third in the country at his position by College Football News and selected All-American first-team by Prep Football Report and Riddell. The All-State first-team choice was a member of the Orlando Sentinel Top 100 for Florida and a member of the FSN South's Countdown To Signing Day" All-South" first-team.
He was named the Dade County Male Athlete of the Year in both 2004 and 2005, becoming the only two-time winner of the award in its 49-year history. The skilled pass rusher closed out his career with a remarkable senior season, registering 93 tackles, 15 sacks and three interceptions. He also forced six fumbles and recovered three. He set the Florida state record for sacks in a game with 6.5. He also had a breakout junior season with 87 tackles, including 27 for losses, 10 sacks and eight forced fumbles.
--NAME-- also excelled in track, competing in the shot put and discus. He won the state championships in the shot put and discus as both a junior and senior. He recorded the nation's third-best toss in the shot put with a throw of 65-5 3/4 in 2005.
--NAME-- enrolled at LSU in 2005 but was red-shirted, concentrating on improving his academics. He appeared in 12 games in 2006, earning freshman All-American first-team honors from The Sporting News. He played most of the year behind Jackson at left defensive end, but started his first college game vs. Auburn at left tackle, replacing an injured Dorsey. He finished his first season with the varsity by making 27 tackles (10 solos) that included three sacks and 5.5 stops for losses.
After the 2006 season, --NAME-- joined the men's track and field team. One of the Tigers' top newcomers that season, he earned All-Southeastern Conference honors in the shot put at the SEC Indoor Championships by finishing in second place with a season-best heave of 60-1 1/4.
Primed for a breakout 2007 season, --NAME-- was called into the coach's office and informed he was being suspended from playing by the NCAA. He practiced with the team but was not allowed to travel. After the conclusion of the regular-season schedule, he was reinstated, starting vs. Tennessee in the Southeastern Conference title game before earning defensive MVP honors for his performance vs. Ohio State in the BCS Championship Game. In two games, he totaled nine tackles (5 solos), assisted on a sack and blocked a kick.
--NAME-- started six of 11 games at right tackle in 2008. He produced 20 tackles (8 solos) with two sacks, three stops behind the line of scrimmage and blocked a kick. A groin strain forced him to miss the second half vs. Mississippi State and sit out the Florida and South Carolina contests.
Before the Florida clash, --NAME-- apologized for what he described as an unfortunate use of diction when he spoke about the pressure the Tigers' defense hoped to put on Tebow. He told the Orlando Sentinel that if LSU defenders had a chance to tackle Tebow on Saturday in Gainesville, they would try their best to "take him out of the game." 
"Every lineman wants to get a good hit on a Heisman Trophy winner," --NAME-- added. After those comments were published, he said they had been misinterpreted. "We never go into any football game trying to hurt a player from the other team," the junior said in a written statement released by the team. "We have great respect for Tim as player and a competitor. By taking him out of the game, I meant as a defense we are going to try to make him ineffective. I'm sorry that my initial comments were interpreted another way."
One of the top shot putters in the NCAA in 2008, --NAME-- stepped into the circle at the NCAA Outdoor Track and Field Championships for the first time in his collegiate career. He placed 18th at the national meet in Des Moines, Iowa, with a throw of 57 feet, 9 3/4 inches.
2008: Missed the second half vs. Mississippi State (9/27) and sat out the Florida (10/11) and South Carolina contests (10/18) with a right groin strain.
2009: Could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine due to his right groin injury.
Attended Carol City (Miami, Fla.) High School, playing football for head coach Walt Frazier Rated the premier defensive line prospect in the state of Florida as a senior 
Rated third in the country at his position by College Football News and selected All-American first-team by Prep Football Report and Riddell The All-State first-team choice was a member of the Orlando Sentinel Top 100 for Florida and a member of the FSN South's Countdown To Signing Day" All-South" first team Named the Dade County Male Athlete of the Year in both 2004 and 2005, becoming the only two-time winner of the award in its 49-year history Closed out his career with a remarkable senior season, registering 93 tackles, 15 sacks and three interceptions Also forced six fumbles and recovered three. He set the Florida state record for sacks in a game with 6.5 Had a breakout junior season with 87 tackles, including 27 for losses, 10 sacks and eight forced fumbles Also excelled in track, competing in the shot put and discus Won the state championships in the shot put and discus as both a junior and senior Recorded the nation's third-best toss in the shot put with a throw of 65-5 3/4 in 2005 Won the 2005 Florida state titles in both the shot put and the discus Was named one of the three top performers of 2005 in the shot put by USA Today Produced career-bests of 190-1 in the discus and 65-7 in the shot put.
Tall, but can still use leverage to bull rush his man into the pocket.   Violent with his hands, able to rip off blocks inside to make plays on the ball.   Impressive in his ability to stand his man up and discard him to either side.   Rarely gets moved when facing a one-on-one block.   Moves fluidly down the line, able to eat up a wide running lane with his length.   Recognizes the screen.   Imposing figure when closing, will work toward the quarterback if he's in sight.   Impacts passing lanes and can block kicks using his height and reach.
A bit lean for some NFL defensive coordinators, but not considerably light.   High pad level allows double-team blocks to sweep him aside.   Inconsistent initial quickness off the snap and he guesses the snap count at times.   Could hustle and chase the ball more often.   Not quick enough to keep off a cut block, but recovers well.   Does not consistently play to his timed speed, lumbering in space and lacking elite stop-start quickness.
JON BRADLEY, Detroit -- --NAME-- has exceptional playing strength, but has failed to live up to his lofty press clippings. He has had academic issues, off-field problems and an overall inconsistent performance on the field. He can easily shed blocks and power through the line, but lacks focus. He runs his mouth more than Warren Sapp, but with 56 tackles in 25 games, it is obvious he can't back up his bold comments. Unless someone feels that they have patient veterans to mentor him, it is doubtful that he will live up to his own opinion of himself.
-------------------------
Peria_Jerry 79585 24
The Rebels' remarkable turnaround on defense in 2008 was thanks largely to the stellar performance of --NAME--, who made a quick recovery from August arthroscopic knee surgery to have the most dominating season for an Ole Miss defender since the departure of All-American linebacke, Patrick Willis. 
Mississippi finished 101st in the nation in rushing defense (199.08 ypg) and 88th in total defense (423.42 ypg) in 2007. With --NAME-- wreaking havoc in the opposing backfield, the team ranked fourth nationally in rushing defense (85.54 ypg) and 19th in total defense (307.23 ypg) in 2008.
--NAME-- led the Southeastern Conference and ranked second among the nation's defensive tackles (11th overall) with 18 tackles behind the line of scrimmage, an average of 1.5 stops for loss per game, in 2008. During last two seasons, he registered 32 tackles for loss and 10.5 sacks, establishing his dominance in the middle of the field. 
"--NAME-- rises to every occasion that we've challenged him to this season," Mississippi defensive coordinator Tyrone Nix said. "There are so many people across the country who haven't seen him and what he can do. He's a kid that's been a force for us in the run game, in the pass game and in every aspect. I'm just proud to be able to say that I coached him his senior year."
--NAME--'s family roots are deep in football tradition. His cousin, Dwayne Rudd, was an All-American linebacker at Alabama (1994-96) and was selected in the first round of the 1997 NFL Draft by Minnesota, playing for the Vikings (1997-2000), Cleveland (2001-02) and Tampa Bay (2003). Their cousin, Derek Pegues, was an All-Southeastern Conference defensive back at Mississippi State (2005-08).
--NAME--'s brother, John, is an offensive lineman and teammate at Ole Miss (2006-present). Their cousins, linebacker Eddie Strong (1998-2002) and running back Toward Sanford (1999-2002), played at Ole Miss. Toward's brother, defensive back Jamarca Sanford (2005-08), played on the Rebel defense alongside --NAME-- during their careers.
Like most of his cousins and Pittsburgh Steelers cornerback DeShea Townsend, --NAME-- was a product from South Panola High School. During his prep days, he earned first-team All-State and Class 5A Defensive Player of the Year honors from the Mississippi Association of Coaches. He was also named first-team All-State by The Clarion-Ledger  and was a member of the RebelGrove.com Mississippi 15 Finest list. 
--NAME-- made the Rivals.com Mississippi Top 20 and Mobile Register's Super Southeast 120 lists, in addition to being a member of Max Emfinger's Super South Top 200, which rated --NAME-- as the sixth-best inside linebacker in the region. He added the Clarion-Ledger's Top 40 recruits in Mississippi and The Sun-Herald's Top 30 accolades, while also being selected to Prep Star' All-Region and Super Prep's All-Dixie. After his senior year, he was chosen to play in the 2004 Mississippi-Alabama All-Star Classic in Mobile, Alabama.
A three-year starter, --NAME-- capped off his senior season by leading South Panola with 104 tackles, which included seven tackles for loss and three sacks, helping the team finish with a perfect 15-0 record in 2003, which was good enough to win the Class 5A state championship and earn a final ninth place national ranking by USA Today. He sat out his junior season due to injury, but recorded 255 tackles and 16 sacks for his career.
--NAME-- signed with Mississippi in 2004, but later enrolled at Hargrave Military Academy to improve his academics. He appeared in eight games that year, posting 30 tackles and five sacks, but was hampered by ankle problems. He enrolled at Ole Miss in 2005, playing in six of the Rebels' final seven games, as he missed the first four games overcoming his prep school injury. He finished with just three tackles.
--NAME-- saw action at every defensive line position in 2006, starting a total of six of the eight games he played in -- two each at left end, left tackle and nose guard. Foot and hand injuries forced him to miss four contests, but he still managed to record 22 tackles (17 solos) with two sacks and five stops for losses.
--NAME-- had his first injury-free season in 2006, starting all 12 games at left tackle. The All-Southeastern Conference second-team choice finished second on the team and seventh in the conference with 14 tackles behind the line of scrimmage, adding 3.5 sacks and a career-high 58 hits (40 solos). He also had his only career interception.
A right knee lateral meniscus tear required surgery in August, but after missing just the 2008 season opener, --NAME-- returned to the field, starting 11 of his final 12 games. The All-American and All-SEC first-team selection posted 49 tackles (25 solos), as he ranked second on the squad with seven sacks. He led the league with 18.0 stops behind the line of scrimmage, racing 13 yards for a touchdown on a fumble recovery.
2004: Sat out the final four games with an ankle sprain.
2005: Missed the first four games with an ankle injury.
2006: Bothered most of the season by foot and hand problems that eventually saw him sit out the Wake Forest (9/23), Georgia (9/30), Arkansas (10/21) and Auburn (10/28) contests.
2008: Missed the season opener vs. Memphis (8/30) after undergoing arthroscopic right knee surgery (8/18) to repair a meniscus tear.
2009: Could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine and limited on Pro Day due to a hamstring strain.
Attended South Panola (Batesville, Miss.) High School, playing football for head coach Ricky Woods Earned first-team All-State and Class 5A Defensive Player of the Year honors from the Mississippi Association of Coaches Named first-team All-State by The Clarion-Ledger and was a member of the RebelGrove.com Mississippi 15 Finest list Made the Rivals.com Mississippi Top 20 and Mobile Register's Super Southeast 120 lists, in addition to being a member of Max Emfinger's Super South Top 200, which rated --NAME-- as the sixth-best inside linebacker in the region Added the Clarion-Ledger's Top 40 recruits in Mississippi and The Sun-Herald's Top 30 accolades, while also being selected to Prep Star' All-Region and Super Prep's All-Dixie After his senior year, he was chosen to play in the 2004 Mississippi-Alabama All-Star Classic in Mobile, Alabama A three-year starter, --NAME-- capped off his senior season by leading South Panola with 104 tackles, which included seven tackles for loss and three sacks, helping the team finish with a perfect 15-0 record in 2003, which was good enough to win the Class 5A state championship and earn a final ninth place national ranking by USA Today Sat out his junior season due to injury, but recorded 255 tackles and 16 sacks for his career.
Quick, active three-technique tackle.   Good height and adequate girth inside.   Very quick off the snap, able to beat the down block by tackles or penetrate to force the quarterback to rush his decision.   Gets his hands inside guards' jerseys to push the pocket.   Chases downfield on plays away from him, and works hard to make a tackle when the ball is in his area.   Uses his hands well to defeat cut blocks inside.   Handles double-teams pretty well when playing the nose considering his height, and is able to get off the double to get to the ball.   Emerged as the unquestioned leader of the Ole Miss defensive line.   Dominant week at the Senior Bowl.   Good bloodlines.   Cousins Eddie Strong and Dwayne Rudd both played linebacker in the NFL.
Makes a lot of plays when slanting toward the action.   Needs to play stronger at the point against the run.   Can play a bit high in rushing situations, causing him to lose the leverage battle.   Lacks great awareness, as he does not keep his eyes in the backfield.   Takes himself out of plays too often.   Needs to stay on his feet against stronger linemen.   Low test score.   May struggle with a complicated playbook.
ANTHONY McFARLAND, ex-Indianapolis -- Like McFarland, --NAME-- is an undersized defensive tackle with a high motor. His versatility (can play zero, two- or three-tech), initial burst and active hands made him the most disruptive force in the SEC in 2008. While he did not do it in the past, --NAME-- showed marked improvement reading blocks, feeling pressure and redirecting to the play. He has become a force from the off-side and became a challenge for offensive linemen as he showed a more physical nature in his play. He won't maul a lineman, but has developed capable hands (wax on, wax off moves) with a quick swim to gain penetration. Still, like McFarland, injuries and durability issues are a concern.
-------------------------
David_Johnson 79589 241
--NAME--'s statistics did not put him on any All-American teams, but his 22 receptions in 2008 went for 356 yards (an excellent 16.2-yard average) and five touchdowns and he did make second-team All-Sun Belt. The combination of his blocking and receiving skills is what puts him among this year's best senior H-back prospects. Texas A&M found out his value as a blocker in the Red Wolves' shocking September upset in College Station. Had an arm span of 33 3/4 inches and a hand span of 10 3/4 inches at the combine.
Caught 20 passes as a senior and two touchdowns for the Zebras   Primarily used as a blocker, but runs a 4.7-second 40-yard dash   Two-year letterman   Helped his team to a 10-3 record   All-State pick as a senior and two-time all-conference   Played baseball as well.
Fullback/tight end combination with matching build: well-built lower body with fullback height and long arms usually seen on receivers. Lines up with his hand down and as an H-back. Excellent in-line and open-field blocker. Uses leg strength to get out of his stance quickly and get into his route or block, anchors well and pushes aside defensive ends with 30 to 50-pound weight advantages. Finds targets in space and negates them using his length and strength. Good hands; can snatch balls from the air and adjust to poor throws. Has the speed to get deep down the seam. Used as outside protector on placements.
Will be most effective in an H-back or true fullback position because of his lack of height. Inexperienced playing fullback in the I-formation. Generally played against a lower level of competition, although Arkansas State does play stronger non-conference games. Must work on hand technique and get up to speed against stronger, quicker defensive ends and linebackers when blocking.
-------------------------
Quinn_Johnson 79593 145
With Jacob Hester having graduated, --NAME--, a former linebacker, finally got the opportunity to be the Tigers' full-time starter at fullback in 2008. Before the 2006 season, the coaches approached the then sophomore and asked him to move to the offensive side of the ball. He was reluctant to make the move, but the staff promised that he would get much more playing time than he did during a trying freshman season on defense.
--NAME-- loves to hit, so lead blocking for the Tigers' physical running game turned out to be a perfect fit. Despite playing on a team that featured standout offensive linemen like Herman --NAME-- and Ciron Black, he ranked second on the team with 11 touchdown-resulting blocks in 2008.
At West St. John High School, --NAME-- was regarded as one of the top prep linebackers in the state. He was a member of the Baton Rouge Advocate Super Dozen as well as being selected to the New Orleans Times-Picayune's Top 20 Blue-Chip list. He earned All-District honors in 2002 after making 122 tackles. 
Along with present LSU teammate defensive lineman Tyson Jackson, --NAME-- helped lead his team to a 14-1 record and the state Class 2A championship in 2003. He also saw action at fullback, rushing for 800 yards and 11 touchdowns as a junior.
In 2004, --NAME-- red-shirted at Louisiana State, where he competed on the scout team as an outside linebacker. He appeared in just one contest the following season, recording one solo tackle in the Mississippi State. He shifted to fullback in 2006, appearing in 12 games, but carried just twice for 6 yards.
With Hester shuffling between fullback and tailback in 2007, --NAME-- had the opportunity to start four of the 14 games he appeared in. He did not get a chance to carry the ball, but caught three balls for 21 yards and posted 35 knockdowns.
--NAME-- started 10 games as a senior. He scored three times on 14 rushing attempts, producing 28 yards (2.0 avg). He registered 72 knockdowns and caught a pair of passes for 33 yards. He also recovered two onside kicks for 14 yards in returns.
No major injuries reported, but could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine due to a shoulder injury.
Attended West St. John (Edgard, La.) High School, playing football for head coach Laury Dupont Regarded as one of the top prep linebackers in the state Member of the Baton Rouge Advocate Super Dozen as well as being selected to the New Orleans Times-Picayune's Top 20 Blue-Chip list Earned All-District honors in 2002 after making 122 tackles Along with present LSU teammate defensive lineman Tyson Jackson, --NAME-- helped lead his team to a 14-1 record and the state Class 2A championship in 2003 Also saw action at fullback, rushing for 800 yards and 11 touchdowns as a junior.
Compact, thick build with good arm length. Lines up in the I-formation and as an H-back. Lowers his shoulder, delivers a good pop and brings his hips against linebackers in the hole. Can be a missile when decisive on who he will hit. Willing special teamer with good straight-line speed for his size.
Only adequate height for the position. Lacks flexibility needed to adjust to linebackers and safeties at the second level. Likes to hit his target, but fails to use his hands to ride him out of the play or sustain the block. Hesitates to find a target at times when no one comes into his area. Very inconsistent hands out of the backfield; not a natural receiver. Lacks elusiveness in the open field, although his size makes him tough for defensive backs to bring down. Will hit, but usually not wrap, returners in the open field.
LOUSAKA POLITE, Miami -- Like Polite, --NAME-- is a punishing inside lead blocker who loves to hit. He lacks any sort of running or receiving skills, which will limit how a team will use him, as most now regard the classic fullback as an endangered species. With his marginal speed and tight hips, he can't be used as an H-Back or in the slot with much success. However, if you need someone to consistently clear the rush lanes, he is the best doing that coming out of college.
-------------------------
Johnny_Knox 79595 140
Perhaps no player has improved their draft stock since the end of the 2008 season than --NAME--. With his stellar performances in college All-Star game action, coupled with an outstanding performance at the Indianapolis Combine, the Wildcats receiver has had NFL scouts scrambling back to the film room to see the deep threat in action.
With his blazing speed and natural hands, --NAME-- was the favorite target of Abilene Christian quarterbacks. In just two seasons at the school, he set the ACU and Lone Star Conference all-time record with 30 touchdown receptions. In just 25 games for the Wildcats, he caught 118 passes, the seventh-best career total in school history. His 2,227 receiving yards placed fifth on the team's all-time record list.
--NAME-- was not highly recruited coming out of tiny Channelview High School, despite earning first-team all-state Class 4A honors from Texas Prep. He was named all-district 23-4A first team and Offensive Most Valuable Player after leading the Houston area prep ranks in touchdown catches and receiving yards in 2004.
In 2005, --NAME-- enrolled at local Tyler Community College. He appeared in four games as a true freshman, snatching eight passes for 137 yards (17.1 avg.) and two scores. The 2006 season would be his "coming out party," as he paced the Texas junior college ranks with 11 touchdowns among his 37 catches for 886 yards, leading the National Junior College Athletics Association with an average of 23.95 yards per reception. He was rated the ninth-best receiver in junior college by Rivals.com.
--NAME-- transferred to Abilene Christian in 2007, earning second-team All-America and first-team All-Southwest Region honors. The All-Lone Star Conference first-team pick was also named the league's Receiver of the Year, as he set school and LSC season records with 17 touchdown receptions. 
--NAME-- tallied 1,158 yards receiving, the fourth-best total in school history, grabbing 62 passes in the process (18.7 avg.). He added another score on seven carries for 26 yards (3.7 avg.), returned eight punts for 92 yards (11.5 avg.) and had four kickoff returns for 85 yards (17.0 avg.). He ranked second on the team, averaging 104.69 all-purpose yards per game, starting all 13 contests in 2007.
As a senior, --NAME-- was again named All-American, All-Lone Star Conference and all-region. He led the team with 56 receptions, becoming just the second player in school history to gain over 1,000 yards receiving (1,069) twice in a career. He averaged 19.1 yards per catch, scoring 13 times. He averaged 104.67 all-purpose yards per game, as he returned three kickoffs for 75 yards and 13 punts for 96 yards (7.4 avg.).
--NAME-- lettered at Tyler (Tex.) Community College from 2005-06 In 2005, he appeared in four games as a true freshman, snatching eight passes for 137 yards (17.1 avg.) and two scores As a sophomore, he paced the Texas junior college ranks with 11 touchdowns among his 37 catches for 886 yards, leading the National Junior College Athletics Association with an average of 23.95 yards per reception Was rated the ninth-best receiver in junior college by Rivals.com, earning NJCAA second-team All-America honors in 2006.
No injury report available for Tyler College No major injuries resulting in any time loss at Abilene Christian.
Attended Channelview (Houston, Texas) High School Earned first-team all-state Class 4A honors from Texas Prep Named All-District 23-4A first-team and Offensive Most Valuable Player after leading the Houston area prep ranks in touchdown catches and receiving yards in 2004.
Adequate height with wiry upper body strength and good muscle definition in his arms. Not your typical slight small-school receiver. Good initial quickness off the snap to get into his route. Reliable hands; snatches the ball and adjusts to poor throws. Gets up to high-point and secure the catch. Sinks his hips and displays quick feet going into and out of routes. Has good vision and is elusive running in the open field. Works hard to block downfield, and will sustain and even dominate against smaller corners. Experienced as a punt returner.
Thin through the hips and legs. Gets a lot of his yardage after short routes, screens and swing passes. Lacks elite speed or quickness, but had enough to be special at the FCS level. Easily tripped up in the open field. Does not switch the ball to the outside hand. Despite his strong effort, he lacks the bulk and strength to be effective against NFL defenders. Dances and runs backward too much after the catch or on returns - will not get away with that at the next level.
-------------------------
Quinten_Lawrence 79597 175
--NAME-- brings speed to the table, and plenty of it. He averaged 19.5 yards on each of his 87 receptions coming into the year, earning second-team All-Southland as a junior. Unfortunately a mid-season lower leg injury cost him a large chunk of his senior campaign; he had only 12 catches for 209 yards and a touchdown in five games this season. He did, however, play some defensive back and take his only career punt return 70 yards for a touchdown. His speed and elusiveness give him a chance to make a team as a returner and fourth receiver/cornerback if he checks out medically. Qualified for the NCAA regionals as a sprinter for the McNeese track squad. Had an arm span of 30 1/4 inches and a hand span of 8 1/4 inches at the combine.
All-district, all-parish and all-Acadiana   Lettered also in track and basketball   Went 7-0 in high jump and was the state champion   Also ran a leg on state champion 4x100 meter relay team   Played point guard in basketball and made the all-parish team.
Adequate height and has a wiry strength. Extremely fast and quick. Eats up cushion by exploding off the line and getting on top of the corner before he knows it. Sells the outside or deep route well and cuts quickly to the inside or comes back to the ball. Catches the ball with his reliable hands, able to go outside his frame. Quick feet into and out of routes. Good vision and a naturally elusive runner with the ball in his hands. Efforts downfield blocking on quick screens and run plays. Could have impact as a returner because of his speed and willingness to go straight upfield.
Very thin frame. Didn't face the jam much in college because FCS defenses were afraid of his speed. May struggle blocking and handling larger, physical corners downfield at the next level. Typically lined up outside for McNeese but will probably move inside in the NFL. Medical check required on his leg injury. Did not get a lot of chances to return kicks in college. Inexperienced at corner, if teams want to try him there.
-------------------------
Alex_Magee 79601 67
The consummate team player, --NAME-- volunteered to move to defensive end from his familiar defensive tackle position when injuries depleted the depth at that position in 2008. Learning a new position was sort of a baptism under fire for the former right tackle who also had to switch sides, moving over to left end. 
While his numbers did not stand out like in previous seasons, he also provided valuable leadership for a young, but inexperienced defensive unit in head coach Joe Tiller's final season. It was --NAME--'s task to serve as the unit's policeman, making sure that everyone was positioned right and knew their assignments. Policing the defense was appropriate for the senior, who hopes to one day work for the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Drug Enforcement Agency.
At Oswego High School, --NAME-- was rated the 32nd-best defensive tackle in the nation and the 14th-best player in the state of Illinois by Rivals.com. He earned All-Midwest honors from Prep Football Report and was listed among ChicagoSports.com's Top 100 players.
The Class 7A first-team All-State selection recorded 60 tackles, including 11 for loss and eight sacks as a senior, earning Conference Player of the Year honors. An All-State pick his junior season, he also played fullback in short-yardage situations.
--NAME-- saw action in 11 games at Purdue during his freshman year. He posted 18 tackles (10 solos) with a stop behind the line of scrimmage in 2005, earning starting assignment at right defensive tackle vs. Wisconsin and Penn State. He competed in 14 games in 2006, starting half of those contests. He had 2.5 sacks to go with 33 tackles (20 solos), as he recorded his only collegiate interception and blocked a kick.
--NAME-- lined up as the starting right defensive tackle in all 13 games as a junior. He posted a career-high 38 tackles (24 solos) that included 4.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He recovered two fumbles, caused another and blocked two kicks.
Shifting to left defensive end in 2008, --NAME--'s statistics were down a bit, but he gained valuable experience as a pass rusher coming off the edge. He produced a career-high 3.5 sacks while making six stops behind the line of scrimmage. He collected 28 tackles (14 solos) while recovering and causing a fumble.
No major injuries reported.
COMBINE
Attended Oswego (Ill.) High School, playing football for head coach Karl Hoinkes Rated the 32nd-best defensive tackle in the nation and the 14th-best player in the state of Illinois by Rivals.com Earned All-Midwest honors from Prep Football Report and was listed among ChicagoSports.com's Top 100 players The Class 7A first-team All-State selection recorded 60 tackles, including 11 for loss and eight sacks as a senior, earning Conference Player of the Year honors An All-State pick his junior season, he also played fullback in short-yardage situations.
Stout build with room for at least an additional 5-10 pounds of mass. Versatile defender with experience at defensive tackle and defensive end. Can create problems up front with good initial quickness off the snap. Quick, active hands to slap away the blockers' attempts to latch on to him. Good strength to disengage. Good overall strength for holding up at the point of attack. Can push the pocket as a bull-rusher. Effective short-area tackler who flashes some burst some close. Helped himself with a standout week of practice for the Senior Bowl, demonstrating better redirection and hand technique in pass-rush drills than scouts anticipated.
Inconsistent. Flashes, but rarely puts together a string of standout plays. Viewed as a bit of a "tweener" by some. Flashes initial quickness off the snap but lacks the speed and flexibility to get around the edge teams prefer for weak-side defensive ends. Can come off the snap too high and lose leverage in the running game. Isn't stout enough to handle the double-team inside. Doesn't make enough plays behind the line of scrimmage due to inconsistent lateral quickness. Needs an open lane to make plays. May struggle to locate the ball.
CLIFTON RYAN, St. Louis -- --NAME-- is a jack-of-all-trades who can play tackle or end. He shows nimble feet and good pursuit quickness to make plays along the line or when shooting the gaps. He lacks great bulk, but compensates with his strength to stack and control. He plays with good effort and desire moving laterally and while he won't ever be a quality pass rusher, the experience at defensive end can only help when he returns to his more natural position inside at the next level. A team looking for a quick under tackle like Ryan or Arizona's Darnell Dockett could find a similar player in --NAME--.
-------------------------
Sen'Derrick_Marks 79603 62
Many people were surprised when --NAME-- made his announcement before New Year's that he was leaving the university, forgoing his senior year to enter the 2009 NFL Draft. What was expected to be a banner season for the junior and possible national championship aspirations for the team went up in smoke early in the 2008 campaign as --NAME-- and Auburn struggled throughout the season.
--NAME-- was injured early in the year, suffering an ankle injury vs. Vanderbilt in the sixth game, but also had problems with his feet, shoulder and hamstring. Poor conditioning also played a factor. When it was announced that Tommy Tubberville was stepping down as the Tigers' head coach, the decision to leave the team became easier for the youngster.
"I just feel good about it," --NAME-- said. "Once a man makes a decision, and he feels solid about it, he's going to feel solid about it. So I don't think there's too much that'll change my mind on what I've decided." 
--NAME-- filed paperwork to the NFL advisory committee following the season, but didn't wait for it to return before making his decision. Instead, --NAME-- made the most of his time with family. "It was tough," he said. "I knew I wasn't going to get much (advice) in what way to go. They were going to say it was my decision, and whatever I choose, they're going to support it. "I just prayed about it, and for some reason, I just feel good about this decision. I think it's the best way to go." 
Before the season ended, --NAME-- said he would trust coaches to guide him in his decision. However, --NAME-- said he didn't receive such guidance. "When I was talking to all the coaches, it seemed like they didn't want to say one thing or another because it would seem like they were saying it because they're not going to be there or saying it just on behalf of the university," --NAME-- said. "Neither one of them gave me (advice) on whether to leave or stay. 
"I just talked with (Tuberville), and he gave me all the advice he can. I said, 'Coach, do you think I should go or leave?' He said he really didn't want to tell me. Either way, he just told me to make the right decision and think it over a lot and do what's best for you and your family, so that's what I did." 
At Vigor High School, --NAME-- helped his team reach the first round of the playoffs, as he recorded 81 tackles and 17 sacks as a senior. The three-year starter posted 87 tackles and 11 sacks as a junior, leading the squad to the Class 6A state quarterfinals. He also lettered three times in basketball, averaging 15 points per game. He was not a highly recruited prospect during his prep playing days. Tuberville noticed him why recruiting another player at his school. Once he saw --NAME-- dunk a basketball, he offered him a scholarship on the spot.
--NAME-- enrolled at Auburn and played in the team's first three games of the 2005 season. He recorded one solo tackle before the coaching staff decided to redshirt him. He returned to claim the right defensive tackle position in 2006, earning freshman All-American third-team honors. He collected 38 tackles (26 solos) that included 3.5 sacks and 11 stops for losses, as he also recovered three fumbles.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- was named All-Southeastern Conference second-team. He posted a career-high 43 tackles (20 solos) with a pair of sacks and nine stops behind the line of scrimmage. He started all 13 games at right defensive end, playing the entire season with a hernia that required surgery after the season.
--NAME-- played in 11 games in 2008, moving back to his more natural right tackle position. He missed half of the Vanderbilt clash and sat out the Tennessee-Martin game because of an ankle sprain. He would finish with 32 tackles (15 solos), 10 stops for losses and a pair of sacks, earning All-SEC second-team honors from the league's coaches.
2007: Played most of the season with a hernia that required surgery after the season.
2008: Missed the second half of the Vanderbilt game (10/04) with an ankle sprain Sat out the Tennessee-Martin contest (11/08) as a precaution (lingering ankle pain).
2009: Could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine because of a hamstring strain.
Attended Vigor (Mobile, Ala.) High School, playing football for head coach Kerry Stevenson Helped his team reach the first round of the playoffs, as he recorded 81 tackles and 17 sacks as a senior The three-year starter posted 87 tackles and 11 sacks as a junior, leading the squad to the Class 6A state quarterfinals Also lettered three times in basketball, averaging 15 points a game.
Short, squatty build with room for additional mass in his upper body and a thick lower body. Good leg drive to anchor and use of leverage to hold up against the run. Flashes good initial quickness off the snap to put the blocker in a defensive position. Quick, strong hands to disengage from defenders. Good arm extension to keep blockers' hands off his frame. Good lateral quickness and balance to provide an interior pass rush. Good short-area quickness to close on the ballcarrier. Flashes some explosiveness as a hitter. Willing in pursuit laterally and downfield.
Not yet the sum of his parts as a player. Lacks the bulk and strength to handle anchoring against the double-team. Plays so low that he loses track of the ball. Seems to tire easily, despite being used as part of a rotation at Auburn. Struggled with ankle injuries as a junior. Elected to come out early despite a disappointing junior season and could be motivated by big NFL paychecks.
CLAUDE WROTEN, ex-St. Louis -- --NAME-- is one of the draft's biggest enigmas. When his motor is running, he is a good force to be reckoned with, but there have been too many times that he shows up for games with just a gallon of gasoline in his tank. He lacks great size or strength and the only thing consistent about him is his inconsistency. Durability is another issue, but it all goes back to the weight room. Based on his strength numbers, or lack of, this is a boom or bust player with minimal upside.
-------------------------
LeSean_McCoy 79607 53
--NAME-- is an opportunist -- any opportunity he has to go to the end zone, he takes. In just 25 games as a Panther, he scored 36 times, including 35 rushing. He ranked second in the nation in scoring as a freshman (9.69 ppg) and eighth as a freshman (7.50 ppg). Along the way, he achieved his second straight 1,000-yard rushing season in 2008, joining Tony Dorsett (1973-76) and Curvin Richards (1988-89) as the only players in Pittsburgh history to record multiple 1,000-yard rushing seasons.
--NAME--'s 36 total touchdowns also helped him break the school, Big East Conference and NCAA record for most touchdowns produced by a player as a freshman and sophomore, topping the old mark of 34 scores by receiver Larry Fitzgerald (2002-03). His 35 touchdown runs also broke the freshman/sophomore combined record of 24 by Dorsett during the 1973-74 campaigns.
--NAME-- enjoyed a heralded career at Harrisburg's Bishop McDevitt High School, where he went on to become one of the most prolific rushers in Pennsylvania history. He was twice named to the Associated Press Pennsylvania Class AAAA All-State first-team and was selected AP Class AAAA Player of the Year as a junior. He also received Super Prep, Prep Star and U.S. Army All-America honors, in addition to being rated the nation's 11th-best overall prospect by Tom Lemming's Prep Football Report.
--NAME-- entered his senior season on pace to break the state rushing record, but suffered a compound ankle fracture (right) in the season's fourth game. In just three-plus games that year, he rushed for 859 yards and 10 touchdowns on 83 carries (10.3 avg.). He finished his career as the state's ninth all-time leading rusher with 6,640 yards and 75 touchdowns. 
He was selected to play in the Big 33 Football Classic and the All-American Bowl, an All-Star game featuring the nation's top 80 high school players at the Alamo Dome in San Antonio, Texas. He ultimately did not participate in those games due to his recovery from his injury.
In 2006, --NAME-- enrolled at Milford Academy (N.Y.). He was rated the country's second-best prep school prospect by Scout and 10th-best by Rivals.com. He helped the team compile a 7-3 record, as he carried 77 times for 547 yards with four touchdowns (7.1 avg.).
--NAME-- became an instant sensation upon his arrival at Pittsburgh in 2007. He was a unanimous Freshman All-American and named to the All-Big East Conference first team. The Big East Rookie of the Year led the nation's freshmen with an average of 110.67 yards per game rushing (ranked 21st overall). He set the Big East freshman rushing record with 1,328 yards on 276 carries (4.8 avg.) and 14 touchdowns.
The first-year player also set Pittsburgh's freshman single-season records with 90 points scored and 15 total touchdowns, topping Dorsett's 1973 marks of 78 points and 13 scores. He pulled down 33 passes for 244 yards (7.4 avg.) and one touchdown, as he placed third in the league with an average of 131.0 all-purpose yards per game.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- garnered All-America second-team and All-Big East first-team honors. A semi-finalist for the Maxwell Award (nation's top player) and Doak Walker Award (top running back), he produced 21 touchdowns on 308 rushing attempts for 1,488 yards (4.8 avg.). He snatched 32 passes for 305 yards (9.5 avg.) and finished third in the league with an average of 139.15 all-purpose yards per game.
--NAME-- has been favorably compared to Pittsburgh's Hall of Fame tailback, Tony Dorsett, who recently stated, "This is the first player who has come along who truly reminds me of me."
2005: Suffered a right ankle compound fracture early during his high school senior season, missing the final eight games.
2009: Could not perform at the NFL Combine due to a bout with the flu.
Attended Bishop McDevitt (Harrisburg, Pa.) High School, playing football for head coach Jeff Weachter Became one of the most prolific rushers in Pennsylvania history Twice named to the Associated Press Pennsylvania Class AAAA All-State first-team AP Class AAAA Player of the Year as a junior Super Prep, Prep Star and U.S. Army All-American, in addition to being rated the nation's 11th-best overall prospect by Tom Lemming's Prep Football Report Entered his senior season on pace to break the state rushing record, but suffered a compound ankle fracture (right) in the season's fourth game In just three-plus games that year, he rushed for 859 yards and 10 touchdowns on 83 carries (10.3 avg.) Finished his career as the state's ninth all-time leading rusher with 6,640 yards and 75 touchdowns Selected to play in the Big 33 Football Classic and the All-American Bowl, an All-Star game featuring the nation's top 80 high school players at the Alamo Dome in San Antonio, Texas, but ultimately did not participate in those games due to his recovery from his injury.
Fast enough to get the corner and owns a second and third gear in the secondary. Excellent inside quickness, hitting the hole in a hurry when in the one-back set. Gets to top speed as quickly as any back in the country. Special vision for the cutback and in traffic. Plants his foot and accelerates. Very elusive in space, with shifty hips and an ability to juke or shake off a defender. Maintains his balance well after making a move or running through arm tackles on the outside. Runs with a lean inside, will bounce off tackles and keep his legs moving. Patient enough to allow blocks to develop on stretch plays to the outside. Very natural hands as a receiver; will excel on swing and screen passes. Uses his quick feet to run crisp out routes. Ultra-competitive; works hard in the film and weight rooms. Wants the ball on every play.
Doesn't have great size or the compact strength of elite backs. Must prove he can get the tough yard and not dance to try and break a big play when it's not there. Invites turnovers by running with the ball very loosely. Doesn't always switch the ball to the outside hand. Runs out of control at times. Some of those cutbacks will not work against the speed of NFL defenses. A liability in pass protection, throwing a shoulder instead of moving his feet to take on or even just get in the way of a rusher. Whiffs on his cut blocks against blitzing linebackers.
WARRICK DUNN, ex-Tampa Bay -- Some scouts liken --NAME-- to Pittsburgh's Willie Parker, but he doesn't have the same patience in following blocks or the outside running skills the Steelers tailback brings to the table. --NAME-- is bigger than Dunn, but both have made a nice living off exploding through holes between the tackles. Both are also very effective as receivers coming out of the backfield. His acceleration is in the category with Dallas' Felix Jones, but he lacks the deceptive power the Cowboy possesses.
-------------------------
Mike_Mickens 79609 227
For 46 consecutive games, --NAME-- was establishing his reputation as one of the premier pass coverage defenders in college football. It seemed certain that big things would happen, but covering a deep route in the 2008 Louisville contest, --NAME-- felt a pop in his left knee. Tests after the game revealed that he suffered a torn meniscus and cartilage damage. The injury would sideline him for the final three regular-season games. He would return for the postseason tilt vs. Virginia Tech in the Orange Bowl, but he was not 100 percent after undergoing arthroscopic surgery. 
He would also have to pull out of the Senior Bowl, as he experienced swelling in the knee during practices in Mobile. He also was unable to work out at the Scouting Combine in February.
--NAME-- was a two-time All-Greater Western Ohio Conference cornerback at Wayne High School. He helped the Warriors to a 24-9 record and two league titles during his three seasons. He amassed 205 tackles and 10 interceptions, blocked four field goals and returned a kickoff for a touchdown during his career. 
The talented athlete also excelled in track, becoming the state 300-meter hurdles champion as a junior. He was also part of the school's 4x400 meter relay team, helping them to a second-place finish at the state finals during his sophomore year.
Upon --NAME--' arrival at Cincinnati, it was evident that he was going to be something special. He did not play in the Rutgers game, but went on to start 10 games at right cornerback for the Bearcats in 2005. The Freshman All-American second-team pick by Football News, he deflected 14 passes and intercepted another that year. He also finished sixth on the team with 51 tackles (38 solos), making 2.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- shifted to left cornerback. Constantly challenged by opposing quarterbacks, he made them pay by pulling down three interceptions to go with 15 pass breakups. He again finished sixth on the team with 59 tackles (39 solos), but was more involved in run support than he was as a freshman, registering a sack, 2.5 stops for loss and a forced fumble. His 18 total passes defended ranked eighth in the nation, earning him All-Big East Conference second-team recognition.
--NAME-- was named All-American and All-Big East Conference first-team as a junior. He combined with fellow cornerback DeAngelo Smith to register 14 interceptions, the most by a cornerback duo in the major college ranks in 2007. --NAME--' six pass thefts rank second on the school single-season record list, as he brought two of those thefts back for scores, gaining 136 return yards. He delivered 53 tackles (33 solos) and deflected six passes while also recovering a fumble.
The 2008 Thorpe Award semifinalist and preseason All-American managed to earn All-Big East Conference second-team honors as a senior, despite missing three late season games. He gained 158 yards (fourth-best season total in the Big East) on four interceptions, scoring for the third time in his career on interceptions. He added ten pass deflections and two stops behind the line of scrimmage, as his career-high 70 tackles (46 solos) ranked second on the squad.
2008: Suffered left knee cartilage damage and a torn meniscus vs. Louisville (11/14), missing the team's final three regular season games vs. Pittsburgh (11/22), Syracuse (11/29) and Hawaii (12/06).
2009: Pulled out of the Senior Bowl after his left knee experienced inflammation during practices, and was unable to work out at the Combine.
Attended Wayne (Huber Heights, Oh.) High School, playing football for head coach Jay Minton Two-time All-Greater Western Ohio Conference cornerback Helped the Warriors to a 24-9 record and two league titles during his three seasons Amassed 205 tackles and 10 interceptions, blocked four field goals and returned a kickoff for a touchdown during his career Also excelled in track, becoming the state 300-meter hurdles champion as a junior Part of the school's 4x400 meter relay team, helping them to a second-place finish at the state finals during his sophomore year.
Legitimate cover corner.   Possesses the quick feet and smooth hip turn to change direction and blanket his assignment.   Often forces the quarterback to go to his second option.   Reads the action quickly and gets an excellent break on the ball.   Cognizant defender.   Experienced in man and zone coverage with the combination of athleticism and instincts to play in either scheme at the next level.   Has a second gear to close and uses his long arms well to deflect passes.   Physical enough to make a big hit after his man makes the catch.   Improved hands for the interception in 2007 and has 14 picks and 44 pass breakups over his career.   Natural with the ball in his hands, returning two of his six interceptions for touchdowns last season.   Quick to come up in run support, even when pressing in man coverage, and flashes physicality that belies his frame.   Coachable.   Very confident in his ability.   Plays with attitude, will not back down from any receiver.   Leads by example on the field.
Feasts on hastily thrown passes in zone coverage behind a dominant pass rush.   Must improve his ability to beat running back blocks when on the blitz.   A bit tall and stiff in his backpedal, which can make it hard for him to recover when the receiver runs a quick out.   While physical, --NAME-- has a tendency to lead with his shoulder when making a big hit, instead of wrapping up securely.   Left knee injury that cost him three games in 2008 and sidelined him for the Senior Bowl and Scouting Combine is a significant concern.
-------------------------
Roy_Miller 79611 81
Short in stature, but long on talent, --NAME-- is one of the strongest players in college football. The former prep power-lifter holds all of the Longhorns' top numbers in the weight room, boasting a 500-pound bench press, 625-pound squat and 365-pound power clean.
--NAME-- emerged during his senior year after taking over left defensive tackle duties. Teaming with defensive end Brian Orakpo, that left side tandem registered 58 quarterback pressures for Texas during the 2008 campaign. It was the first time that he served as a full-time starter, having answered the opening whistle just six times during his first 36 games.
With --NAME--'s father a member of the U.S. Army, he moved around a bit as a youth. He was born in Fort Lewis, Washington before moving to Fort Eustis two years later. In 1997, the family again relocated, settling in Killeen, Texas, where --NAME-- excelled at Shoemaker High School.
--NAME-- was a two-time All-State and three-time All-District performer at defensive tackle and also played some offensive tackle. The All-Area Defensive MVP recorded 111 tackles with 10 sacks, 17 stops for loss, 19 pressures, six pass break-ups and two fumble recoveries, returning one 43 yards for a touchdown as a senior at Shoemaker. In three seasons, the team captain collected 264 tackles with 24 sacks.
--NAME-- was named captain in the 2005 U.S. Army All-American Bowl and finished second in the voting for Game MVP honors. He also lettered four times as a power-lifter and twice in track. He placed eighth in the state in the power-lifting championship as a junior. In track, he competed in the shot put and discus. He was a three-time Academic All-District pick and named to the National Honor Roll as a junior.
In 2005, --NAME-- saw reserve action at both defensive tackle positions for Texas. The freshman posted seven tackles (2 solos). As a sophomore, injuries saw --NAME-- start the final six games, lining up vs. Baylor at left defensive tackle before shifting to the right side for the balance of the schedule. He went on to record 27 tackles (17 solos) with 3.5 sacks and 4.5 stops for loss.
--NAME-- returned to reserve duty in 2007, playing mostly behind Derek Lokey at left tackle for 13 games. He collected 24 tackles (14 solos) with a sack, adding 5.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage, one pressure and a fumble recovery. He was also a member of UT's Athletics Director's Honor Roll.
Looked upon to fill the leadership void in 2008, --NAME-- was more than willing to assume those responsibilities, both on and off the field. Away from the game, he was very active in UT's community service program. He played host to 150 middle school students at Moncrief-Neuhaus Athletic Center and spoke at his middle school and high school in Killeen. 
--NAME-- is part of a group of Longhorns that regularly visits patients at the Austin Children's Hospital, and participated in A Hero's Tribute by welcoming troops back to Fort Hood after being stationed overseas. He has also participated in reading and mentoring at local elementary and middle schools and counseling at a local youth center.
In his final season as a Longhorn, --NAME-- earned All-Big 12 Conference second-team honors. Starting all 13 games at left defensive tackle, he ranked sixth on the team with 42 tackles (24 solos), adding 5.5 sacks, 10.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage and seven quarterback pressures. He was also named the Fiesta Bowl Defensive MVP.
2008: Left the Texas Tech game (11/01) briefly after suffering a knee sprain.
Attended Shoemaker (Killeen, Texas) High School, playing football for head coach Ken Gray Two-time All-State and three-time All-District performer at defensive tackle and also played some offensive tackle The All-Area Defensive MVP recorded 111 tackles with 10 sacks, 17 stops for loss, 19 pressures, six pass breakups and two fumble recoveries, returning one 43 yards for a touchdown as a senior In three seasons, the team captain collected 264 tackles with 24 sacks Named captain in the 2005 U.S. Army All-American Bowl and finished second in the voting for Game MVP honors Also lettered four times as a power-lifter and twice in track Placed eighth in the state in the power-lifting championship as a junior In track, he competed in the shot put and discus Three-time Academic All-District pick and named to the National Honor Roll as a junior.
Short, squatty frame.   Good lower-leg drive and use of leverage to hold up as a nose guard.   Can anchor against the double-team and create a pile.   Flashes some initial and lateral quickness as a pass rusher.   Quick hands and impressive upper-body strength to disengage from blocks and make tackles at the point of attack.   Flashes some explosiveness as a hitter.   High-effort player who will pursue down the line.   Physical player who has value as a short-yardage fullback or wedge-buster on special teams.   Helped himself with solid week of practice at the East-West Shrine Game.
Limited athlete who lacks the size and agility to offer much more than what he's asked as a run-plugging nose guard.   Needs an open lane to close and has only short-area quickness.   Offers very little in terms of a traditional pass rush.   Creates penetration behind the line of scrimmage due to his stout frame, but most of his plays are made based on hustle.
KELLY GREGG, Baltimore -- Like Gregg, --NAME-- is more of a two-gap type but is trapped in a squat nose guard's body. He has exceptional strength and can create a good surge off the ball, but does not have the speed to chase down quarterbacks from the backside. He has a strong hand jolt to separate and fend off blocks and uses that punch to shed with authority. He lacks any pass rush moves and just marginal-to-adequate lateral agility. He fails to recover and change direction in pursuit. He is a good wrap-up tackler at the point of attack, but when chasing on the edge he reaches and overextends, causing him to slip off some tackles.
-------------------------
Marko_Mitchell 79615 243
The Mesa (Ariz.) Community College transfer has developed into one of the country's most feared big-play threats. He's had similar production in his first two years, leading the Wolfpack in receptions (53 in 2007, 61 in 2008), receiving yards (1,129, 1,141) and receiving touchdowns (eight, ten). He ranked second in the nation averaging 21.3 yards per catch as a junior, but finally made first team All-WAC this season. Those outstanding numbers are boosted by Nevada's unique "pistol" offense, but his rare combination of height and straight-line speed makes him a difficult matchup for any cornerback. Had an arm span of 34 1/2 inches and a hand span of 10 1/4 inches at the combine.
Earned first-team all-conference and all-district honors at Mesa (Ariz.) Community College Had 34 catches for 719 yards and eight touchdowns Averaged 21.1 yards per catch.
Was also a standout basketball player.
Rare height and arm length for the position. Good straight-line speed to challenge deep. Can track the ball over either shoulder and shows good body control and field awareness to keep his feet in bounds. Soft hands to pluck the ball out of the air and can make the reception outside of his frame. Alert receiver who will work his way back when the quarterback is under pressure. Good leaping ability. Shows a bit of vision and elusiveness as a runner after the catch and has the long strides to pull away from smaller defenders. Uses his size and length to effectively run block against small corners.
Much of his production is due to this offense. Good, not great, straight-line speed. Will be caught from behind by NFL corners. Long-strider who has to build up to it. Lacks the short burst quickness to consistently gain separation against elite cover corners. Sinewy frame that may not withstand NFL punishment. Ball security may be an issue considering his lack of upper body strength. Isn't the dominant red-zone target his size indicates, due to marginal toughness and physicality in going up for the ball in traffic. Allows too many passes to get into his pads, resulting in some drops.
-------------------------
D.J._Moore 79617 119
--NAME-- is perhaps the most versatile athlete to ever wear a Commodores uniform. During his three seasons at Vanderbilt, he has lined up at cornerback, wide receiver, tailback, slot back, punt returner and kickoff returner, in addition to taking direct snaps as a quarterback, accomplishing all of that in both his sophomore and junior seasons. Do not consider him a jack-of-all-trades though, as he is a team-first player but loves the physical contact he can generate on the defensive side of the ball.
"He does it all,'' Vanderbilt head coach Bobby Johnson said about --NAME--. "If he were a wide receiver by trade, he would be a fantastic one. He's a kick returner. He almost had an interception one time and their guy made a great play on it. He is physical, came up and made some great tackles. He's a top-notch player.'' 
--NAME-- says he is just eager to help out any way he can. All the Vanderbilt coaching staff needs to do is ask. "I do what they ask me to do,'' --NAME-- said of his different roles. "If they asked me to do anything, I'll do it because I'm part of the team. If they ask me to do it, I try to do it.'' 
--NAME-- was a four-year starter at Broome High School, competing mostly as a wide receiver and defensive back. He was named South Carolina Class AA Special Teams Player of the Year and Region 2-2A Player of the Year as a senior. The two-time All-State receiver had 48 receptions for 896 yards and 14 touchdowns during his final campaign. His lone rushing attempt was good for an 84-yard score.
In addition, --NAME-- returned three punts for touchdowns and totaled 39 tackles with six interceptions on defense. He helped lead the squad to the 2004 state title, earning MVP honors in championship game. He also posted five receptions and a touchdown in the postseason Shrine Bowl of the Carolinas.
--NAME-- was also a three-time All-State selection in basketball, as he led that team to the state title as junior. That season, he averaged 14 points, 10 rebounds and five assists per game. Adding to his athletic resume, he was the reigning high jump state champion with a personal best of 6'6".
As a true freshman, --NAME-- shared left cornerback duties with Josh Allen, starting nine contests. He was named Specialist of the Week in his collegiate debut vs. Michigan, going on to record 37 tackles (27 solos), as he shared the team lead with three fumble recoveries and also had two pass deflections, along with one interception.
--NAME-- started every game at left cornerback in 2007, in addition to handling the bulk of kickoff return chores. The Associated Press All-Southeastern Conference first-team choice was named the squad's Defensive MVP, as he ranked second on the team with 83 tackles (63 solos), adding a 9-yard sack and two stops for loss. His six interceptions rank tied for fifth on the school single-season record list, as he returned one for a touchdown. He also deflected 10 passes and ranked fourth in the league with a 25.7-yard average (tied the Commodore single-season record) on 32 kickoff returns. In brief action on offense, he gained 78 yards on six carries (13.0 avg).
In 2008, the junior started all year at left cornerback, but also played a variety of roles for the special team and offensive units. He produced 58 tackles (30 solos) that included one sack among his 4.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He caused and recovered a fumble, broke up seven passes and tied his career-high with six interceptions.
On offense, he carried nine times for 76 yards (8.4 avg) and snared seven passes for 143 yards (20.4 avg), including two touchdowns. He returned 21 kickoffs for 407 yards (19.4 avg) and amassed 244 yards on 17 punt returns, ranking third in the league and 11th nationally with a 14.35-yard average.
After the Music City Bowl, the Commodores' All-American defensive back made it known that he would forgo his final season of eligibility and make himself available for the NFL Draft. --NAME-- revealed his decision during a post-game interview with ESPN and reaffirmed a short time later after he showered and dressed. "About the middle of the season I decided I was good enough to leave," he said. "I had done well.   I wanted to be All-American, so once I was (second-team) All-American there was pretty much nothing left to do."
2007: Suffered a chest contusion vs. Tennessee (11/17).
2008: Suffered a high ankle sprain vs. Boston College (12/31) in the Music City Bowl, but even though the training staff said he was done for the day, he got his ankle taped and came back out to play the second half.
--NAME-- attended Broome (Spartanburg, S.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Quay Farr Four-year starter, competing mostly as a wide receiver and defensive back Named South Carolina Class AA Special Teams Player of the Year and Region 2-2A Player of the Year as a senior The two-time All-State receiver had 48 receptions for 896 yards and 14 touchdowns during his final campaign His lone rushing attempt was good for an 84-yard score In addition, --NAME-- returned three punts for touchdowns and totaled 39 tackles with six interceptions on defense Helped lead the squad to the 2004 state title, earning MVP honors in championship game Posted five receptions and a touchdown in the postseason Shrine Bowl of the Carolinas Three-time All-State selection in basketball, as he led that team to the state title as junior That season, he averaged 14 points, 10 rebounds and five assists per game Adding to his athletic resume, he was the reigning high jump state champion with a personal best of 6'6" Member of the French honors organization.
Good upper body build for his size. Very quick to support the run or attack quick screens and passes in the flat. Quick reactions and instincts make him a natural in zone. Not contact shy, so receivers will expect to get hit on shorter routes. Sits on routes and closes very quickly to make quarterbacks pay if they birddog. Looks like he knows routes as well as the receiver does. Very good straight-line speed and will chase his teammates' receivers downfield. Tries to knock the ball out after securing the tackle. As a slot receiver, --NAME-- has the strength to get off the line, elusiveness in the open field, reliable hands to adjust to poor throws and an ability to track the ball over either shoulder. Extremely quick feet on routes, accelerating past defenders. Uses those receiver skills after interceptions.
Barely adequate height for a corner. Thin legs. Not asked to press much. Lack of size could make bringing down bigger and quicker NFL receivers tough when closing fast. Can be dominated by good blocking receivers. A bit slow to react when receiver stutters and heads up the field. May not have the recovery speed to catch up to quicker NFL receivers using fakes or double moves, and his aggressive style could also cost him in this regard. Doesn't always secure the ball or make good decisions on punt returns while trying to do too much.
-------------------------
Knowshon_Moreno 79619 12
One can only wonder how many Georgia and Southeastern Conference records --NAME-- might have broken if he decided to stay in school for four full seasons. In just two campaigns with the Bulldogs, he ranks sixth on the school career record list for rushing attempts (498), rushing yardage (2,734) and rushing touchdowns (30), as he also ranked seventh in conference annals by averaging 105.15 yards per game on the ground, the second-best career average by a Bulldog.
Even though he started just six times in 2007, --NAME--'s 1,334 yards rushing rank sixth on the school's single-season record list and was the second-highest total by a Georgia freshman. His 1,400 yards rushing in 2008 rank fifth on the Bulldogs annual record chart and rank behind Herschel Walker as the second-best season total by a sophomore. Known as the team's workhorse, he averaged 19.15 rushing attempts per game, the second-most career total in school annals.
--NAME-- joined Herschel Walker (1980-82) as the only players in school history to produce back-to-back 1,000-yard rushing seasons. The fifth Bulldog to reach 2,000 yards rushing, he has also proven to be a capable receiving target. In 26 games, he pulled down 53 passes for 645 yards (12.2 avg) and two scores, finishing his career with 3,409 all-purpose yards, an average of 131.12 yards per game.
At Middletown South High School, --NAME-- earned EA Sports and Prep Star All-American honors. He was rated the 10th-best running back in the country and the third-best overall prospect in the state of New Jersey by Rivals.com, a recruiting service that also listed him as a member of their Rivals Top 100 List. He led the team to three state titles.
--NAME-- concluded his career with 782 points scored on a total of 128 touchdowns, setting the state prep records. As a senior, he rushed for 1,808 yards on 185 carries and scored 43 times in 10 games. His 6,268 career rushing yards is second all-time in New Jersey.
--NAME-- enrolled at Georgia in 2006, spending the season performing on the scout team. With the offense struggling in 2007 fall camp, the fans and media started buzzing about the redshirt freshman who was simply dazzling in scrimmages. He worked his way up the depth chart and many were calling for the staff to insert him into the lineup to begin the season.
Georgia's running game has been predicated on diversity, as no running back knew who was going to get the ball when. There was supposed to be a change of pace, an element of surprise to it all. But the truth of the matter was the pace never reached breakneck speed. Georgia's running game plodded instead of plowed. Then, along came --NAME--. 
Before the 2007 season opener, Georgia coach Mark Richt said, "--NAME--, I know when you get to watch the kid practice every day and see what he does, it gets you excited. He is a very vibrant guy. He could be a gymnast. You can't hide his enthusiasm for life. He will light up his team with his energy level. He will jump over a guy standing on his feet and score. He has got speed, power and agility. People have to respect his power. If (the defense) sends a guy full-speed to try and get him, --NAME-- will make them miss." 
--NAME-- waited patently for his opportunity, coming off the bench behind Thomas Brown and Kregg Lumpkin for the first six games of the 2007 campaign. Brown would get injured and instead of turning to Lumpkin, --NAME-- was inserted into the starting lineup vs. Vanderbilt. After racing for 157 yards on 28 carries vs. the Commodores, all other Bulldog runners lined up behind the redshirt freshman on the depth chart. 
He would go on to gain 1,334 yards with 14 touchdowns on 248 carries (5.3 avg). That yardage total was the second-best by a Bulldog first-year player and third among Southeastern Conference freshman in a campaign. He also made 20 catches for 253 yards (12.6 avg) and averaged 122.08 all-purpose yards per game.
Leg cramps in the season opener and a deep elbow bruise vs. Alabama could not slow down the --NAME-- Express in 2008. The All-American overcame those bumps and bruises to carry the ball 250 times for 1,400 yards (5.6 avg), the fifth-best season total (second among sophomores) in school annals. More involved in the passing game, he snatched 33 passes for 392 yards (11.9 avg) and a pair of scores, piling up 108 points. His average of 107.69 yards per game rushing led the Southeastern Conference, and his 16 scoring runs tied for fourth-best on the school single-season record chart.
2008: Left the Georgia Southern game (8/30) with leg cramps Suffered a deep elbow bruise vs. Alabama (9/27).
Attended Middletown (N.J.) South High School, playing football for head coach Steve Antonucci Earned EA Sports and Prep Star All-American honors Rated the 10th-best running back in the country and the third-best overall prospect in the state of New Jersey by Rivals.com, a recruiting service that also listed him as a member of their Rivals Top 100 List Led the team to three state titles, as he concluded his career with 782 points scored on a total of 128 touchdowns, setting the state prep records As a senior, he rushed for 1,808 yards on 185 carries and scored 43 times in 10 games His 6,268 career rushing yards is second all-time in New Jersey.
Tight-skinned athlete with good overall musculature. Good quickness to the hole. Reads the defense and anticipates where the hole, including cutback lanes, will appear. Exceptional lateral quickness and elusiveness in tight quarters. Very rarely tackled by the first defender. Good acceleration past the initial wave of defense and into the secondary. Good spin and stiff arm, and has phenomenal leaping ability to jump over tacklers. Attacks the line of scrimmage and is a tougher interior runner than given credit for. Can drop his shoulders and has good leg drive. Runs through a lot of tackles due to his competitive drive and toughness. Keeps his legs churning and will spin away from tackles. Soft hands for the reception. Natural receiver who poses intriguing possibilities to be split out wide. Good quickness and effort as a route-runner; isn't just a threat on dump-offs in the flat or screens. Provides a pop in pass protection. Extreme competitor who can put the team on his shoulders. Wants the ball with the game on the line.
Questionable top-end speed. Lacks the prototype size and bulk some teams are looking for in a bell-cow runner.
JOSEPH ADDAI, Indianapolis -- Like Addai, --NAME-- might lack blazing speed but he is a physical inside runner whose field vision, redirection agility and leg drive allows him to break tackles and get positive yardage up the gut. He is not much of a dancer in the backfield and shows good route running skills and hands to be an every-down back. Like Addai and Buffalo's Marshawn Lynch, his best asset is his ability to handle a variety of running back roles, rather than be limited as a specialist.
-------------------------
Ryan_Mouton 79621 94
This jack of all trades played on both sides of the ball at every level. --NAME-- was named a Junior College All-American because of his production as a defender and return man and continued the performance after transferring to Hawaii. He didn't make any big plays for the Warriors on offense (eight catches, 71 yards) but returned a kickoff for a touchdown and had six tackles for loss, one interception, eight pass breakups and two forced fumbles as a nickel back. His versatility, speed and attitude may land him a roster spot as a rookie. Changed his jersey number from Number 27 to 2 as a tribute to a high school teammate who died before the 2008 Sugar Bowl.
All-American at Blinn JC.
Great quickness and change-of-direction agility.   Slot cornerback who plays stronger than his diminutive frame would suggest.   Strong as a cut tackler, hits the man in the thigh instead of diving at his shins.   Shows no let up and doesn't back down.   Will run blitz from the slot and wrap the ballcarrier in the hole.   Able to locate the ball on the run and has the hands to make the interception.   Plays receiver and returns kicks in addition to his cornerback duties.   Good in the slot and is elusive after the catch.   Difference-maker on returns, using his quickness and some tough running to hit the gap and separate from coverage units.
Teams could wonder if he fits on defense or offense.   Short with a small frame, although he does have adequate muscle definition.   Will have troubles matching up against tall or strong receivers on the outside.   Taken out of run plays if a receiver gets a hand on him.   Will not win fights for the ball.   Tackling is an issue, lacks the size and strength to wrap up.   Takes poor angles to the ball at times.   Must work on staying low in his backpedal.   Will dance on returns at times instead of hitting a lane.   Did not return punts at Hawaii, a skill that would greatly improve his stock.
-------------------------
Bear_Pascoe 79625 184
--NAME-- might have something in common with the late James Brown - competing for the title of "hardest working man in America." The well-built athlete joined the Fresno State program as a quarterback, but quickly found a home as the team's primary offensive weapon after moving to tight end. He did not rest on his receiving laurels, however, as he developed into what head coach Pat Hill calls, "the most devastating blocker we've ever had at his position, ever!"
While he will go down as one of the best players to ever wear a Bulldogs uniform, there was much more to his game than just receptions and blocking. He also excelled on special teams, finishing as the school's career record holder by blocking six kicks. 
Still, his football exploits don't tell the full story about McKenna Sean "--NAME--" --NAME--. Growing up on a ranch, the cowboy is also an award-winning rodeo calf roper. --NAME-- was a big, physical quarterback and one of the top all-around athletes in the Valley during his playing days at Granite Hills High School. He was selected the 2003 East Yosemite League Offensive Player of the Year and was named All-Area after guiding his team to a 16-4 record over the last two seasons, including the 2002 East Yosemite League title.
As a senior, --NAME-- accounted for 1,851 total yards and 16 touchdowns, generating nearly 3,500 yards and 33 touchdowns over his final two seasons. Not limited to just offense, he was regarded as one of the league's top outside linebackers. 
--NAME-- added to his prep resume when he was named a first-team All-East Yosemite League basketball player as a junior. He also lettered in track, competing in the EYL Finals in the shot and discus, placing sixth in the Valley championships in the discus as a junior.
In 2004, --NAME-- enrolled at Fresno State, spending the season adjusting to tight end from quarterback. He so impressed the coaching staff that he was named Scout Team Player of the Year for his performances in practice. He played in all 13 games, including nine on offense, where he earned three starts in 2005. He pulled down five passes for 34 yards and returned five kickoffs for 27 yards.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- took over tight end duties, starting all 12 games. He finished fourth on the team with 22 receptions, gaining 307 yards (14.2 avg) with two scores. He had one kickoff return for 12 yards and registered four tackles, as he blocked kicks in each of the Oregon and New Mexico State clashes.
Despite missing one game and a good portion of another with an ankle sprain, --NAME-- became the first Fresno State tight end to receiver first-team All-Conference (Western Athletic) honors. He finished second on the team with a career-high 45 receptions for 553 yards (12.3 avg) and four touchdowns. He blocked two more kicks, knocking down a field goal in each of the Texas A&M and Nevada contests.
--NAME-- was named to the John Mackey Award Watch List and again garnered All-WAC first-team honors, even though his ankle problems again saw him sit out one entire game and a part of another. He again ranked second on the squad after hauling down 40 passes, good for 400 yards (10.0 avg) and four touchdowns He added two more blocked kicks to establish a new school record with six blocks for his career.
2007: Missed a good portion of the Utah State game (11/03) and sat out the Kansas State clash (11/24) with a high ankle sprain.
2008: Did not play vs. Idaho (10/11) and Utah State (10/25) due to an ankle sprain.
2009: Could not participate in 225-pound bench press at the combine due to a right shoulder injury.
Attended Granite Hills (Porterville, Calif.) High School Selected the 2003 East Yosemite League Offensive Player of the Year and was named All-Area after guiding his team to a 16-4 record over the last two seasons, including the 2002 East Yosemite League title As a senior, --NAME-- accounted for 1,851 total yards and 16 touchdowns, generating nearly 3,500 yards and 33 touchdowns over his final two seasons Was also regarded as one of the league's top outside linebackers Named a first-team All-East Yosemite League basketball player as a junior Also lettered in track, competing in the EYL Finals in the shot and discus, placing sixth in the Valley championships in the discus as a junior.
Good frame for the position. Good bulk and overall strength as a blocker. Uses his hands and leverage well as a blocker and provides as much effort as a blocker as he does as a receiver. Puts smaller defenders on their back and plays through the whistle. Able to reach linebackers at the second level. Former quarterback who understands where the holes are on the defense. Solid route-running in the short to intermediate zones. Uses his body to shield defenders. Natural hands catcher who can who fight for the ball and can track over his shoulder. Bullish runner who fights for extra yardage.
Not an elite athlete in the Kellen Winslow mold. Lacks the straight-line speed to threaten the seam against NFL talent. Takes a few steps to get to top speed. Flashes the ability to make tough receptions with defenders draped over him, but needs to continue to work in this area. Leans forward when blocking, and needs to improve his balance facing stronger defenders. Defensive backs use their quickness to elude him while blocking in the open field.
KRIS MANGUM, ex-Carolina -- It is fitting that he is compared to a retired player, as --NAME-- is an old school type of tight end, one that does a good job of blocking in-line and is used as a safety valve receiver underneath. He is not the type to threaten the seam and you will find most other tight ends in the draft able to outrace him, but he has the intangibles - a blue collar work ethic, tough as nails and willing to sacrifice himself to make the play.
-------------------------
Cedric_Peerman 79629 185
Chances for a Cavalier running back being noticed by NFL teams when your team finishes 100th in the nation in rushing in 2006, 79th in 2007 and 108th in 2009 are understandably slim, at best. But after professional scouts missed the boat on North Carolina's Willie Parker (Pittsburgh) several years ago, they were not about to let another underrated Atlantic Coast Conference running back go unnoticed. --NAME-- might have only started 18 games at Virginia during his career due to injuries, but many opposing defensive coordinators agree he ranks with the elite runners in the league.
--NAME-- had to patiently wait his turn behind Jason Snelling, now a fullback for the Atlanta Falcons, before being given an opportunity to start in 2007. He piled up 585 yards by the midseason point, but an ankle and foot injury vs. Middle Tennessee State sent the Cavalier tailback to the operating table and then to the sidelines, standing around on crutches while watching Mikell Simpson seize his starting position.
--NAME-- was limited in 2008 spring drills, but returned fully recovered by fall camp to reclaim his starting job as a senior. Leg problems again forced him to sit out one game, but after a rough first part of the season, he would go on to lead the team in rushing and receiving an earn an invitation to compete with the rest of the country's elite prospects at the 2009 Senior Bowl.
At William Campbell High School, --NAME-- was a standout two-way player during his four-year career and further displayed his athletic ability as a state champion sprinter. The Prep Star All-American compiled several of the top offensive totals in state history. He scored a state-record 708 points and ranks second in state history with 112 touchdowns.
The two-time All-State choice gained 5,078 yards rushing and added 787 yards receiving, producing five 300-yard games and 23 100-yard games on the ground. The state Player of the Year as a senior, he rushed 222 times for 2,016 yards and 43 touchdowns and also caught 12 passes for 203 yards and two touchdowns while having a kickoff return for another score. He led the state with 45 touchdowns, while his 280 points are the third-highest total in state history.
--NAME-- earned first-team All-State, All-Region and All-District honors as a junior, as he ran for 2,048 yards and 43 touchdowns, and caught 22 passes for 367 yards and seven more scores as his team won the state championship. He rushed for 317 yards and scored a state-record seven touchdowns in the state title game. As a sophomore, he rushed for more than 1,000 yards after moving from wide receiver to running back midway through the season.
--NAME-- was a standout sprinter and long jumper on the track team. He was the state champion in the 100 meters as a junior and senior and also placed fourth in the long jump and triple jump, and eighth in the shot put to lead his school to state championship as a senior. He also started on the basketball team. As a senior, he received the DAR Good Citizen Award for the qualities of dependability, service, leadership and patriotism.
In 2004, --NAME-- enrolled at Virginia, where he suited up for six games, but did not play, retaining freshman eligibility. Despite starting just the Syracuse clash in 2005, he ranked sixth among Atlantic Coast Conference first-year players with 237 yards and three touchdowns on 70 carries (3.4 avg). With the special teams struggling, he took over kickoff return duties later in the year, ranking second in the league and 22nd nationally with a 25.8-yard average on 21 runbacks.
--NAME-- again caddied for Jason Snelling in 2006, appearing in 12 games. He had just 46 rushing attempts, good for 153 yards, having his best production on kickoff returns. He averaged a career-best 27.3 yards on 19 returns, ranking 12th in the nation in that category.
With Snelling having left for the National Football League, --NAME-- moved into the starting lineup in 2007. Through the first six games, he rushed for 585 yards on 113 tries, including five touchdowns, leading the team despite missing the final six games. His injury vs. Middle Tennessee forced him to the sidelines after he underwent Lisfranc foot surgery.
Foot problems continued early in 2008 (unrelated to his previous injury), as --NAME-- started 10 times in 2008. The All-ACC honorable mention finished with a career-high 774 yards on 153 attempts (5.1 avg), scoring seven times on the ground. He also hauled in 44 passes for 193 yards (4.4 avg) and averaged 21.6 yards on five kickoff returns. He closed out his final campaign with 1,075 all-purpose yards.
2007: Suffered a right ankle and foot sprain vs. Middle Tennessee (10/06) and was forced to wear a protective boot, but later in November, team doctors performed Lisfranc foot surgery that would force him to miss the final six games.
2008: Did not play vs. Duke (9/27) due to a foot sprain Left the Maryland contest (10/04) when he lost stamina in the third quarter.
Attended William Campbell (Gladys, Va.) High School, playing football for head coach Brad Bradley The Prep Star All-American compiled several of the top offensive totals in state history Scored a state-record 708 points and ranks second in state history with 112 touchdowns The two-time All-State choice gained 5,078 yards rushing and added 787 yards receiving, producing five 300-yard games and 23 100-yard games on the ground  The state Player of the Year as a senior, he rushed 222 times for 2,016 yards and 43 touchdowns and also caught 12 passes for 203 yards and two scores while having a kickoff return for another touchdown Led the state with 45 touchdowns, while his 280 points are the third-highest total in state history Earned first-team All-State, All-Region and All-District honors as a junior, as he ran for 2,048 yards and 43 touchdowns, and caught 22 passes for 367 yards and seven more scores as his team won the state championship  Rushed for 317 yards and scored a state-record seven touchdowns in the state title game As a sophomore, he rushed for more than 1,000 yards after moving from wide receiver to running back midway through the season Standout sprinter and long jumper on the track team State champion in the 100 meters as a junior and senior and placed fourth in the long jump and triple jump, and eighth in the shot put to lead his school to state championship as a senior Also started on the basketball team As a senior, he received the DAR Good Citizen Award for the qualities of dependability, service, leadership and patriotism.
Short, thick build that appears capable of handling NFL punishment. Quick to the hole. Good lateral agility to make defenders miss. Runs with surprising authority. Can bounce to the outside and has the burst to get to the second level. Might lack elite stopwatch speed, but plays fast and can pull away in the open field. Soft hands out of the backfield. High effort player who makes those around him better.
Lacks the bulk teams are looking for in a bell-cow runner. May have to be a change of pace back in the NFL due to his struggles in staying healthy. Missed second half of 2007 with Lisfranc surgery on his right foot and missed time last season with a bruised knee. Very small hands, which scouts fear will lead to fumbles. Didn't help his cause in this area with a fumble during the Senior Bowl.
-------------------------
B.J._Raji 79631 9
--NAME-- made a successful return to the field in 2008 after sitting out the previous season due to academic issues. He re-joined teammate Ron Brace in the middle of the front wall, as they proved to be one of the most feared defensive tackle tandems in college football. 
With those two anchored in the middle of the line, they combined for 11 of the team's 35 sacks (31.43 percent) and 27 of the Eagles' 108 tackles behind the line of scrimmage (25.0 percent). --NAME-- led a unit that led the Atlantic Coast Conference in rush defense (91.21 ypg, seventh in the NCAA) and total defense (268.14 ypg, ranked fifth nationally).
At Westwood Regional High School, --NAME-- earned All-State, All-North Jersey and All-County honors as a senior. The three-time starter was a two-time All-Bergen County Scholastic League choice, as he played on both the offensive and defensive lines.
As a senior, --NAME-- recorded 75 tackles, 7.5 sacks and four forced fumbles in 2003. He was selected to play in the 2004 Governor's Bowl, which pits the top high-school seniors in New Jersey vs. their New York counterparts. He also played on Westwood's basketball team as a freshman and sophomore.
--NAME-- enrolled at Boston College in 2004, seeing action in 11 games behind Tim Bulman at right defensive tackle. He collected 13 tackles (6 solos) with 1.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. Having bulked up to 320 pounds in a rigorous offseason program, he captured the right tackle starting position in 2005, posting 27 tackles (15 solos) with 6.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage, including 1.5 sacks his sophomore campaign.
--NAME-- saw constant double-team blocking in 2006, as he started 12 games at right tackle. He garnered All-Atlantic Coast Conference second-team honors, as he delivered 23 tackles (16 solos) with three sacks and 8.5 stops for losses. Two of his three pass breakups came on third-down plays. 
Primed for a banner senior season, --NAME-- had to wait another year for that to occur, as he was ruled academically ineligible to play in 2007. He came back with renewed hunger, going on to register a career-high 42 tackles (22 solos), including a team-high eight sacks and 16.0 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also became the first Eagle defensive tackle since Mike Ruth in 1985 to lead the team in sacks. He added three pressures and deflected five passes at the line of scrimmage.
2007: Suffered a shoulder contusion during the first day of spring drills (4/01) and missed more than half of camp.
2008: Held out of spring drills after undergoing shoulder surgery (4/08).
Attended Westwood Regional (Washington Township, N.J.) High School, playing football for head coach Joe Gambardella Earned All-State, All-North Jersey and All-County honors as a senior The three-time starter was a two-time All-Bergen County Scholastic League choice, as he played on both the offensive and defensive lines As a senior, --NAME-- recorded 75 tackles, 7.5 sacks and four forced fumbles in 2003 Selected to play in the 2004 Governor's Bowl, which pits the top high-school seniors in New Jersey vs. their New York counterparts Also played on Westwood's basketball team as a freshman and sophomore.
Flashes rare burst off the snap for a man his size and can penetrate into the backfield and disrupt the play without necessarily making the tackle. Good strength and mass at the point of attack to create a pile. Good short-area lateral quickness. Experienced. Missed the 2007 season due to academics, but leaves BC with 38 career starts. Locates the ball quickly and works to make the play. At his best lining up at the nose, though he flashes the initial burst off the snap to be effective as the under-tackle in the 4-3 alignment. Strong enough to pull down ballcarriers with just his arms. Arguably the single-most dominant player during the week of practice at the Senior Bowl.
Marginal height for the position. Only adequate to shed blocks due to his short arms and lack of sustained quickness. Rare quickness in confined space, but lacks the speed to sustain and struggles to make an impact outside of the guard box. Flashes the burst off the snap for the three-technique (under tackle in the 4-3 alignment), but is only a marginal pass rusher. Relies on his initial burst off the snap and an occasional spin move to pressure. Reliable tackler, but lacks the balance and lateral quickness to break down and make the tackle in space. Most effective when operating as part of a rotation. Maturity is a concern. Has struggled with his weight, playing in 2006 at more than 350 pounds. Was suspended for the first half of the Clemson game in 2006 for throwing a punch at a Central Michigan player. Missed the entire 2007 season due to academics.
SHAUN ROGERS, Cleveland -- Rogers is about three inches bigger than --NAME--, but both have the awesome ability to change the tide of a game on the field and frustrate coaches by their lack of work ethic away from it. --NAME-- had a good senior campaign, but it was not earth-shattering. You have to look at the whole picture here. Is your team going to get a player motivated and hungry to prove his doubters wrong, or a player his former coaching staff had to constantly monitor. That's a lot of money to gamble on someone that can either dominate for you or get a general manager fired.
-------------------------
Darryl_Richard 79633 234
A three-year starter who isn't as flashy as the other Georgia Tech senior defensive linemen, but ACC coaches named him second-team all-conference with 10 tackles for loss and four sacks in 2008. Given the desperate need for linemen in the NFL, --NAME--'s size, strength and intelligence up front will be coveted. Redshirted his second season (2005) due to reconstructive surgery on his right knee after coming on strong as a true freshman starter.
One of the nation's premier defensive line prospects . . . Named to the Atlanta Journal-Constitution's Super Southern 100 . . . Rated the Number 12 player in Louisiana by SuperPrep and the Number 13 player in the state by Rivals.com . . . Prep Star all-America . . . The Number 9 defensive lineman and Number 93 player in the nation by Tom Lemming and ESPN.com . . . The Number 30 player on TheInsiders.com South Hot 100 . . . Rated the Number 15 defensive tackle in the nation by TheInsiders.com and Number 34 by Rivals.com . . . Played in the U.S. Army All-American all-star game . . . Recorded 85 tackles, 12 sacks and 18 tackles for loss as a senior . . . Added 65 tackles and seven sacks as a junior . . . Coached by Steve Robichaux at Destrehan High School . . . Student body President . . . One of five national finalists for the 2004 Franklin D. Watkins Memorial Trophy, presented by the National Alliance of African American Athletes to promote academic excellence among young African American males.
Strong interior presence who plays with low pad level and a sturdy anchor.   Holds his ground very well against double-team blocks inside.   Moves down the line when engaged.   Gives up his body to maintain the gap, is able to push two blockers on twists.   Willing to pursue plays down the line and downfield.   Flashes the upper-body strength and hands to rip across his man to beat him.   Recognizes screens when let go.   Intelligent player and a leader in the locker room.
Lacks elite explosiveness and chasing speed.   Rarely collapses the pocket using a bull rush.   Takes advantage of Tech's aggressive, one-gap system but usually shows only moderate initial quickness off the snap.   Will stand up and hesitate after initial move, possibly due to poor stamina.   Lateral movement in space is extremely limited.
-------------------------
Javon_Ringer 79635 173
One of the true warriors of the game, --NAME-- sometimes looks like he has emerged from a fierce battle on the football field. The tough "old school" player proved throughout his career that he is perfectly capable of being a complementary back or one that a team can saddle up and ride to victory as its featured runner. 
--NAME-- has undergone two major surgeries on his knees, along with several other minor procedures, yet, when he is counted out, he just appears out on the football field. The coaching staff is still amazed that after undergoing surgery to repair torn knee ligaments in late September, 2006, he was back on the field carrying the ball just a little over a month later.
Through all of those injuries, --NAME-- continued to excel. He closed out his career as the school's second-leading rusher with 4,398 yards and set the MSU all-time record with 5,426 all-purpose yards. He ranks second in Spartans annals with 843 carries and tied for fourth with 34 touchdown runs. His workhorse-like season in 2008 saw him carry the ball 390 times, the second-highest season total in school and Big Ten Conference history.
With all of those lofty numbers, --NAME-- still remained the consummate team player. One example of his unselfishness came in his press conference after rushing for five touchdowns vs. Eastern Michigan in 2008. He led his entire offensive line on to the dais with him, telling all the media assembled, "these guys are the real game MVPs and deserve all the credit."
Two weeks later, after rushing for 201 yards vs. Notre Dame, --NAME-- repeated the process, trying to share the spotlight. He brought a slew of offensive linemen, tight ends and fullbacks to the news conference. "We were able to win because of these guys," --NAME-- said. "Not because of me."
"--NAME-- is a total team player, Michigan head coach Mark Dantonio stated. "It's not about him, and you can't say enough about him as a person aside from his athletic abilities. But it's the person in him, it's the intangibles within him that make him the back that he is. There are other guys who are just as explosive and just as fast, but it's the things inside of him that make him special."
One week after his 2008 Ohio State performance, --NAME-- was found doing something close to his heart - giving back to the community. Respected not only for his success on the field, but for his time spent working with youth in the local community, he is one of the most active student-athletes in MSU's Multicultural Program. --NAME-- spent that day attending to affairs for the Gear Up College Day Program, in which he served as a counselor to help advise middle school children.
--NAME-- is also involved in the Academic Gladiators program, where he expressed the importance of academics to other student-athletes. His vibrant attitude has inspired children at hospitals and the MSU Child Development Lab, while his positive coaching skills at camps and clinics have made him a mentor to young football players. --NAME-- has proven to be a humble role model that the community has truly come to know, making him a fan favorite in the stands at Spartan Stadium.
--NAME-- was a Super Prep All-American selection as a senior at Chaminade-Julienne High School. He was rated among the nation's top running backs by Rivals.com (18th), Super Prep (29th) and College Football News (31st), in addition to being listed among the country's top 10 all-purpose backs by Max Emfinger (fourth). He was also named to the All-Midwest team by Super Prep, Prep Football Report and Prep Star.
The three-year starter and three-time All-Ohio selection finished fourth in voting for Mr. Football in 2004, despite missing his final six games after tearing a right knee ligament. In just seven contests that year, he rushed for 1,790 yards and 21 touchdowns, including a career-best 372 rushing yards and five touchdowns vs. Purcell Marian High.
As a junior, --NAME-- generated 2,356 yards and scored 30 rushing touchdowns. He gained 2,038 yards and scored 30 times on the ground as a sophomore. In three seasons, he amassed 6,184 yards and 81 touchdowns rushing in 33 games (187.4 ypg). He also lettered in track, producing a personal best 10.6 clocking in the 100 meters.
--NAME-- enrolled at Michigan State in 2005, where he appeared in 11 games, earning Freshman All-American and All-Big Ten Conference honors. Despite not starting any contests, he led the Spartans with 817 yards and five touchdowns on 122 carries (6.7 avg), the second-best season performance ever by a MSU freshman. He also snared 19 passes for 138 yards (7.3 avg).
As a sophomore, --NAME-- Earned the Biggie Munn Award as the team's Most Inspirational Player, shocking teammates, coaching staff and team doctors when he returned to the field after just over a month after undergoing midseason knee surgery that was supposed to sideline him for the rest of the schedule. He still led the team with 86 rushing attempts for 497 yards (5.8 avg) and a score, adding 96 yards and a touchdown on 14 receptions (6.9 avg) and averaged 21.2 yards on four kickoff returns in eight games.
In 2007, --NAME-- shared tailback duties with Jehuu Caulcrick, but still led the Spartans for the third consecutive year with 245 attempts for 1,447 yards (5.9 avg) and six touchdowns, ranking fourth in rushing among Big Ten players while becoming the first Spartan to rush for more than 1,000 yards since 2001. The second-team All-Big Ten pick also improved his pass catching skills, pulling down 35 passes for 295 yards (8.4 avg) while averaging 134.0 all-purpose yards per game.
--NAME-- was a Doak Walker Award finalist (nation's top running back) and an All-American choice in 2008. He set school single-season records for points scored (132) and touchdowns rushing (22), as he placed second on the MSU annual record books with 390 carries for 1,637 yards (4.2 avg), ranking fourth in the nation with an average of 125.92 yards per game while leading the NCAA in scoring (10.15 ppg) and pacing the conference in all-purpose yardage (157.77 ypg).
2004: Suffered a right knee anterior cruciate ligament tear vs. Cincinnati's McNicholas High (10/08), missing the final six games after undergoing reconstructive surgery.
2006: Suffered a right ankle sprain vs. Eastern Michigan (9/09) Left the Pittsburgh game (9/16) in the fourth quarter with cramps Suffered right knee medial collateral and anterior cruciate ligament tears vs. Illinois (9/30). Underwent surgery, missing the next four games vs. Michigan, Ohio State, Northwestern and Indiana.
2008: Almost sat out the Michigan game after he suffered a hamstring pull in Thursday's practice (10/23) prior to the contest and also suffered a left knee sprain and what would later be diagnosed as a meniscus tear in his right knee vs. Michigan (10/25), but continued to play the rest of the schedule Played in the Wisconsin clash (11/01) with flu-like symptoms. 
2009: Missed the Senior Bowl after undergoing knee surgery Jan. 7 to repair a torn lateral meniscus.
Attended Chaminade-Julienne (Dayton, Oh.) High School, playing football for head coach Jim Place Super Prep All-American selection as a senior Rated among the nation's top running backs by Rivals.com (18th), Super Prep (29th) and College Football News (31st), in addition to being listed among the country's top 10 all-purpose backs by Max Emfinger (fourth) Named to the All-Midwest team by Super Prep, Prep Football Report and Prep Star The three-year starter and three-time All-Ohio selection finished fourth in voting for Mr. Football in 2004, despite missing his final six games after tearing a right knee ligament In just seven contests that year, he rushed for 1,790 yards and 21 touchdowns, including a career-best 372 rushing yards and five touchdowns vs. Purcell Marian High As a junior, --NAME-- generated 2,356 yards and scored 30 rushing touchdowns Gained 2,038 yards and scored 30 times on the ground as a sophomore In three seasons, he amassed 6,184 yards and 81 touchdowns rushing in 33 games (187.4 ypg) Also lettered in track, producing a personal best 10.6 clocking in the 100 meters.
Compact body. Inside-out runner who will keep his center of gravity low and churn his legs to get extra yardage. Can escape arm tackles inside. Stays on the hip of pulling and zone-blocking linemen and waits for the hole to open up before hitting his second gear. Fights for yards on the outside when working against linebackers and safeties. Solid hands to make catches on screens and in the flat.
Short with only adequate strength and definition. Not particularly quick or elusive in the open field. Lacks breakaway speed. Has decent vision, but sometimes runs with his head down anticipating contact. Tends to dance ineffectively when on the edge. Often indecisive on stretch plays, failing to hit the hole quickly enough when it opens up. Has an open-field spin move, but loses his balance afterwards. Needs to improve his cut blocking in pass protection. Tore his ACL as a high school senior, missed four-plus games of the 2006 season due to a torn right MCL and did not participate at the Senior Bowl due to a knee injury. However, he did participate in the combine workouts in February, just six weeks after undergoing knee surgery Jan. 7.
-------------------------
Dorell_Scott 79641 103
The three-year starter at nose guard, --NAME-- was expected to emerge from the shadows of former teammate, Philip Merling, to take over leadership responsibilities for a young defense in 2008. --NAME-- struggled early in the season, resulting in the university deciding to change coaches at midseason. --NAME-- responded briefly, but then limped through the late stages of his final season with a knee injury.
The 2008 preseason Outland Trophy candidate failed to make much of an impact through the first six games. Freshman backup Brandon Thompson was considered to be performing at the same level until Clemson's coaching change, which included defensive line coach Chris Rumph initiating a candid chat with --NAME--. --NAME-- responded with a season-high eight tackles against Georgia Tech and lived up to his preseason billing.
At Ridge View High School, --NAME-- was rated the 30th-best defensive tackle in the nation by CollegeFootballNews.com and 32nd by Super Prep. The three-year starter was also named first-team All-State by the Associated Press and an All-Atlantic Region pick by Prep Star. The Super Southern 100 team pick by the Atlanta Journal-Constitution, he added All-Mid Atlantic honors from Super Prep and was a two-time All-Area and All-Conference choice. 
--NAME-- recorded had 242 career tackles, 31 stops for loss, seven sacks, 35 quarterback pressures, four caused fumbles, six recovered fumbles, and one defensive touchdown. He was named team defensive MVP three times. He posted 101 tackles and 12 stops for loss on defense and graded 89% for blocking consistency as an offensive lineman in his final campaign. As a junior, he posted 70 tackles with three forced fumbles and five stops behind the line of scrimmage, making 71 stops, including 13 for loss during his sophomore season.
--NAME-- chose Clemson over Auburn, Florida, and South Carolina, enrolling in 2004. He spent the season redshirting. Prior to the start of the 2005 campaign, his frustration at being third on the depth chart. --NAME-- briefly left the team, resulting in the coaches sitting him down for the first three games upon his return. He appeared in nine contests, producing 10 pressures along with 18 tackles (10 solo) and two sacks.
--NAME-- took over nose guard duties in 2006, going on to start the next 38 games he appeared in. He collected a career-high 54 tackles (32 solos) that included three sacks and eight pressures. The following season, he finished third among Tiger down linemen with 50 tackles (32 solos), adding three sacks and eight pressures while also picking off a pass.
The 2008 Outland Trophy Watch List member never got untracked as a senior. He sat out the Duke game and missed most of the Florida State clash with a knee sprain. He delivered 39 tackles (29 solos) with 7.5 stops for loss, including one sack and added ten pressures.
2007: Limited in August camp (8/16) with a high ankle sprain Left the Chick-fil-A Bowl after he suffered a right knee sprain from a chop block vs. Auburn (12/31).
2008: Missed most of the Florida State (11/08) game and the entire Duke contest (11/15) with a knee sprain suffered vs. the Seminoles
Attended Ridge View (Columbia, S.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Kirk Burnett Rated the 30th-best defensive tackle in the nation by CollegeFootballNews.com and 32nd by Super Prep The three-year starter was also named first-team All-State by the Associated Press and an All-Atlantic Region pick by Prep Star The Super Southern 100 team pick by the Atlanta Journal-Constitution, he added All-Mid Atlantic honors from Super Prep and was a two-time All-Area and All-Conference choice Recorded had 242 career tackles, 31 stops for loss, seven sacks, 35 quarterback pressures, four caused fumbles, six recovered fumbles, and one defensive touchdown Named team defensive MVP three times Posted 101 tackles and 12 stops for loss on defense and graded 89% for blocking consistency as an offensive lineman in his final campaign As a junior, he posted 70 tackles with three forced fumbles and five stops behind the line of scrimmage, making 71 stops, including thirteen for loss during his sophomore season.
Prototypical frame for the position with room for an additional 10-15 pounds of bulk.   Flashes impressive initial quickness off the snap for a player his size.   Good balance and can redirect his charge to close when open lanes are presented.   Quick hands to deflect the blocker's initial hand punch.   Has some rush technique, including an impressive rip.   Can get his hands up to create obstacles in the passing lane.   Can close running lanes due to his size.   When playing with leverage, has the leg drive to hold up at the point of attack and flashes the ability to split double-team blocks.
Not consistently the sum of his parts.   Inconsistent use of hands.   Too often comes off the snap high and struggles with leverage.   Can negate his own strength and get knocked off the ball.   Doesn't use his height and hands often enough to deflect passes at the line of scrimmage.   Requires an open lane to close and rarely makes plays on his own.   Inconsistent effort.   Seems to tire easily and may have to be used as part of a rotation to be effective.   Struggled with a knee sprain as a senior.
WILLIAM JOSEPH, Oakland -- --NAME-- lacks Joseph's tall frame, but both are classic underachievers who might entice some scouts with athletic ability. When he puts the pads on, it's a different story. You might expect his strength to allow him to hold his ground at the point but he stops his feet and can be ridden out. In pursuit, he will generally overextend and lose balance, as he keeps his base too narrow. He gets a good push and shows a decent swim move to gain initial gap penetration, but he is more of a finesse type than power-oriented pass rusher, leading to minimal production in attempts to get to the quarterback. He lacks technique and stamina, but he has athletic talent to be worth a look at the tail end of the draft, and not in the early rounds as some experts target him. If all else fails, a team could try him at offensive guard to take advantage of his strength and athletic skills.
-------------------------
Matt_Shaughnessy 79643 71
--NAME-- is the kind of player you could envision stepping out on the field in a leather helmet playing for George Halas. He's overcome doubters to prove he can play on the defensive line as a 230-pound freshman, only to start seven games before a late-season knee injury.
As a sophomore, he made a rapid recovery from knee surgery and would start the final 33 games of his career. He continued to battle knee and foot injuries, but when he was counted out, --NAME-- would just put on his jersey, step on the field and give his coaches more than they could ever ask for from a player.
At Norwich Free Academy, --NAME-- earned Super Prep All-American honors and was rated one of the top 30 defensive ends in the nation according to Rivals.com. He was rated one of top 35 players in the East by Prep Football Report and named to the Connecticut High School Coaches Association and New Haven Register All-State teams in 2004. He also earned All-Conference and All-Area accolades in each of his three final seasons, adding three more letters in basketball and two in track.
--NAME-- enrolled at Wisconsin as a 230-pound true freshman in 2005. He earned Freshman All-American recognition and was named All-Big Ten Conference honorable mention. In his first campaign with the Badgers, he collected 39 tackles (20 solos), 2.5 sacks and 7.5 stops for losses before his season came to an end when he suffered a torn ligament in his left knee vs. Iowa, sitting out the last two contests.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- garnered All-Big Ten Conference second-team honors. He started all year at right defensive end, delivering 35 tackles (19 solo) and eight stops behind the line of scrimmage, including four sacks. He also caused and recovered a fumble.
--NAME-- ranked fourth in the league and 19th nationally, as the team MVP and second-team All-Big Ten pick totaled 18 stops for loss. He was second on the team with five sacks and posted a career-high 60 tackles (41 solo) in 13 games as a junior in 2007. His tackle-for-loss total of 84 yards rank eighth on the school season-record list.
In 2008 spring camp, --NAME-- suffered a right fibula fracture. Even though he started all year, you could see early in the season that he was still not fully recovered. The All-Big Ten honorable mention managed 40 tackles (29 solo), but did more chasing down the opposing quarterback (10 pressures) than "close the deal" on the passer (four sacks).
2006: Suffered a left knee anterior cruciate ligament tear vs. Iowa (11/12), missing the Hawaii (11/25) and Auburn (1/02/06) contests.
2008: Suffered a right fibula fracture in spring camp.
Attended Norwich (Ct.) Free Academy, playing football for head coach Steve Robichaud Earned Super Prep All-American honors and was rated one of the top 30 defensive ends in the nation according to Rivals.com Rated one of top 35 players in the East by Prep Football Report and named to the Connecticut High School Coaches Association and New Haven Register All-State teams in 2004 Earned All-Conference and All-Area accolades in each of his three final seasons, adding three more letters in basketball and two in track.
Has the length to gain the edge off the line. Defeats cut blocks with his hands and presents trouble for quarterbacks trying to get a pass over his extended arms. Better than expected at holding his ground on running plays despite his build. Can rip off his man to get into the backfield or get off blocks to wrap up ballcarriers coming through the hole.
Lacks explosion and doesn't seem to beat any offensive tackle off the snap. Gets pushed aside by stronger right tackles when lined up on the right side, where he played as a junior due to a lack of team depth. Only adequate in changing direction when standing up, and takes time to accelerate, making it harder for him to corral quick players on the edge.
JOHN ENGELBERGER, ex Denver -- --NAME-- needs to be in the right system, one in which he doesn't have to worry about gap penetration and just play out on the edge. With that reach of his, combined with good leaping ability, he can create problems for shorter passers trying to get the ball over the defender's head. He needs to add more bulk and improve his lower-body strength before he can contribute as part of a defensive rotation.
-------------------------
DeAngelo_Smith 79645 143
--NAME-- teamed with Mike Mickens to form one of the elite cornerback tandems in college football. The two combined for 26 interceptions during their careers together, more than any other active duo in the NCAA in 2008. Always known for his outstanding hands, the right cornerback added a new wrinkle to his game as a senior taking over full-time punt return duties to add to his resume that included handling the bulk of kickoff return chores as a junior.
While not the celebrated tackler that Mickens is, --NAME-- is a top-notch pass defender, breaking up 21 passes as a two-year starter. He ranks tied for second in school history with 12 interceptions and set the Bearcats' single-season record with eight pass thefts in 2007, ranking second nationally in that category. He also collected 179 yards in returns, the fifth-best total in Cincinnati annals, as his two touchdown returns are good for a third place tie in school history.
Causing problems for opposing quarterbacks is commonplace for --NAME--, who registered 11 interceptions, returning five for touchdowns, en route to earning All-State first-team honors as a senior at Independence High School. He closed out his career with 20 pass thefts, returning seven for scores. 
--NAME-- also caught 14 touchdown passes and totaled seven punt or kickoff returns for scores as a senior. He earned first-team All-City and All-District honors. He was named to the Columbus Dispatch-Agonis All-Star team, as he helped the team to a regional finals appearance in the state playoffs.
--NAME-- enrolled at Cincinnati in 2004, spending the season on the scout team. The Bearcat Academic Honor Roll selection appeared briefly in seven games, mostly on special teams in 2005, finishing with one solo tackle. He was the top reserve at both cornerback positions in 2006, recording 23 tackles (17 solos) with three pass deflections, a pair of interceptions and two fumble recoveries. He made the most of his opportunity in his only game as a starter, earning Big East Player of the Week honors after posting six tackles and returning an interception 84 yards (fourth-longest return in school history) vs. Rutgers. He also gained 65 yards on four kickoff returns that campaign.
--NAME-- took over right cornerback duties as a junior, coming up with 49 tackles (39 solos) that included 2.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He caused and recovered two fumbles, as he also deflected eight passes. His eight interceptions set the school single-season record and led the Big East Conference while ranking second in the nation. He also amassed 296 yards on 12 kickoff returns (24.7 avg), earning second-team All-Big East recognition.
In 2008, --NAME-- was chosen All-Big East third-team. He started all 14 games, picking up the leadership slack in the secondary when Mickens was sidelined late in the season. He broke up 10 passes, intercepted two others and caused a fumble. He also had 53 tackles (36 solos) with 3.5 stops for loss. His versatility proved invaluable, as he lined up at free safety for the first five games before returning to his more familiar right cornerback spot for the rest of the schedule. He also averaged 9.5 yards on 23 punt returns.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Independence (Columbus, Ohio) High School, playing football for head coach Alan Jones Registered 11 interceptions, returning five for touchdowns en route to earning All-State first-team honors as a senior Closed out his career with 20 pass thefts, returning seven for scores Also caught 14 touchdown passes and totaled seven punt or kickoff returns for scores as a senior Earned first-team All-City and All-District honors Named to the Columbus Dispatch-Agonis All-Star team, as he helped the team to a regional finals appearance in the state playoffs.
Aggressive, adequately-sized corner with long arms and confidence.   Stays low in his pedal and flips his hips open well.   Good hands for the interception when closing forward on the ball.   Attacks quick screens behind the line of scrimmage, will throw his body into the tackle.   Has played some free safety when needed and also returned kicks.   Works hard to improve his game.
Fits best in a zone system where he can see the play in front of him and close on the ball.   Plays near the line at times but does not get his hands on receivers.   Gambles to get to the ball.   Only adequate straight-line speed.   Has trouble adjusting to the ball in the air and making the interceptions when moving backward.   Has a tough time getting off wide receiver's blocks due to his lack of size and upper-body strength.   Gets turned around easily.   Lacks the suddenness to handle quick slot receivers.   Not a physical tackler.   Whiffs on attempts to cut tackle because he ducks his head.   Questionable ball security, decision-making and speed as a punt returner.
-------------------------
Terrance_Taylor 79655 136
A three-year starter at nose guard, --NAME--'s squat, thick frame resembles a fire hydrant, but he attacks blockers like a runaway fire truck. 
--NAME-- delivered one of the best performances in the weight room at the 2009 NFL Combine, recording 37 repetitions bench-pressing 225 pounds. Strength has always been his biggest asset. 
He set Michigan prep records with a 500-pound bench press, 680-pound squat and a 670-pound dead lift.
At Muskegon High, --NAME-- earned EA Sports All-American and Class A Player of the Year in Michigan honors from the Detroit Free Press. He was an All-State pick and a member of The Detroit News Dream Team at defensive tackle as a junior and senior. He added All-Conference, All-Area and All-State honors his senior year, as he was rated the third-best player in the state by The Detroit News and the nation's sixth-best defensive tackle by Tom Lemming.
--NAME-- was ranked as the third-best player in Michigan by Rivals.com, picking up All-American honors from Super Prep, in addition to being named the nation's sixth-best defensive line prospect on Student Sports Hot 100 recruits list. As a junior, he captured All-Conference, All-State and Grand Rapids Press Dream Team accolades.
The four-year starter on both the offensive and defensive line, --NAME-- recorded 203 tackles during career, including 38 sacks, eight fumble recoveries and one interception. He led Muskegon to a 14-0 record and the state championship as a senior, posting 55 tackles, 20 for loss and added 16 hurries. He also collected 85 tackles and eight sacks in his junior campaign.
--NAME-- was state champion in power lifting as a sophomore, junior and senior. He was the undefeated heavyweight wrestling state champion as a senior and ranked third in the state as a junior. He compiled an 89-6 career record in wrestling, including a 24-0 mark as a senior. He also threw the shot put and discus on the track team. His best shot put was 57 feet and his best discus throw was 161 feet.
--NAME-- enrolled at Michigan in 2005, but saw limited action in nine games, finishing his freshman year with just one solo tackle. He had a stellar 2006 preseason camp, forcing the team to shift Alan Branch out of the nose guard position in favor of the sophomore, who would start 11 contests. He produced 23 tackles (12 solo) that year, including a sack and five stops for losses.
In 2007, --NAME-- captured second-team All-Big Ten Conference honors. He started all 13 games at nose guard, going on to deliver a career-high 55 tackles (28 solos), leading the team's down lineman while becoming the first Michigan defensive tackle to post 50 tackles in a season since Josh Williams in 1997 (53). He also had 8.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage, including 3.5 sacks while blocking two kicks.
The new coaching staff named --NAME-- team captain for the 2008 season. He was an All-Big Ten Conference honorable mention, starting 12 games at nose guard. He contributed 35 tackles (16 solos), 1.5 sacks, four stops for loss and recovered two fumbles. He also blocked the third kick of his career.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Muskegon (Mich.) High School, playing football for head coach Tony Annese Earned EA Sports All-American and Class A Player of the Year in Michigan honors from the Detroit Free Press All-State pick and a member of The Detroit News Dream Team at defensive tackle as a junior and senior Added All-Conference, All-Area and All-State honors his senior year, as he was rated the third-best player in the state by The Detroit News and the nation's sixth-best defensive tackle by Tom Lemming Ranked as the third-best player in Michigan by Rivals.com, picking up All-American honors from Super Prep, in addition to being named the nation's sixth-best defensive line prospect on Student Sports Hot 100 recruits list As a junior, he captured All-Conference, All-State and Grand Rapids Press Dream Team accolades Four-year starter on both the offensive and defensive lines Recorded 203 tackles during career, including 38 sacks, eight fumbles recoveries and one interception Led Muskegon to a 14-0 record and the state champion-ship as a senior, posting 55 tackles, 20 for loss and added 16 hurries Posted 85 tackles and eight sacks in his junior campaign State champion in power lifting as a sophomore, junior and senior Was the undefeated heavyweight wrestling state champion as a senior and ranked third in the state as a junior Compiled an 89-6 career record in wrestling, including a 24-0 mark as a senior Threw the shot put and discus on the track team His best shot put was 57 feet and his best discus throw was 161 feet.
Prime NFL nose tackle candidate.   Plays with good leverage, keeping his pad level low and square and getting his hands high and inside.   Does not move much against double teams, holding his ground against the run.   When fresh, he gets off the ball and pushes the center into the backfield to blow up inside runs.   On occasion he can quickly knife through the A-gap to get pressure on the quarterback.   Will chase downfield at times.   Plays with a mean streak.   Voted team captain in 2008.
Short and not in great shape.   Does not shed blocks when straight-up on his man, but makes plays when lined up on the shoulder of the center or guard.   Better conditioning could help him get off the ball and collapse the pocket consistently.   Doesn't get his hands up often enough to break up passes.   Exposed a bit at the East-West Shrine Game for being a bit of a one-trick pony.   Makes piles in short-yardage situations but does not stay on his feet consistently enough to stop the runner.
JIM BURT, ex-New York Giants -- --NAME-- was tailor made to play for Bill Parcells in Miami. He needs some hard coaching and the right 3-4 system to become a classic garbage man in the trenches. When he gets a good angle, he attacks the ballcarrier with intent, getting good collision upon contact. While he can make plays behind the line of scrimmage, he seems more comfortable in his role of handling combos and stacking at the point of attack. For a player of his size, he shows good quickness, along with strength and proper pad level. He plays with good body lean and has the power to stack and control.
-------------------------
Vance_Walker 79657 210
With teammates like Michael Johnson, Darryl Richard and Derrick Morgan, --NAME-- didn't appear in the headlines often. But he gets plenty of credit for the defensive success of the Yellow Jackets from the Georgia Tech coaching staff. The hard worker was the anchor of the line.
His coaching staff and teammates, along with opposing coaches and players, are all singing his praises, and he was named an All-American third-team pick and Bednarik Award semifinalist as a junior. The accolades continued during his senior campaign, when ESPN named him the Atlantic Coast Conference midseason defensive MVP. --NAME-- went on to capture All-ACC first-team honors and secure an invitation to the Senior Bowl.
At Fort Mill High School, --NAME-- garnered third-team All-State honors from the Columbia State and was named to the Charlotte Observer's All-Observer first-team and all-Upper South Carolina first-team. The All-region and All-Area selection by the Rock Hill Herald was also a member of South Carolina's Shrine Bowl team. The team MVP recorded 17.5 sacks and 41 tackles behind the line of scrimmage as a senior.
--NAME-- developed into a key contributor on the Georgia Tech defensive line as a true freshman. He played behind Mansfield Wrotto at left defensive tackle most of the season, earning a pair of starting assignments. He posted 15 tackles (12 solo) with a sack and three stops for loss to earn his first varsity letter.
--NAME-- shifted to right tackle in 2006, starting two of 14 games for an injured Joe Anoai. He delivered 17 tackles for the campaign, including nine solo stops. The 2007 was his breakout campaign, capturing All-American and All-ACC honors. He started all 13 games at right tackle, as his 8.5 sacks rank 12th on the school single-season record list. He registered 14 tackles behind the line of scrimmage among his 45 tackles (30 solo), causing three fumbles while recovering two others.
The senior was a preseason All-American choice, but --NAME-- had a few injury glitches during the 2008 season. He suffered from a violent helmet-to-helmet collision that brought upon concussion-like symptoms in the third game vs. Virginia Tech, but despite being shut down in practices, he was back on the field the next game. An ankle sprain late in the season forced him to sit out the Miami clash and he did not record any statistics in his last four games, finishing with 33 tackles (18 solo), three sacks and 8.5 stops for loss.
2008: Left the Virginia Tech game (9/13) after suffering a head injury in the fourth quarter   Did not play vs. Miami (11/20) and though he started, he saw minimal action vs. Georgia (11/29) and LSU (12/31) after leaving the North Carolina game early (11/08) with an ankle sprain.
2009: Could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine and he didn't participate in Georgia Tech's Pro Day (3/09) due to a right hamstring pull.
Attended Fort Mill (S.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Greg Taylor  Garnered third-team All-State honors from the Columbia State and was named to the Charlotte Observer's All-Observer first-team and All-Upper South Carolina first-team The All-region and All-Area selection by the Rock Hill Herald was also a member of South Carolina's Shrine Bowl team The team MVP recorded 17.5 sacks and 41 tackles behind the line of scrimmage as a senior.
Flashes initial quickness off the snap.   Locates the football quickly and has the short-area burst to close.   Has the upper-body strength and is effective enough with his hands to rip off his man and pressure the quarterback or corral backs in the hole.   Short, squatty build with long arms that helps him hold up against double-team blocks and in short-yardage situations due to his natural leverage advantage.   Good lower-body strength to push the pocket.   Uses his hands to get off blocks up front to get to the ball.   Hustles downfield and chases down the line to help his teammates.
Too short and lacks the girth to fit some defensive systems.   Must prove himself quick enough to beat NFL interior linemen one-on-one.   Impressive statistics inflated by the aggressive blitzing and stunting Georgia Tech defensive philosophy.   Seems to guess at the snap count often, leading to instances when he's the first lineman off the ball, and others where he's the last.   Lacks a variety of moves as a pass rusher.
TANK TYLER, Kansas City -- --NAME-- will work in the trenches and has a good bull rush, but he does struggle to recognize blocking schemes and locate the ball on the move. When he stays low in his pads, he shows enough power in the lower body to stack and defeat the one-on-one blocks. There is no question that he plays with good effort and desire, but outside of the short area, his lack of speed prevents him from making plays in long pursuit.
-------------------------
Chris_Wells 79661 31
Regarded by many as the most powerful tailback in college football, that title came with a hefty price for --NAME-- during his three years at Ohio State. Even though he suffered from a rash of injuries - a left ankle sprain, a right wrist sprain and a thumb fracture in 2007; a right foot sprain, turf toe, a hamstring strain and a concussion in 2008 - he only missed three games while compiling enough rushing yardage to rank fourth on the school career record list.
Following in the footsteps of Archie Griffin, Keith Byars and Eddie George, --NAME-- had big shoes to fill and lots of veteran depth to move past on the roster before he was given his opportunity. Being one of 11 children, he was used to being patient waiting for his time to come.
--NAME-- was just the seventh player in school history to rush for more than 3,000 yards in a career (3,382). His average of 93.94 yards per game rushing was the third-best mark in Buckeyes annals. He tied Keith Byars (1982-85) for third on OSU's all-time record chart with 17 100-yard rushing performances. In his first season as a starter, he amassed 1,609 yards on the ground in 2007, the fourth-best season total by an Ohio State running back.
At Garfield High School, --NAME-- was a Parade All-American and named the nation's top running back as a senior, rushing for 2,134 yards and 27 touchdowns on 223 carries (9.6 avg) in 2005. As a junior, he rushed for 1,939 yards and scored 20 touchdowns. The 2005 National Player of the Year scored three touchdowns on his way to being selected Most Valuable Player of the U.S. Army All-America Bowl.
--NAME-- was Ohio State's first commitment to its 2006 recruiting class, enrolling at the university in time to compete in 2006 spring practice. He rushed for game-high 48 yards on 11 carries in the spring game, but found himself listed behind Maurice --NAME-- and Antonio Pittman on the depth chart entering the season.
Despite playing as a reserve in all 13 games, --NAME-- finished second on the team with 576 yards on 104 carries (5.5 avg) and seven touchdowns. Fumble issues saw his playing time decrease as the season progressed.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- took over the tailback position, starting all 13 games despite battling a nagging ankle sprain all campaign. He was also hampered by a late-season fractured bone near his thumb that would require surgery after the season. The second-team All-American still produced the fourth-best season in school history, as he amassed 1,609 yards on 274 attempts (5.9 avg), finding the end zone 15 times.
Hoping to become more mobile, --NAME-- shed more than 10 pounds from his frame before the 2008 season opener, but was limited in his off-season training program and missed the bulk of spring drills while recovering from thumb surgery. In the season opener vs. Youngstown State, he was carted off the field with a right foot sprain (also suffered from turf toe) and would miss OSU's next three contests. Upon his return, he was forced to wear an offensive lineman's high-top cleats, but called them "cement shoes," as they hampered his cutting ability. 
Later in the season, --NAME-- had a hamstring issue to deal with and later missed a portion of the Fiesta Bowl with a concussion. He still led the team in rushing with 207 attempts for 1,197 yards (5.8 avg) and eight touchdowns, as his average of 119.7 yards per game ranked sixth among the nation's running backs. He also more than doubled his receiving output, catching eight passes for 47 yards (5.9 avg).
2007: Missed most of spring camp (5/07) with a left ankle sprain Left the Penn State game (9/23) when he re-injured his ankle, doing that again after just four carries in the Kent clash (10/13) Suffered what later was diagnosed as a right wrist sprain and a broken bone above his thumb vs. Illinois (11/10) and was forced to wear a brace the following game vs. Michigan (11/17).
2008: Sat out spring drills after having surgery to repair his right thumb fracture (5/22)  Was carted off the field with a right foot sprain in the third quarter of the season opener vs. Youngstown State (8/30), missing the next three games vs. Ohio University (9/06), Southern California (9/13) and Troy (9/20). Upon his return, he was forced to wear an oversized offense lineman's high-top cleats to protect his foot Suffered a hamstring pull vs. Michigan (11/22) Sat out most of the second half of the Fiesta Bowl vs. Texas with a mild concussion.
Attended Garfield (Akron, Ohio) High School, earning Parade All-American honors 
Named the nation's top running back as a senior, rushing for 2,134 yards and 27 touchdowns on 223 carries (9.6 avg) in 2005 As a junior, --NAME-- rushed for 1,939 yards and scored 20 touchdowns as a junior The 2005 National Player of the Year scored three touchdowns on his way to being selected Most Valuable Player of the U.S. Army All-America Bowl.
Extraordinary combination of size and natural running ability. Downhill runner who attacks the line of scrimmage when running inside. Shows the patience to pick and slide laterally. Good burst to and through the hole. Despite his height, generally runs with good pad level, giving defenders little to target other than his knees and shoulder pads. Rare size and leg drive to move the pile. Rare vision and lateral quickness for a back of his size. Anticipates the cutback lanes before they appear and capitalizes on them. Surprising acceleration to break through the first wave of the defense and get to the second level. Brutal stiff-arm when in the open field to bat away defenders attempting to drag him down. Despite his size, shows good breakaway speed. Final nine touchdowns against BCS opponents traveled an average of 32 yards. Good size and strength as a pass blocker. Despite his struggles with durability, some close to the program characterize him as being a tough player willing to play through pain.
Primary concern - and the only one that will keep him from being a top 10 pick - is --NAME--' struggles with durability. Fought nagging injuries throughout much of his career at Ohio State and some have questioned whether he knows the difference between pain and injury. Sat out three full games and parts of several others (including the 2009 Fiesta Bowl -- his final game in a Buckeye uniform) with foot, hamstring and head (concussion) injuries. May lack natural hands for the reception. Has only caught 15 passes for 84 career yards and too often double-clutches. Inconsistent effort as a blocker.
LARRY JOHNSON, Kansas City -- Like Johnson, --NAME-- is a power-oriented runner with a great stiff-arm, but all that pounding does come with a price - serious concerns about his durability. He has the hard-driving running style of Minnesota's Adrian Peterson, but is not as well-rounded and doesn't play with that steady fire in the belly that the best NFL backs displays. There are a lot of holes in --NAME--' game, but for a team needing someone to punch the ball up the gut, he is the best option in this draft.
-------------------------
Eddie_Williams 79663 221
--NAME-- looks like a fullback and plays like a wide receiver. His production (54 catches, 687 yards, six touchdowns) and leadership made him the team's 2008 Most Valuable Player. And his versatility put him on the NFL draft map. Whether it's at fullback or H-back, the versatility of the first-team All-WAC pick could make him a tough player to keep off someone's roster next September. Had an arm span of 31 3/4 inches and a hand span of 9 inches at the combine.
Team captain   team MVP in 2003 and 2004   first-team all-county, all-league and all-metro   second-team all-state   Peninsula Athletic League "A" Division Utility award as a senior   Aragon lost only two league games during his three-year career   also played basketball and competed on the track team   track MVP.
Adequate upper and lower body build. Reliable hands, and can extend and snatch the ball outside his frame. Adjusts to low and high passes. Lines up outside, in the slot, on the line and as an H-back. Used on quick screens to get the ball in his hands. Always seems to find the hole in the zone to present a target. Sells the fake well, getting his head around quickly to find the ball. Lowers his pads to bowl over defensive backs and get extra yardage. Has some elusiveness and ability to break tackles in the open field. Fair release off the line, and uses his hands to free himself of jams. Good blocker downfield, getting his hands inside the jersey and sustaining with quick feet. Used on special teams coverage units and is able to wrap up or pound return men on the fly.
Finding a position may be an issue. Below average height and strength to play tight end or H-back, but was not used as a lead blocker in Idaho's offense. Struggles to anchor or sustain blocks against defensive ends or bigger linebackers. Will cut block, albeit effectively, in pass protection instead of standing up to blitzers. Doesn't have the straight-line speed to threaten the seam or separate from NFL linebackers and safeties.
-------------------------
DeAndre_Wright 79667 200
--NAME-- finished his distinguished career earning second-team All-Mountain West honors while playing through pain most of the season. A factor in coverage since his freshman season, he had 10 career interceptions and 25 pass breakups for the Lobos. Despite that production, --NAME--'s durability is a major concern for scouts because of his slight frame and postseason surgeries on both shoulders.
A 2004 graduate of Gwynn Park HS in Clinton, Md A two-year starter at running back Rushed for 1,363 yards and 16 TDs as a senior, earning all-county honors Played for head coach Danny Hayes.
Nice length to play the ball on the outside.   Excellent hands for the interception, whether deep in coverage or on tip drills.   Has the vision to get yards after the pick.   Keeps his eyes on the quarterback, jumping routes aggressively.   Fast and low in his backpedal.   Changes direction quickly, able to flip his hips and run with receivers down the sideline.   Quick to come up in run support, eat up a block on a receiver screen, or put a shoulder into his man immediately after the catch.   Played through injuries.
Small with a very lanky build.   Doesn't show great strength to get off blocks, fight for the ball in the air, jam at the line or tackle in the open field.   Cut tackler who will whiff on occasion.   Lacks top-end speed to hang with NFL receivers over distance.   Rounds off when adjusting to out routes.   Gets turned around and bites hard on double moves due to his aggressive style and does not have good recovery speed.   Takes on gunners but lacks the strength to hold them up.   Medical check needed on his injured shoulders.
-------------------------
Stanley_Arnoux 79838 118
Outside linebacker Aaron Curry deserved the spotlight, but --NAME--, a four-year starter who never earned all-conference accolades, also received a Combine invitation. Considering that the 42-game starter leaves the Demon Deacons with 251 career stops, it's easy to see why. A steady presence in the middle, --NAME-- lacks rare athleticism, but his reliable tackling between the hashes make him a late-round possibility for clubs in need of an inside thumper.
Listed as the country's Number 116 linebacker by TheInsiders.com   Had 125 solo tackles and three interceptions as a senior in 2003   Also collected 500 rushing yards and 11 touchdowns on offense   Earned all-area honors   A first-team all-state selection   Named the Defensive Player of the Year by the Ft. Lauderdale Sun-Sentinel   Runs a 4.6 40m   Coached by Craig Dobson at Glades Day.
 Short, squat frame to handle taking on and discarding blocks.   Plays with good overall physicality.   Reliable tackler between the hashes.   Flashes some pop as a hitter and can close in close quarters.   Better in coverage than his measureables indicate.   Gets surprising depth on his drops and reads the quarterback's eyes.   Team leader who made the Dean's list.
Shorter than scouts would like and a bit round in the middle.   Lacks the instincts and quick first step preferred at the "Mike" 'backer position.   Takes a moment to recognize the action and is slow to flow toward the ball.   Lacks the straight-line speed to beat backs to the flanks and is a liability in coverage.   Lacks the lateral agility to consistently get around blockers in tight quarters, thus relying on his pop to disengage.   Needs an open lane to close when rushing the quarterback.
-------------------------
Jasper_Brinkley 79840 150
--NAME-- made a successful recovery from 2007 knee surgery, returning to the dominant force he displayed for the Gamecocks when he and his twin brother, Casper, joined the program in January 2006. To say that South Carolina missed him in 2007 would be an understatement, as the Gamecocks struggled considerably without their leader in the middle of the field.
Without --NAME--'s services for the last eight games of the 2007 campaign, the defense finished 56 in the nation, yielding 378.08 yards per game and missed the postseason bowl action. With their middle linebacker leading the way, the Gamecocks improved dramatically in 2008, as they finished 13th in the nation in total defense, allowing only 291.92 yards per game and finished second in pass defense (159.23 ypg).
The --NAME-- twins terrorized opponents during their days at Thomson High School. --NAME-- garnered All-Area and All-State first-team honors as a junior and senior. To improve their academic standing, both enrolled at Georgia Military College upon high graduation. --NAME-- captured team MVP honors as a freshman and sophomore, going on to be named an All-American second team choice while playing middle linebacker in 2005.
The brothers enrolled at South Carolina in time to participate in 2006 spring drills. Casper took over one defensive end spot while --NAME-- became an instant hit at middle linebacker. He earned All-Southeastern Conference honors while leading the team with 107 tackles, including 85 solo hits (79% of his total). He finished third on the squad with five sacks and led the squad with 14.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage, ranking sixth in the conference with an average of 1.08 tackles for loss per game.
--NAME-- was the only Gamecock to be listed on the All-SEC preseason team in 2007. He was also on the Bronko Nagurski Trophy, Butkus Award and Lombardi Award Watch Lists. He totaled 21 tackles (15 solos) with a pair of interceptions, but suffered a right knee anterior ligament tear vs. Louisiana State, undergoing surgery and bringing his season to an end with eight games left on the schedule.
With his brother, Casper, having signed with the Carolina Panthers as a free agent, --NAME-- returned to South Carolina in 2008. He was named All-SEC second-team and returned to his familiar middle linebacker role. He ranked third on the squad with 65 tackles (42 solos), including 2.5 sacks and five stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also caused a pair of fumbles and had his third interception for his Gamecocks' career.
Attended Georgia Military College in Milledgeville, Ga. where he was coached by Bert Williams  Was a preseason first-team All-America linebacker who earned second-team post-season All-America accolades  Recognized as the team's MVP both as a freshman and sophomore  Came from the same program that produced current USC teammate Brandon Isaac.
2007: Played in the season opener vs. Louisiana-Lafayette (9/01) with a left ankle sprain Suffered a right knee anterior cruciate tear vs. Louisiana State (9/22), undergoing surgery Sept. 26 that would sideline him for the final eight games of the season.
Attended Thomson (Ga.) High School, playing football for head coach Luther Welch Earned first-team All-Area and All-State honors as a junior and senior.
Prototype size and strength for the inside linebacker position.   Immediate impact defender for South Carolina after transferring from Georgia Military College, and improved gradually.   Shows some burst as pass rusher on the blitz.   Good short-area quickness to elude blockers.   Reliable open-field tackler and can be a punisher inside.   Intimidating presence whose size and power project nicely as a 3-4 inside linebacker.
Relies on his physical attributes and is still developing his instincts and technique.   Too often looks to slip blocks instead of using his size advantage.   Struggles with his hand placement and is slow to disengage.   Can be fooled by misdirection and lacks the explosiveness to recover.   Lacks the instincts and foot speed to be a factor in coverage.   Missed all but four games of the 2007 season after tearing his ACL.   Underwent surgery September 2007 and wasn't the same player in 2008, when his athleticism was nowhere close to what it was pre-injury.
CARLOS POLK, Dallas -- Like Polk, --NAME--'s pass coverage deficiencies will leave him performing as a two-down linebacker at the next level. He gives good effort on the field, but is best served in a 3-4 alignment where he would not have to handle making calls, as he has just an adequate mental grasp for those duties. He plays much better in the box than when giving chase, as he does a good job of keeping his shoulders square and exploding through the holes. There are just too many holes in his game (mental aspect, pass coverage) for a team to get excited over him.
-------------------------
Aaron_Curry 79842 4
The 2008 Butkus Award winner, given to the nation's top linebacker, --NAME-- so impressed the award's namesake that Dick Butkus surprised him in early December when he arrived on campus to personally hand the award to its recipient.
--NAME-- started 49 of the 51 games he appeared in, going on to rank third in school annals with 45.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage. The All-American defender also finished ninth on Wake Forest's all-time record list with 332 total tackles. 
--NAME-- outstanding field vision and ball awareness skills saw him not only wreak havoc in the opposition's backfield on the blitz, but also excel in pass coverage. He returned three of his four interceptions for touchdowns as a junior, tying the NCAA single-season record for linebackers that was first set by Malcolm Postell of Pittsburgh, who also had three in 2004. Only cornerback Deltha O'Neal of California scored more on interception returns in a season (four in 1999) in major college annals.
--NAME-- gained a total of 226 yards on those interception returns in 2007, setting the school and Atlantic Coast Conference single-season records. He was just the third player in league annals to gain more than 200 yards on interception returns in a season. His 226 yards placed fifth in NCAA history, becoming the 10th college player to gain more than 200 yards.
At E.E. Smith High School, --NAME-- was a standout outside linebacker and tight end. He was named Conference Defensive Player of the Year and also earned All-Conference and All-Region honors after registering 123 tackles during his senior year. He was selected to the North Carolina-South Carolina Shrine Bowl as a tight end.
--NAME-- was the prize recruit from Wake Forest's 2004 class, but spent the season performing on the scout team. He entered 2005 fall camp behind Caron Bracy and James Adams at strong-side outside linebacker, but emerged as the starter at that position for 10 games, earning Freshman All-American second-team honors. He collected 45 tackles (28 solos) with a 15-yard sack and 7.5 stops for losses. He also blocked a punt that he recovered for a 13-yard return.
--NAME-- started all 14 games at strong-side linebacker in 2006. He finished second on the squad with 83 tackles (52 solos), including 8.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage and three sacks. His first career interception came vs. Georgia Tech in the Atlantic Coast Conference title game, returning the ball 30 yards to set up a scoring drive.
--NAME-- was named second-team All-American in 2007, twice receiving ACC Player of the Week honors. The strong-side linebacker started 12 games, snapping a sting of 30 consecutive starts when he came off the bench vs. Navy (was punished by the coaching staff for missing class prior to that contest). He delivered 99 tackles (61 solos) with three sacks and led the team with 13.5 stops for loss. His 226 yards via four interception returns set the school single-season record, as his 84-yard run back vs. Army was the fifth-longest interception return in Demon Deacon history.
The All-American and All-Atlantic Coast Conference first-team choice led the team with a career-high 105 tackles (66 solos). The Butkus Award winner also paced the defense with 16 tackles behind the line of scrimmage, adding 2.5 sacks with an interception, as he also recovered three fumbles, caused another and broke up three passes.
No major injuries reported.
Attended E.E. Smith (Fayetteville, N.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Mike Earwood Standout outside linebacker and tight end Named Conference Defensive Player of the Year and also earned All-Conference and All-Region honors after registering 123 tackles during his senior year Selected to the North Carolina-South Carolina Shrine Bowl as a tight end.
Strongly-built with long arms to keep himself off offensive linemen when playing against the run. Very smooth in pass drops, staying low in his backpedal and getting into depth at the proper angles. Good hands for the interception, and can break up passes using his hands or a big hit over the middle. Plays the nine-technique very well, ripping off the tackle's block and getting to the ballcarrier on inside and outside runs. Also closes on the ball quickly when playing in the stack. Able to shed blocks and go through backs on blitzes. Will pop the fullback and create a pile to stuff inside runs. Shows good awareness on misdirection, quickly diagnosing plays and affecting the success of the play. Gets a lot of attention from opponents on special teams because of his size, speed and aggressiveness in kick return coverage.
A bit stiff in the upper body, he tends to succeed most in straight-line situations rather than changing directions quickly. Can get to the quarterback on the blitz but doesn't always make the play. Doesn't explode into tackles consistently, using his long arms to try and wrap up.
DERRICK JOHNSON, Kansas City -- Like the Chiefs finally realized with Johnson, hopefully the NFL team that drafts --NAME-- will do likewise and play him in the middle. He has very good athleticism making plays in front of him, but bites often on play-action, lacks good depth playing in the zone and is a bit too stiff to generate the sideline-to-sideline range to make impact plays on the outside, where he struggles to stop the runner's forward momentum. He can clog the rush lanes when he stays low in his pads. Put him inside in a 3-4 alignment and he can be equally productive getting to the quarterback as he did in college. Play him on the outside and he will be exposed in a quick and deep passing game.
-------------------------
Malcolm_Jenkins 79848 14
--NAME-- is regarded as the best Big Ten Conference defensive back since Michigan's Charles Woodson terrorized league quarterbacks and receivers en route to capturing the Heisman Trophy in 1997. The similarities in their game is what most impresses pro scouts, as both are known for their physicality in playing the bump-and-run, along with the ability to make game-changing plays. 
The comparisons between the two continue, as most experts also envision --NAME-- moving to free safety in the professional ranks, a position Woodson was moved to midseason last year with the Green Bay Packers. --NAME--, the three-time All-Big Ten Conference choice, usually plays on the wide side of the field, but often moves around the field to cover the opponent's best receiver.
Called a natural pass defender with great instincts and outstanding speed and quickness, --NAME-- excels at man-to-man coverage. He tied the school career record by returning two of his 11 career interceptions for touchdowns and has also used his excellent leaping ability as a standout special team performer, having blocked three kicks during his career. In 49 games for the Buckeyes, he has never allowed a touchdown reception.
At Piscataway High School, --NAME-- led his team to three consecutive state titles. The All-State and All-American choice played receiver and defensive back. He also excelled at track, winning the state title in the 400-meter dash as a junior. He took third place in the 200 meters as a junior and finished third in the hurdles as a senior at the state meet.
Most freshmen spend their first year residing on special teams at Ohio State, but --NAME-- appeared in 10 games at nickel back, starting three games at that position and three more at boundary cornerback late in the season. He suffered a knee sprain that sidelined him for the final two regular-season contests, but he returned to play in the Fiesta Bowl vs. Notre Dame. He produced 37 tackles (23 solos), broke up two passes and returned an onside kick 34 yards as a 180-pounder.
Having bulked up during the offseason, --NAME-- took over field cornerback duties in 2006, starting all 13 games. The All-Big Ten Conference first-team pick led the OSU secondary with 55 tackles (40 solos) that included 4.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He broke up four passes and intercepted four others, returning one 61 yards for a score in the Penn State clash. He also blocked one punt.
--NAME-- was a Thorpe Award (nation's top defensive back) semifinalist as a junior. He added All-American and All-Big Ten Conference honors, as he shifted to boundary cornerback, starting all 13 contests. He produced 44 tackles (27 solo) and five stops behind the line of scrimmage. Teams refused to throw to his side of the field, as the opposition completed just 32.3 percent of passes thrown into his area. He intercepted four passes, as he returned one for a score and knocked down three other throws.
The team captain was a unanimous All-Big Ten choice and consensus All-American in 2008. He captured the Jim Thorpe Award and was a semifinalist for Bednarik Award (top defensive player in the nation). He shifted back to field cornerback, taking on the top receiver each game, as he totaled 57 tackles (34 solos) and caused three fumbles. He added three pass thefts, nine pass deflections and had four stops for loss. He also continued to excel on special teams, blocking two more punts. The opposition averaged just 3.83 yards on 60 pass attempts into his territory.
2005: Sat out the Northwestern (11/12) and Michigan (11/19) games with a knee sprain.
Attended Piscataway (N.J.) High School Led his team to three consecutive state titles The All-State and All-American choice played receiver and defensive back  Also excelled at track, winning the state title in the 400-meter dash as a junior Took third place in the 200 meters as a junior and finished third in the hurdles as a senior at the state meet.
Lockdown corner.   Very physical at the line, has a strong punch to knock receivers off their route.   Attacks ballcarriers behind the line, making secure tackles.   Also willing to assist in tackles downfield or inside.   Effective playing off receivers as he can flip open his hips and accelerate, close quickly on the ball in front of him or change direction to mirror receivers.   Stays with even the fastest receivers down the sideline.   Plays free safety on occasion and has all of the tools to succeed there in the NFL.   Excellent hands for the interception, and he has the vertical to high-point the ball and strength to fight for it.   Can make plays with the ball in his hands.
Creates havoc on the blitz but doesn't always finish.   Will take chances to make a play on the ball.   Could improve his tackling in the open field -- will occasionally drop his head instead of watching what he hits.   Inconsistent taking on and getting off receiver blocks, and will hesitate to get to ballcarriers coming into his area.   Must prove he has the mental discipline needed to handle getting constantly challenged as a rookie after rarely being thrown at in college.
CHARLES WOODSON, Green Bay -- With receivers the size of Brandon Marshall, Larry Fitzgerald, Terrell Owens and Randy Moss becoming more common, defensive coordinators realize the need for big, physical cornerbacks. When analyzing the talent at this position, --NAME-- stands well above the rest of the class. He might not be flashy or have many interceptions, but he knows how to play and won't be a liability against the run.
-------------------------
James_Laurinaitis 79850 35
One of the most highly dedicated athletes in school history, --NAME-- carried on the tradition of standout performers to compete at linebacker for the university, joining perennial All-Americans Chris Spielman, Tom Cousineau, Pepper Johnson, Steve Tovar and A.J. Hawk as some of the best ever produced at OSU.
In addition to garnering All-American and All-Big Ten Conference honors since his sophomore campaign, --NAME-- has been a finalist for the Lombardi Award, Lott Trophy and Bednarik Award. He was the 2006 Bronko Nagurski Award winner as the nation's best defensive player, the same year he won the Randy Gradishar Linebacker Award. As a junior, he added the coveted Butkus Award (nation's top linebacker) to his trophy case.
In 2008, --NAME-- was named the inaugural winner of the Lowe's Senior CLASS Award for NCAA. The award, chosen by a nationwide vote of coaches, media and fans, is presented annually to the most outstanding NCAA Division I senior student-athlete in nine sports. The announcement and trophy presentation to --NAME-- were made today during the pre-game show of the Fiesta Bowl national telecast on FOX. 
--NAME--, who has received many awards including the Big Ten Defensive Player of the Year, said the Lowe's Senior CLASS Award is special because of what it represents. "What a tremendous honor this is to be recognized with such a prestigious award," --NAME-- said. "The Lowe's Senior CLASS Award is already well known in basketball, and to be the first-ever winner for football is something very special. I appreciate the compliment it pays to me and to Ohio State to be recognized for character, academics and community service. I am very proud to be the winner." 
The son of world renowned wrestler, Joe --NAME-- (pronounced Larr-en-EYE-tiss), who competed as the "Animal" in the 1980s and 1990s as part of the tag team called the Road Warriors (Legion of Doom), --NAME-- also has excelled in the classroom. One of the more instinctive players on the field, he also captured Academic All-Big Ten Conference honors during his junior season.
At Plymouth Wayzata High School, --NAME-- was named Minnesota's "Defensive Mr. Football" as a senior, going on to record 193 tackles, five sacks and 28 stops behind the line of scrimmage. That year, he led the team to the Minnesota Class 5A state championship game.
During his junior campaign, --NAME-- was credited with 160 tackles, earning All-State and All-Conference accolades. In addition to his exploits on the football field, he also excelled in hockey, serving as that team's captain during his senior year. He led the hockey squad to the state tournament in 2004 and was considered to be a possible second- or third-round pick if he had decided to enter the NHL draft after high school. 
When --NAME-- accepted a scholarship to Ohio State in 2005, he became the first player from the state of Minnesota to join the Buckeyes' football team since the famed Sid Gillman in 1930. The true freshman played mostly on special teams and as a reserve outside linebacker that season. He would close out his first year on the varsity by delivering nine tackles (3 solos) and assisting on one stop behind the line of scrimmage.
--NAME-- shifted to middle linebacker in 2006, earning All-American and All-Big Ten Conference first-team accolades. He was a finalist for the Butkus Award and Bednarik Award, in addition to winning the Bronko Nagurski Award, given to the nation's best defensive player. He ranked fourth in the conference and led the team with 115 tackles (53 solos), including four sacks and 8.5 stops for losses. He also paced the Buckeyes with five interceptions and deflected two other throws while causing three fumbles.
As a junior, --NAME-- was again selected All-American and All-Big Ten Conference first-team. He was named the league's Defensive Player of the Year and won the Butkus Award, as he tallied a team-high 121 tackles (51 solos). He posted 8.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage, including five sacks and also picked off two passes.
--NAME-- was voted team captain for the second consecutive season by his teammates in 2008 and is only the seventh Buckeye to be elected twice. He earned All-American and 
All-Big Ten Conference first-team honors, and for the second consecutive year was named the league's Defensive Player of the Year. 
He led the team, ranked second in the Big Ten and 14th in the nation with an average of 10.0 tackles per game. He posted a career-high 130 hits (52 solos) with four sacks and seven stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also picked off a pair of passes and deflected four others while leading the Buckeyes to four BCS bowl games during his career at the university.
2007: Sat out the second half of the Kent State game (10/13) after --NAME-- suffered a hip pointer when he got kicked in the right hip.
Attended Plymouth Wayzata (Minn.) High School Named Minnesota's "Defensive Mr. Football" as a senior, going on to record 193 tackles, five sacks and 28 stops behind the line of scrimmage That year, he led the team to the Minnesota Class 5A state championship game During his junior campaign, --NAME-- was credited with 160 tackles, earning All-State and All-Conference accolades In addition to his exploits on the football field, he also excelled in hockey, serving as that team's captain during his senior year Led the hockey squad to the state tournament in 2004 and was considered to be a possible second- or third-round pick in the NHL draft, if he had decided to enter the draft after high school.
Prototype size and athleticism for the inside linebacker position. Reads the action quickly and gets in position to make the play. Instinctive and rarely out of position. Uses his hands well to meet, greet and discard blockers. Best attribute might be his open-field tackling. Form tackler who can generate explosiveness with his hits. Rare instincts and underrated athleticism for coverage. Gets good depth on his drops and has good straight-line speed and lateral agility. Baits the quarterback and can break on the ball. Soft hands for the interception.
Needs to continue to add strength, especially in his upper body. Relies on his athleticism and good technique to defeat blocks and can struggle to disengage. Consistent and reliable, but rarely made the game-changing play over his career. Experienced and productive blitzer, but doesn't show a variety of pass rush moves, relying more on athleticism, hustle and instincts.
NICK BARNETT, Green Bay -- Like Barnett, --NAME-- gets most of his production by making plays on the move. He has very good range and change of direction agility, but for a middle linebacker, you would look for someone that is more of a smash mouth type. But, the OSU defender lacks the brute strength and bulk, resulting in his getting bounced around when attacking inside. He would be a much better fit as a weak-side linebacker (compares to Green Bay's A.J. Hawk there), as he has the foot speed and pursuit skills to be a big impact vs. the outside running game. He will be an effective player in the middle, but could be much more productive if allowed to roam the field from the outside, as he is better on the chase than one who can initiate the tackle (only 159 of 375 career tackles are solo efforts).
-------------------------
Rey_Maualuga 79852 38
The three-year starter was called by the coaching staff the "most menacing" linebacker of the Pete Carroll era. By the time he finished playing for USC, --NAME-- was the most decorated linebacker to wear a Trojans uniform since Junior Seau roamed the fields for Southern California in the late 1980s. In each of his three seasons as a starter, --NAME-- garnered All-American and All-Pac 10 Conference recognition.
During his freshman season as a reserve, the Trojans ranked 31st in the nation in rush defense (130.54 ypg), 48th in total defense (360.92 ypg) and 35th in scoring defense (22.85 ppg). In --NAME--'s first year as a starter, Southern California improved to ninth in the nation vs. the run (91.08 ypg), 20th in total defense (295.85 ypg) and 11th in scoring defense (15.15 ppg). 
As a junior, USC continued to move up the national charts, finishing fourth vs. the run (84.15 ypg), second in total defense (273.15 ypg) and second in scoring defense (16.0 ppg) in 2007. In his final season, the Trojans allowed just 87.38 yards per game on the ground (fifth in the NCAA), ranking second in the country in total defense (221.77 ypg) while leading the major colleges in scoring defense (9.0 ppg).
"I want to become the player that the offense game-plans around, that the offense fears coming into the game," --NAME-- recently stated. The inspiration he draws from his late father, Talatonu, who died just before the 2006 Rose Bowl BCS championship game: "It doesn't hit me as much now as it did, but I use it as inspiration. He's out there in my heart playing with me. Even though he's not here, he's with me spiritually. I've matured a lot lately. That childish player, that person that I was, is long gone. I feel like I've developed a sense of leadership on the team. I've learned the do's and don'ts, and I've realized what's important." 
In an article by Steve Dilbeck of the Los Angeles Daily News, he wrote: "Have you seen the play of USC linebacker --NAME--? If you watched the Trojans play, could your eyes possibly avoid him? Does this look like Superman in cardinal and gold or what? He flies to the ball and then hits like a locomotive. Isn't this obviously USC's next superstar? He has given every indication of becoming the ideal middle linebacker. He has the natural size. He has incredible burst. He is powerful and aggressive and uncommonly fast. More than all that, he is also amazingly athletic. He can be a sledgehammer or a ballerina. Dazzle with power or agility. Play with fury and control." 
Hall of Fame coach and ESPN's Lou Holtz chimed in, "He's the next great Trojans linebacker, very physical, always lining up big hits. He reminds me of (ex-Ohio State All-American) A.J. Hawk. His athletic ability is similar to Hawk's, but the infectiousness of his free spirit makes him even more valuable to his team." 
--NAME-- earned Parade, Super Prep, Prep Football Report, Scout.com and EA Sports All-American honors at Eureka High School as a senior in 2004. He was named USA Today All-USA first- team, Super Prep Elite 50, Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team, Student Sports Top 100, Rivals 100, Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West, Tacoma News Tribune Western 100, Orange County Register Fab 15 first team and Cal-Hi Sports All-State first team honors that season.
In 2004, --NAME-- recorded 96 tackles, including 37 stops for loss, four interceptions, including two that he returned for touchdowns, a pair of fumble recoveries and had one kickoff return for a touchdown. As a junior in 2003, he was a Student Sports Junior All-American and Cal-Hi Sports All-State Underclass first-team pick while posting 146 tackles, 43 for loss, 11 sacks and one interception. Eureka went 20-2-1 during his junior and senior seasons. He spent his 2001 freshman year at St. Bonaventure High in Ventura (Calif.).
--NAME-- made an immediate impact as a true freshman. Even though he played behind Oscar Lua at middle linebacker, he was named Freshman All-American first-team by the Football Writers Association and Scout.com. He received the team's John McKay Award, given to the player that shows the most competitive spirit. He finished with 37 tackles (26 solos), a sack, 4.5 stops for losses and an interception.
--NAME-- earned All-American honorable mention and All-Pac 10 Conference first-team honors in 2006. He started 10 of the 13 games he played in at middle linebacker, going on to register 78 tackles (45 solos), ranking second on the team. He had two sacks among his five stops for loss, as he also deflected three passes and picked off another.
As a junior, --NAME-- received All-American third-team and All-Pac 10 Conference first-team accolades. He started all but the Notre Dame game, as he was nursing a hip pointer before that contest, leading the team with a career-high 79 tackles (41 solos). He placed third on the squad with six sacks and 10.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also knocked down three passes while intercepting another.
--NAME-- was a unanimous first-team All-American and All-Pac 10 Conference choice in 2008. He was a finalist for the Lombardi Award, Bronko Nagurski Award and the Butkus Award, in addition to being named the league's Defensive Player of the Year. He matched his career-high with 79 tackles (51 solos), as he returned one of his two interceptions for a touchdown and deflected four other throws in 12 games. He sat out the Oregon clash after he sprained his knee in the Oregon State game.
2007: Saw limited action vs. Notre Dame (11/25) due to a hip pointer.
2008: Sat out the Oregon game (10/04) after suffering a right knee sprain the previous week vs. Oregon State (9/25). 
2009: Could not complete the agility tests at the NFL Combine due to a right hamstring pull.
Attended Eureka (Cal.) High School, earning Parade, Super Prep, Prep Football Report, Scout.com and EA Sports All-American honors as a senior in 2004 Named USA Today All-USA first- team, Super Prep Elite 50, Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team, Student Sports Top 100, Rivals 100, Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West, Tacoma News Tribune Western 100, Orange County Register Fab 15 first team and Cal-Hi Sports All-State first team honors that season In 2004, --NAME-- made 96 tackles, including 37 stops for loss, four interceptions, including two that he returned for touchdowns, a pair of fumble recoveries and had one kickoff return for a touchdown  As a junior in 2003, he was a Student Sports Junior All-American and Cal-Hi Sports All-State Underclass first-team pick while posting 146 tackles, 43 for loss, 11 sacks and one interception Eureka went 20-2-1 during his junior and senior seasons Spent his 2001 freshman year at St. Bonaventure High in Ventura (Cal.).
Good initial quickness off the snap. Quickly gets to top speed, flashing rare downhill explosiveness for the position. Reads the action quickly. Willing to take on blocks and has the strength and hand technique to shed quickly. Good lateral quickness to evade blockers and has the speed to beat backs to the flanks. Gets good depth on his pass drop and is quick to close on the ball. Punishing hitter with four career forced fumbles. Productive pass rusher with the speed to close on even mobile quarterbacks. Can break down in space to make the secure open-field tackle.
Has a tendency to overpursue, opening holes in the defense for quick and savvy ballcarriers to exploit. Too often relies on his explosive hitting to knock down ballcarriers, rather than wrapping up to make secure tackles. Concerns about his maturity. Repeated troubles while at USC involving fights and alcohol. Arrested for misdemeanor battery after punching a student at a Halloween party in 2005. The charge was eventually dropped.
BILL ROMANOWSKI, ex-Oakland -- Alright, Romanowski played on the outside, but there are a lot of similarities in their games, especially with both being violent tacklers. --NAME-- is fun to watch because he plays so physically. He is big, strong, fast and explosive, displaying the perfect middle linebacker temperament. He is the type of player that can set the tempo of the game and makes players around him better. His teammates know that if they let up, he is going to get all over them. He plays very close to the line of scrimmage, right up in the "A" gap, and will not hesitate to attack and be physical with blockers. If he maintains his recent maturity off the field, he is the type of playmaker to build a defense around.
-------------------------
Gerald_McRath 79854 130
--NAME-- is an undersized middle linebacker who packs a lot of punch behind his hits, but much like former USM standout Michael Boley (Giants), the junior's cat-like quickness could see him shift to weak-side outside linebacker in the National Football League. He could have returned to the university in 2009 as a sixth-year player, but having already graduated with a degree in Sports Administration, he decided to test his skills at the next level and declared for the 2009 NFL Draft.
The two-time All-Conference USA first-team selection and league 2007 Defensive Player of the Year petitioned the NFL during the season to receive a projection on how high he may go in the draft, and he received word that he wasn't expected to be drafted in the first three rounds. Still, --NAME-- said he's ready to take the next step. "I'm just going to work, putting to use that usual Southern Miss mentality," --NAME-- said. "I just have to work every day and leave it all on the line." 
--NAME-- would close out his career as the school's eighth-ranked player on the all-time record list with 386 tackles, as his 171 assisted hits placed fourth on that chart. "He's a leader, a good kid with a lot of savvy," defensive coordinator Jay Hopson said of --NAME--. "He's just got a lot of football instincts and awesome athletic ability. We wanted to take a good look at him there."  
At Powder Springs High School, the team captain was named to the Marietta Daily Journal Dynamite Dozen, Cobb County Super 11 by the Atlanta Journal Constitution's Georgia Top 50 and received a two-star (5.2) rating by Rivals.com. He was listed as the 32nd-best player in Georgia by Super Prep, earning a three-star rating by TheInsiders.com, a recruiting service that ranked him 69th nationally among linebackers.
As a senior, --NAME-- recorded 85 tackles (59 solos) with three stops behind the line of scrimmage. He had two fumble recoveries, one forced fumble, five quarterback pressures and one interception that season. He also lettered in wrestling.
--NAME-- enrolled at Southern Mississippi in 2004, redshirting that season. He started the first two games of the 2005 campaign at strong-side outside linebacker, but suffered a broken bone in his leg and a knee injury vs. McNeese State that would sideline him for the rest of the schedule, finishing with six tackles (5 solos). He also returned his only collegiate interception 32 yards for a touchdown.
In 2006, --NAME-- appeared in 14 games, starting nine contests, including the final seven at middle linebacker, a position he switched to early in the year. He still managed to lead the team with 104 tackles (59 solos), rank third on the squad with 11 stops for loss and collect a pair of sacks. That performance earned him Freshman All-American first-team recognition.
--NAME-- settled in at middle linebacker in 2007, starting 12 contests. A knee sprain vs. Memphis kept him out of all but a handful of snaps the following week vs. Texas-El Paso, but he ranked 15th in the nation and led the Golden Eagles with a career-high 139 tackles (72 solos). He was second on the squad with 12 stops behind the line of scrimmage and posted 4.5 sacks to go along with three pass breakups. He was named Conference USA Defensive Player of the Year and received Sophomore All-American second-team honors.
In 2008, --NAME-- was again selected to the All-Conference USA first-team. For the third season in a row, he led the squad with 137 tackles (78 solos), leading the league while placing 10th nationally with an average of 10.54 tackles per game. He ranked second on the team with 9.5 stops for loss, as he also caused and recovered a pair of fumbles.
2005: Suffered a broken bone in his leg and knee ligament damage vs. McNeese State (9/17), missing the rest of the season.
2007: Saw limited action in reserve vs. Texas-El Paso (11/17) after suffering a knee sprain the previous week vs. Memphis (11/10).
Attended Powder Springs (Ga.) High School, playing football for head coach Jim Dorsey The team captain was named to the Marietta Daily Journal Dynamite Dozen, Cobb County Super 11 by the Atlanta Journal Constitution's Georgia Top 50 and received a two-star (5.2) rating by Rivals.com Listed as the 32nd-best player in Georgia by Super Prep, earning a three-star rating by TheInsiders.com, a recruiting service that ranked him 69th nationally among linebackers As a senior, --NAME-- recorded 85 tackles (59 solos) with three stops behind the line of scrimmage Had two fumble recoveries, one forced fumble, five quarterback pressures and one interception that season Also lettered in wrestling.
Rangy build with plenty of room for additional growth.   Good instincts.   Flows to the action quickly and puts himself in position to make a play.   Reads the quarterback's eyes in coverage.   Recognizes the screen and draw and isn't fooled often.   Good speed to the flanks. .. Reliable open-field tackler who can break down in space and make the secure stop.   Good agility to slip past blockers.   Good balance to handle working through trash.   Flashes some aggression taking on blocks, though he needs more consistency in this area.   Improved in this area as a junior.
Undersized.   Lacks bulk in both his upper and lower body and looks more like a strong safety than a middle linebacker.   Lacks the straight-line speed and hips for coverage to make the transition to defensive back.   Likes to avoid blockers rather than forcefully taking them on.   Drag-down tackler who only occasionally shows legitimate pop as a tackler.   Bit of a pile jumper.   Often credited for tackles in which he didn't make the play.
D'QWELL JACKSON, Cleveland -- Like Jackson, --NAME-- compensates for a lack of size with field smarts and a relentless motor. He is a quick reactor with a nose for the ball, but could move to weak-side linebacker, where he would be better suited to do what he does best - take on lead blockers and roam the field to make the play. He plays with leverage and takes good angles in pursuit, but does get stonewalled challenging offensive linemen in the trenches and needs to stay away from the trash in order to be much more effective.
-------------------------
Myron_Pryor 79856 207
A four-year starter, --NAME-- emerged as a legitimate playmaker for the Wildcats as a senior, earning second-team All-SEC honors as a part of an underrated defensive line. --NAME-- had 107 career tackles, including 20.5 tackles for loss and 11 sacks. NFL scouts wonder if his breakout senior campaign had more to do with the talent around him, but a solid week of practice at the East-West Shrine Game may have cemented --NAME--'s status as a draftworthy prospect.
Explosive defensive lineman who has been likened to former Wildcat and first-round NFL draft choice Dewayne Robertson   Three-year starter at offensive tackle and in the defensive line at Eastern High School in Louisville, Ky.   First-team all-state by the Louisville Courier-Journal and second-team all-state by The Associated Press as a senior   Named to the Lexington Herald-Leader Class of the Commonwealth list of the top-22 seniors in Kentucky   Selected All-Metro Louisville by the Voice-Tribune   Given the Republic Bank Award for the top defensive lineman in Louisville   Eastern's recipient of the Unitas Scholarship Award   Senior year defensive stats feature approximately 30 tackles, with 10 tackles for loss and five fumble recoveries   Also played running back in some short-yardage situations and scored one touchdown   Second-team all-state as a junior by the Courier-Journal.   Helped Eastern to a 9-3 record as a junior, advancing to the second round of the state playoffs   Two-year member of the all-district team   Strength is noted by his top lifts -- 390 pounds in the bench press, 585 in the squat, 270 in the power clean, and a state-record 690 in the dead lift   An All-South Region selection by PrepStar   The Number 7 prospect in Kentucky as named by Rivals.com and SuperPrep   Coached by Lance Dudley   "--NAME-- is a naturally strong and gifted athlete," Dudley said. "He runs very well for his size and has surprising agility. One of his strengths is his football instincts -- he knows how to find the football. He also takes pride in his technique."   Two-year letterman on the wrestling and track and field teams   Competed in the shot put and discus throw   Member of the Fellowship of Christian Athletes   Selected Kentucky over Indiana, Louisville and Cincinnati.
Powerful lower body.   Good use of his natural leverage and strength to anchor as a run blocker.   Anticipates the snap count well and flashes some initial quickness to push the pocket.   Good short-area quickness to make plays at the line of scrimmage.   Durable.
Short, squatty build with little room for additional mass.   Bit of a one-trick pony.   Relies on his natural leverage advantage to hold up against the run.   Marginal upper-body strength and hand quickness to break free of blocks.   Lacks the consistent initial burst off the snap to operate as a three-technique or the bulk to hold up against double-teams.   Marginal lateral quickness to pressure the pocket.   Needs an open lane to close.   Lacks the height and long arms to bat down passes.   Suspended for the opening game of the 2007 season due to an undisclosed violation of team rules.
-------------------------
Mark_Sanchez 79858 5
--NAME-- started just one season at Southern Cal, but etched his name in the school record books alongside Carson Palmer and Matt Leinhart, other blue-chip passers who came into their own during Pete Carroll's tenure as the team's head coach. 
The junior hopes that NFL teams will overlook his inexperience and regard him in the same class as other former Trojans quarterbacks.
--NAME-- started 16 games and completed 64.27% of his passes at Southern California. His 313 pass completions rank ninth in school history and 3,998 yards in total offense rank 12th. He registered 41 touchdown passes in only 27 games, including at least two scoring tosses in 13 of those contests (including seven games with at least three scores, four with four TDs and one with five). He totaled at least 200 passing yards nine times in 2008.
--NAME-- received excellent tutoring as the heralded quarterback at Mission Viejo High School, where his coach was Bob Johnson, the father of former USC and NFL quarterback Rob Johnson. He was named 2004 Parade All-American Player of the Year, Super Prep All-American Player of the Year, EA Sports All-American first-team, Super Prep Elite 50, Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team, Student Sports Top 100, Rivals 100, Prep Star All-American, Tom Lemming All-American and Scout.com All-American first-team as a senior.
--NAME-- also added Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West first-team, Tacoma News Tribune Western 100, Orange County Register Fab 15 first-team, Gatorade California Player of the Year, Cal-Hi Sports All-State first team, All-CIF Southern Section, All-CIF Division II Co-Offensive Player of the Year and Los Angeles Times All-Star honors. The Los Angeles Times All-Orange County Back of the Year was also named Orange County Register All-Orange County.
The All-South Coast League Co-Offensive MVP completed 151-of-245 (61.6%) passes for 2,441 yards with 24 touchdowns and four interceptions in 2004, despite sitting out the equivalent of four games (eight halves), because Mission Viejo was winning handily on the way to capturing the CIF Division II championship. He would finish his career with a 27-1 record as a starter.
As a junior in 2003, he made the Cal-Hi Sports All-State Underclass second-team, All-CIF Division II, Orange County Register All-Orange County first-team and All-South Coast League first-team. That year, he connected on 161-of-211 passes (76.3%) for 2,460 yards with 29 touchdowns and seven interceptions. He also ran for 90 yards and caught a touchdown pass in 2003. In one game, he was 12-of-12 for 326 yards and four scores. 
--NAME-- also played basketball and baseball at Mission Viejo. He spent his freshman and sophomore years at Santa Margarita High in Rancho Santa Margarita, where his first varsity pass as a 2002 sophomore went 55 yards for the game-winning touchdown.
--NAME-- enrolled at Southern California in 2005, redshirting as a freshman. He won the Service Team Offensive Player of the Year Award. In 2006, he took over starting chores for an injured John David Booty throughout the preseason, but was relegated to six games of reserve action once the schedule began. He was limited to 3-of-7 passes for 63 yards and one interception, but drew praise from Booty, who stated, "--NAME-- is going to have an awesome career at USC. I promise you, --NAME-- is going to do well at USC. Waiting a while to play is not necessarily a bad thing."
--NAME-- served as the second-string quarterback in 2007. He appeared in eight games, including replacing an injured Booty in the Arizona, Notre Dame and Oregon clashes. He went on to gain 695 yards with seven touchdowns and five interceptions, completing 69-of-114 attempts (60.53%), proving that he has the high-caliber arm to attract pro interest.
--NAME-- worked hard during the 2008 offseason, beating out highly regarded Arkansas transfer Mitch Mustain for the starting job. He suffered a dislocated left knee cap prior to the season opener, affecting his mobility, but proved to be capable of handling the team's high-powered offense. 
He was a finalist for the Manning Award (nation's top passer) and semifinalist for both the Davey O'Brien Award and Maxwell Award (nation's top player). He led the Pac-10 Conference in total offense (247.92 yards per game) and passing efficiency (164.64), with 34 touchdown passes ranking second among quarterbacks (Matt Leinart had 38 in 2003) during the Pete Carroll era. 
--NAME-- generated 3,207 yards with 10 interceptions on 241-of-366 attempts (65.85%), adding three more scores on the ground. --NAME-- surprised everyone, including family and his head coach, when he announced that he would forgo his senior season and enter the 2009 NFL Draft. Carroll tried to convince his quarterback that another year of college experience would help him in the pro game, but --NAME-- said he had carefully weighed all the considerations before deciding to leave.  
Heisman Trophy winners Carson Palmer and Matt Leinart, along with John David Booty, all returned for their final year of eligibility with the Trojans. Palmer was the first overall pick in the 2002 NFL draft and Leinart was selected 10th in 2005. Carroll, who said he considers --NAME-- as talented as any of those three, discussed the pros and cons with him. "We've talked at great depth and great length. We've covered this from A to Z   going until late last night," Carroll said. "We don't see this decision the same. (But) I'm thrilled for --NAME--. For any of our kids to live the dream and do what they want to do with their football career, this is a great place to do this."
2007: Sat out the season opener vs. Idaho (9/01) after he suffered right thumb fracture in fall camp.
2008: --NAME-- was carted off the field during fall camp (8/08) shortly after the start practice with a left knee cap dislocation. --NAME--, who won the starting job in the spring, fell to the ground before the Trojans began stretching exercises. Witnesses reported seeing him doing a carioca shuffle. He then went to throw a football, put weight on his left knee and collapsed. --NAME-- was helped to the trainers' table, where ice was administered and his jersey and shoulder pads were removed. He was then carted to the locker room and was then taken for x-rays. An MRI revealed the damage. The injury was called a clean dislocation, with no complications (no ligament, cartilage or bone damage). The knee was immobilized through the weekend. "They put (the knee) back in (on the field)," said head coach Pete Carroll. "There are no other complications. He's real encouraged and the doctors are, too. It will be immobilized over the weekend, then he'll start rehab on Monday. It's day-to-day and we'll see how it responds."
Attended Mission Viejo (Cal.) High School as a junior and senior, playing for head coach Bob Johnson, father of former USC and NFL quarterback, Rob Johnson Named 2004 Parade All-American Player of the Year, Super Prep All-American Player of the Year, EA Sports All-American first-team, Super Prep Elite 50, Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team, Student Sports Top 100, Rivals 100, Prep Star All-American, Tom Lemming All-American and Scout.com All-American first-team as a senior Added Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West first-team, Tacoma News Tribune Western 100, Orange County Register Fab 15 first-team, Gatorade California Player of the Year, Cal-Hi Sports All-State first team, All-CIF Southern Section, All-CIF Division II Co-Offensive Player of the Year and  Los Angeles Times All-Star honors The Los Angeles Times All-Orange County Back of the Year was also named Orange County Register All-Orange County The All-South Coast League Co-Offensive MVP completed 151-of-245 (61.6%) passes for 2,441 yards with 24 touchdowns and four interceptions in 2004, despite sitting out the equivalent of four games (eight halves), because Mission Viejo was winning handily on the way to capturing the CIF Division II championship Would finish his career with a 27-1 record as a starter As a junior in 2003, he made the Cal-Hi Sports All-State Underclass second-team, All-CIF Division II, Orange County Register All-Orange County first-team and All-South Coast League first-team That year, he connected on 161-of-211 passes (76.3%) for 2,460 yards with 29 touchdowns and seven interceptions. He also ran for 90 yards and caught a touch-down pass in 2003 In one game, he was 12-of-12 for 326 yards and four scores Also played basketball and baseball at Mission Viejo Spent his freshman and sophomore years at Santa Margarita High in Rancho Santa Margarita, where his first varsity pass as a 2002 sophomore went 55 yards for the game-winning touchdown.
Ascending talent whose intangibles for the position are just as impressive as his physical tools. Cerebral player. Reads defenses well and rarely throws into coverage. Goes through his progressions quickly and takes what the defense gives him. Recognizes the blitz very well for a player of his experience and often targets the weak link on defense when blitzed. Good setup and a smooth over-the-top delivery. Legitimate NFL arm strength. Capable of making every NFL throw, including the deep ball. Rather than relying on pure arm strength as some of the other highly touted passers of the 2009 class do, however, --NAME-- combines good velocity with rare anticipation, especially for a player of his limited experience. Consistently releases his passes before his receivers have made a break, giving the defense little time to react. Distributes the ball all over the field. Good short, medium, and long-range accuracy. Consistently places his passes where only his receiver can get it and throws a very catchable ball. When healthy, showed very surprising mobility for his size. Can evade the pass rush and will scramble if the defense gives free yards. Rare accuracy on the rollout. Squares his shoulders and can fire the ball with consistency and accuracy. Team captain. Blue-collar work ethic. Father, Nick --NAME--, is a fire captain in Orange Country, Calif.
Only one season as the full-time starter and leaves USC with just 16 career starts. Career record of 4-2 outside of the state of California. Undeniable tools, but isn't yet a finished product. Runs a bit hot and cold and has a tendency to score touchdowns in bunches. Characterized by those close to the program as a very cerebral player who makes the right read, but many of his touchdown passes went to receivers with five or more yards of separation between the next closest defender, opening up some questions if USC's dominant athletes and the team's aggressive play-calling helped inflate his stock. Injury red flag: Suffered a dislocated left knee cap prior to the season opener and his mobility was limited at times.
TRENT EDWARDS, Buffalo -- --NAME--, just beginning to come into his own after he was groomed in a pro-style offense since his prep days, might lack the game experience or incredible arm strength of Matthew Stafford, he does show a lot of moxie on the field, along with good patience and excellent timing and touch. He needs to be in a strong vertical attack, as he's best throwing downfield and does a great job of anticipating his receivers before they come out of their breaks.
-------------------------
Matthew_Stafford 79860 1
Considered the most NFL-ready quarterback in the 2009 draft, --NAME-- has been the unquestioned leader of the Bulldogs offense since taking over the starting signal-caller duties as a freshman. In 34 starting assignments, the junior compiled a 27-7 record (.794) at Georgia. He would close out his collegiate career ranking third on the school's all-time record list for yards passing (7,731), pass attempts (987), completed passes (564), touchdown passes (51), touchdowns responsible for (57), and yards in total offense (7,944). 
Blessed with top arm strength, --NAME-- has a compact and quick delivery that allows him to get the ball off on time. He is the classic drop-back passer who gets proper depth and shows good footwork dropping back from center to efficiently scan the field and locate his open target.
--NAME-- was a standout at Highland Park High School. The Parade, Super Prep and USA Today All-American was rated as the best prep passer in the country by Rivals.com and ranked second nationally by both Scout.com and ESPN. He added Prep Star Top 100 honors and that recruiting service ranked him third in the country at his position.
--NAME-- was a three-time All-State selection, adding Gatorade Player of the Year, EA Sports National Player of the Year and Dallas Morning News Area Offensive Player of the Year accolades as a senior. He received a five-star prospect rating from both Scout.com and Rivals.com, in addition to being chosen Class AAAA Player of the Year by Dave Campbell's Texas Football and Class AAAA "Mr. Texas Football" recognition from TexasFootball.com. 
--NAME-- threw for 4,018 yards on 209-of-322 passing and 38 touchdowns, as he led his team to the Class AAAA championship, its first title since 1957. He also rushed for 212 yards and eight touchdowns on 42 carries. In the first round of the 2005 state playoffs, he rallied his team from a 17-0 deficit to win 38-31 with 411 yards passing and four touchdowns. He was named the Most Outstanding Player of the Tom Landry Classic, a Student Sports All-American and All-District choice.
During his junior year, --NAME-- threw for 1,748 yards and 18 touchdowns, and was named to the Rivals.com Junior All-American Team. As a sophomore, he had 2,945 yards and 36 touchdown passes. Upon graduation, he was invited to play in the U.S. Army All-American Game and to the EA Sports Elite 11 Camp for the nation's top quarterbacks.
--NAME-- graduated from high school early and enrolled at Georgia in time to compete in 2005 spring drills. That extra time with the varsity saw the true freshman earn eight starting assignments, becoming the first Bulldog since Eric Zeier since 1991 to come out of high school and start for Georgia.
The Freshman All-Southeastern Conference choice compiled a 6-2 record in those contests. He was named the Offensive MVP of the Chick-fil-A Bowl, going on to gain 1,749 yards with seven touchdowns and thirteen interceptions, as he completed 135-of-256 passes (52.7%). He also scored three times on the ground, finishing with an average of 149.23 yards per game in total offense.
--NAME-- produced an 11-2 record in 13 starts during the 2007 season. His 84-yard touchdown vs. Florida was the longest pass completion in the SEC that year. He hit on 194-of-348 tosses (55.75%) for 2,523 yards, 19 touchdowns and 10 interceptions. He also scored on a pair of option runs.
--NAME-- was named a finalist for Manning Award and a semifinalist for the Davey O'Brien Award, both given to the nation's top passer. The second-team All-Southeastern Conference choice led the Bulldogs to a 10-3 record. He set school season-records for touchdown passes (25), yards gained per offensive play (8.27 yards per play) and yards in total offense (3,499). His 3,459 yards passing rank second on Georgia's annual record books, as his 235-of-383 passes placed him fourth on the school lists.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Highland Park (Dallas, Tex.) High School, playing football for head coach Randy Allen Parade, Super Prep and USA Today All-American selection Rated as the best prep passer in the country by Rivals.com and ranked second nationally by both Scout.com and ESPN Added Prep Star Top 100 honors, as that recruiting service ranked him third in the country at his position Three-time All-State selection, adding Gatorade Player of the Year, EA Sports National Player of the Year and Dallas Morning News Area Offensive Player of the Year accolades as a senior Received a five-star prospect rating from both Scout.com and Rivals.com Chosen Class AAAA Player of the Year by Dave Campbell's Texas Football Named Class AAAA "Mr. Texas Football" from TexasFootball.com As a senior, --NAME-- threw for 4,018 yards on 209 of 322 passing and 38 touchdowns, as he led his team to the Class AAAA championship, its first title since 1957 Also rushed for 212 yards and eight touchdowns on 42 carries In the first round of the 2005 state playoffs, he rallied his team from a 17-0 deficit to win 38-31 with 411 yards passing and four touchdowns Named the Most Outstanding Player of the Tom Landry Classic Student Sports All-American and All-District choice after his final season Upon graduation, he was invited to play in the U.S. Army All-American Game and to the EA Sports Elite 11 Camp for the nation's top quarterbacks During his junior year, --NAME-- threw for 1,748 yards and 18 touchdowns, as he was named to the Rivals.com Junior All-American Team As a sophomore, he had 2,945 yards and 36 touchdown passes.
A bit shorter than preferred, but has excellent bulk and strength for the position. Durable performer who never missed a collegiate game due to injury, despite a leaky offensive line. Efficient footwork and depth on his drop from center. Quick to scan the field and go through his progressions. Elite arm-strength. Can make any NFL pass, including flicking the ball 50 yards with defenders draped over his lower body. Consistently very good-to-excellent accuracy to all levels of the field. Consistently places the deep out on the far shoulder of his receiver, away from the defender. Consistently places the comeback route low and away. Good deep accuracy and trajectory. Lofts the ball high enough to allow his receiver to run under it. Aggressive, but has developed into a smarter passer over his career and will take what the defense gives him by dropping to his second and third options. Learning to look off defenders. Underrated core strength. Can complete passes with defenders draped over him. Keeps his eyes downfield and will step up in the pocket and is willing to take a hit to complete the pass. Surprisingly nimble in the pocket and can avoid the rush. Underrated straight-line speed and will take what the defense gives. Good intangibles. Has shown considerable improvement over his three seasons as a starter and takes the team's and his own success very seriously. Very competitive. Team captain. Undefeated in bowl games.
Can get fundamentally lazy. Though he has an efficient overall release, should be able to speed it up for underneath screens passes to take better advantage of the surprise to the defense. Sloppy footwork at times and will get lazy and throw off his back foot. Willing to throw into tight spots, though more often than not he places the ball where it needs to be. Good, but not great accuracy on crossing routes. Too often leads his receivers too far or forces them to reach back, slowing their momentum and limiting their ability to generate yardage after the catch. Lacks the straight-line speed to be a true scrambling threat. Often stays too high on quarterback sneaks. Needs to get lower and show more leg drive in these situations.
JAY CUTLER, Denver -- --NAME-- displays excellent arm strength. He is nimble moving around for a player his size, but is best throwing from the pocket than on the move. He could have used another year to work on improving his accuracy on underneath and crossing patterns and will never be a threat with his feet. Can be overconfident in his superb arm strength, but he can make all the throws and when he steps up in the pocket, a team that loves the vertical passing game could find the kind of success that Atlanta and Baltimore experienced with rookie quarterbacks in 2008.
-------------------------
Darius_Butler 79897 41
Regarded as the premier cornerback in the Big East Conference, --NAME-- added a new wrinkle to his game that would make New England Patriots fans clamoring for him to be their next Troy Brown. Always willing to help the team in any way he can, --NAME-- was highly productive wearing two hats last season, seeing action as a receiver in addition to taking over kickoff return duties full-time.
A late-season knee injury prevented --NAME-- from playing in the team's final three regular-season games, but he made a remarkable recovery to get back on the field for the Music City Bowl. During his absence lost two of those three contests, proving just how valuable his leadership and versatility were to the Huskies.
In 45 games at Connecticut, he finished eighth on the school's career record list with 10 interceptions, but he made the most out of those pass thefts, returning them for a total of 213 yards, the third-highest yardage in Connecticut annals. Two of those interceptions went for touchdowns, tying another school all-time mark. 
Even though he was the team's full-time kickoff returner for just 2008, --NAME-- filled in at that position from time to time his first three years, finishing with 895 return yards, the 10th-best total in school annals. He is also the first player in Big East Conference history to produce a touchdown on a kickoff return, interception, reception and rushing attempt in a career. In his last two seasons as a starting left cornerback, no opposing receiver was able to catch a touchdown pass or record more than two first downs in any game vs. him.
--NAME-- also comes from a family with solid National Football League pedigree. His uncle, Gene Atkins, was a standout defensive back who played in the NFL from 1987-96 with the New Orleans Saints and Miami Dolphins. His cousin, Baltimore Ravens running back Willis McGahee, was a first-round draft choice by the Buffalo Bills after earning All-American status at the University of Miami in 2002.
At little known Coral Springs Charter High School, --NAME-- was the big man on campus, as he would become their first student-athlete to ever sign a national letter of intent to attend a major college. He was listed amongst the top 20 recruits in talent-rich Broward County by the Miami Herald, despite not playing football until his junior year.
--NAME-- received All-County honors from both the Herald and the South Florida Sun-Sentinel and was an honorable mention All-State selection. Playing quarterback in an option offense, he both rushed and passed for more than 1,000 yards in 2003 while also starting at safety on defense. He totaled 2,491 total yards as a senior and was responsible for 25 touchdowns.
--NAME-- finished third in Broward County in rushing yards in 2003 and was second in completions, attempts and passing yards. The team captain was also selected for the Dade-Broward All-Star Game. He also excelled in basketball, adding All-County honors as he scored more than 1,000 career points.
--NAME-- spent the 2004 season as the premier player on Connecticut's scout team. In 2006, he was the only defensive player to start every game, earning Freshman All-American honors from The NFL Draft Report after gaining 140 yards with a touchdown on four pass thefts, as he also deflected eight other throws.  He recorded 36 tackles (24 solos) and averaged 33.8 yards on 10 kickoff returns, becoming the first player in school history to return a kickoff and interception for a touchdown in the same season.
In 2006, --NAME-- started 10 games, missing the Syracuse clash with a sore hamstring. He added another four interceptions to go with seven pass break-ups. He also delivered 50 tackles (36 solos), ranking sixth on the team, and produced two stops for loss.
--NAME-- was named team captain as a junior in 2007. The All-Big East Conference choice collected 54 tackles (37 solos) with 2.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He broke up seven passes and intercepted two others, returning one for a touchdown. He caught the attention of pro scouts, who were in attendance at the Louisville game to review the Cardinals' Harry Douglas. Assigned to cover the receiver, --NAME-- held him to a career-low 19 yards receiving, as he knocked two passes out of Douglas' hands and picked off another.
A member of The NFL Draft Report's All-American Dream Team, --NAME-- picked up All-Big East Conference first-team honors in 2008. In 10 games, the two-time team captain posted 40 tackles (28 solos), including three stops for loss. He did not have any interceptions for the first time in his career, but broke up four throws and averaged 23.5 yards on 20 kickoff returns. On offense, he caught nine passes for 123 yards (13.7 avg) with a touchdown and scored again on a pair of rushing attempts.
2006: Sat out the Syracuse game (11/18) with a sore hamstring.
2007: Left the Pittsburgh game after he was flipped and landed on his head during an onside kick (9/22).
2008: Missed the second half vs. West Virginia (11/01) and the Syracuse (11/15), South Florida (11/23) and Pittsburgh (12/06) games with a knee sprain.
Attended Coral Springs (Fla.) Charter High School Listed amongst the top 20 recruits in talent-rich Broward County by the Miami Herald, despite not playing football until his junior year Received All-County honors from both the Herald and the South Florida Sun-Sentinel and was an honorable mention All-State selection Playing quarterback in an option offense, he both rushed and passed for more than 1,000 yards in 2003 while also starting at safety on defense Totaled 2,491 total yards as a senior and was responsible for 25 touchdowns Finished third in Broward County in rushing yards in 2003 and was second in completions, attempts and passing yards The team captain was also selected for the Dade-Broward All-Star Game Excelled in basketball, adding All-County honors as he scored over 1,000 career points.
Adequate height for the position.   Versatile athlete capable of playing in various defensive schemes.   Instinctive.   Good recognition in zone.   Legitimate cover corner athleticism.   Very good straight-line speed.   Loose hips to turn and run with receivers.   Shows a late burst to close.   Excellent vertical, can get into position for jump balls and make a play on the ball.   When playing off, he can shadow his man on slants and over the middle.   Good hands for the interception.   Played receiver at times as a senior to take advantage of his playmaking ability.   Get hiss shoulder on the ball to force fumbles.   Closes quickly and wraps up to prevent gains after catch.   Gets into the pile to assist in tackles.   Holds up blocks to force quick screens inside.   Has the straight-line speed and hands to be an effective kick returner.   Proved his health with a strong week of practice at the Senior Bowl.
Very lanky with thin hips.   Not particularly strong on the line or able to get off blocks.   Bit of a duck-and-swipe tackler.   Does not always play to timed speed, as quicker receivers can get separation downfield.   Can get pushed off easily by bigger, stronger receivers.   Allows too much cushion in off man coverage.   Missed the final two regular-season games in 2008 with a knee sprain.
ROY GREEN, ex. St. Louis Cardinals -- Long before there was a Troy Brown (New England), there was Green, a speedy defensive back who also excelled as a receiver and return specialist. --NAME-- is more Roy Green than Brown, as he not only has outstanding speed, but polished zone coverage ability. He is an instinctive player with the footwork, agility and field smarts to quickly close on the ball. In a perfect world, he ends up in New England playing for a team on which versatile players are encouraged to show off their athletic talent.
-------------------------
Jairus_Byrd 79899 42
--NAME-- is just the seventh Oregon player since 1997 to leave early for the National Football League. However, he has a good mentor and role model to help him adjust to life as a professional football player in his father, Gill --NAME--. Gill was a 1983 first-round draft pick out of San Jose State who was a two-time Pro Bowl selection while playing cornerback for the San Diego Chargers (1983-92).
His father then went on to join the coaching ranks, serving as the secondary coach for the St. Louis Rams (2003-05) before joining the Chicago Bears staff as a defensive quality control coach in 2006. --NAME-- can also listen to advice from his older brother, Gill Jr., who was a defensive back at New Mexico State (2004-06).
Besides those strong bloodlines, the younger --NAME-- made a nice reputation for himself in just three seasons playing for the Ducks. An outstanding coverage cornerback with the soft, natural hands his father displayed during his playing days, --NAME-- ranks fourth in school history with 53 pass deflections, including 22 as a sophomore, the second-highest season total in Oregon annals. He also placed second all-time in Ducks lore with 17 interceptions.
At Clayton High School, to merely hint that the Missouri 4A Offensive Player of the Year played a large role in leading the Greyhounds to the 2004 state championship would be a gross understatement. He willed the school to a 13-1 ledger as a quarterback, safety, wide receiver and on special teams to aid the march to the Suburban East Conference title.
--NAME-- ranked fourth in the state in scoring (158 points), as he rushed for 1,480 yards (seventh in the state) while averaging 8.76 yards per carry and scoring 26 touchdowns his senior season. In addition, he passed for another 1,038 yards (65-128) and 13 scores. 
On defense, --NAME-- was afforded first-team All-State accolades as his team's second-leading tackler, posting 71 stops (60 solos) along with seven interceptions (fifth in the state), three sacks and two fumble recoveries. He completed his "total package" with six catches for 125 yards (20.8 avg), 10 kickoff returns (30.1 avg), 15 returned punts (13.3 avg), in addition to punting the football 18 times for a 37.6-yard clip.
--NAME-- spent the 2005 season honing his defensive skills on Oregon's scout team. He was named to the program's Lou Casanova Award (top newcomer) and selected Pac-10 Conference co-Freshman Player of the Year in 2006, starting 11 games at left cornerback. The Freshman All-American adding All-Pac 10 honorable mention, as he ranked sixth on the team with 56 tackles (40 solos). He paced the Ducks with five pass thefts and broke up 12 other throws.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- was again selected All-Pac 10 Conference honorable mention. The left cornerback delivered 64 tackles (43 solos), along with four stops for loss. His 22 pass deflections rank second on the school single-season record list. He led the league and ranked ninth in the nation with seven interceptions, the sixth highest total in school history. His total of 29 passes defended ranked third in the NCAA ranks. He also filled in at times as a punt returner, averaging 9.0 yards on seven chances.
--NAME-- elevated his game in 2008. The All-Pac 10 Conference first-team choice recorded a career-high 83 tackles (60 solos). He ranked third in the league with five interceptions and with his punt return average of 12.31 yards, as he had 26 attempts that included one return for a touchdown. He led the team with 19 pass breakups, finishing second in the Pac-10 and third in the nation with 26 total passes defended.
2009: Suffered a right groin strain at the NFL Combine and could not participate in pro day activities (3/12).
Attended Clayton (Mo.) High School, playing football for head coach Mike Musick Named the Missouri 4A Offensive Player of the Year Played a large role in leading the Greyhounds to the 2004 state championship, as the team compiled a 13-1 record Competed as a quarterback, safety, wide receiver and on special teams to aid the march to the Suburban East Conference title Ranked fourth in the state in scoring (158 points), as he rushed for 1,480 yards (seventh in the state) while averaging 8.76 yards per carry and scoring 26 touchdowns his senior season In addition, he passed for another 1,038 yards (65-128) and 13 scores On defense, --NAME-- was afforded first-team All-State honors as his team's second-leading tackler, posting 71 stops (60 solos), seven interceptions (fifth in the state), three sacks and two fumble recoveries Came up with six catches for 125 yards (20.8 avg), 10 kickoff returns (30.1 avg), 15 returned punts (13.3 avg), in addition to punting the football 18 times for a 37.6-yard clip.
Well-built athlete.   Good initial jam at the line of scrimmage.   Loose hips to turn and run with the receiver.   Can shadow the receiver due to very good lateral quickness and the ability to plant and go out of his cuts.   Late explosive burst to close on the ball.   Gets his hands on a lot of passes.   Natural playmaker with soft hands for the interception.   Times leaps well and can snatch the ball out of the air.   Good body control to make the catch outside of his frame.   Natural with the ball in his hands.   Good feel for the return.   Good vision to set up blocks.   Good agility and has a quick burst to accelerate.   Reliable open-field tackler.   Breaks down in space well and wraps his arms securely.   Willing to come up in run support.   Good bloodlines.   Father, Gill --NAME--, was a two-time Pro Bowl cornerback with San Diego and recently served as Chicago Bears' DB coach.
More quick than he is fast.   May lack the straight-line speed for a traditional man-to-man scheme.   Can be grabby in coverage, likely to lead to pass interference penalties in the NFL.   Reliable open-field tackler, but isn't an intimidating hitter.   Assisted by an aggressive pass rush and a veteran secondary at Oregon.
-------------------------
Vontae_Davis 79901 25
With tight end Vernon --NAME-- the sixth overall selection by San Francisco in 2006, his younger brother, --NAME--, could be joining him shortly as a first-round pick. That means 2009 could mark the first time the two brothers will compete vs. each other in an organized football game.
The Fighting Illini cornerback was the cornerstone for Illinois returning to the postseason in his sophomore year. Much like Ohio State's Malcolm Jenkins, --NAME-- is one of the most physical pass defenders in the collegiate game. A little more of a gambler than Jenkins, --NAME-- has been known for coming up for the spectacular play in crunch time situations.
In 36 games at Illinois, --NAME-- was responsible for the opposition turning the ball over 12 times and has also delivered 13.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage. Unlike most cornerbacks, the Illini junior has provided the team with a dominant force vs. the running game, as six of his seven stops for loss in 2008 came inside the red zone. Of his 78 tackles that season, 23 came on third-down plays, with two others on fourth-down action.
At powerhouse Dunbar High School, --NAME-- was a Prep Star All-American and Washington D.C. Gatorade Player of the Year. He was named to the Washington Post All-Metro team, in addition to picking up DCIAA West first-team All-Conference honors. He was rated the top recruit in the Washington D.C. area by Rivals.com, and received a three-star recruit ranking by Rivals.com and Scout.com.
--NAME-- had eight interceptions and 38 solo tackles as a senior. He also added 25 receptions for 612 yards and recorded more than 1,000 all-purpose yards in 2005. He led Dunbar High to a 9-2 record and defeated Coolidge in the Turkey Bowl, the DCIAA city championship game.
The third-fastest defensive back at the State College NIKE camp, --NAME-- chose Illinois over Maryland, Michigan State and Virginia. He was a consensus Freshman All-American first-team pick in 2006, adding All-Big Ten Conference honorable mention and team Rookie of the Year honors. In his first collegiate season, he started all but the Ohio State contest at strong-side cornerback. He ranked sixth on the squad with 52 tackles (30 solos), as he picked off one pass and deflected six others.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- was named All-Big Ten Conference first-team. He was the only sophomore selected a semifinalist for the Jim Thorpe Award, given to the nation's top defensive back. He started 12 games at right cornerback, missing the Northwestern clash and three quarters of the Ohio State contest after suffering a concussion. He still managed to finish fourth on the team with 76 tackles (56 solos) that included four stops for loss. He deflected eight passes and intercepted four others. On special teams, he averaged 29.0 yards on four kickoff returns and blocked two punts, returning one for a touchdown.
--NAME-- was a Playboy All-American selection in 2008, adding All-Big Ten Conference first-team honors, as he was again a Thorpe Award semifinalist. He started 11 games, coming off the bench vs. Iowa, as he placed second on the squad with 78 tackles (53 solos) and seven stops behind the line of scrimmage. He caused three fumbles and recovered another while breaking up eight passes to go with a pair of interceptions. He also averaged 19.8 yards on five kickoff returns.
2007: Suffered a concussion in the first quarter vs. Ohio State (11/10), missing the rest of that game and the following week vs. Northwestern (11/17).
Attended Dunbar (Washington, D.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Craig Jefferies Prep Star All-American and Washington D.C. Gatorade Player of the Year Was named to the Washington Post All-Metro team, in addition to picking up DCIAA West first-team All-Conference honors Rated the top recruit in the Washington D.C. area by Rivals.com, and received a three-star recruit ranking by Rivals.com and Scout.com Had eight interceptions and 38 solo tackles as a senior Added 25 receptions for 612 yards and recorded more than 1,000 all-purpose yards in 2005 Led Dunbar High to a 9-2 record and defeated Coolidge in the Turkey Bowl, the DCIAA city championship game.
Rare combination of size and pure athleticism. Chiseled frame. Excellent straight-line speed. Loose hips to turn and run. Instinctive defender who recognizes the action when playing off-man or zone and closes downhill. Rare aggression in run support. Physical tackler with legitimate explosive hitting ability. Can separate the ball from the ball-carrier. Times his blitzes well and can close when the opportunity presents itself. Good special teams performer with punt and kick return experience. Blocked two kicks in 2007. May boast unmatched upside at this position.
Not a natural playmaker. Inconsistent hands for the interception. Doesn't fight through blocks with the physicality in which he comes up to tackle. Best in off-man and zone coverage where he can watch the action, plant and drive to the ball. Faster in shorts than on the field. Peeks back at the quarterback and savvy route-runners can beat him with double moves. Was benched in 2008 by coach Ron Zook, creating questions about his work ethic. Concerns that --NAME--, like his brother, Vernon --NAME--, may lack the drive to turn his unique athleticism into NFL success.
RON BARTELL, St. Louis -- --NAME-- packs a good punch as a tackler, but plays out of control. He is a bit of a riverboat gambler and is eager to attack the ball, but he shows good hands and timing to disrupt the pass before the receiver can settle under it. He needs to play with better control and based on the average year he had in 2008, he could have used another year in school to improve his draft stock, which has been sliding a bit ever since his standout freshman season. But, once he matures, he could rank with the league's elite.
-------------------------
Coye_Francies 79903 191
A standout at the East-West Shrine Game and Senior Bowl, --NAME--' long, lean frame and pure athleticism make him arguably the most underrated cornerback in the draft. An All-American at American River (Calif.) College who intercepted 11 passes in 2005, --NAME-- transferred to OSU and established himself as one of the top young cornerbacks (three starts, one INT, four forced fumbles) and kick returners (22.4-yard average) in the conference. --NAME-- later transferred to San Jose State, where after sitting out a year due to the NCAA imposed transfer rules, he started as a senior and promptly earned second-team All-WAC honors with 69 tackles and three interceptions. Scouts will certainly point out that he has only one full season of D-I experience, but his tools will likely be too much for teams to ignore on draft day.
2005 Mid-Empire Conference Defensive Most Valuable Player at American River JC First-team JC All-American by the California Community College Football Coaches Association  Member of the 2005 Mid-Empire Conference All-Conference team as a return specialist.
Good frame to add additional mass.   Good straight-line speed.   Loose hips to turn and run with receivers.   Good agility.   Can plant and drive out of his cuts.   Good awareness in coverage.   Rarely out of position.   Has a closing burst to the ball.   Long arms and active hands to slap away the pass.   At least adequate hands for the interception.   Good vertical jump and times his leaps well.   Can high-point the ball and catch passes outside of his frame.   Can track the ball over his shoulder.   Active in run support.   Fights around and through blocks and willing to stick his head into the pile.   Willing to lower his shoulder into the ballcarrier.   Can break down in space and make the open-field tackle.   Generally reliable wrap-up technique.   Good speed and vision as a kick returner.   Averaged 22.4 yards per return at Oregon State.   Strong weeks of practice at East-West Shrine Game and Senior Bowl.   Voted a team co-captain and considered a good locker room presence, despite gun charge that led to suspension from Oregon State.
Lighter than scouts would like, especially considering his height. .. Especially thin in the hips and lower legs.   Very physical in coverage, which could lead to penalties at the next level.   Only 15 starts at the D-I level over his career.
-------------------------
Sean_Smith 79905 61
--NAME-- is a converted receiver who developed into one of the best cornerbacks in the nation before leaving school a year early to enter the 2009 NFL Draft. He is still a neophyte at the position, possessing only 12 starts in 39 career games, but he showed superb hands and leaping ability as a ball thief. Even though he started in only 12 games, he led the team in interceptions during the past two seasons. He ranks fifth on the school single-season record list with 151 yards via interception returns in 2008.
--NAME-- originally joined the program as a running back before shifting to the flank during his redshirt season. The coaches looked at his tall frame and decided that he would make an imposing shutdown cornerback, leading to his third position shift during his time in a Utes uniform.
--NAME-- excelled as a running back, receiver and kickoff return specialist at Blair High School. He earned All-conference, All-State and All-American honors as a senior, the same year that he captured league Offensive Back of the Year accolades. That year, he led the team to its best record in 10 seasons, as he rushed for more than 1,500 yards with 18 touchdowns, adding 547 receiving yards and more than 400 yards in kickoff returns.
One of the team's prized recruits in the 2005 class, --NAME-- spent that season on offense, carrying the ball on the scout team. He competed as an inside slot receiver for the first 11 games of the 2006 campaign, coming up with a 12-yard reception and 63 yards on seven carries (9.0 avg). He was shifted the defensive side of the ball for the final two games, coming up with a pair of assisted tackles.
In 2007, --NAME-- appeared in 13 contests as a reserve defensive back, playing the left corner position, where he started nine contests before moving to nickel back late in the year, earning another starting assignment. He posted 32 tackles (20 solos) with a stop behind the line of scrimmage. He also broke up seven passes and led the team with four interceptions. His four pass breakups vs. New Mexico tied the school single-game record.  
As a junior, --NAME-- was named All-American third-team and All-Mountain West Conference first-team. He started all but the Air Force contest (Utes opened with a four-safety alignment), recording 46 tackles (23 solos) that included a sack and two stops for loss. He caused a fumble, broke up nine passes and had five interceptions, returning one for a touchdown. His total of 14 passes defended ranks second in the conference.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Blair (Pasadena, Cal.) High School, where he excelled as a running back, receiver and kickoff return specialist Earned All-conference, All-State and All-American honors as a senior, the same year that he captured league Offensive Back of the Year accolades That year, he led the team to its best record in ten seasons, as he rushed for over 1,500 yards, with 18 touchdowns, adding 547 receiving yards and over 400 yards in kickoff returns.
Good height and great length for a boundary corner. Very quick feet for his size. Runs well with taller receivers down the sideline, but also lines up in the slot. Former receiver has great ball skills and the vertical to go up and get the ball. Able to locate and high-point in coverage. Elusive runner with some vision to flip field position after the interception. Forces fumbles by using his length to get a hand on the ball. Has the size and closing speed to be an effective blitzer. Very quick to support the run or attack quick screens and passes in the flat. Reacts quickly on plays in front of him and finds the ball well in the air.
Might be seen as a corner/safety "tweener." Stiff in the upper body. Does not play with the physicality scouts would like given his size. Is slow to adjust when backpedaling if a receiver cuts his route short or goes to the skinny post. Catch-and-drag tackler whose height is a disadvantage when trying to bring down ballcarriers with a low center of gravity. Inconsistent using his hands at the line of scrimmage. Gets stuck on blocks. Takes poor angles to make tackles in space or when attacking a screen. Just a little more than two years of experience on defense. Cocky and talks trash.
-------------------------
Brian_Cushing 80421 15
The unquestioned leader of one of the premier defenses in college football, --NAME-- is also regarded as one of the finest strong-side outside linebackers in the game. Whether it is blitzing the quarterback, chasing down running backs or dropping back in pass coverage, the chiseled athlete has excelled at whatever task the coaches ask from him. 
His steady performances each week brought back memories of former Trojans standout linebacker Duane Bickett, who went on to star in the NFL for Indianapolis (1985-93), Seattle (1994-95) and Carolina (1996) after being selected in the first round of the 1985 NFL Draft by the Colts.
--NAME-- felt that the 2008 season was his chance to prove to scouts that he was not only capable of being a first-round pick, but also prove that he could stay on the football field. Having missed more than a third of his freshman and junior seasons combined due to a rash of injuries, he underwent a rigorous training and nutritional program before the 2008 campaign. His exploits in the training room eventually earned him the honor of being named the team's Co-Lifter of the Year.
On the field, he received All-American recognition in addition to being named All-Pac 10 Conference first-team in 2008. He was a finalist for the Butkus Award, semifinalist for the Lombardi Award and quarterfinalist for the Lott Trophy. He accomplished all of this despite playing with a cast for close to a month to protect a broken bone in his hand.
--NAME-- earned Parade, USA Today, Prep Football Report, Scout.com, Super Prep, EA Sports and Prep Star All-American honors as a senior at Bergen Catholic High School. He was a member of the USA Today All-USA Team, in addition to receiving Super Prep Elite 50, Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team, Student Sports Top 100, Rivals 100, Super Prep All-Northeast Defensive Player of the Year, Prep Star All-East and All-State Defensive Player of the Year honors.
Despite missing three games with an ankle sprain, --NAME-- recorded 120 tackles, 11 stops for loss, 10 sacks and seven interceptions as a linebacker in 2004. On offense, the running back and tight end gained 475 rushing yards with 10 touchdowns and caught 13 receptions for 456 yards (35.1 avg) with seven scores. He also returned a kickoff for a touchdown.
As a junior, --NAME-- was named Student Sports Junior All-American, All-State first-team and All-Bergen County Defensive Player of the Year. He went on to register 120 tackles, including 22 behind the line of scrimmage, adding nine sacks and seven interceptions.
Despite missing more than half his freshman season with a shoulder dislocation, --NAME-- returned to start four games for Southern California in 2005. He shared strong-side outside linebacker duties with Thomas Williams and also excelled on the special team coverage units. He returned a blocked punt 6 yards, delivered 23 tackles (14 solos), recovered a pair of fumbles and caused another. For that performance, Scout.com placed his named on their Freshman All-American squad (honorable mention).
With the depth on the defensive front wall depleted after four starters graduated, --NAME-- shifted to right defensive end for the 2006 campaign. He underwent a crash course at his new position during fall camp, having missed spring drills due to arthroscopic shoulder surgery. He recorded 57 tackles (27 solos) in his only season on the defensive line, as he ranked tied for second on the squad with 4.5 sacks and paced the Trojans with a career-high 13.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He blocked a punt for the second consecutive year, returning it 21 yards, and also fielded a kickoff that he returned 42 yards for a touchdown. He was named the winner of the team's John McKay Award, given to the player showing the most competitive spirit.
The injury bug resided in --NAME--'s locker in 2007. He missed a portion of spring drills with a hamstring injury, and at the conclusion of camp underwent arthroscopic surgery on his left knee. The All-Pac 10 Conference honorable mention suffered a bone chip and high ankle sprain vs. Idaho in the season opener and two games later, re-injured the ankle in the Washington State clash, missing the next four games. He finished with 25 tackles (14 solos) while starting eight of 10 games he played in at strong-side linebacker.
For the third consecutive spring, --NAME-- was on the sidelines, this time due to arthroscopic ankle surgery. He wore a cast for close to a month after breaking a bone in his hand vs. Oregon State and suffered a shoulder contusion vs. Arizona State, but still started all 13 games at strong-side linebacker in 2008. He was named All-American and All-Pac 10 Conference, as he collected 73 tackles (46 solos), ranking second on the team. He delivered three sacks and led the Trojans with 10.5 stops for losses. He also deflected six passes and picked off another.
2004: Missed three games during his high school senior year with an ankle sprain.
2005: Suffered a shoulder dislocation prior to the Arkansas contest (9/17), sitting out that game and also vs. Oregon (9/24), Arizona State (10/01) Arizona (10/08) and Notre Dame (10/15) Underwent surgery after the season, missing 2006 spring camp.
2007: Missed most of spring drills with a right hamstring strain After spring camp, he underwent arthroscopic left knee surgery Suffered a slight bone fracture and a high ankle sprain vs. Idaho (9/01) Saw limited action the next two games vs. Nebraska (9/15) and Washington State (9/22), but re-injured the ankle vs. WSU, sitting out the next three games vs. Washington (9/29), Stanford (10/06) and Arizona (10/13).
2008: Missed spring drills after undergoing arthroscopic ankle surgery Played with a cast after suffering a broken bone in his hand vs. Oregon State (9/25) Suffered a shoulder contusion vs. Arizona State (10/11).
Attended Bergen Catholic (Oradell, N.J.) High School Earned Parade, USA Today, Prep Football Report, Scout.com, Super Prep, EA Sports and Prep Star All-American honors as a senior Member of the USA Today All-USA Team, in addition to receiving Super Prep Elite 50, Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team, Student Sports Top 100, Rivals 100, Super Prep All-Northeast Defensive Player of the Year, Prep Star All-East and All-State Defensive Player of the Year honors Despite missing three games with an ankle sprain, --NAME-- recorded 120 tackles, 11 stops for loss, 10 sacks and seven interceptions as a linebacker in 2004 On offense, the running back and tight end gained 475 rushing yards with 10 touchdowns and caught 13 receptions for 456 yards (35.1 avg) with seven scores Also returned a kickoff for a touchdown As a junior, --NAME-- was named Student Sports Junior All-American, All-State first-team and All-Bergen County Defensive Player of the Year Registered 120 tackles, including 22 behind the line of scrimmage, adding nine sacks and seven interceptions.
Physical prototype with a combination of excellent size and overall athleticism for the position. Versatile. Signed with USC as a potential strong safety candidate, but has played defensive end, strong-side linebacker and even middle linebacker. Physical and intense. Big hitter who looks to intimidate opponents with his physicality in every phase of the game. Attacks blocks aggressively and flashes not only explosiveness but ferocity as a tackler. Good straight-line speed. Good flexibility to turn and run with tight ends and backs in coverage. Reads the quarterback well and can break on the ball. Productive pass rusher who is equally effective as an end and blitzing linebacker. Immediate standout performer who started for USC as a freshman.
Has struggled with injuries throughout his career -- missing five games due to a shoulder separation in 2005 and three games in 2007 due to a high ankle sprain, as well as undergoing surgery after the 2006 (shoulder) and 2007 (knee) spring practices. Relies on his athletic ability, rather than his upper body strength to defeat blocks too often. Can overrun the play and allow for cutback opportunities. Mistakes often covered up by the surrounding talent at USC.
CHAD GREENWAY, Minnesota -- Like Greenway, --NAME-- is quick to read and react to the play, having a good feel for blocking schemes and the take-off speed to beat offensive tackles upfield. He has enough acceleration to turn the corner, but is best when he slips through the gaps uncontested, as he is quick to fill the inside rush lanes. He stays low in his pads and attacks with good leg drive to neutralize the lead blockers when attempting to fill the run lanes. There are big concerns about his durability, but when healthy he is consistent if not spectacular.
-------------------------
Larry_English 80423 16
--NAME-- is a two-time Vern Smith Leadership Award recipient, given to the Mid-American Conference's top player, as voted on by league coaches. He is just the second defensive player to ever receive that honor, as Central Michigan linebacker Ray Bentley captured the inaugural award in 1982. --NAME-- is also only the fourth player to earn that award twice in a career, joining quarterbacks Brian McClure of Bowling Green (1984-85), Erik White of Bowling Green (1991-92) and Byron Leftwich of Marshall (2001-02).
One of the premier pass rushers in the collegiate game, --NAME-- ranks second to Phillip Hunt of Houston (33.5 sacks for minus 229 yards) among the NCAA's active players with 31.5 sacks for losses totaling 220 yards. His 31.5 sacks set the school all-time record and rank fifth in Mid-American Conference history. That total also ranks seventh in NCAA annals. His five sacks vs. Idaho in 2007 is topped by just two other players on the NCAA single-game record books.
--NAME-- wreaked havoc in the opposing backfields throughout his career. His 63.0 tackles behind the line of scrimmage set the school career record and rank fifth on the NCAA all-time record chart (the NCAA began compiling sack and tackle for loss totals beginning in 2000), as he is just the seventh player in major college annals to register 60 or more tackles for loss since those statistics were recognized by the NCAA.
--NAME-- attended Marmion Military Academy, where the team co-captain and MVP was regarded as one of the most feared players in the Suburban Catholic Conference. The first-team All-SCC, Aurora Beacon-News All-Area, Daily Herald Tri-City All-Area and honorable mention IHSFCA All-State as a senior, he totaled 98 tackles and six sacks from his inside linebacker position and rushed for 312 yards on 38 carries (8.2 avg) as a fullback, despite being hampered early in that season by an ankle sprain that limited him to seven games.
--NAME-- was named team MVP, first-team All-SCC, Aurora Beacon-News All-Area and Daily Herald Tri-City All-Area as a junior. He led the Tri-City area with 100 tackles, and added two interceptions along with two fumble recoveries. In addition to earning three letters in football, he also threw the discus for the track team as a freshman and added three more letters in basketball. The Honor Roll student was selected team captain in basketball. He received All-SCC and All-Area honors as a junior on the hardwood.
--NAME-- turned down a scholarship offer from the University of Iowa, enrolling at Northern Illinois in 2004. He made four tackles vs. Maryland in his collegiate debut, but suffered a shoulder injury that would sideline him for the rest of the season, earning a medical hardship. In 2005, --NAME-- started nine games at right defensive end, moving up from fifth on the depth chart to lead the team's down linemen with 57 tackles (35 solos). The 230-pounder had yet to show his pass rushing prowess, sacking the quarterback just twice, but his eight stops for loss ranked second on the squad.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- garnered All-Mid American Conference first-team honors. He made 51 tackles (32 solos) in 13 games, leading the team and ranking second in the league with a career-high 12 sacks. That total tied the school single-season record that was first set by Scott Kellar in 1984. He also paced the Huskies with 16.0 tackles for loss and caused four fumbles, the most in the MAC for 2006.
The Vern Smith Leadership Award winner and first-team All-MAC pick led the conference with 10.5 sacks in 2007. His 17.0 stops for loss also led the league and ranked 16th in the nation. He produced 67 tackles (29 solos), fourth on the squad, and also recovered a fumble in the end zone for a touchdown. His banner junior campaign came to a crashing halt in the Poinsettia Bowl, as he suffered a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his knee that would require surgery.
The injury bug continued in 2008, as --NAME-- suffered a torn pectoral muscle in spring drills. He played nearly all season with pins in his broken thumb, but he still led the team with eight sacks and 16 stops behind the line of scrimmage, ranking fourth and third, respectively, in each category among MAC players. He was again named the recipient of the Verne Smith Award, finishing his final season with a career-low 37 tackles (26 solos).
2003: Only played in seven games as a high school senior due to an early-season ankle sprain.
2004: Missed the final 11 games after suffering a shoulder injury vs. Maryland.
2007: Suffered a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his knee vs. Texas Christian in the Poinsettia Bowl (12/19), undergoing surgery in early January 2008.
2008: Missed most of spring camp with a torn pectoral muscle Played most of the season with pins inserted in his thumb after breaking his hand in fall camp.
Attended Marmion (Aurora, Ill.) Military Academy The team co-captain and MVP was regarded as one of the most feared players in the Suburban Catholic Conference The first- team All-SCC, Aurora Beacon-News All-Area, Daily Herald Tri-City All-Area, and honorable mention IHSFCA All-State as a senior, he totaled 98 tackles and six sacks from his inside linebacker position and rushed for 312 yards on 38 carries (8.2 avg) as a fullback, despite being hampered early in that season by an ankle sprain that limited him to seven games Named team MVP, first-team All-SCC, Aurora Beacon-News All-Area, and Daily Herald Tri-City All-Area as a junior Led the Tri-City area with 100 tackles, and added two interceptions along with two fumble recoveries In addition to earning three letters in football, he also threw the discus for the track team as a freshman and added three more letters in basketball The Honor Roll student was selected team captain in basketball. He received All-SCC and All-Area honors as a junior on the hardwood Graduated with a 3.4 grade point average.
Solid linebacker build, with more than adequate upper-body strength and legs for the position. Good motor, hustles down or across the field until the play is completed, even if initially blocked. Changes direction in space well. Secure wrap-up tackler when man is in his area. Can use his arms to keep linemen and fullbacks off him when standing up. Stays balanced and upright most times on stretch plays. At times he can bounce off a block using his punch. Has quick, violent hands to stay free. Stays at home on option plays until last possible moment. Able to drop back off the line in zone blitzes and stay with tight ends. Strong week of practice at the Senior Bowl eliminated many of the concerns regarding --NAME--'s level of competition.
Lacks the bulk to play with his hand down in the NFL, which he did in college. Gets engulfed by better left tackles on inside pass rush moves, lacks the strength to bull rush and doesn't quite have the speed to get the corner consistently (but has good closing speed when standing up). Fails to hold his ground when directly out of his stance and can't get off the block quickly enough to get to the ball. Will need to prove he can handle coverage duties against better tight ends and that he has zone awareness. Needs to get lower in his backpedal, as he stands a bit tall.
ANTHONY SPENCER, Dallas -- Some draft experts claim --NAME-- is the next Shawne Merriman, but that's a stretch at this point. As a pass rusher, he shows great tenacity, but that seems to be the only consistent aspect of his game. There are too many contests where he got lost in too much trash talk and isn't much of a factor. As an athlete, you have to be impressed with his power, but one look at his clocked speed makes you be concerned that he won't be able to drop back and handle speedy slot receivers outside the short area.
-------------------------
Percy_Harvin 80425 22
--NAME-- was the consummate dual threat at wide receiver and running back for the Gators, amassing 1,929 receiving yards to go with 1,852 yards on the ground. In just 36 games at Florida, he proved to be a dangerous open-field threat, finding the end zone 32 times. His yards per rush average of 9.55 shattered the previous school career record of 6.4 yards by Elijah Williams (1994-97).
The 2006 Southeastern Conference Freshman of the Year was one of the main reasons Florida captured two national championships during his three seasons at the university. He quickly became the favorite target of 2007 Heisman Trophy QB Tim Tebow, as that tandem hooked up on 19 touchdown passes.
--NAME-- was regarded as the nation's top wide receiver prospect by Scout.com following his four-year career at Landstown High School. He was also listed as the nation's top recruit according to Rivals.com and Scout.com. He earned Parade All-American honors as a senior and was selected to participate in the U.S. Army All-American Game after being named the 2004 National Junior of the Year by Rivals.com.
--NAME-- finished his prep career with 75 catches for 1,313 yards with 14 touchdowns, as he also rushed for 504 yards and 13 additional scores his senior season. He recorded a total of 33 touchdowns during his final campaign. He caught 58 passes for 1,016 yards (17.5 avg) and 17 touchdowns while rushing 68 times for 726 yards (10.7 avg) and 10 touchdowns as a junior, en route to helping lead Landstown to Group AAA state championship. 
Named Offensive Player of the Year in the Beach District and Eastern Region in 2004, --NAME-- returned four punts for touchdowns as a junior. In addition to his exploits on the gridiron, he also served as captain of the basketball and excelled in track. He is the only athlete in Virginia history to claim five gold medals at the state track and field meet.
--NAME-- turned down scholarship offers from Florida State, Miami, Michigan and Southern California to enroll at Florida in 2006. He started five of the 13 games he played in, sitting out the Alabama clash after suffering a left ankle sprain vs. Tennessee. The Freshman All-American gained 427 yards with two scores on 34 receptions (12.6 avg) and ran 41 times for 428 yards (10.4 avg) and three touchdowns, averaging 65.77 all-purpose yards per game.
In 2007, --NAME-- started 10 of the 11 games he appeared in, sitting out vs. South Carolina and Florida Atlantic due to a sinus infection and migraine headaches. He was limited in fall camp by an Achilles tendon strain and left the Mississippi State clash with a hip pointer. Still, he amassed 1,622 all-purpose yards, grabbing 59 passes for 858 yards and four touchdowns. He rushed for 764 yards and six scores on 83 attempts. In the Vanderbilt game, he became the first player in school history to total 100 yards rushing (113) and 100 yards receiving (110) in the same contest.
--NAME-- earned All-American honors as a specialist in 2008. He started 11 games, sitting out the SEC title game due to a right ankle sprain that he suffered during a mid-season contest vs. Arkansas. He had missed spring and fall drills after undergoing April surgery to correct a right heel problem from his high school days. He would manage 644 yards and seven touchdowns on 40 receptions and 660 yards on 70 carries (9.4 avg) that produced 10 more scores.
2006: --NAME-- injured his left ankle midway through the second quarter vs. Tennessee (9/16) after he caught a 14-yard pass to convert a third-down play, but he came up limping. He went to the sideline, where trainers taped the ankle heavily. --NAME-- attempted to run on the sideline later in the second quarter, but he did not return in the first half. He returned briefly in the third quarter but did not touch the ball. The following week, --NAME-- saw just limited action vs. Kentucky (9/23) and then sat out the Alabama clash (9/30), wearing a protective boot to help speed up his recovery from his high ankle sprain. He would not fully recover from this injury until two months later (first injury-free game was vs. Western Carolina on 11/18).
One week after the Western Carolina contest, --NAME-- was carted off the field on a stretcher after taking a hard hit across the middle with 2:51 left in the first half vs. Florida State (11/25). --NAME-- had already scored on a 41-yard touchdown run and gained a career-high 86 yards on four carries before he was forced to miss the game. The decision to cart him off the field turned out to be a precautionary measure. He was taken for tests and returned to the bench after halftime but did not play the second half due to a neck stinger. 
2007: --NAME-- was limited in practice on 8/14 because of Achilles' tendonitis.   --NAME-- suffered a hip pointer vs. Mississippi (9/22) that prevented him from practicing in the week leading up to the Auburn clash (9/29) --NAME-- did not travel to South Carolina for the Gators' game (11/10) and missed close to two weeks of practice because of a sinus infection and migraine headaches, resulting in him also being sidelined vs. Florida Atlantic (11/17).
2008: On March 24, --NAME-- was ordered by team doctors to sit out the rest of spring drills due to lingering heel problems. He was forced to wear a protective boot and was re-evaluated by team doctors, who decided to shut him down for the spring.  On April 7, --NAME-- had heel surgery that was performed by foot specialist Dr. Robert Anderson at the Orthocarolina Orthopedic Clinic in Charlotte, N.C. The Gators hoped the surgery would relieve years of pain in --NAME--'s right heel, which has bothered him off and on since his high school days in Virginia. --NAME-- returned for fall camp, but by late August, he the majority of practice roaming the sidelines and doing conditioning drills. The lingering heel injury would force him to sit out the season opener vs. Hawaii (8/30). The receiver was finally cleared to resume full-speed practices on 9/06.
--NAME-- sprained his right ankle at Arkansas and his foot was placed in a protective boot. --NAME-- left the Florida State (11/29) game when he re-injured his right ankle. He was again forced to wear a protective boot, missing practices leading up to the SEC title game vs. Alabama (12/06), as he did not see action vs. the Tide. Wearing sweat pants and his Number 1 jersey, he clearly favored the right ankle even when he was only trying to walk during the Gators' warm-ups prior to the SEC championship clash. Even so, he said he tried to talk his way into playing. "I came out today and still tried to go," --NAME-- said. "The trainers had to grab me and say this is not good for you." He said he also was told by his teammates that it was not necessary for him to try to play when he wasn't close to full speed. "My teammates said 'We've got you' and I had to believe them."
Hoping to return to action for the BCS title game vs. Oklahoma, --NAME-- was so determined to play in the contest that he decided to remain in Gainesville rather than return home to Virginia during Christmas, putting in extra work with the athletic trainers. "They moved him from the pool to the trampoline," coach Urban Meyer said. "And then, obviously, the next thing will be the ground, hard surface." 
--NAME-- said his sprained ankle was "90 percent" healed -- the result of spending nearly 100 percent of his time in the training room over the holidays. He estimated he was in the training room 15 hours each day with trainer Kyle Johnston -- which would put him in there from about the time he wakes up until he goes to bed. "Our team made jokes about it. They said me and one of the trainers, we're dating each other because of the time we spent with each other," --NAME-- said. That hard rehabilitation process allowed him to return to the field for his final college appearance vs. Oklahoma (1/08/09).
Attended Landstown (Virginia Beach, Va.) High School, where --NAME-- was regarded as the nation's top wide receiver prospect by Scout.com following his four-year career Listed as the nation's top recruit according to Rivals.com and Scout.com Earned Parade All-American honors as a senior and was selected to participate in the U.S. Army All-American Game after being named the 2004 National Junior of the Year by Rivals.com Finished his prep career with 75 catches for 1,313 yards with 14 touchdowns, as he also rushed for 504 yards and 13 additional scores his senior season Recorded a total of 33 touchdowns during his final campaign Caught 58 passes for 1,016 yards (17.5 avg) and 17 touchdowns while rushing 68 times for 726 yards (10.7 avg) and 10 touchdowns as a junior, en route to helping lead Landstown to Group AAA state championship Named Offensive Player of the Year in the Beach District and Eastern Region in 2004, --NAME-- returned four punts for touchdowns as a junior Also served as captain of the basketball team and excelled in track Only athlete in Virginia history to claim five gold medals at the state track and field meet.
Shorter than scouts would like, but has a strong, compact build. Rare straight-line speed. Rare elusiveness. Can make defenders miss in tight quarters. Good vision when running in space. Sets up his blocks well and can cut back against the grain. Good agility as a route-runner. Strong, secure hands for the reception. Courageous going over the middle. Gathers in the pass and quickly moves upfield to maximize production. Can extend outside of his frame to make the spectacular reception. Versatile athlete who can contribute as a receiver, running back and shows great potential as a returner, although he never attempted a kick or punt return at Florida. Has struggled with durability, but is considered a physically tough player.
Looks shorter on film than his listed 5-11. Many of his plays in this offense were slip screens designed to get him the ball quickly and in space. Could struggle acclimating to a more pro-style offense. Lack of success at the NFL level from former receivers from Meyer's offense is troubling. Has struggled with durability. Missed practice time in 2008 with ankle, hip pointer and tendonitis in his knee and heel.
-------------------------
Darrius_Heyward-Bey 80427 7
By far the fastest player in school history, --NAME-- set the Terps record with a 4.23 clocking in the 40-yard dash during 2006 preseason drills. Always known for his blazing speed, he added a new wrinkle to his game the last two seasons, proving to be a dangerous threat on the reverse or when operating out of the backfield as a slot back. 
Even though Maryland struggled at the quarterback position and failed to find another big-play receiver to prevent --NAME-- from receiving the constant double coverage he experienced throughout his career, he left his mark in the school record books in only three seasons. Even though he never returned a kick or punt, his 2,403 all-purpose yards rank 17th in school annals.
--NAME--'s 138 receptions rank third on Maryland's career record chart. His 2,089 yards receiving placed him second in school annals. He also tied for third on the all-time list with 13 touchdown grabs and is tied for sixth with four 100-yard receiving games. The team's third-leading rusher as a junior, he would amass 314 yards with a pair of scores on 25 carries, averaging 12.56 yards per rushing attempt and 14.74 yards on the 163 times he touched the ball. Proving to be the team's money receiver, he generated 228 receiving yards in three bowl appearances.
At McDonogh High School, --NAME-- was a standout in football and track. On the gridiron, he earned three letters, starting in each of his final two seasons at receiver and outside linebacker. The consensus All-State selection added Prep Star and Super Prep All-American honors, as Super Prep rated him the 17th-best receiver in the nation. Tom Lemming of ESPN rated him the prep ranks' 23rd-best receiver. 
--NAME-- received a four-star rating from Rivals.com, as that recruiting service picked him as the fourth-best prospect in the state of Maryland. He added All-Conference and All-Area accolades as a junior and senior. In his final campaign, he had 47 receptions for 821 yards and 10 touchdowns. The previous season, he made 40 catches for 802 yards and 12 scores.
In track, --NAME-- received first-team All-American accolades in the indoor 60 meters. He finished fifth at the nationals as a junior as well winning the MIAA championship in the 100 and 200 meters. He was timed at 4.38 in the 40-yard dash at the Nike combine at the University of Virginia and ran a 6.35 in the 55-meter dash in January 2005. He also posted a 40-inch vertical jump at McDonogh High.
--NAME-- bypassed scholarship offers from Boston College, Alabama, Pittsburgh, Virginia and Michigan State to enroll at Maryland in 2005. After red-shirting that year, he made a huge impact in 2006, starting 10 of 13 games on the way to earning Freshman All-American honors. He led the team with 45 receptions and set the school freshman single-season record with 694 yards receiving (15.4 avg), scoring five times.
Despite constant double coverage, --NAME-- again led the team with 51 receptions for 786 yards (15.4 avg) and three touchdowns as a sophomore. He was an All-Atlantic Coast Conference honorable mention, as he ranked ninth in the league with an average of 60.5 yards per game receiving. He also tallied 107 yards with a score on just five carries (21.4 avg). His 51 catches placed 10th on the school's single-season record list.
--NAME-- was again named All-ACC honorable mention in 2008. The team's continued struggles at quarterback saw the junior receiver be used more often out of the backfield as a runner. For the third consecutive season, he led the Terps with 41 catches for 609 yards (14.5 avg) that included five touchdowns. He carried 13 times, totaling 202 yards with a score, averaging 13.5 yards per rushing attempt and 14.23 yards each time he touched the ball.
After his junior campaign, --NAME-- decided it was time to join the NFL ranks, forgoing his senior season to enter the 2009 draft. "After the bowl game I sat down with my mom, my aunt and coach (Ralph) Friedgen to explore my options and felt like the time is right to take my game to the next level," --NAME-- said. 
"It was a very difficult decision. I love the University of Maryland and everything people have done for me the last four years. Not only the coaches, but also the players and support staff. It was a great experience. I want to thank the student body, the fans and Coach Friedgen for their support and allowing me this opportunity. I look forward to always being a Terp."
2006: Sat out the fourth quarter of the Boston College game (11/18) due to a concussion.
2007: Limited in fall camp by an ankle sprain.
2008: Did not play vs. Boston College (11/29) due to a leg contusion.
Attended McDonogh (Silver Spring, Md.) High School, playing football for head coach Dominic Damico, earning three letters as he started in each of his final two seasons at both receiver and outside linebacker Consensus All-State selection Added Prep Star and Super Prep All-American honors, as Super Prep rated him the 17th-best receiver in the nation. Tom Lemming of ESPN rated him the prep ranks' 23rd-best receiver Received a four-star rating from Rivals.com, as that recruiting service picked him as the fourth-best prospect in the state of Maryland Added All-Conference and All-Area accolades as a junior and senior In his final campaign, he had 47 receptions for 821 yards and 10 touchdowns The previous season, he made 40 catches for 802 yards and 12 scores In track, --NAME-- received first-team All-American accolades in the indoor 60 meters Finished fifth at the nationals as a junior as well winning the MIAA championship in the 100 and 200 meters Timed at 4.38 in the 40-yard dash at the Nike combine at the University of Virginia and ran a 6.35 in the 55-meter dash in January, 2005 Also posted a 40-inch vertical jump at McDonogh High.
Exceptional straight-line speed. Opponents must account for his deep speed on every play. Too fast off the snap for most defenders to challenge him in press coverage. Long, lean athlete with long arms and strong hands. Has the agility to make plays in space. Reads the field and can follow his blocks to generate yards after the catch. Can snatch the ball out of the air. Learning to better use his height as an advantage. Good leaping ability and has become more consistent in timing his leaps.
Bit of a one trick pony at this time. Might be the draft's most dangerous vertical threat, but offers little else. Long-legged and struggles to generate consistent separation out of his cuts. Not as consistently effective on jump balls as he should be, considering his natural size advantage. Too often double-clutches the ball. Questionable toughness running across the middle. Lacks strength and consistent effort as a downfield blocker.
-------------------------
Jeremy_Maclin 80429 19
In just two seasons at Missouri, --NAME-- established himself as one of college football's most dangerous offensive threats. Whether lining up in the slot, at split end, flanker or coming out of the backfield, the talented sophomore's vision and superb quickness forced the defense to account for him on every play.
In addition to his exploits as the team's clutch receiver and third-down specialist (22 of his 55 first-down catches in 2008 came on third-down snaps), --NAME-- also provided Tiger fans with the opportunity of seeing one of the most explosive kickoff and punt returners in the collegiate game. He would go on to be the only player in school history to score on a reception, a rushing attempt, a punt return and kickoff return. 
All told, --NAME-- found the end zone a total of 32 times in 28 contests. He is just the third player in NCAA history to average more than 200 all-purpose yards per game during a career (202.36 ypg). His 2,776 all-purpose yards in 2007 set a major college single-season record for freshmen. The following season, he became the sixth player in NCAA annals to amass more than 2,800 all-purpose yards in a season (2,833).
--NAME--'s 1,346 yards in total kick returns in 2007 was two yards shy of the NCAA single-season record. He joined Derek Abney of Kentucky (2000-03) as the only major college players to ever gain more than 2,000 yards receiving and more than 2,000 yards in kickoff returns during a career, with --NAME-- accomplishing that feat in only two seasons.
--NAME--'s average of 73.18 yards per game gained on kickoff returns is the best since Steve Odom of Utah set the NCAA record (78.24 ypg, 1971-73). In addition to that kickoff return average, the multi-talented athlete averaged 82.68 yards per game receiving, 20.61 yards on punt returns and 23.86 yards rushing during his time with the Tigers.
At Kirkwood High School, --NAME-- was an outstanding two-sport athlete who was considered the top wide receiver and one of the top overall prospects to come out of the state of Missouri in 2006. The star receiver, safety and punt returner was ranked as the nation's 24th-best wide receiver prospect by Rivals.com and was listed as the third-best overall prospect in Missouri by the same outlet.
He earned first-team All-State honors as a receiver in 2005, after catching 41 passes for 1,042 yards and 11 touchdowns, averaging an impressive 25.4 yards per catch. He also carried the ball 36 times for 293 yards and four scores, adding two more touchdowns throwing the ball. He proved to be a dangerous return man, as he took 11 punts back for an average of 24.6 yards per return, with one going for a touchdown. 
On defense, --NAME-- was named All-Conference as a safety, as he notched 55 tackles and added four interceptions, including one that he returned for a score. As a junior, he earned first-team All-State honors, as he caught 58 passes for 1,184 yards and 18 touchdowns, while rushing for two scores and also returning one kickoff for a touchdown. He also added 59 tackles and six interceptions. --NAME-- was a second-team All-Conference pick as a sophomore, catching 33 passes for 356 yards and four touchdowns, as he also averaged 25 yards per punt return and 30 yards per kickoff return that year.
--NAME-- was also a standout on the hardwood, as he averaged 11.2 points, 4.1 assists and 2.5 steals per game for Kirkwood's basketball team. He was an honorable-mention All-State and first-team All-Conference guard as a junior, averaging 13.3 points, 5.2 assists and 4.1 steals per game.
After red-shirting in 2006 at Missouri, --NAME-- burst onto the scene in 2007, becoming the first freshman in school history to earn All-American first-team honors. He set the NCAA freshman single-season record with 2,776 all-purpose yards, scoring a total of 16 times on 199 touches. 
He was second on the squad with 80 receptions for 1,055 yards (13.2 avg) and nine scores, adding 375 yards and four touchdowns on 51 carries (7.4 avg), two more scores with a 12.3-yard average on 25 punt returns and averaged 24.2 yards on 43 kickoff returns, including another touchdown.
In 2008, --NAME-- continued his assault on the school, Big 12 Conference and NCAA record books. The All-American first-team choice was a finalist for the Biletnikoff Award, given to the nation's top receiver. He became the sixth player in league history to catch more than 100 passes (102) in a season, gaining 1,260 yards (12.4 avg) with 13 touchdowns. 
--NAME-- was second on the team with 293 yards and two scores on 40 carries (7.3 avg) and tallied 270 yards on 23 punt returns (11.7 avg) that included another score. With his 99-yard kickoff return for a touchdown, he became the first Big 12 player to score on a kickoff return, punt return, rushing attempt and reception in more than one season. He would also become only the second major college player to gain more than 1,000 kickoff return yards (1,010) in back-to-back seasons.
2006: --NAME-- tore the anterior cruciate ligament in his right knee before the start of fall camp in late July. He also sprained another in his right knee during 7-on-7 play and underwent surgery that sidelined him for six months, receiving a medical hardship.
2007: --NAME-- left the Texas Tech game (10/20) after suffering a shoulder contusion.  
2008: --NAME-- was carted into the locker room to have a twisted left ankle examined in the fourth quarter vs. Illinois (8/30). He began treatment the following day after undergoing a precautionary MRI, as the results were negative. The injury was officially diagnosed as a strained peroneal tendon.   --NAME-- suffered a bruised knee when he collided with teammate Brian Coulter on a second-quarter punt return vs. Texas. He still managed to catch eight passes for 120 yards after the injury but said he had trouble running at full stride. He was limited in practices leading up to the Tigers' next game vs. Colorado --NAME-- suffered a hip pointer vs. Kansas (11/29), but continued to play in that game.
2009: --NAME--, running a deep fade pattern during the NFL scouting combine (2/22), tried to adjust to an under-thrown pass by quarterback Jason Boltus of Hartwick and tumbled to the turf at Lucas Oil Stadium. He didn't get up for several minutes and had to be assisted off the field. He suffered a hyper-extended left knee, but the most pain came from the right hip on which he landed. After received treatment while sitting on a table, he returned to the pass receiving drills and hauled in a pass on a deep down-and-out pattern. But he still walked gingerly back to his group of receivers.
Attended Kirkwood (Mo.) High School, playing football for head coach Larry Frost Considered the top wide receiver, and one of the top overall prospects to come out of the state of Missouri in 2006 The star receiver, safety and punt returner was ranked as the nation's 24th-best wide receiver prospect by Rivals.com and was listed as the third-best overall prospect in Missouri by the same outlet Earned first-team All-State honors as a receiver in 2005, after catching 41 passes for 1,042 yards and 11 touchdowns, averaging 25.4 yards per catch Also carried the ball 36 times for 293 yards and four scores, adding two more touchdowns throwing the ball Proved to be a dangerous return man, as he took 11 punts back for an average of 24.6 yards per return, with one going for a touchdown On defense, --NAME-- was named All-Conference as a safety, as he notched 55 tackles and added four interceptions, including one that he returned for a score As a junior, he earned first-team All-State honors, as he caught 58 passes for 1,184 yards and 18 touchdowns, while rushing for two scores and also returning one kickoff for a touchdown Added 59 tackles and six interceptions Second-team All-Conference pick as a sophomore, catching 33 passes for 356 yards and four touchdowns, as he also averaged 25 yards per punt return and 30 yards per kickoff return that year Standout on the hardwood, as he averaged 11.2 points, 4.1 assists and 2.5 steals per game for Kirkwood's basketball team Honorable-mention All-State and first-team All-Conference guard as a junior, averaging 13.3 points, 5.2 assists and 4.1 steals per game.
Tight-skinned athlete. Good overall musculature. Explosive straight-line speed and quickness out of his breaks. Agile. Can make defenders miss in tight quarters. Natural playmaker who is a threat to score - from any distance - on every snap. Versatile athlete who can make plays in the running, receiving or return games. Natural pass catcher. Good body control to contort in space and make the spectacular reception. High-points passes and is an explosive leaper. High effort player. Courageous over the middle. Blocks downfield. Showed mental toughness in returning after a horrific knee injury in 2006.
Still developing as a route-runner. Relies on his athletic ability at this point, and doesn't explode out of his cuts as well as he could. Will takes his eyes off the ball, on occasion, to prepare to make the defender miss, and drop the ball. Production inflated due to his role and the presence of other playmakers in this offense.
-------------------------
Clay_Matthews 80431 26
With two family members having not only played, but excelled at Southern California, you would think that with a name like --NAME-- III that he would have been one of the team's elite recruits. However, 160-pound high school players do not have Pete Carroll knocking on their door, no matter what his last name is. Still, after joining the team as a walk-on, putting in three years as a reserve and a special teams player, --NAME-- wrote a terrific final chapter to his college career that could end in April with him joining his father and uncle as USC first-round selections.
When the --NAME-- family gets together during the holidays, that gathering is filled with athletes. It all begins with --NAME--'s grandfather, --NAME-- Sr., who was on the football, wrestling and swimming teams at Georgia Tech in the 1940s and then played in the NFL with the San Francisco 49ers in the 1950s. --NAME--'s father, --NAME-- Jr., was a four-year (1974-77) linebacker at USC who played on the Trojans' 1974 national championship team and earned All-American honors in 1977. He went on to play with the NFL's Cleveland Browns and Atlanta Falcons from 1978-96.
--NAME--'s uncle, Bruce, was a three-year (1980-82) letterman offensive guard at USC who earned All-American honors in 1982 and then played with the NFL's Houston Oilers/Tennessee Titans from 1983-2001. --NAME--'s older brother, Kyle, lettered at safety on USC's 2003 national championship team. Another brother, Casey, is a sophomore linebacker at Oregon. His cousin, Ashley Nick, is a senior on the USC women's soccer team that captured the 2007 NCAA championship. 
--NAME-- prepped at Agoura High School. His dramatic rise as a pro prospect would be one of this draft's more compelling stories, even without his bloodlines. Lightly recruited as a high school junior, he walked on to USC rather than take a scholarship to a smaller program.  "He was 160 pounds as a junior in high school," his father, --NAME-- Jr., said. "His senior year, he just got taller and bigger. But you're recruited your junior year. I was thinking he wasn't going to be able to play football, and I was fine with that." 
The freshman linebacker was relegated to duties on the scout team at Southern California in 2004. As a red-shirt freshman, he played mostly on special teams in 2005, seeing action in all but the Hawaii contest (missed that game with an elbow sprain). He managed to record eight tackles (4 solos) to earn his first varsity letter.
Now measuring in at 230 pounds, --NAME-- earned a scholarship during 2006 fall camp. He served as a reserve strong-side outside linebacker behind Dallas Sartz, but made his reputation when he was named Co-Special Teams Player of the Year. He was also a second-team Academic All-Pac 10 Conference pick. In 13 games, he delivered 15 tackles (9 solos) with a 7-yard sack.
--NAME-- was again the key backup at both outside linebacker positions and captured the team's Co-Special Teams Player of the Year Award for the second consecutive season in 2007. He played in all 13 games, blocking two kicks while posting 17 tackles (15 solos) with three stops for loss. He also caused two fumbles, both coming vs. Illinois in the Rose Bowl.
An intense weight training program during the 2008 offseason was tempered by surgery performed on his hand, but he still ended up receiving Co-Lifter of the Year honors. The now 240-pounder opened the 2008 campaign as a reserve, but took over right defensive end duties for the final 10 contests. The All-American honorable mention and All-Pac 10 Conference second-team choice was named the team's Co-Special Teams Player of the Year for the third consecutive season. He ranked fourth on the team with 56 tackles (28 solos), blocked another kick and had 4.5 sacks to go with nine stops for losses.
2005: Did not play vs. Hawaii (9/03) due to a sprained elbow.
2008: Underwent hand surgery prior to the beginning of spring drills.
Prepped at Agoura (Cal.) High School as a linebacker, but was not recruited by the major colleges "He was 160 pounds as a junior in high school," his father, --NAME-- Jr., said. "His senior year, he just got taller and bigger. But you're recruited your junior year. I was thinking he wasn't going to be able to play football, and I was fine with that."
Ascending player who may be just scratching the surface of his potential. Well-built athlete whose dedication in the weight-room is obvious in his physique. Reliable open-field tackler. Versatile defender who flashes as a natural pass rusher off the edge. Good speed upfield and has the balance and burst to redirect his rush. Good initial hand punch to pop the blocker and disengage. Good effort and speed in pursuit. Instinctive defender who played well in space as a traditional linebacker. Excellent special teams player. Twice named co-special teams player of the year (2005, 2006). Excellent bloodlines. Father, --NAME--, played 19 seasons at linebacker and made the Pro Bowl four times. Uncle, Bruce, made the Pro Bowl 14 times and was inducted into the Hall of Fame in 2007. Grandfather, also named --NAME--, played for the 49ers in the 1950s. Pac-10 Academic All-American with a 3.06 GPA in international relations.
Has less than a full season as a starter and only 10 career starts -- all in 2008. Surrounded by so much talent at USC that holes in his game could have been disguised. Lacks the bulk to remain at defensive end. Prefers to run around blocks rather than take them on. While he improved as the year went on, remains a work in progress in disengaging from blocks. Suffered broken left thumb against Nebraska, then fractured a metacarpal later in season, then had to have surgery after the bowl game as it did not heal properly.
MARCUS WASHINGTON, ex-Washington -- --NAME-- knows how to use his quickness to slip past and avoid blocks in order to get to the ball and clog the inside rush lanes. He has the balance and body control to run clean and take proper angles to the ball when working in space. He is a solid wrap-up tackler with enough power to drag ball carriers down. He is not big enough to prevent NFL linemen from engulfing him as a defensive end, but as a linebacker he could develop into a solid blitzer. He has the hand strength to get a decent push off the ball and works hard to play off blocks to get to the quarterback. When working off the edge, he can surprise a lethargic offensive lineman with his ability to explode past the opponent and has more than enough speed to close, making him a nice fit for strong-side linebacker.
-------------------------
Aaron_Maybin 80433 11
Listed second on the depth chart behind Maurice Evans at left defensive end, --NAME-- was thrust into the starting lineup the third game of his junior season. Coaches were looking to spark a unit hit by graduation, suspensions and injuries and felt that the youngster would be given an audition to see if he could ignite the pass rush.
And spark the defense he did. 
--NAME-- became the 93rd Penn State player to earn All-American first-team honors, the 76th athlete from the Joe Paterno era to receive that honor. The legendary coach has seen at least one of his players earn All-American accolades in 38 of his 43 seasons as head coach.
--NAME-- finished the 2008 season leading the Big Ten Conference and ranking seventh in the nation with 12 quarterback sacks. That total tied for fifth-best on the school single-season list. His 20 stops behind the line of scrimmage rank as the sixth-highest season total by a Nittany Lion. The left end also registered at least one tackle for loss in all 13 games in which he played.
Many Penn State fans thought they were seeing the rise of their team's next great defensive presence. But the 230-pounder felt that after just one season as a starter and two campaigns with the varsity, that he was ready to test his wares in the NFL.
Becoming a force to be reckoned with is not something new for --NAME--. At Mount Hebron High School, he earned 2005 Baltimore Sun All-Metro team, second-team big school All-State and first-team All-Howard County accolades. As a junior, he produced 79 tackles with nine sacks, followed by ten sacks and 80 tackles in his final season. 
During his first collegiate season, he redshirted, performing on the scout team at Penn State in 2006. He saw action in 13 games in '07 as a reserve defensive end. He managed only 12 tackles (eight solo), but four of them were quarterback sacks, as he also caused one fumble and deflected a third-down pass.
The 2008 season opened with --NAME-- playing with the second unit. He took over left end duties vs. Syracuse, going on to start ten of the team's next 11 contests. He had at least one tackle behind the line of scrimmage in every game in which he played. The All-Big Ten Conference choice and Ted Hendricks Award finalist also registered at least one sack in 10 games, caused three fumbles and ranked sixth on the team with 49 tackles.
No injuries reported.
Attended Mount Hebron (Ellicott City, Md.) High School, playing football for head coach Larry Luthe Earned 2005 Baltimore Sun All-Metro team, second-team big school All-State and first-team All-Howard County accolades As a junior, he produced 79 tackles with nine sacks, followed by 10 sacks and 80 tackles in his final season Participated in drama programs and did volunteer work.
Tall with a frame to add a needed 10-15 pounds of muscle in his upper body. Superior quickness off the snap on wide rushes. Combines speed and length to challenge offensive tackles in passing situations. Very good straight-line speed to chase plays down the line or hustle downfield. Keeps cut blocks off his knees, recovers and maintains balance. Great length and vertical to affect passing lanes. Dropped into zone coverage often, got into his zone in a hurry when decisive. Breaks down in space and can change direction in the backfield to handle cutbacks and misdirection. Improving his hand usage as a pass rusher.
A bit thin in the hips and might not grow into a defensive end build. Does not always use his length to get off offensive tackle or tight end blocks. Lacks the strength to bull rush. Runs stiff and upright, looks much better straight-ahead than laterally. Doesn't turn the corner as fast as you'd like because of his inflexible lower body. Needs more pass-rush moves. Always runs straight up the field, allowing tackles to direct him around the pocket. Demoted to backup status during the week of the Rose Bowl for undisclosed reasons.
PARYS HARALSON, San Francisco -- --NAME-- could eventually develop into another Chad Brown (Colorado; Pittsburgh Steelers) at the next level, but the NFL's love for pass rushers, rather than looking at the "complete" picture has spelled doom and gloom for a lot of teams taking "tweeners" early in the draft. Undersized defensive ends often fail to adjust to life as outside linebackers. Could --NAME-- be the next flash in the pan? If used strictly as an edge rusher, he brings good value, but that is not why teams pay a hefty price to ink a first-round pick.
-------------------------
Alphonso_Smith 80435 37
--NAME-- is just the third player this century to amass 20 or more interceptions in a career, joining Jim Leonhard of Wisconsin (21, 2001-04) and Mitch Meeuwsen of Oregon State (20, 2001-04), and only the second in Atlantic Coast Conference annals to reach that lofty mark (Dre' Bly of North Carolina had 20, 1996-98). Only nine other players in the history of college football (all levels) have produced more interceptions in a career than --NAME--.
What makes --NAME-- even more valuable at his position is his ability to make big plays in the backfield. Few cornerbacks, much less ones that stand just 5-feet-9 can boast having nine sacks, 23.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage and eight forced fumbles on those hits during a career. He also adds to his resume as a capable kickoff returner, averaging 20.7 yards for his career, along with using his superb leaping ability and timing to block five kicks during his time at Wake Forest.
--NAME-- was a standout player at quarterback and defensive back during his days at Pahokee High School, where he was the runner-up for state Player of the Year honors as a senior. He helped the Blue Devils to a 13-1 record and the Class 2B state championship, earning MVP honors in the state title game, throwing a 58-yard touchdown strike to current Deacon teammate Demir Boldin in that contest.
As a quarterback, --NAME-- threw for 2,400 yards and 32 touchdowns and also rushed for 640 yards and six scores in 2003. He was responsible for 38 touchdowns as a senior, including scores on interception, punt, kickoff and fumble returns. He added 27 tackles, a sack and four interceptions as a cornerback, earning first-team All-State honors. He also played in the Outback Bowl and the Palm Beach All-Star Game. In addition to football, he was a starter on the basketball team.
--NAME-- came to Wake Forest with high school teammates D.J. Boldin and Antonio Wilson, spending the 2004 season performing on the scout team. He made an immediate impact during 2005 spring camp, emerging as the team's starting left cornerback. He would earn consensus Freshman All-American and All-Atlantic Coast Conference honors that season. He placed fourth on the team with 60 tackles (52 solos), adding two sacks and eight stops for loss, along with a forced fumble. He picked off three passes, deflected nine throws and blocked a pair of kicks.
--NAME-- started the first three games at left cornerback before coming off the bench for the rest of the 2006 campaign. He posted 48 tackles (37 solos) and led the ACC cornerbacks with four sacks and 8.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage. He batted down eight passes and had another three interceptions. He also returned a blocked punt for a touchdown.
In 2007, --NAME-- garnered national recognition with his first All-American award. The All-ACC first-team pick ranked tied for second in the nation with eight interceptions, as he returned three of them for touchdowns, one shy of the NCAA single-season record. He added 44 tackles with three sacks and led the conference with four forced fumbles. He also had 10 pass deflections and blocked a kick for the third consecutive season.
In his own version of the game show, "Can You Top This," --NAME-- did so as a senior. The consensus All-American tied for third in the nation with seven interceptions in 2008, adding a team-high thirteen pass deflections. He averaged 22.0 yards as a kickoff returner, blocked a kick and caused two fumbles. He was credited with 37 tackles (28 solos) while starting all 13 games while shuttling between free safety and left cornerback.
No injuries reported.
Attended Pahokee (Fla.) High School, playing football for head coach Leroy Foster  Standout at quarterback and defensive back Runner-up for state Player of the Year honors as a senior Helped the Blue Devils to a 13-1 record and the Class 2B state championship, earning MVP honors in the state title game, throwing a 58-yard touchdown strike to Deacon teammate Demir Boldin in that contest As a quarterback, --NAME-- threw for 2,400 yards and 32 touchdowns and also rushed for 640 yards and six scores in 2003 Responsible for 38 touchdowns as a senior, including scores on interception, punt, kickoff and fumble returns Added 27 tackles, a sack and four interceptions as a cornerback, earning first-team All-State honors. He also played in the Outback Bowl and the Palm Beach All-Star Game In addition to football, he was a starter on the basketball team.
Excellent ball skills, closing on the ball quickly and watching it into his hands. Can adjust to ball over his shoulder. Able to return interceptions for significant yardage. Very good speed to stay with receivers down the sideline, along with fluid hips and excellent quickness to handle short-area responsibilities. Reads the quarterback well, and can undercut throws to make a play. Very confident on an island, and won't back down even if giving up size to his opponent. Able to get position on receivers in order to cut off routes. Not shy about contact, and will attempt to wrap tackle in the open or cut if needed. Can close down the sideline on outside runs. Tries to strip the ball when part of a gang tackle. Got touches as a receiver on quick screens, and could be a return option.
Short with only an adequate build and strength. Gives up several inches in height to outside receivers who can take advantage of him in jump balls down the sideline and red-zone situations. Can get vertical quickly, but isn't strong enough to out-fight bigger receivers for the ball. Struggles to get off decent receiver run blocks in space. Not a great one-on-one open-field tackler. Best as a zone corner or in the slot, as he may have problems jamming physical receivers at the line of scrimmage.
DRE' BLY, ex-Denver -- --NAME-- is an extraordinary pass thief with great timing and recovery speed. He plays taller than his size indicates, but is not strong enough to challenge more physical receivers, especially in press coverage. He is best suited to be a zone corner or operate in the slot in man coverage as he will get soft on you if bounced around by bigger blockers.
-------------------------
Asher_Allen 80626 86
The two-year starter at strong-side cornerback decided to forgo his final year of eligibility to test his wares in the National Football League. He closed out his Bulldogs career as one of the elite kickoff return specialists in school history despite handling the duty for just two years.
--NAME--'s 47 kickoff returns for 1,110 yards rank third on the Georgia career record list, as his average of 23.6 yards per attempt placed him fourth in school history. Those totals were aided by his 28 returns for 690 yards in 2007, both setting new Bulldogs season marks.
At Tucker High School, --NAME-- excelled in football, basketball and track. On the football field, he earned Atlanta Journal-Constitution Super 11 and Super Southern 100 honors. He was a member of the Fox Sports Net All-South third-team, Super Prep All-American and Prep Star Top 200 squads. He was rated the ninth-best cornerback in the country by Rivals.com.
--NAME-- earned Coaches Choice All-State honors as a junior punt/kick returner, as he had seven punt returns and two kickoffs for touchdowns. On offense, the receiver had 36 receptions for 432 yards and five touchdowns as a junior and almost 500 yards and six rushing scores. As a cornerback, he recorded six interceptions, 46 solo tackles and 20 assists as a junior.
--NAME-- enrolled at Georgia in January, 2006, competing during spring drills. He was named the team's Defensive Newcomer of the Year, seeing action in 13 contests behind Paul Oliver (San Diego) at weak-side cornerback. He posted 24 tackles (20 solos) on defense and also handled return duties. He averaged 22.1 yards on 19 kickoff returns and 13.5 yards on four punt returns.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- started the team's final 11 games at strong-side cornerback, recording a career-high 64 tackles (50 solos) with a pair of sacks and a fumble recovery. He had his only interceptions (three) during his time with the Bulldogs and broke up four other throws. He tied the school single-season record with 28 kickoff returns and broke another annual mark by gaining 690 yards on those runbacks.
--NAME-- started all 13 games at strong-side cornerback in 2008. The Jim Thorpe Award semifinalist played in the last five contests with a right hand fracture, wearing a cast that prevented him from getting too many interception opportunities and not handle the bulk of the kickoff return chores like he did in the past. He still managed to record 53 tackles (44 solos), adding 4.5 stops for loss while deflecting seven throws.
Partially due to his injury, --NAME-- decided to leave Georgia after the season, joining fellow underclassmen quarterback Matthew Stafford and running back Knowshon Moreno in declaring for the 2009 NFL Draft. "--NAME-- has been a great part of our football team as well as our overall athletic program over the past three years," head coach Mark Richt said. "We will certainly miss him, however, we wish him the very best in the NFL Draft and with his professional football aspirations in the future."
"This was the hardest decision of my life because of my love and respect for Georgia and everyone who is affiliated with Georgia, including the fans, my teammates, my coaches, the academic staff and everyone else," --NAME-- said. "I have been chasing this dream of playing in the NFL and after making this decision with my family, I feel like I am ready for this next step. But I owe everyone the world who has helped me out during my time at Georgia."
2006: Handled punt return chores for the first three games, until he suffered a big toe sprain vs. Alabama-Birmingham (9/16).
2008: Suffered a right hand fracture when his hand hit an opponent's helmet during the second series of the Louisiana State game (10/25) and wore a cast to protect the injury during the team's final five contests.
Attended Tucker (Ga.) High School, playing football for head coach Bill Ballard Earned Atlanta Journal-Constitution Super 11 and Super Southern 100 honors Member of the Fox Sports Net All-South third-team, Super Prep All-American and Prep Star Top 200 squads Rated the ninth-best cornerback in the country by Rivals.com Earned Coaches Choice All-State honors as a junior punt/kick returner, as he had seven punt returns and two kickoffs for touchdowns On offense, the receiver had 36 receptions for 432 yards and five touchdowns as a junior and almost 500 yards and six rushing scores As a cornerback, he recorded six interceptions, 46 solo tackles and 20 assists as a junior  Also lettered in basketball and track.
Shorter than scouts would prefer, but has a good build. Good straight-line speed. Legitimate cover skills. Loose hips to turn and run with receivers. Accelerates smoothly. Cuts smoothly and generates burst to close quickly out of his cuts. Should be able to handle the nickel role early due to his agility. Secure open-field tackler who flashes some pop, considering his size. Natural kickoff returner. Sees the field well and can accelerate through the pack. Mentally tough. Responded to the challenge of playing on an island as a sophomore in the SEC and looked like he belonged immediately. Isn't a finished product.
Lacks prototype height to play on the outside. Aggressive and will bite on the double-move. Lacks the elite recovery speed if beaten initially. Responds to the challenge of bigger receivers, but loses out too often on jump-balls. Has obvious athletic ability, but hasn't yet "arrived." Allows too many passes into his chest and will drop easy interceptions. Broken hand requires a Combine check.
-------------------------
Kevin_Barnes 80628 80
Known as the Atlantic Coast Conference's hardest-hitting tackler, --NAME-- became a YouTube sensation after that service began showing the vicious hit he delivered on California's Jahvid Best early last season that caused the running back to "lose his lunch" from the bone-jarring tackle. But making sensational tackles had become a normal thing for the Terrapin defender. "That's probably the hardest hit I've ever taken in my life," Best said at the time. "It really knocked the wind out of me, and I had a little trouble breathing for the rest of the game."
During 2008 spring camp, --NAME-- stopped running back Morgan Green (who outweighed him by 30 pounds) in his tracks during an intra-squad game, leaving his teammate being carried off the field. However, it was another violent collision that would bring his college career to an end. In the team's seventh game of 2008, he clobbered Wake Forest receiver D.J. Boldin as both were going for the pass, resulting in the Terps defensive back suffering a torn labrum, fractured left scapula, broken collarbone and rotator cuff damage.
While an injury of that caliber would result in a long recovery period, --NAME-- proved at the NFL Combine that he was more than ready to compete in the agility tests. He had gone to great lengths to make sure he's completely healthy. Since graduating in December, he began working out at the Athletes' Performance Institute in Tempe, Arizona, along with Maryland teammate Darrius Heyward-Bey. "My primary thing was to rehab my shoulder," said --NAME--. "I'm pretty much 99 percent right now." 
"You'd never know he was injured," Heyward-Bey said. "At first, he couldn't do a lot of the (weightlifting) stuff. But other than that, he's been right in the mix." --NAME-- understands the NFL evaluation process well enough to know that there are other questions about him. He has the reputation as being a strong coverage corner who might struggle to make tackles on running plays in the NFL. "Most of the time (at Maryland) I was a coverage guy," he said. "They want to see how physical I am."
That issue might seem moot to those who watched him during his career at Maryland. Over the years, --NAME-- has delivered some memorable blows despite hit lack of bulk. As far as Maryland coach Ralph Friedgen is concerned, --NAME--' abilities are beyond question. 
"If he's healthy," Friedgen said, "He has a chance to be drafted pretty good."
--NAME-- was a two-year starter during his three-year football career at Old Mill high School. 
The cornerback and wide receiver was named Big School All-State by the Associated Press, All-Metro first-team by the Baltimore Sun and honorable mention All-Metro by The Washington Post. He was a Mid-Atlantic All-Region pick by Super Prep and All-Region selection by Prep Star. He added second-team Big School All-State (AP), honorable mention All-Met (Baltimore Sun) and All-County accolades as a junior.
--NAME-- posted 62 tackles (32 solos), three interceptions, three pass deflections and a fumble recovery as a senior. He also had 17 receptions for 435 yards and three touchdowns in 2003, as well as one rushing touchdown. He produced nine interceptions and 129 tackles in his two years as a starter. 
--NAME-- also posted 10 receptions for 222 yards and four touchdowns as a junior. In addition to football, he competed in track and basketball. He captured the state Class 4A high jump with a leap of 6'6" in his first year competing as a junior.
An early commitment who was also recruited by Virginia and Duke, --NAME-- was named the Terps' Defensive Scout Team Player of the Week twice in 2004. He played mostly on special teams in 10 games during the 2005 campaign, as the reserve "field" cornerback posted four solo tackles and broke up one pass.
He shifted to "boundary" cornerback in 2006, appearing in 13 games, starting in place of Josh Wilson vs. Florida International. He went on to register 11 tackles (9 solos). --NAME-- took over strong-side cornerback duties in 2007, starting all 13 games. He received All-Atlantic Coast Conference recognition after producing a career-high 65 tackles (47 solos) with 5.5 stops for loss, as 15 of his hits came on third-down snaps. He broke up nine passes and intercepted four others.
--NAME-- was named to the Terrapin Council (team's leadership committee) in 2008, as the preseason All-ACC choice was having a solid campaign. Through the team's first seven games, he allowed just 10 receptions by his main pass coverage assignment. He made 20 tackles (15 solos), caused two fumbles and also blocked a kick. He batted away five throws and came up with a pair of interceptions.
2008-Missed the final six games after suffering a left shoulder fractured collarbone, torn labrum and rotator cuff damage vs. Wake Forest (10/18).
Attended Old Mill (Glen Burnia, Mary.) High School, playing football for head coach Mike Marcus Two-year starter during his three-year football career The cornerback and wide receiver was named Big School All-State by the Associated Press, All-Metro first-team by the Baltimore Sun and honorable mention All-Metro by The Washington Post Mid-Atlantic All-Region pick by Super Prep and All-Region selection by Prep Star Added second-team Big School All-State (AP), honorable mention All-Met (Baltimore Sun) and All-County accolades as a junior Posted 62 tackles (32 solos), three interceptions, three pass deflections and a fumble recovery as a senior Also had 17 receptions for 435 yards and three touchdowns in 2003, as well as one rushing touchdown Added nine interceptions and 129 tackles in his two years as a starter Collected 10 receptions for 222 yards and four touchdowns as a junior Also competed in track and basketball Captured the state Class 4A high jump with a leap of 6'6" in his first year competing as a junior.
Good height.   Long arms which he uses well to shield the receiver from the ball.   Natural hands for the interception.   Good straight-line speed.   Good leaping ability.   Cognizant zone defender who can close on the ball.   Generally a reliable open-field tackler.   Flashes big-hitting ability.
Very thin in the hips.   Struggles with large, physical receivers on the line or in run support because he doesn't use his long arms to his full advantage.   Throws his body around, but misses too many tackles in the open field by putting his head down and failing to wrap.   Gets hands on the receiver but doesn't knock them off their routes.   Lacks great awareness on misdirection.   Plays on the outside on special teams coverage and blocking units, but is not consistently physical enough to make big hits or keep gunners from getting to return men.   Not as fast on the field as he is in workouts.   Has a hitch in his turn and has to gather a bit in changing direction.   Broken shoulder blade that required surgery.
-------------------------
Cody_Brown 80632 63
The three-year starter at right defensive end, --NAME--'s blitzing skills and range dropping back in pass coverage could see him shift to outside linebacker in the National Football League. Huskies coach Randy Edsall felt --NAME-- responded remarkably to his tough love approach, emerging as one of the elite pass rushers in the collegiate game.
As a senior, --NAME-- discovered what consistency can do. "He's played very, very well," Edsall said. "He's played up to the level of my expectations now." 
It is rare for Edsall to say one of his Huskies is playing up to expectations. In the past, he has only said such things about the likes of linebacker Alfred Fincher and quarterback Dan Orlovsky. Part of that is simple coaching philosophy, a desire to ride the best players to get the best out of them. --NAME-- produced his best season in 2008, so Edsall could drop some plaudits on him. It would almost be impossible not to do so. His coach also noted that --NAME-- has dominated like no defensive player in recent memory. He did it the way rush end Uyi Osunde did it back in Edsall's early days with the UConn program. 
As a testimony to his coach's praise and faith in him, the team's Defensive Most Valuable Player in 2008 guided a unit that had a great turnaround from the previous season. The Huskies finished --NAME--'s final campaign ranked sixth in the nation in total offense, allowing just 278.0 yards per game compared to 351.38 yards in 2007 (ranked 37th in the NCAA). His stellar performance in the trenches resulted in the front wall giving up only 109.77 yards per game rushing (second in the Big East/16th in the NCAA), compared to its 62nd national ranking in 2007 (157.38 ypg).
--NAME-- served as team captain during his senior year at Coral Springs High School. He was named first-team All-Broward County and All-State honorable mention, adding Miami Herald Sweet Sixteen recognition. He helped the team to the district playoffs, recording 88 tackles with nine sacks in 2004. He was selected to play in the BCAA All-Star Classic and the Dade-Broward All-Star Game. In addition to football, he earned two letters in basketball, picking up All-Broward County honors.
--NAME-- enrolled at Connecticut as a 215-pound defensive end in 2005. He appeared in the team's first 10 games, playing behind senior Shawn Mayne on the left side, where he earned one starting assignment vs. Cincinnati. He finished his first season with 20 tackles (10 solos) that included one sack and five stops for loss.
--NAME-- emerged from 2006 fall camp as the Huskies' starting right defensive end, but in the sixth game he broke a bone in his arm vs. Army, missing the second half of the season. The 233-pound defender managed to register 24 tackles (8 solos), as he led the team with 4.5 sacks and also made 7.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage.
During his rehabilitation from his arm injury, --NAME-- added 15 pounds of muscle to his frame, returning to start all 13 games at right end in 2007. He led the team with 16.5 stops for loss, the sixth-best season total in school history. He also paced the Huskies with 7.5 sacks and collected 50 tackles (35 solos) with three pass deflections.
--NAME-- continued his progression to the elite ranks in college football as a senior. The unanimous All-Big East Conference first-team pick was named the team's Defensive Most Valuable Player. He led the team with a career-high 11 sacks and matched his 2007 figures with 16.5 tackles for loss, both good for second place on the conference chart. He also delivered 56 tackles (33 solos) and tied for eighth in the NCAA with a school single-season record-tying five forced fumbles. His eight pass deflection were the second-highest total of any defensive end in the major college circuit.
2005: Sat out the season finale vs. Louisville (undisclosed injury).
2006: Suffered a broken arm vs. Army (10/14), missing the final six games.
Attended Coral Spring (Fla.) High School, serving as team captain during his senior year 
Named first-team All-Broward County and All-State honorable mention, adding Miami Herald Sweet Sixteen recognition Helped the team to the district playoffs, recording 88 tackles with nine sacks in 2004 Selected to play in the BCAA All-Star Classic and the Dade-Broward All-Star Game Earned two letters in basket-ball, picking up All-Broward County honors.
Excellent athlete. Uses his hands to rip off blocks from much bigger tackles. Very good off the edge. Able to get into the chest of his man to bull rush him into the quarterback. Will close on quarterbacks quickly and secure the tackle. Plays on the strong and weak sides, as well as a stand-up rusher at times. Shows potential to be an effective 3-4 rush linebacker. Should be an asset on special teams coverage units. Recognizes misdirection quickly. Helped himself with a strong performance throughout Senior Bowl week.
Lacks great bulk to hold up as an every-down end, and will likely switch to 3-4 rush linebacker in the pros. Can get moved out of the hole. A bit high and choppy in his backpedal, but he can get deep on zone blitzes. Needs to hustle and chase a bit more when plays are downfield or down the line. Quarterbacks and ballcarriers can sidestep him as he closes because he doesn't break down quickly enough to make the tackle.
KAMERION WIMBLEY, Cleveland -- --NAME-- is an undersized defensive end who will need some time to adjust to playing linebacker. He might bring quicker value as a situational rush end, as he is not really fluid in his pass drops and might struggle in pass coverage. He is more of a drag-down tackler than a wrap-up type working in space, causing some of the slippery runners to escape. However, he is a solid hitter vs. plays in front of him and shows enough spin in his lateral movements to make plays outside the box. He has good acceleration working down the line and does a good job of colliding with the ball carrier on contact. When he gets too high in his stance, he tends to pick a side rather than squaring up, making him an easy target to block.
-------------------------
Nate_Davis 80634 171
--NAME-- could be the next MAC quarterback to make it big in the NFL.
He was the first player in school history to produce back-to-back 3,000-yard passing seasons and compiled a 17-5 record as a starter vs. MAC competition, leading the Cardinals to a 12-2 mark, including an 8-1 record vs. league opponents in his final season.
A finalist for the 2008 Manning Award (nation's top passer) and the MAC's Offensive Player of the Year, --NAME-- was twice the recipient of the John Magnabosco Award, given to the team's Most Valuable Player. In just three seasons, he rewrote the team record books. He left as the all-time leader in touchdown passes (74), passing yards (9,233), pass attempts (1,124), pass completions (678), 250-yard passing games (20) and 300-yard games (nine).
At Bellaire High School, the same school that produced NFL receiver Joey Galloway, --NAME-- lettered three times in football. He earned All-State and All-Conference honors as a senior, helping lead the Big Reds to a 10-0 conference record and a state semifinal appearance, finishing with a 13-1 overall mark. He completed 125-of-207 passes for 2,932 yards and 42 touchdowns. 
For his prep career, --NAME-- compiled a 21-8 record as a starter. He set the school all-time record with 113 total touchdowns, and school all-time marks with 7,348 yards and 81 touchdowns passing.
--NAME-- also excelled in basketball at Bellaire High, earning four letters. He eclipsed the school's 50-year-old career scoring record, amassing over 1,800 points. As a senior, he helped the hoops team to a 15-0 start.
--NAME-- made an impact as a true freshman at Ball State in 2006, earning the John Hodge Award as the squad's Most Outstanding Freshman. He started seven games, tying the school season-record with 18 touchdown passes. His 1,975 aerial yards were the fourth-best season total in BSU annals, as he connected on 150-of-245 chances (61.22%).
As a sophomore, --NAME-- shattered the school season-record of 2,377 yards passing by Neil Britt in 1983, registering 3,667 yards on 270-of-478 tries (56.49%). His 30 touchdown passes also established a new team record, as he was intercepted just six times. He also began to show more confidence in his running ability, as the team MVP tallied 235 yards and five scores on the ground, finishing 15th in the nation with an average of 300.31 yards per game in total offense.
--NAME-- was named the league Offensive Player of the Year in 2008. The Manning Award finalist generated 3,591 yards and 26 touchdowns on 258-of-401 throws (64.34%), as he was picked off only eight times. His 3,591 yards ranked 11th in the nation, as he also placed 19th with an average of 278.79 yards per game in total offense.
Prior to the 2008 GMAC Bowl, Ball State head coach Brady Hoke left the team to take over at San Diego State University. --NAME-- decided to bypass his final season of eligibility and applied for the 2009 NFL Draft.
2009: --NAME-- suffered a severe bruise to his right throwing hand vs. Tulsa in the GMAC Bowl (1/06), but an MRI revealed no bone fractures.
Attended Bellaire (Oh.) High School, playing football for head coach John Magistro Lettered three times in football, earning All-State and All-Conference honors as a senior  Helped lead the Big Reds to a 10-0 conference record and a state semifinal appearance, finishing with a 13-1 overall mark, as he completed 125-of-207 passes for 2,932 yards and 42 touchdowns that year For his prep career, --NAME-- compiled a 21-8 record as a starter, setting the school all-time record with 113 total touchdowns, as he also set school all-time marks with 7,348 yards and 81 touchdowns passing Became the team's first three-time All-State and All-Conference  choice Also excelled in basketball at Bellaire High, earning four letters Eclipsed the school's 50-year-old career scoring record, amassing over 1,800 points As a senior, he helped the hoops team to a 15-0 start.
Not tall, but has all other physical tools scouts want in a quarterback. Quick setup and delivery. Over-the-top throwing motion with an efficient release. Very good arm strength. Legitimate NFL accuracy to all levels of the field. Sets his feet and can drive the deep out from the opposite hash with ease. Good touch in the intermediate and deep. Throws a catchable ball with enough loft to allow his receivers to catch it in space and create yardage after the catch. Good mobility in the pocket to buy time and keep plays alive.
Shorter than scouts would like. Big numbers were byproduct of spread system. Will have to adjust to taking traditional snaps under center. Struggled against non-MAC foes, including Tulsa in the GMAC Bowl. Plays with gloves on both hands and throws the ball without the laces. Has resisted coaches' attempts to change how he throws the ball. Documented learning disability and might struggle with a complicated NFL playbook.
ALEX SMITH, San Francisco -- --NAME-- is a combination of Alex Smith and -- because of his athletic skills -- Baltimore's Troy Smith, undersized passers who rely on their quickness, balance and feet to make big plays on the move. --NAME-- is in the same situation as Alex Smith in that he would've greatly benefited from an additional year in college. If he is drafted into a rebuilding situation without a standout receiver or offensive line, --NAME-- could quickly regress as Alex Smith did. How teams choose to handle --NAME-- in his early NFL career will be critical. He could be devoured by unfriendly media and some are concerned that his last three performances, with Ball State aiming for an undefeated season and --NAME-- looking to the NFL, showed he can't handle immense pressure.
-------------------------
Bradley_Fletcher 80636 66
The waiting was finally over in 2008 for --NAME--, who emerged as one of the elite pass defenders in the Big Ten Conference in his final season. 
Always the good soldier since arriving on campus in 2004, he toiled on special teams as a redshirt freshman. He started four games while sharing left cornerback duties with Adam Shada as a sophomore and then shifted to the right side in 2007. He spent his junior campaign alternating with Charles Godfrey, picking up four more starting assignments. 
With Godfrey having graduated, it was time for --NAME-- to step up his leadership role in 2008. He manned the left cornerback position all season, as the All-Big Ten Conference honorable mention finished fifth on the team with 60 tackles and defended 13 passes.
--NAME-- was a first-team All-Conference, All-County, All-District, All-Northwest Ohio, All-Ohio and North/South All-State selection as a senior at Liberty High School. He was also named first-team All-Conference and All-County, along with special mention All-Ohio as a junior.
As a defensive back, --NAME-- recorded 207 tackles (81 solo), 13 pass breakups and four interceptions during his career. He registered 74 tackles (43 solos), two interceptions and six pass deflections as a senior. He also performed as a running back, as he rushed 143 times for 815 yards 12 touchdowns as a senior, adding 17 receptions for 314 yards and one kickoff return for 61 yards. In addition to football, he was also an All-State choice in basketball.
--NAME-- enrolled at Iowa in 2004, spending the season on the scout team. He played in nine games, seeing action mostly on special teams in 2005, finishing with one solo tackle. He shared left cornerback duties in 2006, appearing in 13 games with four starts. He ranked 11th on the team with 38 tackles (24 solos), as he caused one fumble and broke up four passes.
In 2007, --NAME-- again started four times, this time on the right side, seeing action in 11 games. He sat out the season opener vs. Northern Illinois for violating team rules, but went on to post 53 tackles (31 solos) while causing and recovering a fumble. He broke up three passes and had the first two interceptions for his career.
The 2008 campaign saw --NAME-- receive All-Big Ten Conference mention. The starter at left cornerback made the most of his opportunity, coming up with 60 tackles (44 solos), as he caused a fumble and knocked down ten passes. He also had three interceptions.
2007: Left the Michigan State game (10/27) after suffering a high ankle sprain.
Attended Liberty (Youngstown, Ohio) High School, playing football for head coach Jeff Whitaker First-team All-Conference, All-County, All-District, All-Northwest Ohio, All-Ohio and North/South All-State selection as a senior Named first-team All-Conference and All-County, along with special mention All-Ohio as a junior As a defensive back, --NAME-- recorded 207 tackles (81 solo), 13 pass breakups and four interceptions during his career Registered 74 tackles (43 solos), two interceptions and six pass deflections as a senior Also performed as a running back, as he rushed 143 times for 815 yards 12 touchdowns as a senior, adding 17 receptions for 314 yards and one kickoff return for 61 yards In addition to football, he was also an All-State choice in basketball.
Excellent size and athleticism for the position; should become effective jamming receivers as a press corner. Gives good effort on every play. Mirrors even the fastest receivers down the sideline. Closes on the ball quickly when playing off his man. Good vertical and strength to high-point the ball in traffic. Fair hands for the interception, and has the coordination and arm length to knock passes away without drawing a flag. Physical enough with receivers to knock the ball out after the catch.
A bit stiff in the hips, as his height can be a detriment when trying to stay with quicker receivers. Can be a bit tall in his backpedal and lateral movement, allowing better NFL receivers to take advantage of slants and double moves. Might move to free safety like former Hawkeye Charles Godfrey. Overly physical and pulls jersey when beaten, which will pick up penalties in the NFL. Must be more consistent using his hands to redirect receivers at the line of scrimmage. Aggressive on out routes, will bite on pump fakes and only has adequate recovery speed. Will drop the occasional interception. Arrested for drunk driving in 2007. He pleaded guilty and attended an OWI(operating while intoxicated) program.
-------------------------
Moise_Fokou 80638 230
A former walk-on who transferred after one season at Frostburg State, he immediately made an impression on the Maryland coaches even during his NCAA mandated transfer season, earning scout MVP accolades twice. Played sparingly behind Erin Henderson at weak-side linebacker in 2006, but switched to the strong side in 2007 and started the next two years there, registering 84 tackles, seven tackles for loss, and three forced fumbles in 2007 and emerging as the only ACC defender to record more than 75 tackles (77) and five sacks on the year. Despite his experience there, lacks the bulk scouts prefer, but his athleticism and secure tackling make him a potential immediate special teamer and an intriguing developmental prospect for the weakside.
Bullis High School: A two-year letterwinner who played running back and linebacker   All-IAC and a second team All-Met pick by the Washington Post his senior year   Conference MVP his senior year as well   Also lettered two years in basketball   Coached by Walt King.
Athletic build with room for additional muscle mass.   Fluid athlete at his best in space.   Good initial quickness.   Gets good depth on his pass drops and shows some light feet and fluidity changing direction.   Good straight-line speed.   Able to break down in space and make the secure tackle.   Wrap-up tackler who flashes some explosion as a hitter.   Good effort in pursuit.   Strong hands to rip away the ball.   Good timing on the blitz.   Can evade blockers in space and has a good short burst to close.   Excellent special teams player who led Maryland in special teams tackles in both 2007 (17 tackles) and 2008 (13 tackles).
Raw and relies on his athletic ability at this point.   Marginal instincts.   A step slow to react and has some wasted motion as he finds the ball.   Lacks the bulk scouts prefer on the strong side and needs to add both upper- and lower-body strength.   Doesn't use his hands well to disengage from blocks.   Struggled to distinguish himself amid the talent at the Senior Bowl.
-------------------------
Zack_Follett 80640 235
Ask any Pac-10 Conference quarterback to name the hardest hitting tackler in the league and they will sound like a choir in singing praises for --NAME--. A versatile defender, he began his Cal career as a middle linebacker, shifting to weak-side outside linebacker as a sophomore before finding a home on the strong side his junior campaign.
One of the more colorful characters on the squad, --NAME-- spent much of 2007 with a hair dye job featuring tiger/lion stripes (artwork courtesy of Greg Van Hoesen), earning himself the nickname "Ziger" for the "Z" dyed into the back of his head amongst the stripes. Even though the hair went back to normal for the final five games, the "Ziger" mentality remained. He is also an accomplished artist, as he has a wood-cutting hobby in which he has shaped plywood into life size replicas of teammates.
While his off-field exploits have kept the locker room loose, on the field --NAME-- is all business. He closed out his career 10th on the school's tackle list with 245 hits, as his 13 forced fumbles set the school all-time record and tied the Pac-10 Conference mark. He also placed fifth in Cal annals with 51.0 stops behind the line of scrimmage that included 23.5 sacks, the sixth-best career total by a Golden Bears defender.
--NAME-- was rated the ninth-best inside linebacker in the country by Tom Lemming's Prep Football Report during his senior year at Clovis High School. Rivals.com rated him the 11th-best inside linebacker in the country and 41st-best overall prospect in the state of California. He was named to The Fresno Bee's All-Valley first-team and chosen the Tri River Athletic Conference Defensive Player of the Year during his final campaign.
That year, the first-team All-State choice recorded 135 tackles, nine quarterback pressures, seven tackles for loss, seven forced fumbles, five passes broken up, four fumble recoveries and three sacks. As a junior, he only played into halftime of the team's third game before a foot fracture would sideline him the rest of the season. He still managed to register 74 tackles and return an interception for a touchdown.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- was named All-Area and All-League first-team. He delivered 151 tackles, 13 for loss, four forced fumbles, two sacks and two interceptions. For his career, he registered 360 tackles, 28 behind the line of scrimmage, 13 forced fumbles and seven sacks in his three seasons. After his senior season, he competed in the Cali-Florida Bowl.
--NAME-- enrolled at California in 2005 and made an immediate impact as a true freshman. Even though Desmond Bishop started ahead of him at middle linebacker, the Freshman All-American first-team choice recorded 32 tackles (25 solos) with a pair of sacks, three stops for loss and two fumbles in 12 contests.
As a sophomore, he appeared in 13 games, but even though he started just once at weak-side linebacker, he totaled 62 tackles (34 solos) and led the squad with 5.5 sacks, 12.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage and four forced fumbles. He also broke up a pair of passes and had the only interception for his career, picking up All-Pac 10 Conference honorable mention for his efforts.
--NAME-- missed three games due to a neck stinger, but was still named to the All-Pac 10 Conference second-team as a junior. He registered 64 tackles (39 solos) to go with a team-high 5.5 sacks and 12.5 stops for loss. He caused two fumbles, recovered another and broke up six passes while starting 10 games at strong-side linebacker.
As a senior, --NAME-- was a semi-finalist for the Bednarik Award and named the team's Defensive MVP. The All-Pac 10 Conference first-team choice led the league and ranked third in the nation with a career-high 23.0 tackles for loss, the third-best season total in Cal annals. His 10.5 sacks led the Bears and placed tied for eighth on the school single-season record list. He also generated 87 tackles (58 solos), second on the squad, as he led the Pac-10 with five forced fumbles.
2002: Only played into the fourth game of his high school junior season before missing the rest of the year with a fractured bone in his foot.
2007: Missed the second half of the Louisiana Tech game (9/15) with a neck stinger that kept him out of the Arizona (9/22), Oregon (9/29) and Oregon State (10/13) games before returning for reserve duty vs. UCLA (10/20).
2009: Could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine due to a pectoral muscle injury.
Attended Clovis (Cal.) High School, where he was rated the ninth-best inside linebacker in the country by Tom Lemming's Prep Football Report during his senior year Rivals.com rated him the 11th-best inside linebacker in the country and 41st-best overall prospect in the state of California Named to The Fresno Bee's All-Valley first-team and chosen the Tri River Athletic Conference Defensive Player of the Year during his final campaign That year, the first-team All-State choice recorded 135 tackles, nine quarterback pressures, seven tackles for loss, seven forced fumbles, five passes broken up, four fumble recoveries and three sacks As a junior, he only played into halftime of the team's third game before a foot fracture would sideline him the rest of the season. He still managed to register 74 tackles and return an interception for a touchdown As a sophomore, --NAME-- was named All-Area and All-League first-team, as he delivered 151 tackles, 13 for loss, four forced fumbles, two sacks and two interceptions For his career, he registered 360 tackles, 28 behind the line of scrimmage, 13 forced fumbles and seven sacks in his three seasons After his senior season, he competed in the Cali-Florida Bowl.
Broad frame with the room for an additional 10-15 pounds of muscle mass.   Improved play recognition as he gained experience.   Plays with reckless abandon on every snap.   Forcefully takes on blocks with an impressive pop that can gain him the separation he needs to make big plays behind the line of scrimmage.   Downhill defender who can explode into the ballcarrier and has forced eight fumbles over his career, despite only emerging as a full-time starter in 2007.   Looks to intimidate his opponent.   Reads the quarterback's eyes and will break on the ball.
Relies on his aggression and physicality to make the play.   Inconsistent in his reads.   Will take false steps and can be beaten over the top by play-action.   At his best coming off the edge as a pass rusher, but showed only marginal technique when facing athletic pass blockers who could absorb his initial charge as a pass rusher.   Only flashes the lateral quickness to evade blockers.   Tackled with his head down too often in 2007, leading to some missed tackles and, more important, putting his spinal cord at risk. --NAME-- missed nearly three games in 2007 due to a neck stinger.
LARRY IZZO, New York Jets -- Like Izzo, --NAME-- plays like a UFC champion - packs a wallop, but boy can he get out of control. He will at least buy himself time in the NFL based on his stellar special teams play and also as a situational player to disrupt the backfield, but there are a lot of holes in his game, especially in pass coverage. He will likely be on the draft board much longer than most experts predict.
-------------------------
Marcus_Freeman 80642 154
Teaming with middle linebacker James Laurinaitis, --NAME-- helped lead a defensive unit that has ranked among the nation's elite ever since he moved into the starting lineup as a sophomore. In his three years in the lineup, the Buckeyes have ranked fifth in scoring defense in 2006 (12.77 ppg), led the nation in total defense (233.0 ypg) and scoring defense (12.77 ppg) in 2007 and gave up just 293.77 yards per game while placing sixth nationally in scoring defense (13.92 ppg) during his senior campaign.
While --NAME-- may not have garnered the national attention afforded Laurinaitis and cornerback Malcolm Jenkins, the OSU coaching staff regarded --NAME-- as its most important defensive player. He not only brought classic tackle technique, quickness, power and intelligence to the field, but he was also one of the most versatile linebackers in the country. During his career, --NAME-- has performed at all three linebacker positions, having also started on the strong side as a sophomore before establishing himself as the premier weak-side linebacker in the Big Ten Conference during his final two campaigns.
--NAME-- was rated as one of the top three overall prospects in Ohio as a senior at Wayne High School, earning Parade All-American honors as a senior. The four-year starter was also a two-time All-Ohio first-team selection. As a senior, he recorded 127 tackles, four sacks, three forced fumbles and three fumble recoveries. He also totaled 152 tackles, including 29 behind the line of scrimmage, and eight sacks as a junior. In addition to lettering in football, he competed in the 4x100-meter relay and threw the shot and discus for the school's track team.
--NAME-- was the top recruit in Ohio State's 2004 class. He appeared mostly on special teams as a true freshman, posting four tackles (one solo). He was scheduled to be the top reserve at outside linebacker in 2005, but in the season opener vs. Miami (Ohio) he suffered a knee injury that would sideline him for the year, earning a medical hardship.
In 2006, --NAME-- replaced a departed Bobby Carpenter at strong-side outside linebacker, starting 11 of the 13 games he played in. He finished tied for second on the team with 71 tackles (34 solos), adding one sack and 2.5 stops for loss. He intercepted a pair of passes and deflected six others.
Looking to free up their fastest linebacker, --NAME-- shifted to the weak side upon the graduation of Larry Grant. He earned second-team All-Big Ten Conference honors in 2007, also picking up Academic All-Big Ten accolades. He registered a career-high 109 tackles (66 solos), second on a team that led the nation in total defense and scoring defense. His 9.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage and two forced fumbles saw the Buckeyes finish third in rush defense (82.85 ypg).
--NAME-- was again named Academic All-Big Ten Conference and second-team All-Big Ten as a senior. He placed second on the team with 84 tackles (39 solos) while starting all 13 games from weak-side linebacker. He broke up four passes and recovered a fumble while also coming up with 3.5 sacks and 9.5 stops for loss.
2005: Missed the rest of the season after suffering a knee injury vs. Miami (Ohio) in the season opener (9/03), as he developed staph infection that prevented him from returning to the field.
2007: Underwent arthroscopic knee surgery after the season to repair a meniscus tear.
2008: Hampered during parts of the season with a recurring ankle sprain.
Attended Wayne (Huber Heights, Ohio) High School, where he was rated as one of the top three overall prospects in Ohio as a senior Earned Parade All-American honors that season The four-year starter was also a two-time All-Ohio first-team selection As a senior, he recorded 127 tackles, four sacks, three forced fumbles and three fumble recoveries Also totaled 152 tackles, including 29 behind the line of scrimmage, and eight sacks as a junior In addition to lettering in football, he competed in the 4x100-meter relay and threw the shot and discus for the school's track team.
A bit shorter than scouts would like, but a well-built athlete with room for additional mass.   Instinctive defender who flows to the ball quickly.   Athletic enough to elude blockers and make plays at or near the line of scrimmage.   Reliable open-field tackler.   Breaks down well and can drive the ballcarrier into the ground.   Good awareness and speed in coverage.   Gets good depth on his drops.   Reads the quarterback's eyes and closes quickly.   Excellent special teams player.   Tough and plays through pain.   Solid week of practice at the Senior Bowl.
A bit smaller than scouts would like.   Likes to avoid blockers rather than facing them up and struggles in disengaging.   Lacks the bulk to hold up when targeted in the running game.   Athletic in coverage, but seems content to allow the reception to be made and make a secure tackle, rather than breaking on the ball.   Has struggled with durability: torn knee ligaments and a subsequent staph infection forced him to redshirt the 2005 season. Had his knee scoped following the 2007 season for a possible torn meniscus. Struggled through the 2008 season with a recurring ankle sprain.
-------------------------
Mike_Goodson 80644 111
Once called the "future of the team" by coach --NAME-- Sherman, --NAME-- left the university after his junior year under mysterious circumstances. The talented running back could possibly shift to wide receiver at the next level, but injuries and problems with the coaching staff caused the player and team to part ways quietly. No announcement was made of his decision to apply for the 2009 NFL Draft, as he just showed up on the list of players who were leaving school early in January.
At his season-ending press conference, Aggies coach --NAME-- Sherman hardly wanted to discuss why --NAME-- wouldn't be back, and why a year ago Sherman had said he wanted to build the offense around --NAME--. "We wanted to, but we didn't," said Sherman, whose first team finished 4-8. "We tried to, but it just didn't happen." Sherman said in December that he didn't expect the junior tailback to return to the Aggies for his senior season. The coach wouldn't elaborate but said it was because of a "combination of things." 
--NAME-- was a finalist for the 2005 Houston Touchdown Club Offensive Player of the Year Award. The Klein High School running back was named to Dave Campbell's Texas Football Magazine Super Team and was rated the third-best prospect in the nation by Super Prep. He was named first-team All-District 14-5A and honorable mention All-State as a senior, receiving the same honors as a running back and return specialist during his junior season.
--NAME-- rushed for 973 yards on only 99 carries (9.8 avg) as a senior, playing in the U.S. Army All-American Game after his final campaign. As a junior, he accounted for more than 1,800 yards, including 1,152 yards on 101 rushing attempts (11.4 avg) and 14 touchdowns. He also returned two punts (65 and 57 yards) and two kicks (96 and 86 yards) for touchdowns that season.
In 2006, --NAME-- enrolled at Texas A&M, where he was selected the Big 12 Conference Freshman of the Year by the Austin American-Statesman. He also garnered All-Big 12 honorable mention, as he led the team in rushing with 847 yards and four touchdowns on 127 carries (6.7 avg), despite starting just one game. He also grabbed 17 passes for 113 yards (6.6 avg) in 13 contests. In the Holiday Bowl vs. California, he gained 62 yards on the ground before he was sidelined by a left knee injury.
--NAME-- started six of the 13 contests he appeared in during his sophomore campaign. Part of a three-member running back committee, he raced for 711 yards and four scores on 153 carries (4.6 avg). He finished second on the team with 361 yards and four touchdowns on 36 receptions (10.0 avg), proving to be more than a capable receiver when flexed out wide. However, he missed a practice before the Oklahoma game and the coaches did not let him play in the first half.
--NAME--'s production continued to regress in 2008. He was limited to six carries vs. New Mexico after spraining his right knee and eventually sat out two other contests. He finished the season with 406 yards and five touchdowns on 94 carries, but gained only 74 yards and one touchdown in his last five contests. He continued to excel as a receiver, though, catching 37 passes for 386 yards (10.4 avg) and three scores.
2006: Suffered a left knee sprain vs. California in the Holiday Bowl (12/28) Doctors first feared the injury was a torn anterior cruciate ligament.
2008: Left the New Mexico game (9/06) after only six carries due to a right knee sprain Sat out the Iowa State (10/25) and Colorado games (11/01) with a knee sprain.
2009: Could not complete agility tests during A&M's Pro Day (3/04) after he tweaked his hamstring.
Attended Klein (Texas) High School, playing football for head coach Ronny Feldman  Finalist for the 2005 Houston Touchdown Club Offensive Player of the Year Award Was named to Dave Campbell's Texas Football Magazine Super Team Rated the third-best prospect in the nation by Super Prep Named first-team All-District 14-5A and honorable mention All-State as a senior, receiving the same honors as a running back and return specialist during his junior season Rushed for 973 yards on only 99 carries (9.8 avg) as a senior, playing in the U.S. Army All-American Game after his final campaign As a junior, he accounted for more than 1,800 yards, including 1,152 yards on 101 rushing attempts (11.4 avg) and 14 touchdowns Also returned two punts (65 and 57 yards) and two kicks (96 and 86 yards) for touchdowns that season.
Lean, athletic build, but one that seems better suited to wide receiver in the NFL. Rare speed and agility. Quick to and through the hole. Can make defenders miss in tight spaces and flashes exceptional elusiveness in the open field. Rare balance and the ability to cut at top speed in either direction. Experienced receiver out of the backfield. Runs with functional power, despite less than ideal strength, as he keeps his legs churning and spins out of tackles. A threat to go the distance every time he has the ball in his hands. Lacks experience as a special teams returner, but has the potential to be a standout in this area -- much like former Aggie Dante Hall.
Lacks the bulk to be an every-down back. Marginal leg drive for short-yardage situations. Undeniable athleticism, but --NAME--'s production dropped in each of his three seasons with the Aggies -- and it can't be blamed on just touches as his yards per carry also dropped each year. Legitimate intangible red flags regarding his struggles to coexist with former Texas A&M head coach R.C. Slocum and his staff, as well as current head coach --NAME-- Sherman and his staff, especially considering that Sherman publicly touted --NAME-- as the player the offense would be centered around when he took the position. Scouts will also question --NAME--'s toughness after he missed time with sprains in his neck, groin and right knee since last spring.
-------------------------
Cary_Harris 80646 183
Scouts have paid a lot of attention to Southern Cal, and that includes --NAME--, a two-time honorable mention All-Pac-10 selection. He lacks great size, athleticism and interception totals of many of this year's top cornerbacks, but is a tough, physical defender that some scouts feel is among the draft's most underrated at the position. --NAME-- might fit best in the NFL in a zone scheme or even at free safety due to his instincts, toughness and reliable open-field tackling.
Was a 2004 Super Prep All-American, Super Prep Elite 50, Prep Star All-American, Tom Lemming All-American, EA Sports All-American honorable mention, Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West first team, Tacoma News Tribune Western 100, Orange County Register Fab 15 second team, Cal-Hi Sports All-State first team, All-CIF Southern Section first team, All-CIF Division III Defensive Player of the Year, Los Angeles Times All-Star, Los Angeles Times All-San Fernando Valley and Los Angeles Daily News All-Area first team selection as a senior running back and cornerback at Notre Dame High in Sherman Oaks (Calif.). He rushed for 1,800 yards with 24 TDs and had 81 tackles, 19 deflections, two forced fumbles and two interceptions in 2004.   Notre Dame went 14-0 and won the CIF Division III championship in 2004. As a junior in 2003, he made Cal-Hi Sports All-State Underclass first team, All-CIF Southern Section second team and All-CIF Division III while gaining 1,150 rushing yards (7.5 yards per carry) with 17 TDs and posting 73 tackles, six deflections, three forced fumbles, two interceptions and one fumble recovery. He was named to the Cal-Hi Sports Sophomore Al-State and All-CIF Division III squads in 2002. In his career, Notre Dame won three consecutive CIF Division III crowns. He also ran track at Notre Dame, with a best of 10.75 in the 100 meters. Current Trojan Garrett Green also attended Notre Dame.
Adequate size for the position.   Instinctive.   Rarely out of position.   Good zone defender. Reads the quarterback's eyes and is quick to close.   Smooth transition and has the agility to mirror receiver's breaks.   Competes for the jump ball.   Tough player.   Aggressive in run support.   Evades blockers well, but isn't afraid to take them on if it means getting to the ballcarrier.   Reliable open-field tackler.   Breaks down in space well and delivers a solid blow.
Questionable deep speed.   Lacks the late burst to recover if beaten initially.   Seems content making the secure stop rather than going for the interception.   Some durability concerns. Underwent surgery on a sprained finger in spring 2007. Underwent surgery on both ankles in spring '08.
-------------------------
Victor_Harris 80648 157
It was commonplace during the 2008 season to see --NAME-- line up at boundary cornerback, field cornerback or even free safety. If that was not enough, when it came time for the opposition to either punt the ball away or kick off, --NAME-- handled those attempts as well. And with the team's receiving corps depleted by 2007 graduation, the coaches experimented with their versatile player on the offensive side of the ball during preseason camps. 
Even though he did not start there, he was utilized quite a bit as a slot receiver, split wide or as a tailback out of the backfield. What made all of this shuffling around more impressive was the fact that --NAME-- was hampered early in the year by a left foot sprain he suffered during the team's final scrimmage before the 2008 season opener.
Undaunted, --NAME-- continued to play, doing whatever the coaches asked from him. Still, he is a shutdown cornerback, first and foremost. To that end, he gave Wake Forest's Alphonso Smith a run for his money in their quest to re-write the Atlantic Coast Conference record books. Both players tied the ACC career record by returning four interceptions for touchdowns. --NAME-- gained 278 yards on his 15 interceptions (third most in school history), which ranks third in league history. Smith managed to generate 254 yards, finishing seventh on the ACC chart.
Parade magazine might have found the right category to place --NAME-- in. When the youngster was competing at Highland Spring High School, he made the Parade All-American team as an "athlete." That was after he led the Richmond metro area in rushing his senior year with 225 carries for 2,346 yards, averaging 10.4 yards per carry and scoring 27 touchdowns on the ground. He also caught four passes for 90 yards and four scores and racked up 751 yards with four touchdowns on 28 returns. In addition, he contributed 22 tackles and three interceptions as a defensive back, scoring touchdowns six different ways during his final season.
During the course of his prep career, --NAME-- was rated the best player in the state by The Roanoke Times and named the Offensive Player of the Year in the state's AAA grouping by the VHSCA. He picked up All-State first-team honors as a running back and defensive back, as well as second-team as a kick returner. He made the Super Prep, Prep Star, USA Today and Prep Football Report All-American first-teams. Prep Star rated him the second-best prospect in the country and Rivals.com gave him a third-place ranking. 
Prep Star also chose --NAME-- to its Dream Team 100 and All-Atlantic Region squads. He was ranked as the best player in the state and fourth-rated cornerback by Scout.com. He participated in the U.S. Army All-American Game in San Antonio, as he finished his career as the Central Region's career leading ground gainer with 5,320 yards, scoring a total of 70 touchdowns his final two seasons.
Needless to say, every major university tried to recruit --NAME--, but he had his heart set on playing for head coach Frank Beamer at Virginia Tech. But before he could even suit up for that school, tragedy struck twice. The story of --NAME-- "Macho" --NAME--' tumultuous December of 2004 is widely known, but always worth repeating. 
First, he suffered third-degree burns on Dec. 15, the day Beamer and assistant Jim Cavanaugh were coming to his house for a recruiting visit. --NAME--' mother, Maritza, was preparing a meal for the coaches, and a grease fire broke out in the kitchen while she was at the store. --NAME-- put out the fire by throwing a quilt on the pan, but suffered burns in the process. He has small scars on his face, and skin grafts on his right forearm. 
Then, 10 days after Beamer's visit and five days after he committed to the Hokies, his mother fainted at home on Christmas Day and passed away at the hospital. He has a tattoo on his left forearm of an image of his mother and the words: "My angel. My reason. My mother." He also has a tattoo on his neck that reads "Mama's Boy." Maritza --NAME-- was 43.
--NAME-- lettered as a true freshman at Virginia Tech in 2005, seeing most of his action on special teams. He blocked a kick, deflected two passes in brief action as a "field" cornerback and produced 12 tackles (7 solos) for the coverage units. Having bulked up in the offseason, he beat out incumbent Roland Minor for the field cornerback position in 2006. He picked off four passes, returning one for the first of his four touchdowns on interceptions for his career. He also collected 34 tackles (22 solos), despite playing the latter part of the schedule with a shoulder dislocation from the Kent State game.
--NAME-- earned All-Atlantic Coast Conference honors in 2007, starting all 14 games at field cornerback. He also started to become acclimated with return chores. He posted 36 tackles and deflected 11 passes. A collarbone contusion at Duke would limit him as a kickoff returner the rest of the year, but not before he tied the school record with a 100-yard runback for a score vs. Clemson. He averaged 34.7 yards on six kickoffs and 7.4 yards on five punt returns. He also scored once on five interceptions and batted down eleven passes.
--NAME-- missed the 2008 season opener vs. East Carolina due to a left foot sprain, but the All-American first-team pick returned to start the final 13 contests, shifting to boundary cornerback. He registered 46 tackles (32 solos), caused two fumbles and recovered another. He also broke up eight passes and intercepted six others, tying the school single-season record by returning two of those pass thefts for touchdowns. He averaged 15.0 yards on four kickoff returns and 9.3 yards on 25 punt returns. He also snatched eight passes for 63 yards (7.9 avg) and rushed five times for a 9.6-yard average.
2006: Suffered a shoulder dislocation vs. Kent State (11/11).
2007: Left the Louisiana State game (9/08) at halftime with a hamstring strain Suffered a collarbone contusion vs. Duke (10/13).
2008: Missed the season opener vs. East Carolina (8/30) after suffering a left foot sprain during the team's final August camp scrimmage.
2009: Did not participate in the bench press at the NFL Combine due to an elbow sprain.
Attended Highland Springs (Va.) High School, playing football for head coach Scott Burton Parade All-American team selection as an "athlete" Led the Richmond metro area in rushing his senior year with 225 carries for 2,346 yards, averaging 10.4 yards per carry and scoring 27 touchdowns on the ground Also caught four passes for 90 yards and four scores and racked up 751 yards with four touchdowns on 28 returns In addition, he contributed 22 tackles and three interceptions as a defensive back, scoring touchdowns six different ways during his final season Rated the best player in the state by The Roanoke Times and named the Offensive Player of the Year in the state's AAA grouping by the VHSCA Picked up All-State first-team honors as a running back and defensive back, as well as second-team as a kick returner Made the Super Prep, Prep Star, USA Today and Prep Football Report All-American first-teams Prep Star rated him the second-best prospect in the country and Rivals.com gave him a third-place ranking Prep Star also chose --NAME-- to its Dream Team 100 and All-Atlantic Region squads Ranked as the best player in the state and fourth-rated cornerback by Scout.com Participated in the U.S. Army All-American Game in San Antonio, as he finished his career as the Central Region's career leading ground gainer with 5,320 yards, scoring a total of 70 touchdowns his final two seasons.
Natural playmaker.   Versatile athlete with the skills to help at multiple positions.   Alert zone defender.   Reads the quarterback's eyes and closes quickly on the ball.   Reliable open-field tackler who flashes explosiveness as a hitter.   Willing to dirty his jersey against the run.   Good lateral agility to elude blockers and will come up aggressively in run support.   At least adequate hip flexibility and straight-line speed.   Natural hands for the interception.   Can track the ball over either shoulder.   Good leaping ability and times his leaps well.   Can highpoint passes and shows the strong hands to snatch passes out of the air.   Reliable hands as a returner.   Good vision and burst as a returner.
Might lack the hip flexibility and straight-line speed for man coverage.   Inconsistent press technique and lacks the burst to keep up with faster receivers if he misses his initial punch.   Likes to go for the intimidating hit and will occasionally fail to wrap up properly when dropping his shoulder into the ballcarrier.   Plays a flashy, emotional game and can get carried away on the field, drawing penalties.
-------------------------
Juaquin_Iglesias 80650 99
Playing for one of the most explosive offenses in the history of college football that featured Heisman Trophy quarterback Sam Bradford, All-American tight end Jermaine Gresham and former All-American receiver Malcolm Kelly, --NAME-- didn't get as much publicity as his more heralded teammates. However, he did lead Oklahoma in receptions (68 in 2007, 74 in 2008) and receiving yards (907, 1,150) the past two seasons. 
--NAME-- also scored 10 times as a senior en route to second-team All-Big 12 Conference honors, which was a difficult task given the league's prolific offenses. More solid than flashy, his size, speed and ability to gain yards after the catch made him a natural for the West Coast Offense. His experience as a kickoff returner (876 yards in '07, 475 in '08) also added to his value.
Before he concluded his career, --NAME-- made his mark in the school and Big 12 record books. His 202 receptions rank second in school annals and placed 11th on the league all-time chart. His 2,821 yards receiving also rank second in Sooners history and 10th in the Big 12. 
His 26.41-yard average on kickoff returns is second on the conference record chart and the Oklahoma mark. He also set school records for most kickoff return yards in a career (1,664) and season (826 in 2007), most receptions and receiving yards in a game (12 for 191 yards vs. Kansas in 2008) and set the 2008 Fiesta Bowl record with 195 kickoff return yards, the second-best game total in school history.
--NAME-- earned All-Area honors as a junior and All-District 16-4A accolades as a senior at Killeen High School. He registered 42 catches for 886 and 10 touchdowns and also threw two passes, both for touchdowns, while also returning kicks as a senior. The three-sport standout also was a starter on the basketball team, where he averaged 17 points per game. In track, he competed in the 400, 800, and 1,600-meter relays.
As a true freshman at Oklahoma in 2005, --NAME-- appeared in 12 games, starting four contests as a slot receiver. He finished fourth on the team with 19 receptions for 290 yards (15.3 avg) and a pair of scores. He played a major role the next season, starting 11 contests as a flanker. He ranked second on the squad with 41 grabs for 514 yards (12.5 avg) and two scores, as he also averaged 25.9 yards on 14 kickoff returns that included a touchdown.
Being a good soldier on a multi-talented team, --NAME-- managed to receive only All-Big 12 Conference honorable mention as a junior. He led the team with 68 receptions for 907 yards (13.3 avg) and five touchdowns. He started 10 games at flanker, but also made a name for himself as a kickoff returner, ranking third in the league and 16th nationally with an average of 28.48 yards on 29 attempts. His 1,833 all-purpose yards led the Sooners and rank seventh on the school single-season record list. 
Bradford's march to the Heisman Trophy in 2008 would have been impossible without --NAME-- being the team's featured receiver. He hauled in 74 passes for 1,150 yards (15.5 avg), both ranking second on the school single-season record list, as his 10 touchdowns rank tied for fourth. He amassed 1,631 all-purpose yards, the 10th-best season total in OU annals.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Killeen (Texas) High School, playing football for head coach Sam Jones Earned All-Area honors as a junior and All-District 16-4A accolades as a senior Registered 42 catches for 886 and 10 touchdowns and also threw two passes, both for touchdowns, while also returning kicks as a senior The three-sport standout also was a starter on the basketball team, where he averaged 17 points per game In track, he competed in the 400, 800, and 1,600-meter relays.
Good initial quickness off the snap to get into his route. Experienced route-runner who can generate separation from defenders due to his agility. Reliable hands. Can pluck the ball outside of his frame and quickly secures it. Tracks the ball well over either shoulder. Experienced as a punt and kick returner. Good vision and a naturally elusive runner with the ball in his hands. Not afraid to go over the middle. Will fight for extra yardage. Classic build, quickness and hands for the West Coast Offense. Better quickness than pure straight-line speed, but is elusive and has the burst to separate.
Questionable straight-line speed. Relies on his quickness and agility to create separation and may never become a classic deep threat. Has never operated as the go-to target while at Oklahoma, and has to prove he can handle the pressure of lining up opposite the opponent's best corner. Viewed by some as only a complementary receiver whose best NFL position might be as a slot receiver.
-------------------------
Gartrell_Johnson 80652 134
Talented backs like --NAME-- don't typically get out of the state of Florida, especially considering he led Dade County in rushing as a senior. His physique and lack of elite speed scream fullback, but his production for the Rams tells a different story. 
The 2008 first-team All-Mountain West pick appeared to come from nowhere with his 285-yard, two-touchdown effort against Fresno State in the New Mexico Bowl last December, but he had already approached 1,200 yards during the regular season and ran for 957 yards as a part-time starter in 2007. He also caught 32 for 295 yards out of the backfield as a senior, mostly on swing passes, which gives him a bit more versatility than most expect. Had an arm span of 30 1/2 inches and a hand span of 9 1/2 inches at the combine.
Miami Springs: Leading rusher in Dade County with 1,649 yards as a senior.   all-state and all-conference performer.   team MVP.   holds the MSHS single-season rushing mark.   scored 18 touchdowns in senior campaign.   earned his team's leadership award and was the Miami Springs player of the year.   head football coach was Gil Lora.
Powerful build. Runs with a low pad level, giving defenders little room to hit him. Has a low-center of gravity and a good first step to accelerate. Hits the hole with authority. Some lateral quickness to elude in tight quarters and can make defenders miss in the open field. Good vision for the cutback. Finishes his runs by falling forward. Secure ball-handler with only one fumble in 310 touches in 2008. Experienced hands out of the backfield. Good strength and effort as a pass-blocker. Relatively fresh legs, considering he didn't establish himself as a full-time starter until his senior year. Strong performance in the East-West Shrine Game alleviated concerns about his level of competition.
Lacks the speed to beat linebackers to the edge or the top-end speed to pull away when gets to the second level. Lacks the agility to make defenders miss if met in the hole. Relies on his initial pop and aggression, rather than true power, in taking on defenders. Can be taken down too easily at the line of scrimmage, as he needs a step or two to build his momentum. May struggle with a complicated playbook.
-------------------------
Paul_Kruger 80656 57
To call --NAME-- a battler might be an understatement.
As a child, he lost a kidney as a result of an automobile accident, but that did not prevent him from pursuing football. He later served on a two-year LDS Church mission after joining the Utah University football team as a quarterback in 2004.
When he returned, he quickly established himself as a standout defensive lineman. After the 2008 season, --NAME-- was stabbed during a fight outside a party. --NAME-- survived, but was stabbed twice in the area of his ribs and abdomen and the wound was perilously close to a lung. The Salt Lake County Sheriff's office said deputies were called to the party because of noise and learned of the stabbing after they arrived. The victims had already left the party and investigators are still trying to figure out who had stabbed them. 
Held out of 2008 spring drills as he recovered from his injuries, --NAME-- was back on the field by fall camp, producing a banner season that saw the Utes compile a 13-0 record that included a Sugar Bowl victory over Southeastern Conference powerhouse, Alabama. After two seasons of college football, the right defensive end decided to forgo his eligibility and has primed himself for his next big battle -- playing in the NFL.
Sports are commonplace in the --NAME-- household. In addition to --NAME-- competing for Utah the past two seasons, he was joined on their defensive line by his younger brother, Dave. Both have solid bloodlines, as their father, --NAME--, played football at Oregon State. Their father married his college sweetheart, Jennifer, who was a member of Oregon State's women track and field team.
--NAME-- served as team captain during his senior year at Timpanogos High School, where he lettered four times on the gridiron. The All-American and All-Conference selection was rated as one of the nation's top thirty quarterbacks by Student Sports magazine. He was also a member of the school's Honor Roll.
--NAME-- enrolled at Utah in 2004, performing on the scout team as the varsity went undefeated. After returning from a two-year church mission, he was shifted to defensive end, earning a starting job at right defensive end. The Freshman All-American recorded 63 tackles (24 solo) with three sacks and ranked fourth on the squad with 7.5 stops for loss. He also broke up five passes and intercepted another.
In 2008, --NAME-- earned All-American honorable mention and first-team All-Mountain West Conference accolades. He started all year at right defensive end, posting 61 tackles (31 solo), as he led the team with 7.5 sacks and 16.5 stops for losses. He also caused two fumbles and had the second interception of his career.
After that campaign, --NAME-- decided it was time to leave school and entered the 2009 NFL Draft.
Childhood: Injuries suffered in a car accident required the removal of one kidney.
2008: Was one of two Utah players stabbed during a fight outside a party on Jan. 20. --NAME-- survived, but was stabbed twice in the area of his ribs and abdomen and the wound was perilously close to his lung.
Attended Timpanogos (Ut.) High School, lettering four times in football Served as squad captain as a senior The All-American and All-Conference selection was rated as one of the nation's top thirty quarterbacks by Student Sports magazine Member of the school's Honor Roll.
Tall with a fairly developed upper body and the frame to add another 10-15 pounds of muscle without losing speed. Relentless as a pass rusher, works hard to attack the passer in or outside the pocket. Gets under his man's pads to push him into the quarterback. Overwhelms backs and tight ends in pass protection. Nice straight-line and closing speed. Flashes explosiveness as a tackler and has the length to secure. Also hustles down the line and chases ballcarriers downfield. Good backfield awareness and lateral agility to knock down passes and keep containment on reverses, run plays and bootlegs. Very good changing direction in space and can drop fluidly. Effective playing upright as a 3-4 rush linebacker due to his length, hustle and athleticism. Handles coverage responsibilities, staying with backs in the flat and on wheel routes. Breaks down and drops his hips in space better than you'd expect for his size. Mature player with an excellent motor.
Must continue to build strength throughout his body. Plays too tall at times, allowing better offensive tackles to latch on and take him out of the play. Has not yet mastered how to rip off blocks at the line. Needs more pass rush moves, relies on a bull rush that was effective at Utah but might not be against stronger NFL tackles. Will be a 23-year-old rookie with just two years of college football experience.
AARON KAMPMAN, Green Bay -- --NAME-- is a perfect complement for a team that likes a strong work ethic in a player. There might be bigger, faster and stronger defensive linemen in the draft, but --NAME-- has enough versatility in his game to put his hand down in a 4-3 alignment or stand up in a 3-4 formation. Kampman has had a good run without having superstar athletic skills. Give --NAME-- a year or two to adapt and he could be a big hit.
-------------------------
Keenan_Lewis 80658 96
After two seasons of battling injuries, --NAME-- had a healthy senior campaign, establishing himself as one of the most physical cornerbacks in the West. His work ethic and team-first attitude saw him perform at a level that has professional scouts feeling that he will quickly emerge as one of the National Football League's elite pass defenders.
--NAME-- not only excelled on the football field, but also received recognition for his success in the classroom, earning Academic All-Pac 10 Conference honors as a senior. That undoubtedly pleased his mother, Muriel, a teacher at Martin Behrman Elementary School. 
--NAME--, along with teammate Dennis Christopher, was recruited to Oregon State by former Beavers assistant and New Orleans native Charlie Camp. His family was displaced to Natchitoches for six months because of Hurricane Katrina. Their home sustained significant wind damage but fortunately did not flood in the storm, he said. Still, --NAME-- said he'd like nothing more than to be in a position to support his family one day. 
"I definitely want to help my mom out," he said. "That would be a dream. But to have an opportunity to play for any team and just make it (in the NFL), that's what I'm trying to accomplish right now." 
And while he loved his days at Oregon State, --NAME-- said he hopes his professional playing career will prove less geographically challenging for his family and friends. "I definitely hope that one day I'll be able to come back and play for New Orleans," said --NAME--, who interviewed with Saints scouts at the NFL Combine. "I hope they bring me home." 
At O. Perry Walker High School, --NAME-- was rated as one of the top 100 cornerback prospects in the country by Rivals.com. The first-team All-Metro and All-League choice as a senior, he made 75 tackles with four sacks and seven interceptions. He also returned five punts for 180 yards and five kickoffs for 150 yards in 2003. 
His best prep game was against L.B. Landry High, when he produced 12 tackles, intercepted a pass, forced two fumbles, recovered a fumble, and returned a punt 55 yards. The three-year starter registered 71 tackles with two interceptions as a junior and posted 54 tackles as a sophomore. He also graduated with academic honors, attaining a 3.27 grade point average.
"--NAME-- is one of those Cinderellas," said Terry Wilson, --NAME--' former head coach at Walker High. "I always knew --NAME-- was going to be good at whatever he chose to do because he always worked hard. He's always had a strong work ethic. He was just a pleasure to coach." 
--NAME-- decided to bypass numerous scholarship offers to enroll at Oregon State in 2004, stating that he selected the university because, "OSU is strong academically and it will allow me an opportunity to play football in the best conference." He redshirted his first season with the Beavers, but was named Freshman All-American and second-team All-Pac Ten Conference in 2005, starting all 11 games at left cornerback. He added Academic All-Pac 10 honors and posted 45 tackles (25 solos) with two stops for loss and 11 pass deflections.
The Exercise and Sport Science major was again named to the Academic All-Pac 10 squad as a sophomore. He started 13 of 14 games, manning the left cornerback position, as he broke up eight passes. He also collected 22 tackles (17 solos) with one sack and two stops behind the line of scrimmage.
--NAME-- saw his playing time decrease by midseason after taking a helmet to his knee vs. Arizona. He would start 11 games in 2007, but had problems running because of the injury, which forced him out of the lineup for two contests. He did intercept three passes, leading the team in that category, but he had just two pass breakups and a career-low 15 tackles (12 solos).
In 2008, he achieved Academic All-Pac 10 status for the fourth time in his career. The team's active leader for starts with 48, he returned to his freshman form, delivering 35 tackles (27 solos) and a stop for a loss. He also batted down nine passes while picking off four others, including one that he returned for a touchdown.
2007: Left the season opener vs. Utah (8/30) with leg cramps Suffered a grade two knee sprain when an opponent's helmet hit his knee in the second quarter vs. Arizona (10/06), missing the next game vs. California (10/13).
Attended O. Perry Walker (New Orleans, La.) High School, playing football for head coach Terry Wilson Rated as one of the top 100 cornerback prospects in the country by Rivals.com First-team All-Metro and All-League choice as a senior Made 75 tackles with four sacks and seven interceptions, as he also returned five punts for 180 yards and five kickoffs for 150 yards in 2003 His best prep game was against L.B. Landry High, when he produced 12 tackles, intercepted a pass, forced two fumbles, recovered a fumble and returned a punt 55 yards The three-year starter registered 71 tackles with two interceptions as a junior and posted 54 tackles as a sophomore Graduated with academic honors, attaining a 3.27 grade point average O. Perry Walker High teammates Burnell Wallace and Dennis Christopher are teammates of his at Oregon State, and Craig Davis and Dominique Cooper were student-athletes at Louisiana State.
Rare height for the position.   Aggressive at the line of scrimmage.   At his best in press coverage where he can get his long arms on the receiver and disrupt the timing of the passing game.   Good foot quickness to turn and run with the receiver.   Plants, drives and closes quickly.   Gets his hands on lot of passes.   Has the experience and intelligence to operate well in zone coverage.   Enjoyed a solid week of practice at the Senior Bowl.
Questionable deep speed.   Lacks the soft hands for the interception.   Misjudges passes and allows too many to get into his chest.   Generally a reliable open-field tackler, but likes to duck his head and swipe, leading to some missed tackles.   Can get a bit grabby downfield, which will lead to pass interference calls at the next level.   Willing in run support, but was protected by a physical and experienced front seven, and prefers to stand around the pile, rather than throw his body into it.
-------------------------
Kaluka_Maiava 80660 104
--NAME--'s versatility was both a blessing and a curse for the Trojans, as his ability to play all three linebacker positions made him a valuable reserve during his first three years at the university. Finally given the opportunity to start as a senior, he played the part of the good soldier, quietly going about doing a stellar job while the team's other linebackers basked in the spotlight. 
He began his collegiate career as a strong-side linebacker. He shifted to the weak-side as a sophomore, but also saw time in the middle, along with excelling on special teams. 
In each of his years playing for the Trojans, the defense continued to improve. During his freshman season, USC ranked 31st in the nation in rush defense (130.54 ypg), 48th in total defense (360.92 ypg) and 35th in scoring defense (22.85 ppg). After moving to the weak side, where he played behind All-American Keith Rivers (Cincinnati), Southern California improved to ninth in the nation vs. the run (91.08 ypg), 20th in total defense (295.85 ypg) and eleventh in scoring defense (15.15 ppg). 
As a junior, USC continued to move up the national charts, finishing fourth vs. the run (84.15 ypg), second in total defense (273.15 ypg) and second in scoring defense (16.0 ppg) in 2007. In his final season, his first as a full-time starter, the Trojans allowed just 87.38 yards per game on the ground (fifth in the NCAA), ranking second in the country in total defense (221.77 ypg) while leading the major colleges in scoring defense (9.0 ppg).
Wrestling with ball carriers is something that seems all so natural for --NAME--, whose family tree reads like the "who's who" of the professional wrestling industry. He is the grandson of professional wrestler Neff --NAME--, who was known for walking on a bed of nails that they would bring into the ring. He had a renowned feud with Killer Kowalski, known as the most feared performer of his era. Neff also wrote a children's book called "Da Grouchy Moocher Boogie Man."
Neff was related to famed Hawaiian wrestler Peter --NAME--, whose daughter married pro wrestler Rocky Johnson. Their son, Duane Johnson, also --NAME--'s uncle, played football at Miami before gaining wide attention as professional wrestler "The Rock". Other wrestlers within --NAME--'s family are the "Wild Samoans," Afa and Sika Anoai, along with Afa's three wrestling sons are Samula Anoa'i (The Great Samu), Larry Anoa'i (L.A. Smooth) and Afa Anoa'i Jr. (Afa Jr.). Junior Anoai (Afa and Sika's brother) is the father of former WWF World Champion, Yokozuna. 
Afa's daughter married American wrestler Gary Albright. Jimmy Snuka, Jimmy Snuka Jr., Mr. Harry Fuji, Junior Maivia, The Barbarian and Haku (aka Meng) are all distantly related. In addition to the wrestling family tree, --NAME--'s father, Scott Mahoney, attended and played football for Kamehameha Schools and the University of Colorado as an offensive lineman. His brother, Kai, also played football at Colorado and UCLA. 
At Baldwin High School, --NAME-- was named Super Prep All-American, Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Tom Lemming All-West, Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West honorable mention, Tacoma News Tribune Western 100, Orange County Register Fab 15, Gatorade Hawaii Player of the Year, Honolulu Advertiser All-State, All-Maui Interscholastic League Defensive Player of the Year and All-League as a senior linebacker.
In his final season, --NAME-- recorded 147 tackles, 39 stops for loss, eight sacks, eight forced fumbles and five blocked kicks in 2004, as well as a punt return for a touchdown. As a junior in 2003, he was a Honolulu Advertiser All-State pick as he posted 157 tackles, 22 tackles for loss and eight sacks. He also participated in soccer and boxing at Baldwin. 
As a reserve strong-side linebacker, --NAME-- was named Southern California's Co-Special Teams Player of the Year, in addition to capturing the Service Team Defensive Player of the Year Award. He appeared in all 13 games, earning his first career start in the Stanford clash. He finished his freshman campaign with 20 tackles (12 solos), a fumble recovery and an interception.
In 2006, --NAME-- shifted to weak-side linebacker, playing in 12 games behind Keith Rivers. He sat out the season opener vs. Arkansas with a fall camp shoulder sprain, but the team's Co-Special Teams Player of the Year posted 34 tackles (15 solos) and 3.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage.
As a junior, --NAME-- again served as the linebacker unit's chief backup, in addition to leading the special teams squad. He started vs. Arizona State at the weak-side position, going on to record 44 tackles (26 solos) with a pair of sacks and 4.5 stops for loss. He also caused a fumble and broke up two passes.
In 2008, --NAME-- became the full-time starter at weak-side linebacker. The second-team All-Pac 10 Conference selection and Rose Bowl Defensive MVP registered a career-high 66 tackles (41 solos), ranking third on the team. He delivered 7.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage, deflected five passes and intercepted another.
Asked what he learned from the long list of linebackers he played with at USC, --NAME-- said, "I have learned a lot just watching them. How they play, how they are always in the backfield. Their passion for the ball, physically taking control, that is how I try to play."
2006: Did not play vs. Arkansas (9/02) after suffering a shoulder sprain in August camp.
2009: Could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine due to a right knee sprain.
Attended Baldwin (Wailuku, Hi.) High School, earning Super Prep All-American, Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Tom Lemming All-West, Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West honorable mention, Tacoma News Tribune Western 100, Orange County Register Fab 15, Gatorade Hawaii Player of the Year, Honolulu Advertiser All-State, All-Maui Interscholastic League Defensive Player of the Year and All-League honors as a senior linebacker Recorded 147 tackles, 39 stops for loss, eight sacks, eight forced fumbles and five blocked kicks in 2004, as well as a punt return for a touchdown As a junior in 2003, he was a Honolulu Advertiser All-State pick as he posted 157 tackles, 22 tackles for loss and eight sacks Also participated in soccer and boxing at Baldwin.
Shorter than scouts would like, but has a solid build with room for additional growth.   Instinctive defender.   Reads the action and puts himself in position to make the play.   Good lateral agility.   Can elude blockers and break down in space to make the open-field tackle.   Gets good depth on his pass drops and is a cognizant pass defender.   Reads the quarterback's eyes and gets a good break on the ball to break up the pass.   Good special-teams performer.
Lacks the bulk to hold up at the point of attack.   Can be washed out by athletic tackles.   Relies on his agility to avoid blockers, as he struggles to disengage.   Only has one season as the starter.   Surrounded by so much talent at USC that his mistakes were minimized.   Missed time during spring drills prior to the 2008 season due to surgery on his thumb and wrist.
FREDDIE KEIAHO, Indianapolis -- Like Keiaho, --NAME--'s ability to play a variety of linebacker positions and also perform on special teams makes him an inviting late second-day pickup for a team looking for depth, but he is not starting material. He is too undersized to stand up to the rigors in the trenches. He has above average quickness, agility and decent short-area pass coverage skills, but his size prevents him from generating good success playing inside the box. He lacks pass rush moves top impact the pocket, but is best playing on the move, as he gets engulfed too often when taking on offensive linemen in the trenches. He could possible shift to strong safety, but poor play in zone coverage will make him a liability there.
-------------------------
Mohamed_Massaquoi 80664 50
After three seasons of frustration due to his penchant for dropping easy passes, everything seemed to come together for --NAME-- during his final season. He equaled his touchdown receptions from his first three years in 2008 en route to capturing All-Southeastern Conference first-team honors for the first time during his four years with the Bulldogs. 
Playing for a team that generally relied on its running attack, --NAME-- not only helped the development of All-American quarterback Matthew Stafford but also showed his team-first attitude and work ethic, taking A.J. Green under his wing. The freshman flanker teamed with the senior split end to give Georgia one of the most explosive receiving tandems in the South. Both players combined to pull down 114 passes for 1,883 yards and 16 touchdowns (team generated 3,610 yards and 27 scores on 246 catches).
--NAME-- also excelled in the classroom during his time at Georgia. He was the recipient of the James W. and Elizabeth Plant Football Scholarship as a true freshman. In 2007, he was awarded the Leon Farmer Athletic Scholarship, given for excellent in academics and on the field. As a senior, he earned Southeastern Conference Academic Honor Roll and Director's Honor Roll distinction, was named one of the school's Scholar-Athletes and was a candidate for the Lowe's Senior CLASS Award.
At Independence High School, --NAME-- earned Parade, Super Prep and EA Sports All-American honors in 2004. He was a member of the Super Prep All-Mid Atlantic team and was named Southeast Region Player of the Year by EA Sports. The three-time Associated Press All-State pick added All-Southern accolades from the Sun Sentinel and was a finalist for the Watkins Award, which recognizes African-American Scholar Athletes.
--NAME-- was rated the fourth-best receiver in the country by Rivals.com after the team captain amassed 1,834 yards receiving in his final campaign. He set the state of North Carolina records for career receiving yards (4,851), receiving yards in a season (1,834 in 2004), touchdown catches in a career (76), and touchdown catches in a season (32 as a senior). He finished his career with 272 receptions and helped his team win 77 consecutive games and five consecutive state championships. After the 2004 season, he played in the 
Shrine Bowl of the Carolinas before reporting to the University of Georgia.
In 2005, --NAME-- played in 13 games, starting four contests. He gained 505 yards with two touchdowns on 38 catches (13.3 avg), earning Freshman All-American honorable mention from The Sporting News. He was also the recipient of the team's Offensive Newcomer of the Year Award after helping the Bulldogs capture the Southeastern Conference title while compiling a 10-3 record.
With Sean Bailey injured in fall camp, --NAME-- was being counted upon to pick up the receiving slack in 2006. But a hamstring injury sidelined him for the Alabama-Birmingham clash and his knack for dropping too many easy passes finally forced the staff to bench him. 
He would go on to start nine of the 12 games he appeared in that year, gaining 366 yards with two touchdowns on a team-high 30 receptions. --NAME--'s struggles continued throughout the 2007 preseason, forcing the coaches to bench him for the first two games. Inconsistency continued after catching just one pass in each of the previous two games before the team's crucial meeting vs. Florida, and he was again residing on the sidelines with the second unit.
--NAME--'s only catch in that Florida contest was a beautiful 84-yard touchdown and that gave him another opportunity to return to the lineup. He would go on to start in his final 18 games as a Bulldog. He finished his junior season with 32 receptions for 491 yards, adding 12 yards on a reverse while making a tackle for a 20-yard loss in the Oklahoma State clash.
Academic and athletic honors came --NAME--'s way in 2008. The split end no longer had to worry about getting benched, as he went on to start all 13 contests. He led the Bulldogs with a career-high 58 receptions for 920 yards (15.9 avg) and eight touchdowns. He also took a few direct snaps from under center, but failed to complete any of the two passes he attempted. His 920 yards receiving were good for fourth on the school single-season record list.
2006: Sat out the Alabama-Birmingham game (9/16) with a hamstring pull.
2008: Left the Tennessee game (10/11) briefly after taking a helmet-to-helmet hit, but returned to catch a touchdown pass on that series.
2009: Forced to pull out of the Senior Bowl (1/22) due to a grade-one ankle sprain.
Attended Independence (Charlotte, N.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Bill Guiler Earned Parade, Super Prep and EA Sports All-American honors in 2004 Was a member of the Super Prep All-Mid Atlantic team and was named Southeast Region Player of the Year by EA Sports Three-time Associated Press All-State pick Added All-Southern accolades from the Sun Sentinel and was a finalist for the Watkins Award, which recognizes African-American Scholar Athletes Rated the fourth-best receiver in the country by Rivals.com after the team captain amassed 1,834 yards receiving in his final campaign Set the state of North Carolina records for career receiving yards (4,851), receiving yards in a season (1,834 in 2004), touchdown catches in a career (76), and touchdown catches in a season (32 as a senior) Finished his career with 272 receptions and helped his team win 77 consecutive games and five consecutive state championships After the 2004 season, he played in the Shrine Bowl of the Carolinas before reporting to the University of Georgia.
Prototypical NFL build for the position. Good height and surprising overall musculature with the frame to add additional mass. Possesses at least adequate straight-line speed to challenge deep. Can throttle down to separate from defenders. Long arms which he extends well to make the tough reception. Flashes good leaping ability and body control to snatch high passes out of the air. Good vision for the cutback. Good elusiveness for a receiver of his size. Good size and strength to run through arm tackles and create positive yardage after the reception. Stepped up his level of play as a senior. Became a vocal and on-field leader as a senior.
Simply drops too many passes. Prone to lapses in concentration or not looking the pass into his hands before trying to make a defender miss. Allows passes into his frame too often, resulting in some ugly bounce-backs. Bit of a long-strider with build-up speed. Lacks elite foot quickness and agility to consistently gain separation from NFL-caliber cornerbacks. Tends to disappear for long stretches.
-------------------------
Fili_Moala 80666 56
Statistics do not always tell the true value a player brings to a team, and --NAME-- is a perfect example. Much of the success of the Trojans' defense over the past three years has been because of their linebackers having free reign to constantly blitz the opposition's backfield. In order for USC to accomplish that feat as well as it has, the Trojans needed a dominating force to control the middle of the field. Much like his cousin, former Oregon defensive tackle Haloti Ngata (2002-05), now with the NFL's Baltimore Ravens, --NAME-- more than capably filled that role. 
When one examines the --NAME--'s college career, they should not look at 90 tackles in 52 games. What numbers really tell the true story is the progression of the defense in the national rankings with --NAME-- starting. 
During his freshman season as a reserve, the Trojans ranked 31st in the nation in rush defense (130.54 ypg), 48th in total defense (360.92 ypg) and 35th in scoring defense (22.85 ppg). In his first year as a starter, USC improved to ninth in the nation vs. the run (91.08 ypg), 20th in total defense (295.85 ypg) and 11th in scoring defense (15.15 ppg). As a junior, USC continued to move up the national charts, finishing fourth vs. the run (84.15 ypg), second in total defense (273.15 ypg) and second in scoring defense (16.0 ppg) in 2007. 
In his final season, the Trojans allowed just 87.38 yards per game on the ground (fifth in the NCAA), ranking second in the country in total defense (221.77 ypg) while leading the major colleges in scoring defense (9.0 ppg). Coach Pete Carroll recently said, "--NAME-- is difficult to block. Plus, the experience and leadership he brings is really valuable." 
At Western High School, an early-season foot ligament injury sidelined --NAME-- for all but two of his senior season games. He still earned 2002 Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Tom Lemming All-West and Tacoma News Tribune Western 100 honors as a two-way lineman. As a junior, he was named All-CIF Division IX and All-League while posting 60 tackles and four sacks. 
--NAME-- originally signed with Southern California in 2003, but did not qualify for admission. He attended Cypress (Calif.) Junior College that semester as a part-time student (did not play football there). He joined the Trojans in 2004, where he was named their Service Team Defensive Player of the Year, retaining freshman eligibility.
In 2006, --NAME-- started three early-season games at nose guard for an injured Sedrick Ellis. He later shifted to weak-side defensive tackle, starting the final seven contests. He earned Sophomore All-American and All-Pac 10 Conference honorable mention, posting 20 tackles (10 solos) with 2.5 sacks, seven stops for losses and four pass deflections.
--NAME-- started all 13 games at weak-side tackle during his junior campaign. He was a first-team All-Pac 10 Conference choice. He missed a good portion of spring drills with a left ankle sprain, but was fully recovered by the season opener. He went on to register a career-high 32 tackles (14 solos) that included 2.5 sacks and 5.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage.
--NAME-- received All-American recognition, in addition to picking up first-team All-Pac 10 and team Defensive Lineman of the Year honors. The Senior Bowl invitee started all 13 games, ending his career with a sting of 33 consecutive starts. He delivered 30 tackles (16 solos) with a career-high 10 stops for losses, including 4.5 sacks. He also caused a fumble and blocked a pair of kicks.
Originally signed with USC in 2003, but did not qualify for admission, so he attended Cypress (Calif.) Junior College in 2003 as a part-time student (he didn't play football there).
2002: Missed all but two games of his high school senior season with a ligament tear in his left foot.
2007: Sat out a good portion of spring drills with a left ankle sprain.
2009: Could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine due to a left groin strain.
Attended Western (Anaheim, Cal.) High School An early-season foot ligament injury sidelined --NAME-- for all but two of his senior season games Still earned 2002 Super Prep All-Farwest, Prep Star All-West, Tom Lemming All-West and Tacoma News Tribune Western 100 honors as a two-way lineman As a junior, he was named All-CIF Division IX and All-League while posting 60 tackles and four sacks.
--NAME-- lacks sudden closing speed, but shows good lateral quickness and above average footwork, along with the agility and balance to change direction and flow down the line. He is strong on the inside gap charge and can dominate with his hand swipes. He has a nice combination of power and quickness to stack and shed. --NAME-- might lack sprinter's legs in pursuit, but shows good body control working in space. He is a normal-to-short strider who has a good short burst to gain penetration. He still looks lanky, despite being 300 pounds and has the frame to carry at least another 20-25 pounds of additional bulk. He is quick to recognize blocking schemes and locate the ball.
He needs to improve his overall strength and hand usage. He lacks the foot speed to make opposite field tackles, but shows relentlessness in his play and will make the second effort when his initial move fails. He just needs to play under better control, as he does get frustrated when stood up by the blockers, but that is his own fault, as he will get too tall at times and lose leverage. He will need to add bulk and strength to compete at the next level, but does respond well to hard coaching.
BARRY COFIELD, New York Giants -- Like Cofield, --NAME-- can't be judged on personal statistics, but needs to be reviewed based on the success of the team because he is a classic mauler in the middle of the field. His constant double-team battles led to USC's linebackers having great success being freed to wreak havoc in the backfield. He is quick to get position, redirect and extend his arms to stalk, wrap and secure the ball carrier in run containment. He reminds a lot of the Cofield because of his lateral agility, change of direction and dominance when he slides down and plays over the center. He still needs some technique refinement, but if he can improve his overall strength base, he will be a solid supporting role player for a defense looking for someone to handle the inside trash.
-------------------------
Captain_Munnerlyn 80668 216
Regarded as one of the Southeastern Conference's rising stars at cornerback, --NAME-- had a forgetful final season in a Gamecocks uniform that resulted in a benching and eventual dressing down by the coaching staff after he and several other underclassmen did not perform to their expected level of play. 
Coming back from a 2007 left foot fracture, the multi-talented athlete manned the right cornerback position and also performed on special teams. He was benched for the 2009 Mississippi game after he missed a team meeting/weight training session. He batted a toe sprain later in the year, but was also taken to task by the staff.
Head coach Steve Spurrier questioned the effort level of several of the Gamecocks' NFL Draft prospects in the loss at Clemson. Spurrier benched junior tight end Jared Cook for the second half, saying the Gamecocks' leading receiver did not appear to be into the game. The staff also cited strong safety Emanuel Cook and --NAME--.
"A few guys aren't playing quite like they did early in the year. I think that was obvious," Spurrier said. "It's disappointing. Football season's a long time. Teams either get better or worse. I thought we were getting better after the Arkansas game, and then it seems like we've taken a down turn since then." 
At Murphy High School, --NAME-- was named to the Alabama Sports Writers Association All-State team. The three-time All-Region selection participated in the Junior All-Star Game and Pigskin Classic in Hawaii, and was also a track participant at the Junior Olympics. As a senior, he led the football team to a 10-2 record and a Class 6A Regional runner-up finish. He also competed in track, clocking a career-best 10.53 in the 100-meter and 22.43 in the 200-meter dashes.
--NAME-- enrolled at South Carolina in 2006, turning down scholarship offers from Kansas State and West Virginia. He started five games at right cornerback, including the final four contests as a true freshman. He recorded 36 tackles (27 solos), as he picked off two passes and deflected five others. The 170-pounder also averaged 23.2 yards on 12 kickoff returns. He sat out the Wofford clash after he was hospitalized for several days with a right forearm infection.
In 2007, --NAME-- was named All-Southeastern Conference first-team by the league's coaches. He started 10 games, missing the season finale vs. Clemson while appearing in just one series vs. Florida after suffering a broken bone in his left foot vs. Arkansas. His presence in the secondary helped the Gamecocks improve their 43rd-ranked pass defense from 2006 to a fourth place finish (168.75 ypg) in 2007.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- ranked seventh on the team with 47 tackles (40 solos), including two stops for loss. He caused and recovered a fumble, broke up four passes and picked off three others. He finished seventh in the SEC with a 9.17-yard average on 18 punt returns and gained 258 yards (21.5 avg) on 12 kickoff returns.
--NAME-- sat out 2008 spring drills to continue his left foot rehabilitation. He started 12 times at right cornerback, again ranking seventh on the squad with 44 tackles (29 solos). He registered two sacks and caused one fumble. He returned one of two fumble recoveries 38 yards for a score and deflected five passes. He averaged 6.6 yards on 18 punt returns and 24.2 yards on nine kickoff returns, including an 84-yarder that was the longest return by a Gamecock since 1997.
2006: Sat out the Wofford game (9/16) after he was hospitalized several days with a right forearm infection.
2007: Suffered a left foot fracture vs. Arkansas (11/03), seeing action for just one play the following week vs. Florida (11/10) and missed the season finale vs. Clemson (11/24).
2008: Suffered a sprained big toe in practice prior to the Clemson clash (11/29).
Attended Murphy (Mobile, Ala.) High School, playing football for head coach Ron Lee Named to the Alabama Sports Writers Association All-State team The three-time All-Region selection participated in the Junior All-Star Game and Pigskin Classic in Hawaii, and was also a track participant at the Junior Olympics As a senior, he led the football team to a 10-2 record and a Class 6A Regional runner-up finish Also competed in track, clocking a career-best 10.53 in the 100-meter and 22.43 in the 200-meter dashes.
Short, but has a legitimate NFL body.   Rare straight-line speed and agility.   Loose hips to turn and run with receivers.   Good explosiveness out of his cuts.   Closes quickly and gets his hands on passes.   Soft hands for the interception and can high-point passes.   Good body control to contort in space and make the athletic catch.   Good returner with experience fielding both punts and kicks.   Plays with a bit of a chip on his shoulder.   Not afraid to mix it up with the big boys and is willing in run support.   Reliable open-field tackler who flashes surprising explosiveness as a hitter.   Has forced three fumbles.
Might be too short to play outside.   Inconsistent.   Relies on his natural ability and can be beaten with double-moves.   Experienced in zone coverage, but his playmaking skills might make him a better fit in man.   Has struggled a bit with durability, missing time in at least one game each of his three years.   Missed time as a junior with flu-like symptoms, as a sophomore with a broken foot, and as a freshman due to an infection in his right arm.
-------------------------
Louis_Murphy 80670 124
The two-sport standout might have been overshadowed by teammates Percy Harvin and Tim Tebow and seldom used in the team's spread offense, but most scouts feel this speedster has some of the best deep threat ability in the 2009 NFL Draft receiver crop. Known more for his track exploits as a sprinter coming out of the prep ranks, --NAME-- patiently waited two seasons before he was given an opportunity to show off his football skills, making 73 of his career 75 receptions during his junior and senior campaigns.
Flying under the radar is nothing new to --NAME--. The Lakwood High School team captain and three-year starter competed as a winged-T option quarterback, twice earning team MVP honors on offense and once on special teams. He shifted to wide receiver during his senior campaign, as Rivals.com rated him the 37th-best receiver prospect in the country during his short tenure at that position. 
In his only year at that spot, --NAME-- had 26 receptions for 520 yards and three touchdowns. He also returned one kick return and one punt return for touchdowns. His most memorable moment on the gridiron was taking the ball as quarterback and running up the middle of the field to score a 50-yard touchdown during his first year playing football.
--NAME-- received much more attention for his exploits on the prep track. He ran as the anchor on a 4x400 relay on the Lakewood squad, winning the state championship as a sophomore. He also played basketball for the Spartans at power forward.
--NAME-- enrolled at the University of Florida in 2005, turning down scholarship offers from Tennessee, Florida State and --NAME--ville. A St. Petersburg native, he wanted to go to Miami but was never recruited by the Hurricanes and wound up at Florida. 
As a freshman, he appeared in nine games, but was relegated to special teams duty in 2005. His only statistic registered was a solo tackle vs. Mississippi State. As a sophomore, he was deep down on the depth chart, seeing action in 12 games. He recorded three solo tackles and caught two passes for 42 yards, including a 35-yard score vs. --NAME--iana State.
As a junior, --NAME-- started 10 games as the team's flanker. He finished third on the squad with 37 receptions for 548 yards (14.8 avg) and five touchdowns. He added 12 yards on a reverse and 41 yards on three kickoff returns (13.7 avg), averaging 52.85 all-purpose yards per game. He was the only Gator to catch art least one pass in each of the team's 13 contests. He also competed on Florida's track team after the season, clocking a personal best 6.36 seconds in the 55-meter dash at the Tom Jones Memorial Classic.
--NAME-- was named team captain for the 2008 season. He changed from jersey Number 82 to Number 9 prior to the season opener, going on to rank second on the squad with 38 catches for 655 yards (17.2 avg) and seven touchdowns. He attempted a pass vs. Florida State and also saw time on the punt coverage team, as he averaged 47.29 all-purpose yards per game.
2008: --NAME-- suffered a sprained right ankle in August camp (8/11) and spent a week wearing a protective boot on his foot.
2009: --NAME-- missed the Senior Bowl due to a minor procedure to clean out cartilage in his knee.
Attended Lakewood (St. Petersburg, Fla.) High School Team captain and three-year starter Competed as a winged-T option quarterback, twice earning team MVP honors on offense and once on special teams Shifted to wide receiver during his senior campaign, as Rivals.com rated him the 37th-best receiver prospect in the country during his short tenure at that position In his only year at that spot, --NAME-- had 26 receptions for 520 yards and three touchdowns Also returned one kickoff and one punt for touchdowns His most memorable moment on the gridiron was taking the ball as quarterback and running up the middle of the field to score a 50-yard touchdown during his first year playing football Ran as the anchor on a 4x400 relay on the Lakewood squad, winning the state championship as a sophomore Also played basketball for the Spartans at power forward.
Good height and long arms. Excellent speed downfield, and he can use his arms to create separation against smaller corners. Fast off the line, getting to top speed quickly. Elusive with the ball in his hands, and can change directions well. Lines up in the slot and outside. Good head fake on slant routes, as he plants and accelerates well. Good on shallow crossing routes, using his speed to get extra yardage.
Slight build and not very physical. Might struggle to get off press coverage and fight for inside position against stronger NFL corners. Ball security may be an issue, as he loses control on big hits. Must prove he can high-point and win a jump ball. Inconsistent using hands to snatch the ball, and will body-catch too often. Does not attack corners to block on run plays or screens, as he hesitates and allows them to get into the play. Will get a hand on someone for a second, but is inconsistent sustaining blocks on the outside.
-------------------------
Hakeem_Nicks 80672 29
The first Tar Heel underclassman to declare for the NFL Draft since defensive end Julius Peppers in 2001, --NAME-- left his mark in the school and Atlantic Coast Conference record books before bolting for the National Football League. He established North Carolina career records for receptions (181), receiving yards (2,840) and touchdown catches (21). He also holds the school single-season records with twelve touchdown receptions and 1,222 yards receiving in 2008, having set the single-season record for catches (74) the previous year.
--NAME--' numbers also found him ranking 13th all-time in the Atlantic Coast Conference for receptions and 11th for receiving yards. Among active ACC players, his 10 100-yard receiving performances tops the league, as his 181 receptions rank second and his 2,840 yards is a league best. 
--NAME-- was a Super Prep and EA Sports first-team All-American at Independence High School, where he was ranked the eighth-best player in North Carolina and the 22nd-best wide receiver in the country by Super Prep as a senior. He was named MVP of the Class 4-AA state championship game after leading Independence (15-0) to a 38-19 win over New Bern, coming up with eight receptions for 205 yards and two touchdowns (11 and 80 yards) in Independence's 92nd consecutive victory. He never lost a game in his high school career. 
--NAME-- was a North Carolina Associated Press All-State and Charlotte Observer Offensive Player of the Year choice. Rivals.com rated him the state's fourth-best prospect as he received membership to North Carolina's Shrine Bowl team, where he caught a 37-yard touchdown pass among his three catches for 42 yards. In his final season, he led the state with 93 receptions for 1,819 yards and 20 touchdowns, including 10 in the playoffs. That year, he had three straight games with 10 or more catches. 
As a true freshman at North Carolina, --NAME-- earned Freshman All-American and Freshman All-ACC first-team honors from The Sporting News. He started all 11 games he appeared in, sitting out the South Florida clash with an ankle sprain. He led the team and set school single-season records for freshman, catching 39 passes for 660 yards (16.9 avg) that included four touchdowns. His average of 60.0 yards receiving per game ranked third in the conference.
In 2007, --NAME-- earned All-ACC first-team and All-American honorable mention from The NFL Draft Report. He set the school single-season record with 74 receptions, gaining 958 yards (12.9 avg) with five touchdowns. He went over 100 receiving yards three times as a sophomore and had at least five catches in 10 contests, ranking third in the league with an average of 6.17 catches and second with 79.83 yards receiving per game.
As a junior, --NAME-- was again named All-American honorable mention and All-ACC first-team. For the third time, he paced the Tar Heels with 68 catches, setting school single-season records with 1,222 yards (18.0 avg) and 12 touchdowns. He also picked up 34 yards and a score on six reverses and helped out on special teams, returning seven kickoffs for 134 yards (19.0 avg) to go with two solo tackles.
2006: Sat out the South Florida game (10/18) with an ankle sprain.
2007: Missed part of the second half of the South Carolina clash (10/13) with a high ankle sprain.
Attended Independence (Charlotte, N.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Tommy Knotts Super Prep and EA Sports first-team All-American Ranked the eighth-best player in North Carolina and the 22nd-best wide receiver in the country by Super Prep as a senior Named MVP of the Class 4-AA state championship game after leading Independence (15-0) to a 38-19 win over New Bern, coming up with eight receptions for 205 yards and two touchdowns (11 and 80 yards) in Independence's 92nd consecutive victory. He never lost a game in his high school career North Carolina Associated Press All-State and Charlotte Observer Offensive Player of the Year choice Rivals.com rated him the state's fourth-best prospect as he received membership to North Carolina's Shrine Bowl team, where he caught a 37-yard touchdown pass among his three catches for 42 yards.   In his final season, he led the state with 93 receptions for 1,819 yards and 20 touchdowns, including 10 in the playoffs That year, he had three straight games with 10 or more catches.
Passes the eyeball test. Good initial quickness off the snap. Good strength and lateral agility to fight through press coverage. Sneaky downfield speed. Good burst out of his breaks to generate separation, especially on slants. Rare body control for a player of his size. Can contort his body in space to make the spectacular reception. Sticky hands. Can snatch out of the air or absorb with his body when he feels an impending big hit. Knows where the sidelines, down markers and, most important, end zone are. Good height and leaping ability for the fade. Rare strength, balance and agility to turn short and intermediate catches into long gains. Good vision to cut back against the grain. Improved with each year of experience. Might just be scratching the surface of his potential.
Questionable deep speed. May lack the top-end speed to challenge defensive backs over the top, allowing savvy NFL defenders to close off the crossing routes on which --NAME-- generated much of his success. One of three legitimate NFL-caliber receivers for the Tar Heels, and capitalized on defenses spread thin.
-------------------------
Chris_Ogbonnaya 80674 211
One of the better stories in college football, --NAME-- finally got his chance to shine after Jamaal Charles declared for the 2008 draft. He entered his senior season having carried the ball only 66 times in three years and switching from tailback to receiver and back multiple times. 
In Texas' Colt McCoy-driven offense (the quarterback was the leading passer and rusher), --NAME-- only managed 73 rushes for 373 yards and four scores n 2008, but his 46 catches for 540 yards and three touchdowns also caught scouts' eyes. His play on coverage units also makes him a draft-able prospect. Had an arm span of 31 5/8 inches and a hand span of 9 7/8 inches at the combine.
Coached by Ron Counter at Strake Jesuit   Three-year letterman who helped his team post a 27-5 record during that time   A versatile athlete who was Strake Jesuit's leading rusher, receiver and defensive back in helping his squad to a 9-2 mark as a senior   Made 20 catches for 500 yards and four touchdowns with 270 yards rushing and two TDs that year   Caught 22 passes for 530 yards and eight TDs with 500 yards rushing and eight more TDs as a junior   Also returned a kickoff for a TD that year   Led his team to an 8-3 record as a junior   Earned Greater Houston Offensive Player of the Year honors that season   Also had 57 tackles, three TFL and eight PBUs as a cornerback in 2002   Made four receptions for 115 yards and ran for a 70-yard TD vs. Bay City as a junior   Had 30 receptions for 600 yards and 10 TDs and added five interceptions from his cornerback spot for a 10-0 squad his sophomore year   Lettered in basketball for two years and was a senior captain   Also lettered in track & field for three years.
Passes the eyeball test. Patient, one-cut runner who can attack the hole when it is there. Some wiggle in open space for a big back. Will lower his shoulder and bowl over the unsuspecting defender. Rare hands and experience as a route-runner due to his time at wide receiver. Physical blocker. Packs a pop and gives good effort to sustain. High effort player. Good locker room presence.
Bit of a "tweener." Lacks the bulk for fullback, the all-around skills to be more than a secondary running back and the straight-line speed to move back to wide receiver. Isn't a nimble back who can consistently make something out of nothing. Has to take a few steps to generate his power. Runs a bit upright, leaving him prone to big hits and limiting his own power. Marginal speed to get to the second level. Can be caught from behind.
-------------------------
Christopher_Owens 80678 90
In his three seasons as the Spartans' starting right cornerback, --NAME-- was overshadowed by fellow cornerbacks Dwight Lowery and Coye Francies. But opponents paid him plenty of respect, rarely challenging him on deep routes.
--NAME-- is regarded as one of the West's top coverage cornerbacks, evident by his ability to shut down the speedy wideouts or the much bigger and physical receivers with equal effectiveness. He started each of his final 37 games, allowing an opponent to catch just one touchdown on him during that span. He would go on to register 13 interceptions as a Spartan, the fourth-highest total in school history.
At Dorsey High School, --NAME-- lettered three times for the football team. He paced the team with five interceptions during his senior campaign and was rewarded with first-team All-League honors.
Looking to stay close to home, --NAME-- did not get much recruiting attention from UCLA or Southern California and opted to enroll at San Jose State in 2005. He played behind Trestin George most of the season at left cornerback, earning his first starting assignment vs. Nevada. He picked off a pair of passes and deflected two others while producing 35 tackles (18 solos).
With the arrival of junior college All-American Dwight Lowery in 2006, --NAME-- secured the right cornerback position with Lowery taking over the left side. The two combined to pick off 13 passes, with --NAME-- tallying four interceptions, along with five pass breakups. He also delivered 50 tackles (33 solos) that included a sack and caused one fumble.
Despite leading the Western Athletic Conference and ranking 12th in the nation with six interceptions in 2007, --NAME-- only earned All-WAC second-team honors. He was one of the few bright spots for a defense that regressed from the previous season, as the secondary allowed 242.58 yards per game, 78th in the nation. He posted a career-high 75 tackles (41 solos) that ranked third on the team, also breaking up three throws.
With Lowery having graduated, he was replaced in the lineup by Oregon transfer Francies, who captured the headlines with his early season play. Still, it was --NAME-- that opposing offensive coordinators feared most. They stopped throwing to his side for fear of the big turnover, resulting in the senior coming up with just one interception. But he also knocked down eight passes and was excellent in run support, making three stops behind the line of scrimmage, two forced fumbles and 68 tackles (40 solos), as the team captain finally received well deserved All-WAC first-team honors in 2008.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Dorsey (Los Angeles, Cal.) High School, playing football for head coach Paul Knox Paced the team with five interceptions during his senior campaign and was rewarded with first-team All-League honors.
Plays bigger than his size.   Good straight-line speed.   Shows a late burst to recover if beaten initially.   Flashes a good initial pop on the receiver.   Aggressive in run support.   Willing to fight through trash to make the stop at or near the line of scrimmage.   Quick, active hands to break up passes.   Good leaping ability and times his leaps well.   Natural hands for the interception and can track over his shoulder.   Mentally tough.   Durable.   Started 38 games.
Doesn't back down from the physical challenge of bigger receivers, but simply is too short to handle their height in jump-ball situations.   Adequate hip flexibility.   Loses a step in his transition and isn't explosive out of his breaks.   Allows separation and isn't big or strong enough to get back around the receiver to knock away accurate passes.
-------------------------
Jerraud_Powers 80680 92
One of the most underrated cornerbacks in college football, --NAME-- decided to venture to the National Football League in 2009 rather than return to the Tigers, who underwent a coaching change. An experienced two-year starter, he lined up at both cornerback positions during his career, as his blanket pass coverage reminded fans of former Tigers standout Carlos Rogers (now with the Washington Redskins).
Since arriving on Auburn's campus, the Tigers' secondary ranked among the nation's elite, even during their losing season in 2008. Before --NAME-- joined the program, Auburn ranked 32nd in the nation vs. the pass in 2005, allowing 199.0 yards per game. The Tigers  improved to 14th in the country during Power's first season (168.15 ypg) and in his first year as a starter, the unit placed sixth in the NCAA (173.23 ypg). 
--NAME-- attended Decatur High School, where he was ranked among the state's top 30 prospects, according to Scout.com. He was named All-Decatur, All-Region and Class 4A-6A All-Area as a senior. He added Montgomery Advertiser and Alabama Sports Writers Association's All-State honors. He was an honorable mention All-Southern Football Team choice by the Orlando Sentinel and a member of the Mobile Register Super Southeast 120 squad, in addition to making the Rivals.com Alabama Top 25 unit.
--NAME-- was selected to Tom Lemming's All-Southeast, Super Prep's All-Dixie and Prep Star's All-Region team. He accumulated 46 tackles, four interceptions and forced two fumbles as a senior, leading his team to the second round of the playoffs. He compiled 44 tackles, four interceptions and added 209 receiving yards and three touchdowns as a junior. He also lettered in basketball, averaged 15 points a game for his career.
--NAME-- enrolled at Auburn in 2005, spending the season performing on the scout team. Despite not starting any of the 13 games he played in during 2006, he was named to the Freshman All-Southeastern Conference squad. He was the team's top reserve, seeing action at free safety and right cornerback. He produced 26 tackles (20 solos) with a stop for a loss and a fumble recovery. He blocked a punt and also deflected four passes.
In 2007, --NAME-- shifted to left cornerback, starting all 13 games. He was the recipient of the Zeke Smith Award, presented each year to Auburn's Defensive Player of the Year. He intercepted four passes and deflected five others, as he caused a fumble and advanced a fumble recovery 36 yards. 
He did not allow an opponent to catch any passes in four contests and allowed no touchdowns while posting 63 tackles (45 solos) and had four stops behind the line of scrimmage. Late in the season, he suffered a strange injury as he was bitten on the left hand by a security guard dog that was patrolling the sidelines during the Alabama contest.
After an incomplete pass in the back of the end zone late in the game, --NAME-- was turning back toward the field when a security dog bit his left hand. --NAME--, who also came through with a critical end-zone interception earlier in the game, was able to play the rest of the game. "The interception will be the first thing they talk about," --NAME-- said. "But the second will be, 'What about that German Shepherd in the back of the end zone?' Everyone said, 'Why didn't you kick the dog?' I was like, 'There were three more dogs barking at me.' I'm embarrassed to talk about it. I didn't even think a German Shepherd would be on the back line of the end zone. He got all of my hand, I know that."  
The 2009 All-SEC second-team pick was bothered by a hamstring pull that saw him miss two late-season games vs. Arkansas and Mississippi. He started 10 games at right cornerback, ranking sixth on the team with 47 tackles (30 solos). He intercepted two passes and deflected seven others, as he again held the opposition to no receptions in four contests.
2007: Was bitten on his left hand by a security guard dog on the sidelines of the Alabama game (11/24).
2008: Suffered a hamstring pull vs. Vanderbilt (10/04), missing the next game vs. Arkansas (10/11) Returned vs. West Virginia (10/23), but re-injured his hamstring and sat out the following week vs. Mississippi (11/01).
Attended Decatur (Ala.) High School Ranked among the state's top 30 prospects, according to Scout.com Named All-Decatur, All-Region and Class 4A-6A All-Area as a senior Added Montgomery Advertiser and Alabama Sports Writers Association's All-State honors Honorable mention All-Southern Football Team choice by the Orlando Sentinel and a member of the Mobile Register Super Southeast 120 squad, in addition to making the Rivals.com Alabama Top 25 unit Selected to Tom Lemming's All-Southeast, Super Prep's All-Dixie and Prep Star's All-Region team Accumulated 46 tackles, four interceptions and forced two fumbles as a senior, leading his team to the second round of the playoffs Compiled 44 tackles, four interceptions, and added 209 receiving yards and three touchdowns as a junior Also lettered in basketball, averaged 15 points a game for his career.
Short, but has a legitimate NFL build.   At least adequate deep speed.   Flashes an aggressive initial hand punch at the line of scrimmage.   Good hip swivel to turn and run with receivers.   Good agility and quickness out of his breaks to close on the ball.   Peeks back at the quarterback and is willing to gamble.   Can adjust his body in space to make the athletic interception.   Rides receivers throughout the route and isn't intimidated by bigger receivers.   Reliable open-field tackler who flashes some pop.   Good agility to avoid blocks.
Might be too short to handle working on the outside.   Good open-field tackler, who flashes some pop, but his physicality hasn't translated into forced fumbles.   Can be too aggressive.   Has a tendency to bite on the fake and lacks the elite burst to recover when beaten initially.   Fought a nagging hamstring pull as a junior.
-------------------------
Brian_Robiskie 80682 36
Much like his father, Terry, a former NFL player and present assistant coach with Atlanta, --NAME-- is the consummate team player. Having grown up in a football environment, he showed great maturity upon his arrival on OSU's campus as a true freshman, nailing down a spot on special teams while patiently waiting his turn behind a veteran-laden receiving unit.
As a sophomore, he forced his way into the lineup for five games before finally getting his opportunity as a full-time starter during his junior and senior campaigns. Blessed with what scouts feel are some of the best hands in the collegiate ranks, he went on to haul in 127 passes, the eighth-best career total by a Buckeye. His 1,866 yards receiving also put him on Ohio State's Top 10 List. 
It was the importance of those catches that made --NAME-- stand out, as 24 of his receptions were good for touchdowns, the fourth-highest total in school history. In addition to his exploits on the football field, he did just as well in the classroom, becoming a Draddy Award finalist, earning an $18,000 post-graduate scholarship from the National Football Foundation.
At Chagrin Falls High School, --NAME-- earned first-team All-Ohio honors as a senior. He set school career receiving records with 118 catches for 1,885 yards and 34 touchdowns. As a senior, he snatched 47 passes for 754 yards and 12 touchdowns. He also scored on a 95-yard punt return and an interception return and averaged 14.9 yards per punt return, leading the squad to a 9-3 overall record and the conference championship in 2004. 
--NAME-- was used mostly on special teams during his first year at Ohio State, playing in all 12 contests. On his only reception for the season, he showed the greatness to come, catching the ball in a crowd and then knifing through a pair of would-be tacklers on a 13-yard grab.
Patiently waiting for his chance to play on offense, --NAME-- shared split end duties with Roy Hall in 2006, where he was part of a receiving corps that featured future NFL first-rounders, Ted Ginn Jr. and Anthony Gonzalez. He finished third on the squad with 29 receptions for 383 yards (13.2 avg) and five touchdowns.
With Hall also off to the National Football League, --NAME-- became the team's featured receiver in 2007, starting all 13 games at split end. He earned Academic All-American honors and despite being a semifinalist for the Biletnikoff Award and a finalist for the Arthur Ashe Sports Scholar Award, the team's Paul Warfield Award winner (given to the outstanding receiver) received just one first-team All-Big Ten Conference honor, coming from The NFL Draft Report (Rivals.com named him to the second-team).
That year, the junior led the Buckeyes with 55 receptions for 935 yards (17.0 avg) and 11 touchdowns. His receptions placed him on the OSU season Top 10 List, while his receiving yardage ranks 11th on annual charts and his scoring grabs were good for fourth on the Buckeyes single-season record list. He also tried his hand as a punt returner, gaining 60 yards on seven attempts (8.6 avg).
With a freshman quarterback at the helm, receiving opportunities were limited for --NAME-- and the rest of the receiving unit in 2008. The two-time Academic All-American and Paul Warfield Award winner was named an All-Big Ten Conference honorable mention. He led the team again, pulling down 42 passes for 535 yards and eight touchdowns. On special teams action, he had an 11-yard kickoff return and 17 yards on four punt returns (4.2 avg).
No major injuries reported.
Attended Chagrin Falls (Cleveland, Ohio) High School, earning first-team All-Ohio honors as a senior Set school career receiving records with 118 catches for 1,885 yards and 34 touchdowns As a senior, he snatched 47 passes for 754 yards and 12 touchdowns Also scored on a 95-yard punt return and an interception return and averaged 14.9 yards per punt return, leading the squad to a 9-3 overall record and the conference championship in 2004.
Has the prototypical height, long arms and strong build for the position. Good hands and body control; very capable of high-pointing the ball and making the tough catch in a crowd. Can tightrope the sideline or the end line. Lines up in the slot and outside, and is effective in either spot. Uses his long arms and size to get off press coverage and negate small corners on running plays. Shows the ability to separate from smaller, quicker collegiate defenders. Also has some elusiveness after the catch and as a punt returner. Uses his frame to his advantage all over the field.
May not have the straight-line speed and quickness needed to separate from top NFL corners. Mixes it up with corners, sometimes too much for coaches' comfort. Lacks consistent technique blocking, sometimes lunging and failing to get inside his man's jersey. Struggles to block a moving target at times. Not a breakaway threat on punt returns, tending to dance a bit.
-------------------------
Donald_Washington 80686 102
In a perfect world, --NAME-- would be the featured player on the Buckeyes' defensive unit in 2009 rather than vying for a roster spot in the National Football League. Regarded as one of the best pure athletes ever recruited by coach Jim Tressel, off-field issues and problems with the coaching staff, along with inconsistent play, prevented the talented athlete from realizing his potential.
--NAME-- greatly improved his draft outlook with a sensational performance at the NFL Combine and in post-combine workouts. His 11-foot, 3-inch broad jump, 45-inch vertical jump and 6.84 three-cone drills certainly opened the eyes of league personnel in attendance during those performances.
Yet, his career never matched his athletic talent. There were flashes of brilliance, including 100 yards gained on three fumble recoveries and 104 yards gained on two interception returns. But in 37 games that included 24 starts, his great leaping ability was rarely on display, as he managed to deflect just four passes.
--NAME-- was rated the best defensive back in the state of Indiana as a senior at Franklin Central High School. He was also a standout big-play receiver, as he caught 47 passes for a 17.0-yard average and 10 touchdowns that campaign, receiving a two-star rating from Rivals.com. In addition to football, he excelled in track, capturing the state long jump championship as a junior and senior. He graduated as an Honor Roll student.
--NAME-- enrolled at Ohio State in 2005, but spent the season performing on the scout team. He was named the team's Outstanding Freshman in 2006, starting nine games at boundary cornerback and nickel back in 2006. He produced 41 tackles (28 solos) with a stop behind the line of scrimmage. He also caused two fumbles and recovered another that he returned 48 yards.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- moved to field cornerback, starting all 13 games. He registered 39 tackles (29 solos) that included his only sack as a Buckeye. He recovered a fumble, broke up two passes and returned an interception 70 yards for a touchdown.
--NAME-- was suspended for the team's first two games of the 2008 season for a violation of team rules. "I'll be honest and admit I made a mistake," he said. "That's the only way you can handle it. The best thing to do is just be honest." 
When he returned, he spent most of the season as a reserve, starting two games at boundary cornerback. He managed just 22 tackles (18 solos) with a fumble recovery and a 34-yard interception return.
--NAME-- joined receiver Brian Hartline and running back Chris Wells as three Ohio State underclassmen to declare for the 2009 NFL Draft. A bit of an unknown before his arrival, he dazzled everyone, as his vertical jump and broad jump figures were the best of any player that attended the 2009 event.
No injuries reported.
Attended Franklin Central (Indianapolis, Ind.) High School Rated the best defensive back in the state of Indiana as a senior Was also a standout big-play receiver, as he caught 47 passes for a 17.0-yard average and 10 touchdowns that campaign, receiving a two-star rating from Rivals.com In addition to football, he excelled in track, capturing the state long jump championship as a junior and senior Graduated as an Honor Roll student.
Good height and build for the position.   Legitimate NFL athlete.   Good straight-line speed.   Low backpedal and smooth transition to run with receivers.   A bit choppy out of his breaks, but accelerates quickly.   Closes on the ball quickly.   Flashes the ability to pop the defender and is generally a reliable wrap-up tackler.   Good vision.   Reads the field well with the ball in his hands and has averaged 40.8 yards on his five turnover returns, including one 70-yard interception return for a touchdown.   Straight-line speed and vision as a runner could translate well as a kick returner.
Enters the NFL as a better raw athlete than football player.   Relies on his athleticism.   Gives receivers a big cushion and seems content with making the tackle rather than going for the interception.   Too often allows passes into his chest and lacks natural hands for the interception.   Plays with bit of a cover corner mentality and doesn't get very involved in run support.   Finished the 2008 season with only five assisted tackles.   Suspended for the first two games of the 2008 season due to a violation of team rules.
-------------------------
Javarris_Williams 80688 212
Looking for an opportunity to play right away, --NAME-- turned down scholarship offers from numerous major colleges, especially in the Big 12 Conference, and decided to enroll at Tennessee State in 2005. Four years later, he leaves the university ranking second in school history with 849 carries, 4,329 rushing yards and 5,117 all-purpose yards. He ranks third in school annals in scoring with 264 points and 44 total touchdowns, as his 42 touchdowns rushing set a TSU all-time mark.
Only two other players ever rushed for more than 1,000 yards in a season for the Tigers, and --NAME-- accomplished that feat three times. He is also the only player to lead the team in rushing four times in his career, as he owns four of the top seven spots on Tennessee State's single-season record list for rushing yardage.
--NAME-- earned All-Houston Area, All-District and All-Texas first-team honors for Foster High School as a senior, adding Class 4A All-State second-team accolades (Adrian Peterson of Minnesota was the first-team running back). He rushed for more than 2,300 yards during his final campaign and generated 1,299 yards on the ground as a junior. A National Dean's List student, he also excelled in track, capturing the district title in the long jump.
--NAME-- turned down scholarship offers from Texas, Texas A&M, Texas Tech, Baylor and Houston, among other major universities to enroll at Tennessee State in 2005. He earned All-Ohio Valley Conference second-team and OVC All-Newcomer team honors, as he ranked fifth in the conference with 872 yards and four touchdowns on 202 carries (4.3 avg), the seventh-best season total in school annals.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- was again an All-OVC second-team choice. He finished second in the league and 16th nationally with 1,233 yards on 245 attempts with 11 scores, the third-best season total by a Tiger. He also placed third in the conference with an average of 131.18 all-purpose yards per game.
Despite amassing 1,187 yards rushing on 195 tries (6.1 avg) that included 12 scores, --NAME-- strangely did not receive any conference postseason recognition. He added 240 yards on 14 receptions, ranking fourth in the OVC with an average of 129.73 all-purpose yards per game.
--NAME-- captured All-American, All-OVC and league Offensive Player of the Year honors in 2008, despite missing the final two games with a hamstring pull. He led the conference with 1,037 yards and 15 touchdowns on 207 carries (5.0 avg). He scored again on 19 receptions for 245 yards (12.9 avg), ranking ninth in the nation in scoring with 96 points, tying for fourth on the school single-season record list. :
2008: Missed the final two games vs. Jacksonville State (11/15) and Murray State (11/22) with a hamstring pull.
2009: Re-injured his hamstring running the 40-yard dash at the NFL Combine and could not complete the agility tests.
Attended Foster (Richmond, Texas) High School, earning All-Houston Area, All-District and All-Texas first-team honors as a senior Added Class 4A All-State second-team accolades (Adrian Peterson of Minnesota was the first-team running back) Rushed for more than 2,300 yards during his final campaign and generated 1,299 yards on the ground as a junior A National Dean's List student, he also excelled in track, capturing the district title in the long jump.
Solid build with room for additional muscle mass. Good quickness to and through the hole. Good quickness and agility at the first level to re-direct. Good vision. Patient runner who follows his blocks well. At least adequate speed to turn the corner. Effective short-yardage runner. Will lower his shoulder and fight for extra yardage. Provides a pop and has good balance and lateral agility as a pass blocker. Experienced receiver out of the backfield. Enjoyed a solid week of practice at the East-West Shrine Game, answering scouts' questions about his production against his level of competition.
Bit of a jack of all trades, master of none. Solid speed, size and power, but doesn't have any one characteristic to hang his hat on. Lacks the straight-line speed to break away from NFL-caliber defenders. Solid power back at this level, but lacks real pop and the leg drive to push the pile. Four-year starter who may not have a lot of tread left on the tires. Helped tremendously by the fact he had two potential NFL Draft selections blocking ahead of him in left tackle Cornelius Lewis and center Cecil Newton.
-------------------------
Victor_Butler 80725 110
An undersized pass-rush specialist with the Beavers, --NAME-- must make the transition to outside linebacker in the NFL. A standout pass rusher who broke out to register 10.5 sacks as a junior despite only starting one game, --NAME-- was first-team All-Pac-10 and tied the single-season sack record at OSU with 12 as a senior and leaves second in school history with 25.5 career sacks. It was his final two games with the Beavers that really have scouts intrigued. --NAME-- earned Sun Bowl MVP after racking up 11 tackles, including five tackles for loss, four sacks and a forced fumble against Pittsburgh and showed surprising fluidity when operating in coverage while at the East-West Shrine Game.
Three-year letterman as receiver, safety, defensive end and kick returner   Played defensive end only as a senior due to team needs   Two-time all-league and all-county as a senior.
Rangy build with plenty of room for additional muscle mass.   Good initial burst off the edge as a pass rusher.   Capable of challenging the tackle and flexible enough to bend around the tackle to collapse the pocket.   Good closing speed.   Good lateral quickness and balance to redirect.   Shows some leg drive as a bull rusher.   Helped himself at the East-West Shrine Game, showing good upper-body strength to pop the tight end off the snap.   Good straight-line speed and agility to redirect in coverage.   Tools to warrant development as a rush linebacker.   Voted team captain.
Classic "tweener."   Essentially a one-trick pony.   Lacks the bulk to remain at defensive end and may lack the necessary speed and agility for coverage.   Questionable instincts for move a linebacker.   Relies on his agility to avoid blockers when in space.   Struggles to disengage from blockers once they've locked on.   Only one season as a starter.
-------------------------
Brandon_Hughes 80727 148
A two-time second-team All-Pac-10 selection, --NAME-- paired with Keenan Lewis to give the Beavers arguably the top cornerback duo in the conference. --NAME-- signed with Oregon State as a receiver but moved to cornerback and started 40 games for the Beavers over his career. Confrontational at the line of scrimmage, --NAME-- relies on his initial pop with the receiver to hold up. He lacks the foot speed and quickness to turn and run with receivers with rare speed. Scouts noted how he struggled at the East-West Shrine Game in off-man coverage, but for bump-and-run teams looking for help on the second day, --NAME--' consistency makes sense.
--NAME-- scored 11 touchdowns as a wide receiver for a team that went 13-1 and was the state's 6A runner-up   Lettered three years and started two for head coach Rigo Schmelzer   Also played defensive back for the Purple Raiders   Caught 20 passes for 688 yards as a senior   Caught 34 passes for 1,008 yards and 16 touchdowns for his career   A member of the All-Big 12 Conference first team as a senior   Played in the Shrine All-Star game   A standout in track in the 400, where he won the Intercity Championship as a sophomore and junior   Finished fourth in the Illinois State Championships.
Good initial pop at the line of scrimmage.   Good body lean into the receiver as he runs the route with him.   Competes for the pass well.   Doesn't back down to the challenge of bigger receivers.   Peeks at the quarterback and has a late burst to close downhill.   Long arms and quick hands to break up the pass.   Willing in run support.   Can elude blockers in space, but also is willing to take them on to get to the ballcarrier.   Effective open-field tackler who wraps up securely.   Consistent.   Four-year starter.
Lacks elite straight-line speed.   Burst downhill not seen when beaten over the top.   Lacks the late burst to recover if beaten off the snap.   Came to Oregon State as a receiver, but moved to cornerback for a reason -- stone hands with only three interceptions out of 36 career pass breakups.   Protected a bit by an aggressive OSU pass rush and an experienced secondary.
-------------------------
Tyrone_McKenzie 80729 97
--NAME--'s collegiate career had more pit stops than Jeff Gordon in a NASCAR race, but he finally found a home at strong-side outside linebacker with South Florida as a junior. He began his collegiate odyssey in 2004 as a reserve weak-side linebacker at Michigan State, but transferred to Iowa State after the season. He sat out the 2005 campaign under NCAA transfer rules, finally getting a starting opportunity with the Cyclones in 2006.
The redshirt sophomore went on to rank eighth in the nation and second in the Big 12 Conference in tackles in 2006, starting all year as a middle linebacker. But after the season, he informed the ISU coaching staff that he would enroll at South Florida for the 2007 spring semester and intended to play football for the Bulls. 
Back in his hometown, --NAME-- took advantage of a spring camp ankle injury to Chris Robinson, winning the strong-side outside linebacker position. He would go on to start 24 of his final 26 games at that position for the Bulls.
At Riverview High School, --NAME-- was rated among Florida's top 50 prospects by the Tampa Tribune. The first-team All-Hillsborough County selection by the Tampa Tribune earned second-team All-County honors from the St. Petersburg Times and was selected to play in the Hillsborough County All-Star Game in Raymond James Stadium.
--NAME-- rushed for more than 1,400 yards and 16 touchdowns as a senior, averaging 7.7 yards per carry in 2003. He produced four 200-yard rushing games that season, including an 80-yard touchdown run and 230 yards vs. Jefferson. He also rushed 20 times for 205 yards and four scores vs. Brandon. He missed most of his junior season due to a broken leg suffered in the season's second game. He also lettered in track, qualifying for the 2004 state 4A track championships in the 110 hurdles.
--NAME-- enrolled at Michigan State in 2004, but left the program after just one season, as he posted three tackles (2 solos) in 11 games. He transferred to Iowa State, performing on the scout team in 2005. The following season, he garnered All-Big 12 Conference second-team honors. As the Cyclones' middle linebacker, he registered a career-high 129 tackles, second on the team and in the league. He also had two sacks, 9.5 stops for loss, three pass breakups and an interception.
In 2007, he enrolled at South Florida, emerging as the starting strong-side linebacker. The All-Big East Conference second-team choice started 11 games, sharing the position with Brouce Mompremier. He still managed to set the school single-season record with 121 tackles (78 solos) that included 1.5 sacks, 7.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage and three pressures. He also blocked a kick, caused two fumbles and recovered two others.
The Butkus, Nagurski and Lott Trophy nominee started all 13 games for South Florida in 2008. He earned first-team All-Big East Conference honors, finishing second in the league with 116 tackles (78 solos). He added 15 stops behind the line of scrimmage and broke up eight passes while picking off another. His 237 tackles as a Bull was the highest total by any South Florida player over a two-year span.
2002: Suffered a broken leg in the second game of his high school junior year, missing the rest of the season after undergoing surgery to have a titanium rod inserted.
2009: Could not complete agility tests at the NFL Combine after he pulled his right hamstring on his second 40-yard dash.
Attended Riverview (Fla.) High School, playing football for head coach Dan O'Regan Rated among Florida's top 50 prospects by the Tampa Tribune The first-team All-Hillsborough County selection by the Tampa Tribune earned second-team All-County honors from the St. Petersburg Times and was selected to play in the Hillsborough County All-Star Game in Raymond James Stadium Rushed for more than 1,400 yards and 16 touchdowns as a senior, averaging 7.7 yards per carry in 2003 Produced four 200-yard rushing games that season, including an 80-yard touchdown run and 230 yards vs. Jefferson Also rushed 20 times for 205 yards and four scores vs. Brandon Missed most of his junior season due to a broken leg suffered in the season's second game Also lettered in track, qualifying for the 2004 state 4A track championships in the 110 hurdles.
Some versatility to play inside and in space.   "Sam" linebacker who lines up in the stack and nine-techniques.   Holds his ground adequately against tackles on outside run plays, can shed to turn play inside or make the tackle.   Breaks down in the open, and can wrap up elusive runners in space.   Brings his hips to hit ballcarriers straight on, and will put his helmet on the ball to create a turnover.   Gets a fair punch on tight ends to knock them off the line, and stays with them in coverage.   Will chase and hustle downfield, giving second or third effort on inside runs plays to get to the ball.
Could be considered a bit of an inside-outside "tweener" by NFL teams.   Not especially fluid dropping into coverage.   Comes out of the game in nickel situations and probably will do so in the NFL.   Not quick enough to corral slot receivers in zones.   Doesn't have the great strength or bulk to fight his way through trash inside.
BARRETT RUUD, Tampa Bay -- Put --NAME-- in a Cover-2 scheme and let him roam the field. With his versatility, he can line up for a few plays at each linebacker position to keep the offense's blocking schemes having to account for him at all times. He is a very good read-&-react type and does a fine job of getting everyone lined up. He needs to improve his lower body strength, but his ability to make plays on the move is his best asset.
-------------------------
Austin_Collie 81282 127
A strong, physical receiver and outstanding route runner, --NAME-- is perhaps the team's most outspoken player since Jim McMahon played for the Cougars three decades ago. A fiery performer, he will long be known for his impassioned speech he gave the team at halftime vs. Air Force that sparked the team to rally to victory in 2008.
The Cougars went to the locker room after once leading 10-0, before having the margin wiped out -- then failing to score from the 2-yard line after a pass was deflected and intercepted in the end zone. "--NAME-- just told us that we're better than this," Brigham Young quarterback Max Hall said of his best friend --NAME--'s words. "He said, 'This is not who we are; this is not how we play.' He got us all fired up and ready to go for the second half." 
Hall rebounded to produce a game-clinching touchdown drive that finished with a pretty 45-yard pass to --NAME--. It was a third-and-8 before that, deep in BYU territory, that had Air Force coach Troy Calhoun shaking his head. He pointed out the critical moment when he attacked with Chris Thomas, who reached Hall on a backside safety blitz with the Cougars ahead just 31-24 in the fourth quarter. Hall spotted --NAME-- for the first down. "Instinct or whatever, he got rid of the ball just in time. That was a big, big play because if we'd have got the ball back, who knows what would have happened," said Calhoun. 
--NAME--'s career was sandwiched around a two-year church mission. In just three seasons with the team, he would close out his collegiate career as the holder of several school records. His 106 receptions for 1,538 yards and 15 touchdowns in 2008 were all BYU season marks. He was the first Cougar to register 11 100-yard receiving performances in the same campaign and his 2,112 all-purpose yards in 2008 set another school record.
His 2008 performance also rearranged several record charts in the Mountain West Conference. His receptions that year rank third, his receiving yards rank second and his 15 scores set a conference annual record. He also set MWC marks with 11 100-yard receiving games, including 10 consecutive. His 2,112 all-purpose yards are the second best in league annals.
--NAME-- also etched his name in the career record sheets. He registered 17 100-yard receiving games, caught 215 passes for 3,255 yards and caught 30 touchdown passes to become the new owner of those records. Those receptions placed sixth in conference annals, while his receiving yardage rank fourth and his touchdowns set an all-time mark. Only three other MWC players ever amassed more than his 4,649 all-purpose yards.
At Oak Ridge High School, --NAME-- earned Prep Star and Super Prep All-America honors, in addition to being named the Sacramento Bee's Most Valuable Player and voted Northern California's Most Valuable Player. The all-metro selection added first-team all-section and all-state recognition and was a nominee for the 2003 California Mr. Football Award.
As a senior, --NAME-- had 60 receptions for 978 yards and was credited with 24 touchdowns, including 18 on receptions in his final season. He also posted 1,654 all-purpose yards and scored 196 points. He totaled 56 receptions for 857 yards and 10 touchdowns as a junior on offense. On defense, he recorded 53 tackles (26 solos) and was credited with two interceptions.
--NAME-- became the third member of his family to letter on the Brigham Young football team. His father, Scott, suited up for the Cougars as a receiver from 1979-82 and later played for the Hamilton Tigercats in the Canadian Football League. --NAME--'s brother, Zac, was also a receiver at BYU (2004-06).
In 2004, --NAME-- earned Mountain West Conference Freshman of the Year honors. The second-team Freshman All-America pick by The Sporting News set the school freshman records for touchdown receptions (eight) and receiving yards (771), as he led the team with 53 receptions. His average of 4.8 receptions per game made him the NCAA's freshman statistical leader for that season.
--NAME-- spent the 2005-06 campaigns serving on a church mission to Buenos Aires, Argentina. He returned to the gridiron in 2007, starting seven games at the "Z" receiver position. He was bothered by an ankle sprain and bruised ribs, but pulled down 56 passes for 946 yards (16.9 avg.) and seven touchdowns. He also returned 28 kicks for 723 yards, ranking second in the Mountain West Conference with a 25.82-yard average. He earned All-MWC second-team honors as a receiver and also on special teams.
The Biletnikoff Award finalist earned All-America and All-MWC first-team honors in 2008. He led the nation in receiving yards per game with 118.31 and total yards receiving with 1,538. He was third nationally in receptions per game at 8.15 and total catches with 106, fourth in the NCAA in touchdown catches with 15, which set both school and league season records. 
After the season, --NAME-- announced he would forgo his final year of eligibility and entered the 2009 NFL Draft. He became the third player at the school to ever declare early for the draft, joining offensive lineman John Tait in 1999 and running back Luke Staley in 2002. He received advice from several former BYU players currently in the NFL and from his older brother, Zac, who had a free-agent tryout with the Philadelphia Eagles in 2006. "They told me to strap on a seat belt," --NAME-- said. "It's a different ride."
"I think I have a lot to offer," --NAME-- said. "I'm a receiver who can catch the ball and run routes. The only question now is speed. I'm going to work my butt off for the next few months to improve that and prove I'm fast enough to play at the next level. It's not just about football. I've grown not only in football but in the classroom and in my life. To be able to go through the last three years at Brigham Young as a flag bearer for this university, when Coach Mendenhall says that, I honestly believe in that."
2007: Missed most of the second half vs. Air Force (9/22) with an ankle sprain Re-injured his ankle vs. New Mexico (9/29) Suffered bruised ribs vs. Nevada-Las Vegas (10/13) that limited his time the following week vs. Eastern Washington (10/20).
2008: Underwent an MRI early in August camp, where it was discovered he had a right tibia stress fracture (below the knee).
Attended Oak Ridge (El Dorado Hills, Cal.) High School Earned Prep Star and Super Prep All-America honors Named the Sacramento Bee's Most Valuable Player Voted Northern California's Most Valuable Player The all-metro selection added first-team all-section and all-state recognition and was a nominee for the 2003 California Mr. Football Award As a senior, --NAME-- had 60 receptions for 978 yards and was credited with 24 touchdowns, including 18 on receptions in his final season Also posted 1,654 all-purpose yards and scored 196 points Totaled 56 receptions for 857 yards and 10 touchdowns as a junior on offense On defense, he recorded 53 tackles (26 solos) and was credited with two interceptions Graduated with a 4.0 grade point average.
Legitimate NFL build. Muscled up athlete. Faster on the field than his rather pedestrian 40-yard dash time would indicate. Good initial quickness off the snap. Good hand usage and lateral quickness to gain a quick release against press coverage. Sharp, savvy route-runner. Varies his speeds and can sink his hips to generate separation. Good burst laterally. Works his way back to the ball if he sees his quarterback in trouble. Soft hands. Snatches the ball out of the air and is quick to put it away. Can track over either shoulder. Good elusiveness to make the first defender miss and strength to run through arm tackles. Good vision and will cut it back inside. May lack elite deep speed, but good early acceleration. Averaged 26.5 yards per kick return from 2007-08.
Questionable deep speed to challenge over the top. Will be older than most NFL rookies (24) due to his LDS mission. Questionable level of competition. Statistics inflated due to BYU's scheme and defenses keying on TE Dennis Pitta.
-------------------------
Brandon_Gibson 81288 194
It was a bittersweet senior season for --NAME--, who concluded his college career as the school's all-time leader with 2,756 receiving yards and finished second in WSU annals with 182 receptions. He seriously considered leaving school after the 2007 season, but was convinced by the new coaching staff that he would greatly benefit returning to the university in 2008. Even though he led the team with 57 catches, the Cougars suffered through one of the worst seasons in the program, finishing 2-11 for the campaign.
The nephew of former NFL cornerback Vaughn Williams (49ers/Colts), --NAME-- struggled to grasp the new offensive system earlier in the 2008 season, and also struggled to grasp the football, as he was plagued by a slew of dropped balls in the early portion of the year. He saw his yardage total decrease from 1,180 yards in 2007 to 673 and his touchdown opportunities reduced from nine scores as a junior to two as a senior.
At Rogers High School, --NAME-- lettered in football and basketball. As a senior, he earned All-SPSL honors after compiling 946 all-purpose yards. He was rated the 17th-best player in the state of Washington by Scout.com and rated 38th nationally as an athlete by Rivals.com. He was named to the Washington Preps all-league first team as a receiver and second team as a defensive back, in addition to earning Tacoma News Tribune "Northwest Nuggets" honorable mention. 
During his junior campaign, --NAME-- earned All-South Puget Sound League honorable mention at wide receiver. He also received league accolades on special teams as a punt and kick returner. That year, he was named second-team All-SPSL in basketball.
--NAME-- enrolled at Washington State in 2005, appearing in 10 games with five starting assignments as a true freshman. The flanker saw most of his action on special teams, where he returned 10 kickoffs for 186 yards, but also caught nine passes for 172 yards (19.1 avg.) and a pair of scores.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- took over flanker duties for the final nine games. He teamed with Jason Hill to give the Cougars one of the biggest receiving tandems in the West. He pulled down 49 passes for 731 yards (14.9 avg.) and four touchdowns, second on the team. He also saw brief action on the coverage unit, making a solo tackle while recovering a fumble and returning two kicks for 42 yards.
In 2007, --NAME-- had a banner campaign, earning All-Pac-10 Conference first-team and All-America third-team recognition. He started 11 games at flanker, sitting out the Oregon clash with a heel bruise. He was hampered early in the season by an August camp knee sprain, but still managed to haul in a career-high 67 passes for 1,180 yards (17.6 avg.), finding the end zone nine times. His 67 grabs placed third on the school season-record list and his 1,180 yards was the most ever by a Cougar, ranking 20th on the conference annual record chart.
With the new spread option offense in place, --NAME-- struggled at the "Z" (flanker) spot, where he started the first three games before shifting to the slot in 2008. He still led the team with 57 receptions, but only got to the end zone twice while recording 673 yards (11.8 avg.), adding 19 yards on 10 carries to earn All-Pac-10 honorable mention.
2005: Did not play vs. Oregon (11/12) with a right hip strain.
2007: Was bothered early in the season by a knee sprain suffered in August camp Sat out the Oregon game (10/13) with a heel bruise.
2009: Suffered a hamstring pull during practices in late January at the Senior Bowl. Did not play in the game and was unable to participate in agility tests at the NFL Combine or at Washington State's pro day.
Attended Rogers (Puyallup, Wash.) High School, playing football for head coach Gene Bowen Lettered in football and basketball As a senior, he earned All-SPSL honors after compiling 946 all-purpose yards Rated the 17th-best player in the state of Washington by Scout.com and rated 38th nationally as an athlete by Rivals.com Washington Preps All-League first team as a receiver and second-team pick as a defensive back, in addition to earning Tacoma News Tribune "Northwest Nuggets" honorable mention During his junior campaign, --NAME-- earned All-South Puget Sound League honorable mention at wide receiver Also received league accolades on special teams as a punt and kick returner  Second-team All-SPSL in basketball as a junior.
Legitimate NFL size. Good height and has the frame to handle NFL punishment. Has the quickness, bulk and strength to fight through the jam at the line of scrimmage. At least adequate straight-line speed to challenge defenders deep. Can track the ball over either shoulder. Can sink his hips, stick his foot in the ground and explode out his breaks, creating separation against even the best of cornerbacks. Soft hands and can snatch the ball out of the air. Good body control to contort his body and make the tough catch in traffic. Courageous over the middle. Effective red-zone target. Cognizant downfield blocker. Showed good toughness last year fighting through knee and heal injuries. Three-year kick returner.
Possesses good, not great deep speed. Demonstrates good overall athleticism, but doesn't consistently produce yards after the catch. Struggled with drops during Senior Bowl practices. Marginal elusiveness in the open field. Experienced kick returner, but not necessarily a candidate to do so at the next level. Plagued by a knee and heal injuries in 2007. Was not able to work out at Combine or Washington State's first pro day due to a right hamstring injury.
-------------------------
Stephen_McGee 81296 101
Few quarterbacks will ever be drafted after starting only three games their senior year, but --NAME-- has the tools worthy of consideration. A fine Texas high school quarterback recruited by several top programs, --NAME-- went to Texas A&M to make his own name. While his statistics under former head coach Dennis Franchione were solid enough to earn NFL attention (60 percent completion rate for 4,606 yards and a 24-10 touchdown-to-interception ratio), --NAME-- was hardly developing into a pro-ready quarterback through Franchione's read-option offense.
With former Green Bay head coach Mike Sherman taking over the helm in 2008, optimism was high that --NAME-- would enjoy a big senior campaign. Then he suffered a torn labrum in his throwing shoulder early in the season, limiting him to only the three starts. A solid week of practice at the East-West Shrine Game - and this year's weak senior class of quarterbacks - could result in --NAME-- earning a surprisingly high grade from some teams who are willing to look past his stunted development and focus on his undeniable tools. Had an arm span of 32 inches and a hand span of 9 inches at the combine.
2008: Limited to three starts due to a torn labrum in his throwing shoulder.
Three-year starter at quarterback for Class 3A Burnet High School, leading his team to a combined record of 36-5 (including a 28-2 mark as a junior and senior).   Burnet appeared in the 3A state finals in 2002 and 2003.   did not throw a single interception in the 2003 regular season.   finished his career with 8,256 passing yards and a 3A state-record 101 passing touchdowns.   as a senior, --NAME-- completed 196 of 313 passes for 3,579 yards with 47 touchdowns and three interceptions.   as a junior, he completed 155 of 276 passes for 2,841 yards and 34 touchdowns and five interceptions.   as a sophomore, he connected on 93 of 176 attempts for 1,829 yards, 20 touchdowns and eight interceptions.   two-time all-state selection and three-time all-district pick.   named the 3A Offensive Most Valuable Player after his senior year.   also earned Dave Campbell's Texas Football Magazine Super Team second-team and Austin American-Statesman All-Centex Co-Player of the Year honors.   coached by Bob Shipley.   also played basketball and track and field.   all-district on the hardwood as a sophomore, but was injured as a junior.   advanced to the regional meet in track with the 400- and 1,600-meter relays.   an excellent student, --NAME-- was Burnet's Number 1-ranked student-athlete and ranked Number 9 overall in his senior class of over 250.
Legitimate NFL frame. Good toughness. Has absorbed a lot of hits throughout his career and is willing to play through pain. Legitimate arm strength. Good zip on his passes, especially on short and intermediate routes. Flashes the arm strength and trajectory for deep passes with touch over the top. Good athlete who can buy time in the pocket and also make plays as a runner in the open field. Good agility and strength for the position as a runner. Solid week of practice at the East-West Shrine Game offers hope that he can develop with time in a pro-style offense. Excellent intangibles. Natural leader who was voted permanent team captain in 2006. Twice led the Aggies to upset victories over rival Texas.
Raw as they come. More of a thrower than a passer at this point. Inconsistent footwork and delivery. Inconsistent accuracy, mostly due to flawed technique. Still acclimating to reading a defense from a passer standpoint. Lacks patience in the pocket and will either run or force passes too often, rather than check down. Needs to be cleared medically due to the torn labrum suffered during his senior year.
-------------------------
Kenny_McKinley 81298 141
The Gamecocks struggled mightily without --NAME-- in the lineup for a three-game stretch in 2008, when he was clearly the team's most indispensable player. Called the best receiver he has ever coached, head coach Steve Spurrier had more than enough evidence to back up that statement.
--NAME--'s production stands out, especially when the Gamecocks' instability at quarterback is factored into his output. He set school career records for receptions and receiving yards, while also closing out his career second on the school's all-time touchdown catches list.
--NAME-- placed his name in the Southeastern Conference record books. His 207 receptions placed third in conference annals, becoming just the fifth SEC player to amass more than 200 catches in a career. He also became the 12th player in league history to record more than 2,700 receiving yards (2,781).
At South Cobb High School, --NAME-- earned All-County honors as a junior and senior. The team's quarterback threw for 1,470 yards and 16 touchdowns and rushed for 750 yards and scored 12 more scores his senior year. As a junior, he ran for 400 yards and eight touchdowns while throwing for 1,575 yards and 12 scores in 2003. He was rated the 29th-best athlete in the state of Georgia and the 54th-best athlete in the country by Rivals.com.
As a true freshman at South Carolina, he quickly adapted to life as a wide receiver, starting six games in the team's multiple receiver formation. He ranked third on the team with 25 catches for 291 yards (11.6-yard average) and a touchdown. While waiting for the opportunity to start, he occupied his playing time by returning 18 punts for a 4.6-yard average and also got to "return to his roots" briefly by taking a few snaps at quarterback.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- started all 13 games at flanker, beginning a string of 33 consecutive starting assignments. He pulled down 51 passes, the 10th-best season total in school history. He generated 880 yards (17.3-yard average), which ranks sixth on the Gamecocks' season-record chart, added five touchdown grabs. He also averaged 8.9 yards on 17 punt returns and completed a 22-yard touchdown pass to QB Syvelle Newton in the Kentucky clash.
Despite playing with turf toe most of the year (would undergo surgery after the season for arthritis in the toe), the second-team All-Southeastern selection moved to split end. He led the league and set the school annual record with 77 receptions. His 968 receiving yards were good for fourth on the school record chart and his nine touchdowns placed sixth. 
The preseason All-American missed three games and a good portion of another due to a right hamstring strain in 2008, but still garnered All-SEC honorable mention. He led the Gamecocks with 642 yards and four scores on 54 receptions (11.9-yard average) in a return to the flanker position. He was invited to the prestigious Senior Bowl, but after impressing scouts early in practices, he re-injured his hamstring.
2007: Underwent surgery in late December for arthritis in his toe and was limited in 2008 spring camp as a precaution.
2008: Left the Vanderbilt game (9/04) with a right hamstring strain that would sideline him for the next three contests vs. Georgia (9/13), Wofford (9/20) and Alabama-Birmingham (9/27).
2009: Re-injured his hamstring at Senior Bowl practices (1/24).
Attended South Cobb (Mableton, Ga.) High School, playing football for head coach Shane Queen Earned All-County honors as a junior and senior The team's quarterback threw for 1,470 yards and 16 touchdowns and rushed for 750 yards and scored 12 more scores his senior year As a junior, he ran for 400 yards and eight touchdowns while throwing for 1,575 yards and 12 scores in 2003 Rated the 29th-best athlete in the state of Georgia and the 54th-best athlete in the country by Rivals.com.
Good initial quickness off the snap. Not a physical player, but uses his hands and lateral quickness to get a clean release off the line of scrimmage. Savvy route-runner. Good short-area burst and varies his speed and utilizes his good body control to generate separation against tight coverage. Reliable hands for the reception. Strong hands. Good vision as a runner.
Lanky, almost skinny build that could use additional mass, but not at the expense of losing speed. Lacks the straight-line speed to challenge deep and break away after a short or intermediate reception. Can be pulled down from behind. Characterized as a tough player, but can be intimidated with a good pop. Doesn't show great toughness crossing the middle in front of safeties.
TODD PINKSTON, ex-Philadelphia -- With his lanky frame, --NAME-- might not be able to stand up to typical NFL punishment. Evaluators are leery of receivers that start to develop hamstring issues, which is what eventually ended Pinkston's career. With his timed speed, --NAME-- should have had much more long distances receptions, but he lacks the second gear to avoid being caught from behind.
-------------------------
Curtis_Painter 81300 201
Blessed with first-round caliber arm strength, --NAME-- was considered a top 100 prospect coming off an honorable mention All-Big Ten junior season (3,846 yards, 29 touchdowns, 11 interceptions). But like other senior quarterbacks in this draft, he struggled with consistency in 2008. 
--NAME-- completed just under 60 percent of his passes for 2,400 yards with 13 touchdowns and 11 interceptions, getting pulled in one game and missing all or part of three others with a separated right shoulder. 
Although his arm and size are what scouts look for, most wonder how --NAME-- can succeed in the NFL if he couldn't be efficient in Purdue's spread offense. His inability to handle pressure -- whether in the form of the blitz or in big-game situations -- raises questions about his ability to handle the mental pressure of the NFL. Had an arm span of 33 1/4 inches and a hand span of 9 1/4 inches at the combine.
Ranked as Number 21 pro-style quarterback in nation and Number 5 player in Indiana by Rivals.com   listed Number 84 among Midwest players by SuperPrep   All-American by PrepStar   completed 106 of 207 passes (51 percent) for 1,787 yards and 16 touchdowns en route to being named all-state, all-area and all-conference as senior   rushed for 274 yards on 96 carries (2.9 average) and five touchdowns   finalist on Mr. Football ballot   team went 11-2 and won conference and sectional championships   received American Legion Mental Attitude Award   selected for Indiana All-Star Game   as junior completed 129 of 237 passes (54.4 percent) for 2,122 yards and 22 touchdowns   rushed for 524 yards on 121 carries (4.3 average) and 12 touchdowns   had three-year record of 28-7 with 4,946 passing yards, 49 passing touchdowns and 17 rushing touchdowns   holds school career records for passing attempts (618), completions (304), yards (5,039) and touchdowns (49)   coach was Mike Hidde   also played baseball and basketball.
-------------------------
Clint_Sintim 81304 45
--NAME-- has been a model of consistency ever since arriving on campus, going on to start his final 48 contests during a 49-game career. He emerged as a pass rushing force during his last two seasons, ranking second in school history with 27.0 sacks, the 12th-best total on the Atlantic Coast Conference's all-time record list.
The strong-side linebacker produced 245 tackles for the Cavaliers. Thirty-nine of those were behind the line of scrimmage, the seventh-highest career total by a Virginia player. Twenty of his career 27.0 sacks were registered since the beginning of the 2007 season. Those 27.0 sacks are the most by any active linebacker in the NCAA ranks at the conclusion of the 2008 campaign.
--NAME-- earned All-American honors from Super Prep as a senior at Garfield High School. He was also named first-team All-State that season, producing 35 tackles and three sacks. He added All-District honors on both offense and defense that season. He also lettered on the school's basketball team.
--NAME-- spent the 2004 season on Virginia's scout team. He had a stellar 2005 spring camp, emerging as the team's starting strong-side outside linebacker. The Freshman All-Atlantic Coast Conference and Freshman All-American choice was the recipient of the Bill Dudley Award, given to the team's most outstanding first-year player. He ranked fifth on the team with 53 tackles (26 solos). He collected three sacks with seven stops for losses, finishing fifth among the league's freshmen with an average of 4.4 tackles per game.
--NAME-- started all 12 games in 2006. He only ranked ninth on the squad with 45 tackles (22 solos), but his 10 stops behind the line of scrimmage, including four sacks, ranked second on the squad in both categories. He walked home with the Cavaliers' Rock Weir Award, given to the team's most improved defensive player.
As a junior, --NAME-- was used more often on the blitz in 2007. All nine of his stops behind the line of scrimmage were sacks, good for losses totaling 48 yards. He added three pressures with a pair of forced fumbles, as he finished third on the team with a career-high 77 tackles (44 solos).
The All-American honorable mention and All-Atlantic Coast Conference second-team choice ranked second in the league with 11 sacks for minus 86 yards, the fifth-best season total in school history. He also made four pressures in 2008 and finished third on the team with 70 tackles (38 solos), picking up All-State first-team recognition. 
The finalist for the Dudley Award, given to the top player in the state of Virginia, he was credited with a career-high 13 tackles behind the line of scrimmage, as he recovered two fumbles, caused another and broke up three passes.
2006: Slowed by a nagging shoulder problem that required surgery in the 2007 offseason.
2008: Left the Duke game (9/27) in the third quarter after a helmet-to-helmet collision, but returned to the game in the fourth quarter to record his third sack in the contest.
Attended Garfield (Woodbridge, Va.) High School, playing football for head coach Jim Poythress Earned All-American honors from Super Prep as a senior Named first-team All-State that season, producing 35 tackles and three sacks Added All-District honors on both offense and defense that season Also lettered on the school's basketball team.
Good height and strong lower- and upper-body build.   Often plays as the elephant linebacker in the 3-4, where he will likely play in the pros.   Good straight-line speed and will hustle to get downfield angles.   Closes on quarterbacks quickly.   Long arms and strength to secure the tackle.   Shows versatility as a hand-down pass rusher on third down.   Gets off the ball, can get under the pads of tackles and rip them aside.   Generally holds up against OT blocks, and can occasionally shed to make a play.   Takes on fullback blocks to stand his ground or create a pile.
Might be considered an end-linebacker "tweener" by 4-3 teams, but he could fit as a strong-side linebacker if he proves the ability to handle coverage responsibilities.   Wasn't asked to drop into coverage, and might lack the fluid hips and change-of-direction agility needed to excel in that area.   Rarely gets into position to block passes in space or at the line.   Needs to shed tight end blocks on the edge and make more plays.
NAPOLEAN HARRIS, ex Minnesota -- --NAME-- is a solid playmaker with good field awareness, but like Harris is a better fit for middle linebacker, as he lacks the loose hips, change of direction agility and second gear to give chase with receivers on the outside. He needs to develop better work habits and is politely called a "gamer" by the coaching staff. He is a good tackler playing downhill, but he needs to work on his hand placement, as blockers have success locking on and controlling him in close quarters. Still, even though some consider him a good fit at strong-side linebacker, he does not have the range or foot speed to chase down ball carriers in long pursuit and his zone coverage skills are a lot to be desired.
-------------------------
Brandon_Tate 81306 83
--NAME-- was just starting to come into his own as a wide receiver in 2008 when he suffered two torn ligaments in his right knee vs. Notre Dame, missing the final seven contests of his career. Before being sidelined, he established an NCAA combined kick return yardage record (3,523 yards) and was 304 yards shy of the NCAA record for kickoff return yardage set by Jeff Liggon of Tulane (2,992 yards, 1993-96), as the Tar Heel generated 2,688 yards.
--NAME-- needed just 165 punt return yards to become the 11th player in NCAA history
with 1,000 yards on both kickoff and punt returns (835 punt return yards). The Atlantic Coast Conference's all-time kick returner holds the school single-season and career records for kicks returned for touchdowns (three in 2006, six for his career). He is one of only nine players in NCAA history to return a kickoff and a punt for a touchdown in the same game (Duke, 2006).
At Cummings High school, --NAME-- earned All-Area honors from the Burlington Times-News. He was a member of the Greensboro News & Record All-Area team and also earned All-Conference accolades, helping the team to the state finals as a junior and the semifinals as a senior.
In his final campaign, --NAME-- had 66 receptions for 1,213 yards and 18 touchdowns in 15 games. He also returned kicks and played defensive back. In 2003, he pulled down 22 catches for 496 yards (22.5 avg) and eight touchdowns. He lettered three times in football, adding three more in basketball. As the team's shooting guard, he led the Cummings High hoops squad to the state title during his junior season.
--NAME-- enrolled at North Carolina in 2005, where he was one of seven true freshmen to letter. He was used strictly on special teams, ranking second in the Atlantic Coast Conference with a 25.81-yard average on 21 kickoff returns that included one touchdown. He also ranked third in the league with 29 punt returns for 267 yards (9.21 avg), as he led the Tar Heels with 809 all-purpose yards.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- continued to perform mostly on special teams. He did manage to get some action with the offense, catching five passes for 72 yards (14.4 avg) and gaining 20 yards on three carries. He ranked second in the conference with a 9.7-yard average on 20 punt returns that included one touchdown. He also returned 38 kickoffs for 902 yards (23.7 avg) and two scores, as his total of three kicks returned for touchdowns and two scores vs. Duke set school records. His 1,188 all-purpose yards led the squad and ranked sixth in the ACC.
--NAME-- shared flanker duties with Brooks Foster in 2007, but started all 12 games. He piled up 1,765 all-purpose yards, leading the conference with an average of 147.08 yards per game. He tallied 939 yards on 39 kickoff returns (24.08 avg, fourth in the ACC), 216 yards and a score on 23 punt returns (9.39 avg) and 131 yards on 12 carries that included another touchdown. He also placed third on the team with a career-high 25 receptions for 479 yards (19.2 avg) and five touchdowns, earning All-ACC honorable mention.
As a senior, --NAME-- was again named All-ACC honorable mention, as he snatched 16 passes for 376 yards (23.5 avg) and three touchdowns, adding 143 yards and a score on 11 reverses (13.0 avg). He also scored once on seven punt returns, averaging 22.6 yards per attempt while posting 305 yards on 11 kickoff returns (27.7 avg). Despite missing the final seven games, he ranked second on the team with 982 all-purpose yards, and if he had qualified (did not have the minimum touches) his average of 163.67 all-purpose yards per game would have ranked 11th in the nation and lead the ACC.
The injury brought a close to his career, but he was highly regarded by the staff. "The good news is that he will be back, and he will recover from this. I shared with him that two of the best receivers that I ever had the opportunity to be around as a coach both had equally significantly damaging injuries," head coach Butch Davis said, on the injury to --NAME--, referring to his experiences with former Miami stars Michael Irvin and Reggie Wayne.
2007: Missed the second half vs. South Carolina (10/13) after suffering a head injury.
2008: Suffered torn anterior and medial collateral ligaments in his right knee vs. Notre Dame (10/11), undergoing surgery that forced him to sit out the final seven games.
Attended Cummings (Burlington, N.C.) High School, playing football for head coach Steve Johnson Earned All-Area honors from the Burlington Times-News Member of the Greensboro News & Record All-Area team and also earned All-Conference accolades, helping the team to the state finals as a junior and the semifinals as a senior In his final campaign, --NAME-- had 66 receptions for 1,213 yards and 18 touchdowns in 15 games. He also returned kicks and played defensive back In 2003, he pulled down 22 catches for 496 yards (22.5 avg) and eight touchdowns Lettered three times in football, adding three more in basketball As the team's shooting guard, he led the Cummings High hoops squad to the state title during his junior season.
Long, lean build. Good quickness, size and hand strength to get off the line of scrimmage against press coverage. Emerging route-runner with the quick feet and balance to ultimately be quite good in this area. More quick than fast, though he has good acceleration. Elusive in the open field and has the vision to set up his blocks and break into the open field. Soft hands. Good body control and flexibility to contort his body for the poorly thrown pass. Can extend to make the diving grab. Good height and long arms and uses the combination well to high-point passes over smaller cornerbacks. Excellent returner with NFL ability for punt and kickoff returns.
Torn ACL and MCL in October means he won't be able to answer questions about his straight-line speed until after the draft. Primarily a return specialist until flashing as a receiver as a senior. A bit raw as a route-runner. Relies on his athletic ability in this area, rather than precise footwork. Lets too many passes get into his pads.
-------------------------
Mike_Thomas 81308 107
--NAME-- is a classic case that big things come in small packages. Having played for a team in a rebuilding process, as a senior he led the team to its first bowl game appearance in nine seasons. The Wildcats would have probably been sitting home in January if not for --NAME--' outstanding performance in a variety of roles, amassing 1,648 all-purpose yards while scoring touchdowns rushing, receiving and returning punts in 2008.
Regarded as the school's best all-purpose threat, --NAME-- closed out his career setting the school and Pac-10 Conference all-time record with 259 receptions. His 3,231 receiving yards placed eighth in league annals and third on the Arizona record charts, as his 23 touchdown grabs tied for third in Wildcats history. He amassed 4,891 yards, the fourth-best career total at Arizona.
--NAME-- excelled in football, track and basketball at DeSoto High School. He earned a spot on the 2004 All-District 7-5A team as a wide receiver on offense and return specialist. He added Prep Star All-Midlands, Super Prep All-Southwest and Houston Chronicle Texas Top 100 accolades. He was rated among the nation's top 30 receivers, receiving a four-star prospect grade from Max Emfinger's recruiting service.
As a senior, --NAME-- rushed 333 yards on a mere 26 carries and had 15 receptions for 205 yards in a run-oriented offense. That year, he helped the team compile a 9-2 record. After his final season, he competed for the West team in the 2005 U.S. Army All-American Bowl at San Antonio, a game that featured the top 78 national players.
--NAME-- enrolled at Arizona in 2005 and made an immediate impact. He was named Pac-10 Conference Freshman of the Year, the first Wildcat to ever earn that honor. He also added Freshman All-American second-team honors. He played in every game, starting four contests, but was used as a decoy in the season finale vs. Arizona State after having surgery to repair broken bones in his forehand. He led the team with 52 receptions for 771 yards (14.8 avg) and five touchdowns. He added 40 yards and a score on five carries and generated 811 all-purpose yards. 
--NAME--' hand injury at the end of 2005 caused him to miss more than a month of the 2006 off-season training program. He started 10 games at split end, placing second on the team with 50 catches for 597 yards (11.9 avg) and two scores, adding six carries for 68 yards (11.3 avg). He also recorded four solo tackles on special teams.
The 2007 season saw --NAME-- garner national attention. The All-Pac 10 Conference first-team choice led the team with a career-high 83 receptions, the third-best season total in school annals. He amassed 1,038 yards (12.5 avg), the fourth-best total in a campaign by a Wildcat. Eleven of those grabs resulted in touchdowns, tying the Arizona single-season mark.
--NAME-- finished third in the league with an average of 152.17 all-purpose yards per game. He took over kickoff return chores, totaling 615 yards on 26 attempts (23.7 avg) and rushed 10 times for 173 yards, including one score.
--NAME-- became just the 12th player in league history to earn All-Pac 10 Conference first-team honors at multiple positions in the same season (as a receiver and punt returner) in 2008. He started all 13 games, leading the league with an average of 5.69 receptions per game, hauling in 74 passes for 825 yards (11.1 avg) and four touchdowns. 
He scored once on 24 carries for 114 yards and returned 14 kickoffs fo317 yards (22.6 avg). As a punt returner, he ranked second in the league and 15th nationally with a 13.52-yard average on 29 attempts with two scores. His average of 126.77 all-purpose yards per game ranked fifth in the Pac-10.
2005: Suffered fractured bones in his forehand vs. Washington (11/12) and underwent surgery to have screws inserted. Despite wearing a cast, he was back in the starting lineup the following game vs. Arizona State.
2006: Suffered a high ankle sprain in the season opener vs. Brigham Young (9/02) and the injury lingered for more than a month.
Attended DeSoto (Texas) High School, excelling in football, track and basketball All-District 7-5A pick as a wide receiver and return specialist in 2004 Prep Star All-Midlands, Super Prep All-Southwest and Houston Chronicle Texas Top 100 choice Was rated among the nation's top 30 receivers, receiving a four-star prospect grade from Max Emfinger's recruiting service As a senior, --NAME-- rushed 333 yards on a mere 26 carries and had 15 receptions for 205 yards in a run-oriented offense That year, he helped the team compile a 9-2 record After his final season, he competed for the West team in the 2005 U.S. Army All-American Bowl at San Antonio, a game that featured the top 78 national players.
Short, but has a strong, surprisingly think frame. Good initial burst off the snap and can quickly eat up the cushion if unchallenged at the line of scrimmage. Can sink his hips and shows good immediate burst out of his breaks. Good toughness as a receiver and returner. Not afraid of contact and will go over the middle or attack the seam as a returner with reckless abandon. Good vision for the cutback and sets up his blocks well. Soft hands for the reception. Can pluck outside of his frame. Good body control to make extend and make the tough catch. Short, but times his leaps well. Returned two punts as a senior -- his first year as a returner. Solid week of practice at the Senior Bowl. Well suited to moving inside to the slot position.
Will be limited to a slot position in the NFL, as he lacks the size and strength to play outside. More quick than fast. Good timed speed, but lacks the top end speed to consistently beat defenders over the top. Prone to lapses in concentration and drops more passes than he should. Production is inflated due to Arizona's spread offense and lack of surrounding playmakers throughout much of --NAME--' career.
-------------------------
Morgan_Trent 81310 179
Recruited as a wide receiver, --NAME-- made a smooth adjustment to the defensive backfield, earning five starting assignments and Freshman All-American honors in his first year with the varsity in 2005. The talented defender used his blazing speed to excel in deep coverage as a regular in the starting lineup over the next four years.
The opposition attempted 250 passes vs. --NAME--, as he allowed 105 receptions for 1,036 yards and four touchdowns. He held his opponents to a 42.0 pass completion percentage, as his main pass coverage assignments averaged 9.87 yards per pass completion and 4.14 yards per pass attempt vs. the cornerback. 
At St. Mary's High School --NAME-- was a Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team choice. He was rated the third-best prospect in Michigan, the nation's 24th-best wide receiver in the nation and the 28th-best prospect in the Midwest by Rivals100.com. Max Emfinger rated him the fifth-best prep receiver in the country, while Super Prep ranked him 21st at that position.
--NAME-- ranked second on The Detroit News Blue Chip list and was the third-best receiver by The Lansing State Journal. The two-time Oakland County Dream Team selection was also a Detroit Free Press All-North first-team, honorable mention All-State and honorable mention Best of the Midwest pick as a senior. He earned Eccentric All-Area and All-Catholic League accolades in his final year and was an All-State honorable mention by The Detroit News as a junior.
--NAME-- started all four seasons for St. Mary's catching 84 passes for 1,533 yards and 16 touchdowns, along with 12 rushes for 250 yards and four scores. As a defensive back, he set the school record for career interceptions with 23, previously held by former Wolverine Grant Mason and recorded 117 career solo tackles. As a senior, he made 11catches for 270 yards and two touchdowns while posting 70 tackles (38 solo) and intercepted six passes.
During his junior campaign, he caught 26 passes for 400 yards and six touchdowns, while delivering seven interceptions. He added 29 receptions for 460 yards and seven scores, as he also intercepted 10 passes as a sophomore. In his first season, he made 18 grabs for 290 yards and five touchdowns.
--NAME-- competed with the Maximum Output indoor track and field team, coached by former Wolverine Stan Edwards. He was timed in a 10.7 100 meters and has been timed in a 6.83 60-yard dash, an indoor state record and the sixth fastest time in the country. He holds the indoor state record in the 200 meter with a time of 21.79 and was a 200-meter All-American, capturing second place at the Nike Indoor Championships with a time of 21.74 seconds. His best prep time in the 200-meters was 21.61 seconds.
--NAME-- spent the 2004 season on the Michigan scout team. He was moved to the secondary prior to the 2005 season, going on to start in five contests. The Sporting News' Freshman All-American second-team choice posted 22 tackles (20 solos) with six deflected passes and a pair of interceptions. Opponents completed just 35.14 percent of the passes targeted into his area, as he was in on a total of 14 third-down stops.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- underwent midseason surgery to repair a broken bone in his left hand. He would start 11-of-12 games, collecting 45 tackles (40 solo) with two stops for losses. Because of his hand injury, he could only deflect three passes and pick off another. 21 of his plays involved third-down stops, as the opposition averaged 11.14 yards on 35 pass completions into his area.
--NAME-- took over left cornerback duties from a departed Leon Hall as a junior. He was a second-team All-Big Ten Conference choice, as he limited the opponents to a 31.76 pass completion percentage and just 3.07 yards per attempt, on 85 passes targeted into his territory. He registered a career-high 10 pass deflections and picked off another throw. He also made 41 tackles (32 solo) with two stops behind the line of scrimmage, as he was involved in 23 third-down stops.
In 2008, --NAME-- started all 12 games, but the entire team struggled, failing to make the bowl season. He recorded 41 tackles (28 solo) with three interceptions and a pair of pass deflections. He saw his main pass coverage assignments catch 30-of-52 balls thrown to them (57.69%) for 294 yards and a pair of touchdowns.
2005: Sat out the Alamo Bowl clash vs. Nebraska (12/28) with a hamstring pull.
2006: Did not play vs. Minnesota (9/30) after suffering a broken bone in his left hand vs. Wisconsin (9/23), undergoing surgery to repair.
Attended St. Mary's (Orchard Lake, Mich.) High School, playing football for head coach George Porritt Prep Star Top 100 Dream Team choice Rated the third-best prospect in Michigan, the nation's 24th-best wide receiver in the nation and the 28th-best prospect in the Midwest by Rivals100.com Max Emfinger rated him the fifth-best prep receiver in the country, while Super Prep ranked him 21st at that position Ranked second on The Detroit News Blue Chip list and was the third-best receiver by The Lansing State Journal The two-time Oakland County Dream Team selection was also a Detroit Free Press All-North first-team, honorable mention All-State and honorable mention Best of the Midwest pick as a senior Earned Eccentric All-Area and All-Catholic League accolades in his final year and was an All-State honorable mention by The Detroit News as a junior Started all four seasons for St. Mary's catching 84 passes for 1,533 yards and 16 touchdowns, along with 12 rushes for 250 yards and four scores As a defensive back, he set the school-record for career interceptions with 23, previously held by former Wolverine Grant Mason and recorded 117 career solo tackles As a senior, he made 11catches for 270 yards and two touchdowns while posting 70 tackles (38 solos) and intercepted six passes During his junior campaign, he caught 26 passes for 400 yards and six touchdowns, while delivering seven interceptions Added 29 receptions for 460 yards and seven scores, as he also intercepted ten passes as a sophomore In his first season, he made 18 grabs for 290 yards and five touchdowns Competed with the Maximum Output indoor track and field team, coached by former Wolverine Stan Edwards Timed in a 10.7 100 meters and has been timed in a 6.83 60-yard dash, an indoor state record and the sixth fastest time in the country Holds the indoor state record in the 200 meter with a time of 21.79 and was a 200-meter All-American, capturing second place at the Nike Indoor Championships with a time of 21.74 seconds His best prep time in the 200-meters was 21.61 seconds.
Good height for the position. Uses his long arms to break up passes in front of the receiver. Secure tackler in the open. Good cut tackler and can get off receiver blocks. Effective reading the quarterback in zone coverage to get involved in the play. Has the size and vertical to fight for balls in the air. Stays with receivers heading down the sideline, maintaining inside position.
A bit thin in the hips. Lacks change-of-direction ability, struggling to stay with quicker receivers inside. Doesn't get his hands on the receiver at the line often enough. A bit choppy and upright in his backpedal, which can cause him problems transitioning on out routes. Lacks the strength to cause turnovers and has questionable hands.
-------------------------
Patrick_Turner 81312 87
High profile disappointments Mike Williams and Dwayne Jarrett might have tainted scouts' perceptions of tall USC receivers, but a breakout 2008 campaign and subsequent impressive Senior Bowl has scouts rethinking their stance on --NAME--. 
After only flashing the potential promised when the highly-regarded high school recruit from Nashville signed with the Trojans, --NAME-- finally unleashed his talents in his senior season, earning second-team All-Pac-10 accolades by catching 49 passes for 741 yards and 10 touchdowns. With a playmaker opposite him (junior Damian Williams), --NAME--'s 6-5, 221-pound frame and surprisingly quick feet helped him become one of the country's better possession receivers. 
If similarly protected in the NFL, he could be the first big receiver from the land of Troy since Keyshawn Johnson to make good on his unique talents. Had an arm span of 33 1/4 inches and a hand span of 9 5/8 inches at the combine.
He had 48 receptions for 800-plus yards and 11 touchdowns in 2004 at Goodpasture High in West Madison (Tenn.). As a junior, he caught 56 passes for 955 yards (17.1 avg.) with 12 TDs. He was a Student Sports Sophomore All-American in 2002 when he had 56 catches for 1,033 yards with 14 TDs. He also was on the basketball and track teams at Goodpasture.
Long, lean build with adequate overall muscle development. Long arms and big hands. Good lateral quickness and hand play to get off the line of scrimmage cleanly. Better foot quickness and balance as a route-runner than most receivers of his height. Good vision and willing to cut back inside against the grain to generate yards after the catch. Times his leaps well and has the strength to go up and make the catch with defenders draped on him. Can track over his shoulder and can extend. Stepped up his play as a senior and was a pleasant surprise at the Senior Bowl in Mobile, Ala.
Relies on build-up speed to get downfield. Lacks the burst off the snap or out of his breaks to threaten defenders, potentially allowing NFL-caliber cornerbacks to stick in his pocket on underneath and intermediate routes. Not the physical dominator his size would indicate. Doesn't use his size and strength often enough to generate separation from undersized defenders. Lacks the agility in the open field or the strength to run through tackles to be much of a playmaking threat after the reception.
-------------------------
Don_Carey 81809 177
--NAME-- will be one of draftable cornerback prospects unearthed from outside the Football Bowl Subdivision. A four-year starter, he was second-team All-MEAC as a junior and was named on the first team in 2008. He accumulated eight interceptions and 14 pass breakups over those two seasons. An excellent student, --NAME-- turned down a chance to attend Yale because it was cost prohibitive. His play at the East-West Shrine practices earned him a lot of credibility among scouts.
A two-year varsity player for Booker T. coach Larry Stepney, a former NSU player   Was a second-team All-Eastern District pick as a senior, when he tied for the team lead in interceptions (eight)   Was also a successful receiver and kick returner for the Bookers   Scored six total touchdowns as a senior, five on receptions and one on a punt return   Had 23 receptions for the season, including two for touchdowns in an Eastern Region playoff game   Had the second-highest GPA on the team and graduated with honors.
PERSONAL
Adequate height and a fair build throughout for his frame.   Plays physically at the line and in coverage.   Good straight-line speed and excellent recovery speed.   Gets back into the play even if a receiver makes a nice head fake to get an advantage.   Very capable of reading the quick screen or supporting the run on the outside.
Lacks top-end speed and great strength.   Will be a little too physical at times, might be susceptible to pass interference calls.   Gets moved too easily by receiver blocks.   Played against a lower level of competition and must speed up his recognition.   Inconsistent hands for the interception.
-------------------------
Brooks_Foster 81819 160
--NAME-- made North Carolina's basketball team as a walk on in 2005 and played in five games for the eventual national champions. Great things were expected from him on the football field as well as a top recruit from South Carolina, but he did not step into the forefront during his four years in Chapel Hill. He averaged 32 catches for 412 yards and two touchdowns over his career (30-334-2 in 2008), occasionally making a big play but never becoming "the guy." His triangle numbers intrigue scouts, who acknowledge his unique athleticism. Had an arm span of 32 inches and a hand span of 9 5/8 inches at the combine.
Ranked the Number 11 prospect in South Carolina by SuperPrep.   Ranked among the top 25 players in South Carolina by The Charlotte Observer.   Caught 56 passes for 759 yards and seven touchdowns as a senior.   Returned 10 kickoffs for 275 yards and scored two touchdowns.   Member of South Carolina's Shrine Bowl team.   Caught four passes for 72 yards in the Shrine Bowl.   Caught 35 passes for 500 yards and scored eight touchdowns as a junior.   Coached by Jeff Snipes, a former assistant coach of NC State's Dick Sheridan.
Athletic build with room for additional mass. Long arms. At least adequate straight-line speed to challenge over the top. Good agility. Flashes the foot quickness and balance to be an effective route-runner. Generally reliable hands. Can extend outside of his frame and pluck the ball out of the air. Catches and quickly turns upfield for positive yardage. Good strength to run through arm tackles in the open field.
Isn't the sum of his parts. Lacks elite top-end speed to challenge deep and the explosiveness out of his breaks to consistently gain separation. Inconsistent hands. Allows too many balls into his chest, resulting in some ugly drops. Struggled with a knee injury late in the year and had to leave the Senior Bowl practices early as the pain flared up again. Knee requires a medical check.
-------------------------
Dan_Gronkowski 81829 255
With head coach Ralph Friedgen turning over the offense to coordinator James Franklin, the new West Coast offensive system saw --NAME-- emerge as a quality receiver. Already regarded as one of college football's premier blockers, the Terrapin Council team leader was never really a focal point of the team's aerial attack during his first three seasons, but that all changed during his final campaign.
With Franklin returning to run the offense, --NAME-- saw plenty of action as the safety valve target for the Terps. "I think having a new offensive coordinator has really added a new excitement to our program," Friedgen said. "I like our staff. They relate to the kids well and I think the kids are having more fun." Franklin was the offensive coordinator at Kansas State the last two years after spending one season with the Green Bay Packers.
--NAME--'s blocking prowess is the byproduct of his incredible strength. The former prep quarterback registered the second-highest strength index on the team in spring 2008 testing. He also boasts a career-best squat of 635 pounds, the second-best figure by a Maryland tight end, topped only by the 685-pound lift from Vernon Davis (49ers). In each of his last four offseasons, the tight end received Iron Terp honors, a recognition for his outstanding performances in the training room.
Having received his master's in Marketing after just three years at Maryland, --NAME-- comes from a sports-oriented family. His older brother, Gordie, Jr., was a first baseman for Jacksonville University from 2003-06. His brother, Chris, was a teammate at Maryland for two seasons (2005-06), where he played fullback. 
Chris later transferred to the University of Arizona, sitting out the 2007 season under NCAA transfer rules. He is presently competing as a H-Back for the Wildcats, playing alongside their younger brother, Rob, a Freshman All-American tight end in 2007.
--NAME-- was a multi-sport standout at Williamsville North High School. He earned four letters in football, playing for head coach Mike Mammoliti. He started as a wide receiver during his sophomore campaign, setting a school single-season record with 539 yards receiving.
He switched to quarterback for his final two campaigns, completing 122 of 207 passes (58.9 percent) for 1,407 yards and 16 touchdowns as a senior. His completion, yardage and touchdown totals were all school annual records. He was named League Offensive Most Valuable Player and was a Western New York All-Academic team selection. He also added four letters in baseball, three in basketball and one in hockey.
--NAME-- turned down scholarship offers from Arizona, Purdue and Syracuse, joining Maryland in 2003 as a grey-shirt. He deferred 2004 spring enrollment to join the team in time for the January 2004 Gator Bowl clash vs. West Virginia. He spent the 2004 season redshirting on the scout team, where the new tight end was a Scout Team Player of the Week pick vs. Duke and Virginia.
In 2005, --NAME-- appeared in five games as a reserve, as both of his catches, good for 37 yards, led to Terrapin scoring drives (one set up a field goal, the other, a fourth-down conversion, led to a Maryland touchdown). As a sophomore, he shared tight end duties with Joey Haynos, starting seven games at the traditional tight end position and two more at H-Back. He caught just two passes for 11 yards, but one resulted in his first career touchdown and the other set up a Maryland field goal. It was his stellar blocking that caught pro scouts' notice, as he registered 70 knockdowns/key blocks that included 11 timely hits downfield and 10 others that resulted in Terrapin touchdowns.
As a junior, --NAME-- started the team's first eight games before a left knee sprain vs. Clemson would sideline him for two contests. He would return to play in a reserve role for the final three games. The C.P. "Lefty" McIntosh Public Service Award recipient and Academic All-Atlantic Coast Conference choice also received Academic All-American consideration. 
He pulled in seven passes for 66 yards (9.4 avg), as five of those grabs produced first downs. Three of his receptions were for 10 yards or longer, as he set up two touchdown drives and three other series that ended with Terps' field goals with his key catches. He delivered nine touchdown-resulting blocks, 10 blocks downfield and a total of 48 knockdowns, grading 86.63 percent for blocking consistency, the highest grade of any tight end in the nation during the season.
--NAME-- earned Academic All-District II first-team accolades and was an All-Atlantic Coast Conference honorable mention. The recipient of the team's A.V. Williams Award for outstanding sportsmanship, he also earned the George Boutselis Memorial Award, given to the player with the highest grade point average, earning that honor for the second straight season in 2008.
As a senior, --NAME-- started 12 games. After catching just 11 passes in his first three seasons, the Terrapin Council member hauled in a career-high 29 passes, good for 287 yards (9.9 avg) and three touchdowns. He also continued his excellence as a blocker, as he registered 66 knockdowns, coming up with 11 touchdown-resulting blocks.
2007: Suffered what first appeared to be a left knee anterior cruciate ligament sprain vs. Clemson (10/27), but the injury was later diagnosed as a medial collateral sprain that would prevent him from playing vs. North Carolina (11/03) and Boston College (11/10). He returned to play in a reserve role for the team's final three contests.
Attended Williamsville (N.Y.) High School, playing football for head coach Mike Mammoliti Earned four letters in football, starting at wide receiver during his sophomore campaign Set a school single-season record with 539 yards receiving Switched to quarterback for his final two campaigns, completing 122 of 207 passes (58.9 percent) for 1,407 yards and 16 touchdowns as a senior His completion, yardage and touchdown totals were all school annual records Named League Offensive Most Valuable Player and was a Western New York All-Academic team selection Added four letters in baseball, three in basketball and one in hockey Member of the National Honor Society.
Looks the part. Good height, and even weight distribution. Good initial pop at the line of scrimmage as a blocker. Good hand placement. Good upper body strength to lock on and has the leg drive to knock defenders off the ball. Good lateral agility and balance to stay square with the defender. Good effort at the second level to block downfield. Uses his hands well to get off the line of scrimmage and into his routes. Presents a big target to the quarterback and knows where the holes in the zone are located. Secure receiver who can take a pop and hang on.
Lacks the preferred athleticism for the position. Only a short yardage target in the passing game. Slow off the line of scrimmage. Lumbers downfield and struggles to sink his hips and generate any explosion out of his breaks. Lacks the frame to add much more weight.
STEVE HEIDEN, Cleveland -- Like Heiden, --NAME--'s athleticism fails to translate to the football field. He has impressive timed speed, but lumbers getting off the line of scrimmage, negating his effectiveness on intermediate patterns. He is a physical blocker with good hands for the short-area tosses, but anything outside of controlled routes makes him a liability.
-------------------------
Brian_Hartline 81831 108
--NAME-- stepped up as a solid Number 2 receiver to --NAME-- Robiskie with 52 catches for 694 yards and six scores in 2007. But the move to QB Terrelle Pryor and a different offensive mindset early in 2008 decreased --NAME--'s role. While he was still a big-play threat who averaged 22.4 yards per receptions, --NAME-- finished with just 21 catches. 
Considering Ohio State's focus on Pryor's running ability, that --NAME-- considered leaving the Buckeyes wasn't a surprise. It was, however, a surprise that he didn't consider transferring rather than relinquishing his collegiate eligibility in the hopes of being a late-round pick. Had an arm span of 32 inches and a hand span of 10 inches at the combine.
Began his junior year as a quarterback, but switched to receiver after four games and caught 41 passes for 411 yards (his brother, Michael, replaced him at quarterback)   also returned punts and kickoffs as a junior  injured his knee in the season opener his senior year and missed the remainder of the season   did play in the Big 33 game   also ran track for three years and won state titles in both the 110-meter and the 300-meter hurdles as a senior.
Good height and an athletic frame. Good initial quickness off the snap. Better football player than overall athlete. Does a lot of the little things well. Reliable route-runner. Lacks elite burst out of his snaps, but runs them with precision. Good body lean and utilizes head fakes and varying speeds to help generate separation. Good hands. Tough. Will take a big hit and hang on to the ball. Good downfield blocker. Stalks defenders at the second level and can supply a big hit. Experienced special teams player.
Lacks the eye-popping athleticism to offer much upside. Doesn't have the straight-line speed to challenge over the top. Lacks burst out of his breaks. Generally reliable hands, but has some ugly drops when he's trying to make a move on the defender before securing the pass.
-------------------------
Manuel_Johnson 81833 229
Oklahoma's offense has so many stars that a solid contributor like --NAME-- can go unnoticed. While not particularly tall, strong or fast, --NAME--'s consistent production over the past three seasons in a complementary role has not gone unnoticed by scouts. 
His 42 catches for 714 yards and nine touchdowns in 2008 would have increased if not for a grotesquely dislocated elbow injury suffered against Kansas. Given his tough play on the field and work ethic in practice, it was no surprise when he returned with a brace after missing only one game. Had an arm span of 32 1/2 inches and a hand span of 8 3/4 inches at the combine.
Played quarterback and wide receiver   threw for 48 career touchdowns, ran for 18 scores and caught 17 more  Number 13 wide receiver in the nation (Rivals.com)   Number 16 player Postseason Texas Top 100 (Rivals.com)   Number 21 player in Texas (SuperPrep)   MVP District 13-AAA (2004)   MVP All East Texas (2004)   first team All-State (2004)   Dave Campbell Player of the Year (2004)   first-team All-State (2003)   also a member of the basketball and track and field teams   coached by Jeff Traylor.
More than the sum of his parts. Lanky build with room for additional mass without a significant loss in quickness. At least adequate straight-line speed. Good agility. Can plant his hips and drive out of his breaks to generate separation. Reliable route-runner. Secure hands. Can extend outside of his frame to make the tough catch. Tough. Courageous over the middle. Emerged as a senior and some feel he could be an ascending player. Looks to make a block at the second level. Good locker room presence.
Better football player than athlete. May lack upside. Marginal deep speed. Doesn't make defenders miss in the open field. Production inflated by his role in this explosive offense. Elbow requires a medical check.
-------------------------
Terrance_Knighton 81841 72
--NAME--'s large body and fair athleticism is coveted by NFL scouts. The 2008 first-team All-MAC pick contributed heavily as a true freshman (after a post-graduate year at Milford Academy) before earning the starting nod in each of the next three seasons. He averaged 56 tackles, 7.5 for loss and four pass breakups from 2006-2008, while recovering six fumbles and blocking four kicks over the past two years. Teams looking for a one-gap 4-3 nose tackle will be most interested in --NAME--.
Attended Milford Academy in New Berlin, N.Y., playing both TE and DL under head coach Bill Chaplick   Made 70 tackles and six sacks in 2004.   Was a two-year varsity letterwinner at Windsor (Conn.) High School, playing tight end and defensive end under head coach Mark Welch   Earned All-State honors from the coaches association and Hartford Courant All-Area accolades in 2003   Made 30 catches for 400 yards and four TDs as a junior   Was elected to the Governor's Cup Rhode Island-Connecticut All-Star Game   Was also an All-CCC West League basketball player.
Good height, length and girth for his position.   Better-than-expected straight-line speed and change-of-direction ability, able to sniff out and disrupt screen plays.   Will chase plays downfield.   Strong upfield rush, either up the shoulder of his defender or splitting double teams.   Uses his long arms to wrap up in the open field or track down ballcarriers coming through the hole.   Flashes violent hands, especially when his man retreats off the snap in passing situations.   Active knocking down passes and blocking field goals because of his push, arm length and large hands.   Keeps cut blocks off his knees.   Athletic enough to quickly jump on loose balls and get down quickly in short-yardage situations.
Might be a nose tackle and three-technique "tweener."   Not particularly explosive off the snap.   Doesn't play as strong as his size would indicate and he will stand after the snap, giving up leverage.   Needs to use his hands more consistently at the line to free himself to make plays or to bull rush his man into the pocket.   Doesn't have many pass rush moves.   Must be more consistent pressing after the initial pop.
-------------------------
Cameron_Morrah 81851 248
There is no questioning the athletic ability or potential that --NAME-- displays, but there were more than a few puzzled faces when he announced in January that he was leaving the Bears and applied for the 2009 NFL Draft. He has become the team's starter just recently after spending two seasons backing up Craig Stevens, and managed just 41 catches in 33 games at California.
However, he is convinced that he is ready to take his game to the next level, much against the advice of his head coach, Jeff Tedford. "Coming out of high school, it was important for me to attend a college that ran a pro-style offense that would help me prepare for the next level, and Coach Tedford's offense has been a perfect fit for me," --NAME-- said in his press conference announcing his decision. 
"The decision to leave Cal has been a hard one for me. My Grandma's recent illness played a role in my decision to leave because she means so much to me and my family. She has seen me play at every level and it is important for me to try to give her the opportunity to see me play at the next level. With that said, I would not have made this decision to leave if I did not believe I was ready to be successful in the NFL."
"We work with NFL candidates to educate them on their prospects for the draft as well as the benefits for staying in college," Coach Tedford said. "I don't necessarily agree with the decision, but I am supportive of --NAME-- and hope that he is successful at the next level." 
--NAME--, who drew the attention of NFL scouts last season for his size and mobility, is the third Cal player to leave early in three years, joining tailback Marshawn Lynch and wide receiver DeSean Jackson.
--NAME-- was a Prep Star All-American defensive end at Claremont High School. He was named to the 2004 All-San Gabriel Valley first-team by the Los Angeles Times after leading his team to the Baseline League championship. Rivals.com gave him a four-star rating and All-American honors, ranking him as the 13th-best strong-side defensive end in the nation and 28th-best overall player in the state of California.
--NAME-- enrolled at California in 2005, spending the season on the scout team, adjusting to offense while learning the techniques for competing at tight end. The following season, he was joined on the Bears' squad by his brother, Eric, who transferred to the program after spending two years as a linebacker at Kansas State.
--NAME-- appeared in eight games on offense and 10 games overall (special teams) in 2006. His only reception was a 3-yard touchdown vs. Portland State. He backed up Stevens in 12 games during the 2007 season, missing the Stanford contest with a knee sprain. With his size and strength, he powered his way for 155 yards and a touchdown on thirteen catches (11.9 avg).
With the receiving corps struggling in 2008, --NAME-- took over the role as featured pass catcher. He started all 13 games as a junior, finishing second on the team with 27 receptions for 326 yards (12.1 avg). What was very impressive was the fact that eight of those grabs were good for touchdowns (29.63 percent of his catches). Only five players had more touchdown receptions in a season for the Bears.
2007: Sat out the Stanford contest (12/01) with a knee sprain.
Attended Claremont (Pomona, Calif.) High School, earning Prep Star All-American honors as a defensive end Named to the 2004 All-San Gabriel Valley first-team by the Los Angeles Times after leading his team to the Baseline League championship Rivals.com gave him a four-star rating and All-American honors, ranking him as the 13th-best strong-side defensive end in the nation and 28th-best overall player in the state of California.
Long, lanky build with plenty of room for additional mass. Good use of hands and lateral quickness off the line of scrimmage to get into his route. Can threaten down the seam. Flashes the ability to sink his hips and generate some separation out of his breaks. Flashes courage over the middle to extend and make the tough catch in traffic. Can snatch the ball out of the air. Generally soft hands for the reception and will catch with his body when he is expecting a big hit. Ascending prospect whose best football is still ahead of him.
Lacks bulk, especially in his upper body. Shows some effort as a run blocker, but is easily discarded by front seven defenders due to his lack of strength. Talented receiver, but is prone to lapses in concentration. Drops some easy passes. Doesn't consistently use his size to his advantage over the middle. Impressive touchdown total more a reflection of defenses' focus on dynamic sophomore running back Jahvid Best.
JACOB TAMME, Indianapolis -- Like Tamme, --NAME-- is going to have to find the right system to play in, as he lacks the experience, size or strength you look for in a traditional tight end. While his eight touchdown catches in 2008 are impressive, there were more lapses in concentration than production from him last season. He has just one year as a starter under his belt, but felt that after just 27 receptions he was ready for prime time. This is the type of player you draft later on the second day, based on potential and hope he eventually develops. He is just not ready for the big show yet.
-------------------------
Lydon_Murtha 81853 228
--NAME-- is a prototypical smart, big and strong Nebraska lineman, but it's been tough for him to stay on the field. He missed the first two games of last season with a staph infection and the final two games with a sprained foot, the last four games of 2007 with a foot injury and his entire freshman season with various ailments (bruised calf, hamstring, shoulder). 
--NAME-- did start games in all four of his seasons in Lincoln, at left and right tackle. His size, strength and relative athleticism make him a solid late-round pick or priority free agent at right tackle. Had an arm span of 33 7/8 inches and a hand span of 10 1/8 inches at the combine.
2004: Sat out his freshman season dealing with calf, hamstring and shoulder injuries.
2007: Missed the final four games with a foot injury.
2008: Missed the first two games with a staph infection and the final two games with a sprained foot.
--NAME-- joined Hutchinson High School teammate Nathan Swift in becoming the first players from Minnesota to sign with Nebraska since 1995. In 2003, --NAME-- helped Hutchinson and Coach Andy Rostberg to a 9-4 record and a state runner-up finish in Class 4A (second-largest). --NAME-- helped pave the way for Swift to rush for more than 2,000 yards as a senior tailback. --NAME-- was a first-team all-state selection by several outlets, including Associated Press. He was an all-metro pick in the Minneapolis area each of his final two seasons and was named the Minnesota Gatorade Player of the Year in 2003. A three-year starter, he helped Hutchinson to the state semifinals as a junior in 2002, after making a trip to the playoffs as a sophomore in 2001. 
--NAME-- was ranked as the nation's Number 1 offensive tackle prospect by ESPN recruiting analyst Tom Lemming. --NAME-- was one of three 2004 Husker recruits who participated in the U.S. Army All-American Game.
--NAME-- was also one of Minnesota's top shot putters. In his first year of track competition in 2003, he finished third at the state meet with a throw of 57-6, before finishing fifth in 2004. He was also an Honor Roll member his final two years and was a youth leader at his church.
Prototypical height for right tackle spot. Short steps and quick set-up in pass protection. Uses his length and kick-slide to stone outside pass rush moves. Comes out of his stance adequately, and can get movement in short-yardage situations. Sustains blocks inside through the whistle. Latches onto defenders at second level. Can get the inside shoulder of tackles to keep them from run plays going away from him. Sells the bootleg.
Stiff in the upper body. Lacks the foot speed to recover on inside moves. Inconsistent speed to get to the second level; lumbers on some plays and looks fluid on others. Overextends when pass rushers free themselves after the initial blow. Slow and ineffective on cut blocks, whether on the line or trying to reach a blitzer on the outside. Needs better second effort if quarterback scrambles away from him. Injury history is a major issue.
-------------------------
Seth_Olsen 81859 132
Nationally underrated, --NAME-- leaves Iowa as a first-team All-Big Ten selection and a rising prospect on NFL boards due to his size, strength, durability and versatility. A four-year contributor, --NAME-- started each of the past two seasons, primarily on the right side of the line, but also seeing some action at left tackle. 
He was first-team All-Big Ten selection by the media and coaches while primarily at right guard in 2008 after garnering honorable mention honors at right tackle as a junior. A strong showing throughout the week at the East-West Shrine Game might have secured --NAME--'s place as a second-day draft selection. Had an arm span of 33 1/8 inches and a hand span of 9 1/2 inches at the combine.
Earned Parade and EA Sports All-American honors as a senior, along with first-team all-state and all-metro laurels.   named first-team all-state and all-metro as a junior, as well as Student Sports Junior all-American.   helped lead prep team to three consecutive undefeated conference seasons and the 2003 Nebraska state championship.   Millard North had a 36-2 record in his three years as a starter.   as a senior, helped pave the way for a running game that averaged 473 yards per game.   also played defensive tackle for three years, amassing 92 tackles (44 solo), nine tackles for loss and three sacks..   attended same high school as DB Adam Shada and LB Jeff Tarpinian.   high school coach was Fred Petito.
Naturally large man with good weight distribution. Good initial quickness off the snap. Very good hand placement and upper-body strength. Seems to enjoy the physical hand-to-hand combat inside the trenches. Good strength to latch onto the defender, turn and either sustain his position or toss the defender onto ground for a pancake block. Underrated short-area lateral quickness and balance to hold up in pass protection. Plays with good leverage despite his height. Versatile blocker who has started at right guard, right tackle and left tackle over the past two years. Impressive week of practice at the East-West Shrine game.
Strong and technically refined, but isn't an elite athlete. Only phone-booth quickness. Struggles adjusting in space at the second level. Lumbers after a few steps and is forced to lunge at defenders. Lacks the deep kick-step and elite lateral quickness to handle the left tackle position, though he has experience there. May struggle on the outside at right tackle.
-------------------------
Bernard_Scott 81869 209
NFL scouts will say --NAME-- is not really fast, big or strong. But he is simply one of the most productive runners in college football history. 
The 2008 Harlon Hill Trophy winner and two-time AP Little All-American rushed for 4,321 yards and 63 touchdowns from 2007-08, adding 93 receptions for 1,391 yards and 10 scores. That doesn't even take into consideration his All-American 2006 season at Blinn JC (1,892 yards, 27 TDs) and a freshman year (played at Central Arkansas, from which his current ACU head coach came) in which he gained 1,026 yards and 11 touchdowns. Had an arm span of 31 3/4 inches and a hand span of 9 1/2 inches at the combine.
However, his checkered past may catch up with him. He was kicked off his high school team for being part of a fight off campus, dismissed from Central Arkansas for - among other things - hitting a coach and has had multiple additional run-ins with police. 
--NAME--'s combination of excellent vision and quick feet make him a fourth-round talent. But character issues will require a strong recommendation of --NAME--'s improved maturity (he did turn 25 in February) from coaches. That could get him a late-round selection or priority free agent call.
--NAME-- was a first team National Junior College Athletic Association all-America after leading the Blinn JC Buccaneers to a 12-0 season and the NJCAA national championship. Blinn beat Pearl River Community College, 19-6, in the Pilgrim's Pride Bowl to win the national title. --NAME-- was named the game's MVP after rushing for 193 yards and one touchdown on 22 carries. --NAME-- averaged 154.4 rushing yards per game, and he finished his only junior college season with a junior college-best 1,892 yards and 27 touchdowns. He was also first team all Southwestern Junior College Football Conference.
Was not eligible for his senior year after being kicked off the football team for being involved in an off-campus fight. 2003 graduate of Wichita Falls High School. As a junior at Vernon High School in 2001, --NAME-- ran for 2,424 yards and 19 touchdowns in 13 games. He also had 150 receiving yards and two touchdowns. --NAME-- was a Class 3A first-team all-state selection by the Associated Press and was the Wichita Falls Times Record-News' Red River 22 Offensive Player of the Year.   --NAME-- was a first-team National Junior College Athletic Association all-America after leading the Blinn JC Buccaneers to a 12-0 season and the NJCAA national championship. Blinn beat Pearl River Community College, 19-6, in the Pilgrim's Pride Bowl to win the national title. --NAME-- was named the game's MVP after rushing for 193 yards and one touchdown on 22 carries. --NAME-- averaged 154.4 rushing yards per game, and he finished his only junior college season with a junior college-best 1,892 yards and 27 touchdowns. He was also first team all Southwestern Junior College Football Conference.
Excellent burst through the hole, and hits it hard. Very good vision, and usually finds the best running lane. Uses that vision and excellent footwork to pick his way through traffic. Sidesteps defenders in the hole. Patient runner inside or on the edge who will wait for blocks to develop before hitting the gas. Runs with a nice lean and low center of gravity, getting through arm tackles in traffic or in space. Keeps legs churning inside; puts his hand on the ground to maintain balance and get more yards. Excellent hands for the reception and makes the first man miss. Quick to get into his route, and fast in and out of his cut.
A bit leaner than most NFL teams like in their backs, although he runs low enough to handle a pounding. Runs with the ball in his left hand heading in either direction. Good second gear but lacks the elite third gear. Lack of experience in pass protection will be a concern as a third-down back. Major character issues and over-aged for a rookie running back.
-------------------------
Matt_Slauson 81871 193
The 'Huskers relied on --NAME-- to step in where needed throughout his four-year career. A second-team All-Big 12 pick at right guard as a senior, he started at both tackle spots and right guard in 2007, at right tackle for all but two games in 2007 (leg injury) and in three games as a true freshman. --NAME--'s versatility, size and strength are exactly what NFL teams (especially those using zone-blocking schemes) look for in a late-round offensive line prospect. Had an arm span of 33 1/8 inches and a hand span of 10 1/2 inches at the combine.
Played one season at Air Force Prep School in Colorado Springs, lining up at offensive tackle. --NAME-- spent the 2003 season at Air Academy High in Colorado Springs after moving from Oregon before his senior season. --NAME-- began his high school career at Sweet Home High in Oregon, where he starred on the offensive line for Coach Rob Younger. Overall, --NAME-- lettered three times in football, twice in basketball and four times in track during his prep career.
Good height with strong upper- and lower-body builds. Strong anchor; typically does not get pushed into quarterback. Gets his hands inside his man's jersey quickly and resets his hands to sustain. Picks up twists from the inside. Fires out of his stance on zone run and short-yardage plays. Will hustle to help quarterback when the play breaks down. Adequate moving in space; can reach linebackers and even safeties at the third level. Strong enough to block down on the tackle but use his right arm to prevent linebackers from blitzing between guard-tackle gap.
Agility might be tested against NFL defensive tackles. Recovery speed is lacking against quick spin moves. Must use a stronger initial punch in pass protection. Plays with high pads at times; must bend his knees to prevent losing the leverage battle. Will overextend when one-on-one against a strong tackle. Does not always pick up his first inside target when on the move.
-------------------------
Sammie_Stroughter 81873 233
For his first two years in Corvallis, --NAME-- was primarily a return specialist. That all changed in 2006, as he accumulated 1,293 yards on 74 receptions -- and still managed to score three touchdowns on punt returns. 
Unfortunately, he could not follow up that second-team All-Pac-10 performance in 2007 due to his battle with depression and a lacerated kidney. He came back from that redshirt season with a vengeance as a senior, earning first-team all-conference accolades by catching 70 passes for 1,040 yards and seven scores. 
--NAME--'s combination of receiving and return skills could land him a spot on an NFL roster in 2009. Had an arm span of 29 1/2 inches and a hand span of 9 inches at the combine.
SuperPrep Magazine All-Region receiver and Rivals.com listed him 48th in its "athlete" category   Member of TheInsiders.com Northwest Hot 100 list   Played wide receiver, running back, defensive back and kick returner for head coach Ernie Cooper   As an all-purpose back as a senior, he rushed for 986 yards on 126 carries (7.8 average) and scored 15 touchdowns   Caught 31 passes for 618 yards (19.9 average) and six touchdowns   Returned kickoffs for 322 yards and 22 punts for 395 yards and two touchdowns   For his career, he produced 2,321 all-purpose yards   First-team All-Sierra League and first-team all-section as a senior   Also first-team all-metro as a senior by the Sacramento Bee   His top prep game came as a senior against Rocklyn, when he rushed for 110 yards on just eight attempts and scored four touchdowns   Also caught three passes for 52 yards and a score   Second-team all-league as a sophomore   Earned two letters in football and three in track   Competing against some of the best high school athletes in Northern California, he placed second in both the boys' 100-meter dash and long jump at the Stanford Invitational.
Good lateral quickness and surprising strength to gain a release from press coverage. Good foot quickness and balance as a route-runner. Can generate consistent separation despite less than ideal deep speed. More quick than fast. Elusive. Can make defenders miss in small quarters and has the vision to set up blocks to turn short and intermediate routes into long gains. Can make the spectacular catch due to his body control and flexibility. Generally reliable hands. Tough. Willing to go over the middle and can absorb a big hit and hang on to the ball. Size, agility and toughness to project nicely as a slot receiver.
Smaller than scouts would like. Lacks the straight-line speed to challenge NFL cornerbacks over the top. Marginal late acceleration and can be caught from behind. Prone to lapses in concentration and drops too many passes. Teams will explore the personal issues appearing before the 2007 season.
-------------------------
Mike_Wallace 81877 84
Few attributes attract NFL scouts more than pure speed. --NAME-- certainly has that. Despite starting three years for the Rebels, he didn't establish himself as one capable of taking advantage of his speed until he averaged 18.9 yards on 38 receptions as a junior. A year later, --NAME--'s speed was even more lethal, as he averaged 20.1 yards per reception and scored a career-high seven touchdowns. 
--NAME-- is still a work in progress as a route-runner, but his ability to stretch defenses deep as an outside receiver and special teams wide on kickoff returns could land him a second-day draft selection from an NFL team looking to catch lightning in a bottle. Had an arm span of 31 3/8 inches and a hand span of 9 inches at the combine.
Rated first-team All-State honors as a wide receiver following senior season at O. Perry Walker High   Also earned league and district MVP honors as a senior, as well as all-league, All-Metro, All-West Bank and All-West Bank MVP   Was rated by SuperPrep as the 17th-best prospect in Louisiana and was a member of its 2004 Southwest Team   After seeing limited playing time as a junior (four receptions while playing mostly on defense), had an outstanding senior season, catching 60 passes for 1,039 yards (17.3 average per catch) and 19 touchdowns   Also returned four punts and four kickoffs for TDs, giving him 27 for the season and 162 points, and had seven TDs called back   Set school records for total points and for kicks returned for touchdowns   Earned two letters in football   Coached in high school by Terry Wilson   Also lettered once in track, earning All-State honors in the 100.
Looks the part. Athletic build with room for additional mass. Rare straight-line speed. Eats up the cushion quickly and can blow by the defender. Smooth acceleration and has a late burst to pull away if being challenged. Can track the ball over his shoulder. Developing into a more reliable route-runner and pass-catcher. Has the foot quickness and balance to be a good route-runner and can sink his hips. Generally uses his hands to make the reception, though he still allows too many into his pads. Has some lateral agility to make defenders miss. Helped himself with a solid week of practice at the Senior Bowl.
Still a work in progress as a route-runner. Learning to sink his hips and explode out of his cuts, as he has to gather himself too much. Struggles a bit against press coverage. Has to use his hands better to gain a quick release. Lets too many passes into his pads, resulting in some ugly drops.  Doesn't consistently show the vision and elusiveness in the open field to truly capitalize on his pure speed. Needs an open lane as a returner to break off a big gain.
-------------------------
Lardarius_Webb 81879 88
A versatile defensive back who his career at Southern Miss and showed real potential as a redshirt sophomore. He was dismissed from the team in January 2007, leading him to transfer to Nicholls State. In his two years playing for the Colonels, he was an All-American (seven INTs, 15 PBU) and a star on kick returns (425 punt-return and 1,060 kickoff-return yards, three scores). In fact, he was the first player in NCAA history to win his conference's offensive, defensive and special teams player of the week awards during his junior year. His ball skills and toughness get him noticed, but scouts wonder what scheme and position he fits best in the NFL.
Three-year starter for coach Rodger McDonald at Beauregard High School   As a senior, rushed for 738 yards and scored 15 touchdowns   Finished with 412 yards passing and threw four touchdowns   Defensively, he had 52 tackles and three fumble recoveries   Led the state of Alabama with 10 interceptions   As a junior, he rushed for 1,011 yards and scored 12 touchdowns   Passed for 731 yards and six touchdowns   Had 47 tackles, two fumble recoveries and seven interceptions   As a senior, he helped the team to a 7-4 record and a berth in the state playoffs   Led the team to a playoff berth as a junior   Team MVP   First-team all-state as a defensive back   Two-time first-team all-state as a defensive back   Two-time first-team Opelika-Auburn News selection   Lettered in basketball, where he was an all-state selection and was picked to play in the Mississippi/Alabama All-Star Game as a junior   Two-time first-team Opelika-Auburn News selection in basketball   Also ran track, where he won the state long jump and triple jump as a junior   Two-star (5.2) rating by rivals.com.
Tough, aggressive defensive back prospect who will likely flourish in a zone system.   Very willing to support the run and attack quick screens, can secure tackles by wrapping up or effectively cutting.   Able to read the quarterback and attack the ball with good closing and recovery speed.   Has the length to cut in front of receivers to knock away the ball.   Comes off his man in coverage to assist his secondary mates.   Natural hands for the interception or pass breakup, with the vertical and strength needed to high-point the ball while fighting off the receiver.   Makes the first man miss with a quick sidestep when fielding punts but also able to run tough and get upfield in a hurry on kickoff returns.   Plays with great confidence.   Will be solid on kick-coverage units because of his secure tackling.
Corner/safety "tweener" due to his lack of size and elite speed.   Barely adequate height and length for a corner.   Thin legs.   Stiff and slow in his backpedal.   Slow in his transition from backpedal to attack short routes.   Finds it difficult to get off blocks from larger receivers.   Gambles, gets beat on double moves when caught looking into the backfield too much.   Will dance on kickoff returns on occasion.   Runs with the ball loose on punt returns.   Teams will question reasons for transfer from Southern Miss.
-------------------------
Jarius_Wynn 81885 182
Scouts see a lot of potential in this former junior college transfer, who was Georgia Military Academy's defensive MVP in 2006. His size and length on the edge did not result in a lot of production in two years between the hedges (33 tackles, four sacks), though his growth might have been stunted a bit with the Georgia staff rotating him back and forth between defensive end and tackle throughout his junior season. Scouts wonder if he was on the verge of breaking out, as he enjoyed the two best games of his career for Georgia in his final two contests. --NAME-- racked up a career-high six tackles against rival Georgia Tech and followed up that performance with another four tackles, including two sacks, against Michigan State in the 2009 Capital One Bowl. If his game continues to improve, --NAME-- could make a roster as a swing end able to play the run and pressure the quarterback -- ultimately proving to be a better pro than collegiate player.
Georgia Military College   Coached by Bert Williams   Earned second-team National Junior College Athletic Association (NJCAA) All-American honors following the 2006 campaign   Voted team captain and defensive MVP   Tallied 21 tackles.
Coached by Larry Campbell   First-team GHSA All-State Class-A as a senior defensive lineman in 2004   Earned first-team All-State honors as an offensive lineman in 2003.
Looks the part.   Appears to have the frame to handle adding additional mass and make the transition inside to defensive tackle.   More technically refined than most junior college prospects.   Good hand usage to take on and slip blocks.   Has the lateral agility to force the play out wide.   Can break down in space and make the secure tackle.   Might be an ascending player.
Lacks burst off the snap.   Bit of a "tweener."   Lacks the speed off the edge to generate a consistent pass rush from the outside and the bulk to play inside at this time.   Needs an open lane to close on the ballcarrier.   Never established himself as a playmaker in the SEC despite plenty of hype.
-------------------------
Al_Afalava 89682 190
--NAME-- for more than three seasons at strong safety for the Beavers, taking over during his true freshman season. He managed only 36 tackles in 2008 (after making 64 as a junior), but showed some ability in coverage with two interceptions and eight pass break-ups. 
His reputation as a hammer in the secondary earned him honorable mention --NAME--l-Pac-10 each of the past two years. --NAME--'s linebacker size and mentality makes him a perfect in-the-box safety and special teams contributor at the next level.
--NAME-- was a two-star athlete by Scout.com and rated the second-best defensive back on the Islands by the recruiting service Rivals.com two-sport athlete first-team all-state on defense led Kahuku to a 10-2 record and an appearance in the semifinals of the state playoffs in 2004 the team was ranked Number 14 in the West and won the Oahu Interscholastic Association scored in a 2004 state quarterfinal game by recovering a fumble in the end zone helped Kahuku to the state title and a 14-0 record as a junior played in the state's Goodwill Football Classic --NAME--l-Star game made 100 tackles, including 20 for loss and nine quarterback sacks, and eight interceptions in '04 SuperPrep Magazine --NAME--l-Region team member.
Good build for the position. Instinctive defender who reads the quarterback's eyes well and breaks on the ball. Very quick to read run and come up in support. Physical hitter who can be an intimidating presence over the middle. Reliable open-field tackler. Willing to take on blocks to make the play. Durable performer with experience at strong and free safety.
May lack the speed and agility for NFL coverage. Makes most of his plays coming downhill and isn't the same playmaker with his back to the quarterback. Questionable deep speed. Lacks the hip flexibility to turn and run with receivers one on one. Rarely tested deep in this defense due to Oregon State's good pass rush and veteran press corners - both of whom will be drafted this April. Character red flag: Suspended for the first game of 2008 after he crashed his car into an empty bus shelter and left the scene on foot. Reached plea agreement to reduce original DUI, hit-and-run charges.
-------------------------
Aaron_Brown 89690 192
An all-around threat for four seasons at TCU, --NAME-- hopes to bring that versatility to the NFL. He started his career as Mountain West Freshman of the Year and Freshman All-American, and added a second-team nod in 2006 before suffering through an injury-filled junior season. He bounced back a bit as a senior, although his numbers weren't great (547 yards on only 99 carries; 95 yards on 12 receptions) because TCU's offense spreads the ball around. --NAME--'s receiver build may turn off some teams, but his potential as a kick returner (29.2 average, 1 touchdown) will gain him points with others.
Played in one game as a senior at Mayde Creek High School  Coached in football by Joe Sheffy  Ran a 4.4 40-yard dash and recorded a 10.45 100-meter dash time on the track, one of the fastest prep times in the nation in 2004.
Good quickness and straight-line speed, making him tough to catch from behind. Shifty in the hips, allowing him to avoid arm tackles and slip through small holes. Has foot quickness to sidestep tacklers and find a crease inside. Can run through trash inside, but is best when bouncing outside. Uses his vision to cut back into open space. Versatile enough to be sent in motion as a receiver. Adequate hands on the outside, can make the first man miss in space. Height and speed combination forces tough coverage matchups against linebackers and safeties. Willing blocker to free up other backs. Will get a chance to return kicks because he's willing to take the ball straight upfield and take punishment.
A running back/receiver 'tweener. Wide receiver build, good upper body development but tall and thin in the hips and calves. Fails to lower his pad level and is therefore too easy to bring down and takes too many big hits. Lacks lower body strength to anchor and sustain blocks outside, and misses his target on the run too often. Rarely used as a pass protector in the backfield. Takes time to get to full speed, tending to take long strides as a receiver. Does not switch ball into outside hand and is a bit loose with the handle.
-------------------------
Ryan_Durand 89712 239
--NAME-- was named second-team All-Big East his senior season, his third consecutive year as the starting right guard. He led the way for 1,000-yard and second-team all-conference RB Curtis Brinkley in 2008. --NAME--'s solid academic record and character put him in contention for the Draddy Trophy in 2008, while his strength inside put him on some teams' radars as a potential late-round pick.
Rated fifth on PrepStar's top 10 list for offensive linemen in the East.   PrepStar All-East Region selection in 2003.   Rated the top offensive lineman and fifth overall prospect in New England by Rivals.com.   Rated the sixth-best player in New England by SuperPrep.   2003 Worcester Telegram & Gazette First Team Defensive All-Star and Boston Globe All-Conference selection.   Team captain as a junior and senior.   Earned team MVP award as a freshman, defensive MVP as a sophomore, the Coaches Award as a junior and senior, and the Lineman Award as a senior.   Four-year football letterwinner for coach Joe Hickey.   Three-year track and field letterwinner, specializing in the shot put and discus.   Recruited by former assistant coach Jerry Azzinaro.
Good height and strong upper-body build. Could succeed in a zone-blocking system because he can get the line moving in the appropriate direction. Moves his feet well enough to get to linebackers in the box and sustain. Effective combo blocker, punching the tackle and getting to the inside shoulder of the end to make a hole. Will reach block to keep slanting linemen from affecting the play. Can move the linebacker out of the hole using his upper body when trap blocking. Gets down quickly to cut block.
Is not the athlete most teams want on their offensive line. Lumbers when pulling or working in space. Anchors adequately in pass protection, but tends to lean too much and must improve his lower-body strength. Waist-bender whose pad level is often too high. Will get ripped off after the initial hit, even by linebackers. Struggles to adjust to speed when one-on-one inside, whether from blitzers or ends beating the tackle.
-------------------------
T.J._Lang 89746 109
Originally recruited as a defensive lineman, --NAME-- made a remarkable transformation over the last three years. Despite coming into his own as a tackle in 2008, many professional scouts feel that his drive-blocking ability, reach and quick hand placement could see him shift inside to guard or center. 
--NAME-- started 36 consecutive games, including his last 26, at left tackle. He registered 169 knock-downs and 21 touchdown-resulting blocks during his junior and senior campaigns. He had 16 tackles (eight solo) and blocked two kicks during his 43-game career at EMU.
--NAME-- began his prep career at Lakeland High School, lettering in both football and baseball as a sophomore. He transferred to Brother Rice High as a junior, where he helped the team to the state finals and was named the squad's Most Improved Lineman.
As a senior, --NAME-- started on both lines. He earned All-State Division II first-team honors and was ranked 33rd on the Fab 50 list of the Detroit Free Press, adding All-North accolades from that news service. He was named his team's Lombardi Award winner as the Most Outstanding Lineman and was nominated for the Gatorade Player of the Year award in the state of Michigan.
--NAME-- recorded 93 tackles (59 solo) with 8.5 quarterback sacks and one fumble recovery, making the Associated Press All-State Division II squad as a high school senior. He also won the Defensive Line award at the University of Michigan 2004 summer camp. 
In 2005, --NAME-- was one of seven true freshmen to letter at Eastern Michigan. He appeared in all 11 games, seeing action in seven contests on defense while starting the season opener vs. Cincinnati at left defensive tackle. He finished the season with 11 tackles (four solo), as he assisted on a stop behind the line of scrimmage and blocked a kick vs. Western Michigan.
As a sophomore, --NAME-- switched to the offensive line, starting 10 contests at right tackle and two more on the left side. He also switched from jersey #93 that he wore in 2005 to #50, which he'd wear for the rest of his career. He posted 74 knockdowns with seven touchdown-resulting blocks and was named Player of the Game vs. Louisiana-Lafayette. He also collected three tackles (two solos).
--NAME-- started all 12 games at left tackle in 2007, delivering 83 knockdowns and 10 touchdown-resulting blocks. He also blocked a kick and recorded a solo tackle. The team averaged 337.5 yards in total offense as the front wall ranked second in the Mid-American Conference, allowing just 1.42 quarterback sacks per game, the 24th-best figure in the nation.
As a senior, --NAME-- again manned the left tackle slot in all 12 games, garnering All-Mid American Conference recognition. He registered 11 touchdown-resulting blocks to go with 86 knockdowns, as he also came up with a solo tackle, but turned the ball over after handling a reception for a 4-yard loss. The Eagles relied on him protecting the blind side, as EMU ranked 20th nationally in passing, averaging 269.33 yards per game.
No major injuries reported.
Graduated from Brother Rice (Birmingham, Mich.) High School, playing football as a junior and senior for head coach Al Fracassa As a senior, --NAME-- started on both lines, earning All-State Division II first-team honors and was ranked 33rd on the Fab 50 list of the Detroit Free Press, adding All-North accolades from that news service Named his team's Lombardi Award winner as the Most Outstanding Lineman and was nominated for the Gatorade Player of the Year award in the state of Michigan In his final prep campaign, --NAME-- recorded 93 tackles (59 solo) with 8.5 quarterback sacks and one fumble recovery, making the Associated Press All-State Division II squad, helping the team to the state finals and was named the squad's Most Improved Lineman Also won the Defensive Line award at the University of Michigan 2004 summer camp Began his prep career at Lake-land High School, lettering in both football and baseball as a sophomore.
Good height with a thick, strong body. Absolute mauler who works hard every play. Versatile enough to start at all three interior OL spots. Gets down quickly and is effective on cut blocks. Strong enough to stone and pancake his opponent. Fires out of his stance and uses his hands well on run plays, gets inside his man's jersey and doesn't let go. Punches and extends his arms to hold off defenders in pass protection. Good enough feet to get to linebackers, pull and trap. Aware enough to help the tackle and center on the same play. Hustles downfield on screens and reverses to throw the late block.
Must learn to play inside in the NFL because he lacks the athleticism, arm length and hand size to be more than a short-term solution outside. Leans into his man, enabling the tackle to rip him off or pull him forward on a second effort. Tries to grab opponent's jersey on most every play instead of punching and resetting, which will be a problem against quicker defensive tackles.
KRIS DIELMAN, San Diego -- --NAME-- is a former defensive lineman and a relative neophyte as an offensive lineman coming out of college. He's made steady progress thanks to weight-room dedication. With his pass protection skills, he could bring better value as an interior lineman while his body fills out. In a zone blocking scheme, he could find a home at guard. With his hand quickness, he could also be used as a center late in his career.
-------------------------
Ellis_Lankster 89752 220
A star at cornerback and on special teams at Jones County Junior College, --NAME-- earned second-team All-Big East honors in his first year as a starter for the Mountaineers. His 68 tackles, three interceptions and seven pass breakups showed scouts the kind of versatility they covet. One product of this Mobile product's hard work was an invitation home to play at the Senior Bowl. Depending on the defensive scheme, --NAME-- could find himself a home at corner or free safety in the NFL.
JUCO All-America return man who enrolled in January   standout corner from Jones County (Miss.) Junior College where he played for Coach Eddie Pierce   NJCAA all-region   School-record 98-yard interception return for score   Blocked four field goals.
Product of Mobile's C.F. Vigor High, where he played for Coach Kerry Stevenson   also a basketball point guard.
Typical zone corner/free safety prospect.   Plays best when off the line to close quickly on receivers' short routes.   Good in run support, forcing plays inside.   Solid open-field tackler, breaking down well to ensure he gets his hands on the ballcarrier.   Has enough speed to run with receivers down the sideline.   Aggressive enough to jam smaller receivers at the line.   High-points the ball very well, even in traffic, displaying a good vertical and timing.   Runs tough as a kickoff and punt returner.
Some teams will view him as a corner-safety "tweener."   Doesn't have the size or strength to get off blocks of larger receivers, although he has a nice spin move to catch the ballcarrier before he can get by.   Lack of size means he must ride bigger backs to get them off their feet.   Doesn't have great recovery speed when fooled on double moves.   Only adequate hands on interceptions and punt returns.   Is not explosive as a return man.   Must be a good special teamer to stick on a roster early in his career.
-------------------------
Jason_McCourty 89756 203
Rutgers coach Greg Schiano was blessed to have talented twin brothers starting at cornerback. --NAME-- -- who didn't redshirt as did brother Devin -- made 52 tackles, two interceptions and six pass breakups in 2008, his third season as a starter. He has the skills to be at least a solid NFL nickel cornerback, if not more, but his ability on kickoff returns (25.8 yards per attempt) in '08 also opened eyes to his speed and versatility.
Earned All-State (Star-Ledger, Associated Press) and All-League honors as a senior  All-Parochial pick as both a junior and senior out of St. Joseph's (Montvale)  Named to MSG High School Heisman Team  Helped New York team to victory in the 2005 Governor's Bowl  Carried 94 times for 1,083 yards as a senior, averaging a school-record 11.5 yards per carry  15 catches for 407 yards, an average of 27.8 per catch  Accounted for 25 touchdowns for St. Joseph's, which finished the season at 11-1 including a 42-8 win over Pope John in the Parochial Group III Final at Rutgers Stadium  Played defensive back as well, returning an interception 81 yards for a touchdown vs. Paterson Eastside  Gained 125 yards and two touchdowns on just three carries in win over Belleville  Rushed for 135 yards and three touchdowns on three carries vs. Nutley  Ranked by Scout.com as the 38th-best player in New Jersey  Starting guard on 26-2 basketball team.
Owns adequate size but excellent speed on the corner.   Plays off to read the quarterback on most plays, and is able to jump routes and support the run accordingly.   Physical in the open field, able to wrap up on receivers and backs.   Closes quickly on short routes and will hit the receiver.   Good hips, can flip and transition when the receiver reaches him.   Runs with any receiver down the sideline.   Will be an option on kickoff returns because he runs straight up the field with great quickness.   Coverage skills make opposing offenses throw away from him.
Lacks the size to get off blocks on the edge on rushing plays.   Inconsistent jamming receivers at the line of scrimmage.   Falls for quick moves when pressing and allows his man to gain inside slant or outside position.   Gambles to make the big play.   Needs to improve his hands for the interception and ball security on kickoff returns.   Will lose jump balls to taller receivers.
-------------------------
Clinton_McDonald 89758 249
--NAME-- built on his successful 2007 season (55 tackles, 9.5 tackles for loss, four sacks) by starting his senior season strong, getting attention from scouts and media outlets across the country. The first-team All-Conference USA pick (39 tackles, seven sacks) hit a snag, when he was injured against Louisville midway through the season. --NAME--'s build, athletic testing, and scouts' reviews of early season film will likely cause his stock to rise.
Played for Coach Johnny Watson at Jacksonville High Lettered three years in football Named to the Arkansas Democrat-Gazette 5-A top prospect list Helped squad to a 7-4 record and an appearance in the state playoffs Was a two-time all-conference honoree Chosen as 5-A Outstanding Lineman Also selected to the 5-A All-State team Holds the school record in the fire clean at 325 pounds Talented athlete who also lettered in basketball and threw the shot put in track.
Wide-chested with strong builds in the upper and lower body.   Good, not great, first step off the ball.   Has very good straight-line speed to chase down backs down the line and from behind.   When lined up in a three-technique, he shows a real burst off the ball and a nice spin move off either shoulder.   Works hard as a pass rusher if he sees even a slight opening.   Has a strong punch but needs to use it more often.   Has the strength to hold off linemen with one shoulder and stay upright when slanting or in the three-technique spot.
Short and a bit smaller than scouts prefer for nose tackle, but adequate for a three-technique.   Can be engulfed and pushed back by larger guards.   Stays upright against double teams, but usually only gets off to make tackles five or six yards downfield.   Gets a little push into the pocket, but usually gets stopped by a good anchor when bull-rushing.   Must improve his hand technique to get off blocks inside.   Does not hustle or chase as much as you'd think given his athleticism.   Will whiff in the backfield but has good change-of-direction skills to recover.   Six of his seven sacks in 2008 came against Arkansas State and UAB, two squads without a lot of cachet with scouts.   Medical report on his severely sprained left ankle is important in determining his final grade.
-------------------------
William_Middleton 89760 138
Not many corners are named team MVP, but --NAME-- was very deserving of that honor after an All-American senior season. A three-year starter for the Paladins, he saved his best for last: 95 tackles, nine for loss, five sacks, four interceptions and nine pass breakups. Some teams will downgrade him for his lack of height, but --NAME--'s strong build and speed should allow him to overcome that limitation at the next level.
Graduate of Marist (4A) High School in 2004   Football coach was Alan Chadwick   Saw action at cornerback, wide receiver and return specialist   Totaled 148 tackles, 10 interceptions, six pass deflections, two kickoff returns for touchdowns and two blocked punts during his prep career   Also recorded a school record 103-yard interception return and averaged 27.0 yards on 21 kickoff returns   Earned first-team all-county and all-region honors in 2003 after helping his squad to a 14-1 record and state championship with 21-6 triumph over Statesboro in title contest   Two-time Marist defensive player of the year selection   Stole second and third base and then scored the go-ahead run on a bunt in 5-3 state title game victory in 2003.
Has a thicker build throughout his body than most corners.   Lines up outside and in the slot.   Strong enough to press and fast enough to run with any receiver down the sideline.   Stands up against receiver blocks, can either force the play inside or rip off to make the play.   Cognizant zone defender who read the quarterback and close on the ball.   Very good hands for the interception, adjusts to balls thrown behind him.   Likes to hit, but can also wrap or cut tackle in space.   Valued leader on and off the field.
Might be a slot/outside corner "tweener."   Only adequate height and below-average length for his position, but thin and a bit stiff in the hips.   Good straight-line speed but lacks acceleration to recover if beaten.   Gets his hands on the receiver in press but does not knock him off the route.   Inconsistent in his tackling security, might struggle to bring down quicker receivers because of a lack of lateral movement.   Struggles to win jump-ball situations.
-------------------------
Brandon_Myers 89766 202
Despite signing with Iowa in 2004, --NAME--' career seemed at a standstill. Not even listed on the depth chart in the spring of 2006, he developed into a reliable red-zone target as a junior, scoring five touchdowns on just 21 receptions for the season. Again listed as a backup entering his senior season, --NAME-- parlayed injuries by others and his own development into earning first-team All-Big Ten accolades. --NAME-- isn't a special athlete, but in tying for the team lead with four receiving touchdowns in 2008, he is viewed by some as an ascending prospect. Others, however, question if his effectiveness was due to defenses stacking the line of scrimmage in an effort to slow running back Shonn Greene.
High School honors: Class 2A first-team all-state selection by the Des Moines Register and first-team all-conference selection as a senior First-team all-conference and all-state player as a junior Second-team all-conference as a sophomore  Finished prep career holding nine Prairie City-Monroe records, including receptions in a season (33) and career (82); touchdowns in a game (5), season (19) and career (29); points in a game (30) season (116) and career (186); and rushing touchdowns in a game (5) Recorded 992 career rushing yards and 1,237 career receiving yards Averaged 10.6 yards per carry as a senior while rushing for 932 yards and 15 touchdowns Member of prep basketball team that posted a perfect 27-0 season record during senior year, winning Class 2A state championship Named to Class 2-A all-state first team by the Des Moines Register Named captain of all-tournament team at state tournament after averaging 30 points and 14.3 rebounds in three games Had 31 points and 18 rebounds in double-overtime win in state title contest Completed prep basketball career with 2,198 points to become 26th player in Iowa prep history to score more than 2,000 career points Helped team advance to state basketball tournament in four consecutive seasons High school coach was Todd Jones.
Legitimate NFL build. Stout upper body. Good hand placement and upper body strength to assist in pass protection. Shows some balance and lateral quickness to mirror the defender. At least adequate initial quickness off the snap. Flexible enough to dip under the jam to gain a free release. Shows some burst out of his breaks and to gain separation. Not often given opportunities to catch passes in Iowa's offense, but shows at least adequate hands for the reception. Can make the tough grab in traffic.
Lacks the straight-line speed to challenge down the seam. While possessing at least adequate upper body strength, is not explosive. Can get fundamentally lazy when blocking laterally. Stops moving his feet, causing him to remain engaged at the line of scrimmage or in space. Lacks agility in space to make defenders miss. Arrested in December 2007 on a charge of public intoxication and interference with official acts, pled guilty and was fined.
-------------------------
Rich_Ohrnberger 89772 123
--NAME--, tackle Gerald Cadogan and Rimington Trophy-winning center A.Q. Shipley all made first-team All-Big Ten. --NAME--'s toughness inside fit in Penn State's "Spread HD" perfectly; NFL teams using a zone-blocking system will find --NAME-- a good fit.
--NAME-- lettered in football and lacrosse at East Meadow HS. He was a three-year letterman and two-year captain in football for Coach Vincent Mascia. --NAME-- was the 2003 New York AA Player of the Year and was a two-time all-conference, all-county, all-metro and All-Long Island pick. He won the Martone Award as the Most Outstanding Lineman in Nassau County and the Thorp Award as the Most Outstanding Player in Nassau County. He also was selected to play in the Governor's Bowl (New York vs. New Jersey) and the Outback Steakhouse Empire Challenge (New York City vs. Long Island). He did not allow any sacks his senior season and averaged 38.0 yards per punt. On defense, he recorded 151 career tackles, with 11 sacks and 38 tackles for loss. He made 66 stops, with four sacks and 13 TFL as a senior.
Strong mauler with nasty attitude.   Quick and strong hand placement inside his man's jersey.   Good enough foot quickness to angle his tackle inside to create a hole or to reach linebackers at the second level.   Handles quick linebackers well at the point of attack.   Quick set in pass pro.   Anchors well against most tackles and will toss them to the ground if they give up their leverage.   Blocks well on the move, opening cutback lanes for the running back.
Undersized, lacking height and width, but a bit large in the middle.   Is not a great athlete.   Will struggle to move larger tackles.   Doesn't have a dominant punch.   Whiffs against blitzing linebackers and can be over-armed by taller, quicker tackles.   Would be a better fit at center than guard if he can make the move.
-------------------------
Nick_Reed 89786 247
The heart and soul of the Ducks' defense, --NAME-- epitomized as a player with a constant motor who refused to be outworked by the opposition and exhibited a great passion for the game. Not only did he perform at a high level on the gridiron, he also excelled in academics. He became only the second football player at Oregon to ever earn first-team All-American honors on the field (Walter Camp Foundation) and in the classroom (ESPN the Magazine), joining Steve Barnett (offensive lineman) from 1962.
--NAME-- set the school career record with 29.5 sacks, a number that ranks fourth in Pac-10 Conference history and 10th in the NCAA major college ranks. His 51.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage also set an Oregon all-time record and placed fourth in conference annals while ranking 14th in college football history. He registered at least one sack or tackle for loss 23 of his final 26 contests.
At Trabuco Canyon High School, --NAME-- earned All-Orange County Region honors from the Los Angeles Times and Defensive Player of the Year accolades by the Orange County Register. He garnered first-team All-CIF Southern Section, CIF Southern Section Division II co-Defensive Player of the Year and South Coast League Defensive MVP recognition.
--NAME-- also received votes on the Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West balloting. He was credited with 65 tackles, 10 sacks (third in the league) and two fumble recoveries as a senior.
As a true freshman, --NAME-- appeared in 11 games as a reserve left defensive end. He collected five solo tackles with a sack and three stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also excelled on special teams, blocking a punt vs. Arizona State that he advanced 27 yards to set up an Oregon scoring drive.
In 2006, injuries on the defensive front wall thrust --NAME-- into the starting lineup at right defensive end for the team's final 10 contests. He ranked fourth on the team with 30 tackles (15 solos), adding 3.5 sacks and six stops behind the line of scrimmage. He also blocked an extra point vs. Washington State. At the conclusion of the season, he was named to the Academic All-Pac 10 Conference team.
--NAME-- was the major reason Oregon led the nation in tackles for loss in 2007. The All-American second-team and All-Pac 10 Conference first-team choice also added Academic All-American honors. He started all 13 games at left end, leading the conference in both sacks and tackles for loss. His 12 sacks ranked ninth nationally while his 22.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage ranked fifth in the NCAA. He recorded 60 tackles (30 solos) and recovered a fumble.
After establishing himself as one of the elite pass rushers in the country in 2007, --NAME-- proved in 2008 that his junior season was no fluke. He was named All-American and Academic All-American and was a finalist for the Ted Hendricks Award (nation's top defensive end) for the second consecutive year. The All-Pac 10 Conference first-team pick again led the league and ranked fourth nationally with 13 sacks. His 20.0 stops for loss placed him tied for eighth in the NCAA, as he also led the country with five fumble recoveries. He posted 53 tackles (35 solos) and caused two fumbles.
No major injuries reported.
Attended Trabuco Canyon (Mission Viejo, Cal.) High School, playing football for head coach Bob Johnson Earned All-Orange County Region honors from the Los Angeles Times and Defensive Player of the Year accolades by the Orange County Register  First-team All-CIF Southern Section, CIF Southern Section Division II co-Defensive Player of the Year and South Coast League Defensive MVP Also received votes on the Long Beach Press-Telegram Best in the West balloting Credited with 65 tackles, 10 sacks (third in the league) and two fumble recoveries as a senior.
Strong up top with adequate lower-body strength.   Draws chips and double teams regularly due to his high motor.   Uses his stout build to play with leverage at the point, although he does not hold his ground against helping guards.   Effective spin move inside or outside when man-up.   Uses his hands well at the point, able to punch or rip off his man or avoid running back blocks when he has the space to do it.   Varies his attack inside and outside so blockers don't zero in on one move.   Hustles toward the quarterback, downfield and chases down the line.   Lines up on both sides of the line.   Plays on coverage units.
Short for an edge rusher, and has little muscle definition.   Lacks the explosiveness off the snap of other undersized NFL ends.   Gets engulfed by larger offensive tackles.   Can not recover from a wide rush, allowing the quarterback to step up in the pocket.   Sacks often come against lesser tackles and when quarterback holds the ball too long.   Wears down in the fourth quarter against stronger linemen.   May be moved to linebacker, but does not have to the flexibility and change of direction agility to handle coverage responsibilities.   Gets in position to make plays in space, but lacks the quickness to finish against NFL-type backs and receivers.
PARYS HARALSON, San Francisco -- It took a few years for Haralson to acclimate to playing linebacker before emerging last season, and --NAME-- brings the same qualities to the table. At worst, he will be an efficient edge rusher and special teams coverage defender early in his NFL career, but there is just something about him that says he has "it" to put together a pretty decent pro career, whether in the middle (his ability to react to the play and recognize blocking schemes) or at the strong-side (to take advantage of his pass rushing skills). The trick is getting him experience in pass coverage before a team can trust him as an every-down player, but he is the type of guy that can grow with a patient team, later in the draft.
-------------------------
Ryan_Succop 89802 256
An all-conference selection throughout his career, handling kickoff, place-kicking and punting responsibilities. --NAME-- entered his senior season in 2008 highly regarded by NFL scouts. Struggles with an abdominal strain from mid-October through early November resulted in the worst statistical year of his career. --NAME-- had as many missed FGs in one game this season (four against Kentucky) as he had in any other season. After missing 6-of-9 attempts by midseason, --NAME-- reverted back to his accurate ways, making 6-of-7 to close the regular season.
Graduated from Hickory (N.C.) High in 2005  Played for Coach John Worley  Four-time all-conference and two-time all-state performer  Three-time conference Special Teams Player of the Year  In 2004, averaged 41 yards per punt, put 98 percent of his kickoffs in the end zone, was 12-14 FG and 42-42 on PATs  In 2003 he was 7-10 on field goals (long of 53 yards) and made all 38 of his PATs  Three-time all-state selection in soccer  Scored 104 career goals in soccer  Rated the 4th-best kicker in the nation and the 16th-best prospect in the state of North Carolina by Rivals.com.
Versatile and is experienced as a place-kicker, punter and on kickoffs.   Legitimate NFL leg strength.   Has a career long field goal of 55 yards and improved his kickoff depth considerably as a senior.   Accurate.   Entered the 2008 season with a 94.1 accuracy rate on attempts of 39 yards and in.   Mentally strong.   Regained accuracy once he'd recovered from abdominal strain in '08.   Rare size and athleticism for the position.   Athletic enough to break down in space and make the tackle in the open field.
May lack the speed from catch to kick to punt in the NFL.   Was relieved of the punting duties in 2008 after having three punts blocked in 2007.   Can drive the ball low for long field goal attempts but had three kicks blocked in his career.   Very accurate within 40 yards over his career, but is only 3-of-7 from 50-plus.
-------------------------
Sebastian_Vollmer 89814 58
--NAME-- is one of the more unusual stories in this year's draft class. He did not start playing football until he was 14 years old, but still helped his German prep school win two national championships. 
U.S. college coaches lined up to sign --NAME-- after he appeared in the 2004 Global Junior Championships in San Diego. --NAME-- spoke almost no English when he signed with Houston. 
He started out as a 250-pound tight end before growing into a first-team All-Conference USA left tackle as a senior. Although he missed the 2006 season with major back surgery and will turn 25 in July, --NAME--'s upside, size and athleticism means he'll be selected sometime mid-afternoon Sunday on draft weekend.
2006: Missed season following back surgery.
Named to the European All-Star team.   helped lead his prep team to a 25-0 record over his career.   finished second at the European Championship game.   two-time national champion.
Prototypical height and length for the tackle position. Plenty of upside, and could gain another 10-15 pounds of muscle. Good strength to get into the defender's jersey and walk him off the line. Catches and locks onto pass rushers using his size and long arms, rarely getting ripped off initially. Uses his length and footwork to prevent speed rushers from getting his outside shoulder. Fair initial punch that knocks smaller ends off their path. Has quick enough feet to get inside the shoulder of his man on runs away from his side. Picks up inside blitzes well. Adequate getting to linebackers when he can line them up.
Still a bit raw due to inexperience. Played left tackle for UH but is best on the right side in the NFL because he lacks the requisite lateral movement and recovery speed. His pad level is too high on most plays. Will lose the leverage battle and get pushed into the quarterback by stronger pro defensive ends unless he bends his knees and uses his hands effectively. Does not stay with his man if his quarterback scrambles. Could sustain blocks better by moving his feet, as he tends to simply push the defender and lose his balance. Struggles to adjust quickly to late blitzes and at the second level. Houston's pass-happy, spread offense did not allow him to line up with his hand on the ground very often. Must learn to explode from his stance in short-yardage situations.
-------------------------
Jason_Williams 89818 69
One of the most underrated players in the 2009 NFL Draft, --NAME-- was a terror in opposing backfields since shifting to weak-side linebacker from strong safety as a sophomore. In each of his last three seasons, he ranked among the nation's leaders in forced fumbles and tackles behind the line of scrimmage.
As a sophomore, he tied for 10th in the country with three forced fumbles and ranked second in the Gateway Conference with 10.5 stops for loss. In 2007, he placed fourth in the Football Championship Subdivision with five forced fumbles, tying the school and league record. His 16.5 tackles behind the line of scrimmage led the team and conference. He would capture the forced fumble title in the FCS with six in 2008, as he also finished second in the league with 17.0 stops for loss.
--NAME--' 14 forced fumbles set the NCAA FSC career-record and is tied with Adam McGurk of Division II Adams State (2002-05), Kenechi Udeze of Southern California (2001-03), Terrell Suggs of Arizona State (2000-02) and Antwan Peek of Cincinnati (2000-02) for the overall collegiate record. His 42.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage rank seventh in school history, fourth in Gateway Conference annals and 21st in the NCAA FCS ranks.
At DuSable High School, --NAME-- was recognized more for his rushing and passing exploits than that as a linebacker. He led his team to an undefeated mark in the Chicago Public League's Intra-City Central Conference as a senior and was a two-time All-City and All-Section pick. He rushed for 2,988 yards, threw for 3,015 and tallied 71 total touchdowns (35 rushing and 36 passing) in his career.
--NAME-- enrolled as a 200-pound athlete at Western Illinois in 2004, redshirting that season as a scout team strong safety. In 2005, he appeared in 10 games, seeing limited action early in the year while being listed third on the depth chart at strong safety. His special teams play helped earn him a starting position for the team's final two games, as he posted 23 tackles (14 solos) with a stop for a loss and one blocked kick.
--NAME-- continued to excel on special teams in 2006. The All-Gateway Conference honorable mention shifted to weak-side linebacker. He was the only defender to start all 11 games for WIU. He was the recipient of the team's Green Beret Award for his significant contributions to the kicking game. He ranked second on the team with 92 tackles (41 solo), including three sacks and 10.5 stops for loss. He also caused three fumbles.
--NAME-- was fourth nationally with a school single-season record tying five forced fumbles in 2007. The All-American and All-Gateway Conference first-team choice finished second in the voting for league Defensive Player of the Year honors. He led the Leathernecks with 107 tackles (42 solo) and eight sacks. His 16.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage led the conference, as he also recovered two fumbles.
As a senior, --NAME-- was named a consensus All-American and unanimous All-Gateway Conference first-team selection. He finished fourth in the voting for the Buck Buchanan Award, given to the top defensive player in the FCS ranks. He started every game at weak-side linebacker, leading the nation with a school season-record six forced fumbles, the second-best total by a Gateway player. He finished second in the league with a team-high 17.0 stops for loss and had four sacks among his 67 tackles (39 solos).
2005: Did not play vs. Iowa Wesleyan (undisclosed injury).
Attended DuSable (Chicago, Ill.) High School, where he was recognized more for his rushing and passing exploits than that as a linebacker Led his team to an undefeated mark in the Chicago Public League's Intra-City Central Conference as a senior and was a two-time All-City and All-Section pick Rushed for 2,988 yards, threw for 3,015 and tallied 71 total touchdowns (35 rushing and 36 passing) in his career.
Good speed and hustle to chase down plays down the line or from behind. Comes downhill in a hurry, but can change direction if the runner makes a move. Takes on fullback blocks in the hole so others can make plays. Often played as a stand-up rusher. Solid wrap-up tackler in space. Will try to get under the pads of guards to hold his position. Forces turnovers by attacking the ball with his hands after securing the tackle. Active in coverage, with the quickness to stay with tight ends and running backs.
Has a strong safety build, thin in the legs and only adequate upper-body strength. May be a classic inside-outside linebacker "tweener." Played inside quite a bit for but is better on the edge because he lacks the strength to hold up versus NFL interior lineman. Has tight hips. Could get off blocks better to make plays. Inconsistent getting through trash inside. Must learn not to overrun plays.
JAMES HARRISON, Pittsburgh -- This is high praise for an unknown player, but the more film scouts watch on --NAME--, the more they will notice he has the "it" factor. With patient coaching and in the right system, he could turn into one of the better finds in this draft. He plays with excellent field vision and awareness. --NAME-- demonstrates the instincts to quickly track down the ball. He has the change-of-direction agility and lateral movement to string plays wide and hits ballcarriers with force, driving with his legs to push the opponent back through the rush lane.
-------------------------
Pat_McAfee 89872 222
Twice named second-team All-Big East punter, his per-punt average increased from 42.7 to 44.7 in 2008, good enough to make the top 10 in the FBS. West Virginia was among the top FBS teams in net punting; --NAME-- landed 25 punts inside the 20. The four-year kicker also earned second-team All-Big East honors at that position, as he made 17-of-20 field goal attempts including 6-of-7 from 40-plus yards. Trained to play soccer this fall, but quit the team to enhance his NFL draft status.
First team all-conference for Coach Bill Rometo at Plum High   80% of his kickoffs went into the end zone   7-7 on field goals with a long of 48   Rated Number 1 kicker in nation by Scout.com   2003 national Punt, Pass and Kick champion   Won One-on-One kicking competition in Miami with a 65-yarder   Three-year first team all-WPIAL soccer   Honor roll student.
Good, not great, leg strength.   Can get 4.5-second hang-time on punts of 40 yards or longer to force fair catches.   Capable of placing the ball inside the 10.   Handles poor snaps.   Strong last line of defense; has a stout build, can get the angle and is aggressive in tackling returners in the open field.   Snaps his hips through the ball on placements, part of his soccer background.   Holds a full follow-through after placements.
Has a slow three-step delivery (1.4 seconds) when not using a rugby style.   Doesn't get a spiral or turn over most punts.   His longer punts are limited in hang-time (around 4.3 seconds).   Limited directional-kicking ability.   Must get placement kicks in the air more quickly to prevent blocks.   Missed two field goal tries of reasonable distance in the 2007 loss to Pittsburgh at home which cost WVU a shot at the national championship.   Was not accurate from 40-plus yards before 2008, making only 11-of-25 attempts over his first three seasons.   Most of his kickoffs do not reach the end zone; must sacrifice hang-time to get it there.
-------------------------
Vaughn_Martin 90404 113
One of the most talented athletes in the Canadian collegiate ranks, --NAME-- brought back memories of William "Refrigerator" Perry for his exploits as a short-yardage blocker and fullback during his second season with the Mustangs. Certainly in much better physical shape than Perry, he displays excellent explosion off the snap, utilizing that quickness to terrorize quarterbacks.
Having moved to defensive end for the 2008 campaign, --NAME-- played a major role in the team's success en route to winning the Yates Cup and playing for the Vanier Cup (Canadian national title). His ability to handle multiple blockers and contain the inside running game saw his opponents frustrated, as they managed to gain only seven yards on 36 rushing plays (0.19 ypc) directed toward him. With his timing and leaping ability, he also saw his opponent complete just 3 of 16 passes into his area (18.75%) for a mere 6 yards.
Nicknamed "Vicious" by his teammates, the defensive line has come to rely upon him to serve as the unit's anchor. Former teammate and fellow down lineman Tom Dolezel recently stated, "We've been playing really well, but I think it is really because --NAME-- has come in and basically anchored that strong side." 
Born on the island of Jamaica, --NAME-- was raised in Toronto and London, Ontario. He attended South Secondary School, playing football for head coach Mike Stenning. He competed as a defensive end, defensive tackle and fullback in high school, recording 90 tackles with five stops behind the line of scrimmage in 2004. The three-time starter was rated one of the top 12 defensive ends in Ontario by All-Star Football and Weir's Magazine. He also received a two-star prospect rating from Rivals.com.
Prior to beginning his collegiate career, --NAME-- competed for two summers with the Forest City Thunderbirds in the Central Ontario Football League. He also was a member of Team Canada, playing in the 2006 NFL Global Junior Championship in Detroit. He was named to the NFL Global Junior Championship X All-Tournament Team after helping Team Canada to a perfect 5-0 record, including five shutouts. 
That season, he finished fourth on the squad in tackles with 10 (9 solos) and made four tackles for losses (12 yards) in the tournament, including two sacks for minus 9 yards. He recorded three solo hits, including a 4-yard sack, in Team Canada's 10-0 victory over Team U.S.A. in the championship game. He also registered three solo stops, including one for a loss, in a third-round game vs. Team U.S.A and posted his first sack of the tournament in the opening-round game vs. Team Japan.
--NAME--'s stellar performances drew the attention of several United States major colleges. He turned down scholarship offers from Toledo and Ohio University to enroll at Michigan State in 2006, but failed to qualify due to academic transcript issues. He then enrolled at Milford Academy, a prep school in New York.
--NAME-- later returned home to Ontario, where Western Ontario head coach Mickey Donovan convinced the talented athlete to enroll at the university. After a lunch-time meeting, the coach was able to sway him from choosing other interested schools, including Concordia (CIS) and Akron, for the 2007 season. What also helped --NAME-- in his decision was the fact that Chris Marcus, Western's former special teams coordinator, coached him at South Secondary School. 
--NAME-- saw action at defensive tackle and end during his first season at Western Ontario. On the field, he made steady progress each week, finishing the season with 56 tackles (35 solos), three sacks and a fumble recovery. Known both for excellent pass-rushing and run-stopping ability, his versatile defensive skill-set immediately put fear into opposing teams. 
In 2008, --NAME-- performed mostly at defensive tackle earlier in the year, but he also had great success filling in for injured teammate Chris Greaves at defensive end, earning GoodLife Fitness Athlete of the Week honors for his performance at that position vs. Queen's. In 12 games, he collected 36 tackles (22 solos) with 3.5 sacks, 7.5 stops behind the line of scrimmage and 13 pressures. He returned an interception for a touchdown, registered a safety, caused a fumble and recovered two others. He provided stellar blocking at the fullback position, where he scored twice on a pair of 3-yard rushing attempts, finishing with 10 yards on four carries.
Prior to beginning his collegiate career, --NAME-- competed for two summers with the Forest City Thunderbirds in the Central Ontario Football League Also was a member of Team Canada, playing in the 2006 NFL Global Junior Championship in Detroit Named to the NFL Global Junior Championship X All-Tournament Team after helping Team Canada to a perfect 5-0 record, including five shutouts Produced four stops for losses of 12 yards, two sacks for minus 9 yards and ten tackles (9 solos) in tournament action Posted a 4-yard sack and four tackles in Canada's 10-0 win over Team USA in the championship contest Had three solo stops, including one for a loss in a third-round game vs. Team USA Had the first sack of the tournament vs. Japan in the opening round.
No major injuries reported.
Attended London (Ontario, Canada) Central South Secondary School, playing football for head coach Mike Stenning, competing as a defensive end, defensive tackle and fullback 
Recorded 90 tackles with five stops behind the line of scrimmage in 2004 The three-time starter was rated one of the top 12 defensive ends in Ontario by All-Star Football and Weir's Magazine.
--NAME-- has a well-built frame with long arms, good chest muscle definition, tight waist and decent thickness in his thighs and calves. He actually looks a bit lean with his V-shaped torso and will surprise people when they find out he weighs more than 330 pounds. --NAME-- lacks sudden explosiveness, but shows the initial quickness, balance and body control to charge hard in his backside pursuit. He keeps his pads down nicely for a player of his size and this allows him to gain position and hold his base well vs. double teams. He has the functional change of direction agility to work his way down the line. His arm strength lets him consistently gain separation, stuff and shed. He also has the feet to adjust on the move.
He might be at maximum growth potential, as any additional bulk on his frame could impede his explosion off the snap. --NAME-- is still a neophyte on the football field, having just two years of college and one year of prep school experience. He has played mostly on sheer instincts, but is a highly intelligent player who will not have problems retaining plays. --NAME-- plays with good intensity and effort. He is very tough in the trenches.
GRADY JACKSON, Detroit -- Much like when Jackson entered the NFL in 1997, --NAME-- is rawer than sushi when it comes to playing the game of football. He is like a bull in a china shop in the trenches, hitting everything in sight based on sheer instincts rather than knowledge. He will need a patient coach to help him learn the techniques of the game and the team that selects him will have to give him a crash course in how to play American-brand football and help him adjust from the Canadian game, but his athletic ability is awesome and while he is a boom or bust type, with his work ethic and desire don't bet against him.
